6505345
Urban_Huttleston_Broughton,_1st_Baron_Fairhaven
Image:Runnymede-meadow-eghamend.jpg|thumb|right|320px|View, from the Egham Village end of Runnymede, of part of the 182 acres of woodland and water-meadow given the National Trust by Lady Fairhaven and her sons to commemorate Urban Hanlon Broughton Urban Huttleston Rogers Broughton, 1st Baron Fairhaven (31 August 1896-20 August 1966) was a British nobleman, born at Massachusetts in the States, who was usually known as Huttleston Broughton.He was the son of Urban Hanlon Broughton, who made a fortune in the United States around the turn of the twentieth century from mining, railways, and sewer systems. His mother was Cara Leland Rogers Broughton (also born in Massachusetts, USA, in 1867), an American heiress and daughter of Abbie Gifford Rogers and Henry Huttleston Rogers, one of the worlds wealthiest men.Educated in America and at Harrow, Huttleston Broughton served in the 1st Life Guards during War I, and, upon his fathers death in 1929, he was granted the barony, named for his mothers beloved hometown, that had been destined for his father. He did not marry, and, in 1961, a second barony was conferred on him, with the remainder to his brother, Henry Rogers Broughton. The Broughton brothers bought the Abbey estate in 1926 because its position, conveniently close to Newmarket, where they owned the Barton Stud, enabled them to indulge their interest in horseracing, while the surrounding countryside provided very good partridge shooting. Much of the American fortune, which Lord Fairhaven inherited, was energetically deployed in the collection of works of art, and the abbey is now the permanent home of an outstandingly rich collection of furniture, pictures, and objets dart. Fairhaven also laid out one of the largest British gardens of the 20th century. He left the abbey to the National Trust.
6515149
Torrinha
thumb|right|250pxTorrinha is a municipality in the state of So Paulo in Brazil. The population in 2004 was 9,521. The elevation is 802 m.HistoryThe occupation and settlements where today is located in the municipality of Torrinha been characterized by advancing the frontiers of colonization of the interior of the country in the search for wealth. 17th and 18th centuries in this portion of the Sao Paulo area was cut by paths of tropeiros and travelers who made their landing. With the need for supplies of food, supplies and services ranging from repairs, emerged fledgling business and service delivery, enabling the establishment of the first settlers of the region and the formation of populated areas. This process of occupation intensified with the donation of Sesmarias which gave way and outlined the major farms, embryos of future urban areas. The Land Law of 1850 benefited from the arrival of people from other regions of the country that we have established themselves with subsistence farming in areas near the small village in training. Through documents and records, it is known that some families torrinhenses has lived here since 1850. That way we can say that the families Fonseca Costa, Mello, Dias, Ferreira, Ferraz, Gomes, Ribeiro del Prado, Dias Ramos, Carvalho, Franco de Moraes, Souza, Barros, Teixeira, Milk, Marques, Paiva, France, Pinto, Melchert , Barbosa, Bueno are considered pioneers. Historically, Jose Antunes de Oliveira is considered the founder of Torrinha, theyve donated to the Bishopric of Sao Paulo a small area where it was built a chapel in honor of San Jose (where the current matrix), considered the patron saint of the city. It is estimated that this fact made around 1870, ie, nineteen years before the Republic. In 1880, documents of the time, record the arrival of Jerome Martins Coelho, grandson of Lord of Cocais, Coming from the Edge of Mata, Minas Gerais, we have acquired large amounts of land that reached the localities of Santa Maria da Serra, Torrinha, Brotas Two and streams. It was installed for a long time on land where today is the Power Plant of the Three Jumps and built this ranch one of the first Presbyterian churches of the state. During this period other families were coming and the village was acquiring life and with the arrival of Pope Benedict Lacerda, who was the son of the Baron de Araras, Benedict Lacerda Guimaraes and Mrs. Manuel Franco, in 1886, the little village has become more prominent. Benedict Lacerda had just returned to their homeland, coming from Germany, where he studied at the Polytechnic University of Hannover, specializing in chemical and mining. Accepted the challenge and came to work on the land purchased by Baron. It became one of the most important figures in the history of the city. To him is attributed the creation of the District Police in 1892 and District of Peace in 1896. The economic development of this region began building around the 19th century with the introduction of sugar culture. The cultivation of sugar cane in the city of Torrinha due to its proximity of the areas of sugar Piracicaba, Araraquara and San Carlos. Meanwhile local conditions did not favor the permanence of that culture. The cycle of sugar cane spurred the settlement and colonization, favoring the introduction of coffee growing and encouraging the arrival of immigrants. The coffee culture has been introduced in the city at the end of the 19th century and its development is associated with the construction of the railroad company Paulista de Estradas de Ferro, inaugurated on September 7, 1886 under the name of railway station of Santa Maria and later Torrinha. The station represented the largest force in the development of the city that needed a means of disposal and filing of its main agricultural product, coffee, but also has allowed for the transport of passengers between them immigrants. GeographyLarge areas consisting of basaltic and sandstone slopes comprising approximately 80 km lie within the perimeter of Torrinha, inside which around 34 canyons are located. The potential for tourist attractions associated with this geological feature is indisputable once that walls up to 100 feet tall, beautiful waterfalls, caves of sandstone and basalt, and even a gallery forest and well preserved primary hillsides can be found in narrow valleys still unexplored. Torrinha is part of the western Sao Paulo plateau, which includes the geotectonic unit called Basin, where accumulation of thick sedimentary masses and basaltic volcanic eruptions occurred in the Tertiary period (Cenozoic Age - between 70 and 12 million years), caused underground tectonic and erosive processes; hence the emerging festooned-scarp relief called cuestas () arranged in arcs towards the Highlands, which encompasses the Torrinha Stone as well. The municipality also has about 5% of its original native vegetation preserved. Of this total, almost 100% is composed of vegetation on slopes. Savannah and broad-leaved tropical forest species still exist in small isolated areas, although they have been almost completely decimated for being originally considered proper for agriculture and stock breeding. Fortunately, the presence of numerous rock walls and slopes that sprang from the cuestas, primarially an embarrassment for the settlers from the beginning of the 20th century, preserved this natural and important sanctuary treasure for biodiversity in the state of Sao Paulo. eo:Torrinhabpy:it:Torrinhamg:Torrinhanl:Torrinhano:Torrinhapl:Torrinhapt:Torrinharo:Torrinharu:vi:Torrinhavo:Torrinhawar:Torrinha
6531113
Syndicate_of_Seven
The Syndicate of Seven is the name given to the original members of the Broken Hill Mining Company formed in 1883, who lodged applications for mining leases along the Line of Lode at Broken Hill in South Wales, Australia.The members, who all worked at the remote Mount Gipps station, were:-#George McCulloch (1848  1907)  station manager.#Rasp (1846  1907)  a rider, who was interested in prospecting, recognised the importance of the site and pegged out the first mining lease.#Philip Charley (1863  1937)  a young man learning to be a sheep farmer, employed as a rider.#David James (1854  1926)  a contractor employed to sink water tanks and mend fences.#James Poole (1848  1924)  an employee of David James.#George Urquhart (1845  1915)  a bookkeeper and overseer#George Lind (1861  1941)  a storekeeper.right|Philip Charley in 1887Each of the above seven contributing the sum of 70 each.(Curtis 1908, and Camilleri 2006).In September 1883 they pegged seven  blocks (blocks No 1016) along the exposed lode at Broken Hill, thus securing almost the whole of the easily worked ore (Curtis, 1908).The Syndicate of Seven was masterminded by George McCulloch (Camilleri, p17, 2006).The initial assay results were not encouraging and Poole, Urquhart and Lind sold their share before the boom days and flotation of Broken Hill Proprietary in 1885 (Curtis, 1908 and Camilleri, 2006).References*Leonard Samuel Curtis, The History of Broken Hill, Its Rise and Progress, Frearsons Printing House, Adelaide, South Australia, 1908.*Blainey, G. (1964) The Rush that never ended: A history of Australian mining, Melbourne, Melbourne University Press, pp 142148.*Jenny Camilleri, In The Broken Hill Paddock, printed by Openbook Australia 2006 ISBN 0-646-46245-8.
6538221
Satrapy_of_Armenia
footnotes                The Satrapy of Armenia (; Old Persian: Armina or Arminiya), also known as Orontid Armenia () after the ruling Dynasty, was one of the satrapies of the Empire in the 6th century BC, which later became an independent kingdom. Its capitals were Armavir and Yervandashat. History  Origins Shortly after the collapse of Urartu at the hand of the Medes and Scythians, the territory was conquered by the Empire and incorporated as satrapies of the land of Armina (in Persian; Harminuya in Elamite; Urashtu in Bablylonian).thumb|left|An Armenian tribute bearer carrying a metal vessel with griffin handles. 5th century BC Orontid Dynasty The Orontid Dynasty, or known by their native name, Yervanduni, was a hereditary Armenian  dynasty and the rulers of the successor state to the Age kingdom of Ararat.()( Tiratsyan, Gevorg.  (Yerevanduniner).  Soviet Encyclopedia. vol. iii. Yerevan:  Academy of Sciences, 1977, p. 640.)(History of Armenia, of Chorene, http://www.vehi.net/istoriya/armenia/khorenaci/index.html)(Xenophon mentions an Armenian king named Orontid in his Cyropaedia. He was an ally of the Great with whom he hunted. Tigranes paid tribute to Astyages.)(Krause, Todd B. and John A.C. Greppin, and Jonathan Slocum. The Yervanduni Dynasty. The  A. Richard Diebold Center for Indo-European Language and Culture at the of Texas. Jan. 22, 2009.) Of probable  Iranian origin,(Garsoan, Nina (1997). The Emergence of Armenia in  The Armenian People from Ancient to Modern Times, Volume I, The Dynastic Periods: From Antiquity to the Fourteenth Century. G. Hovannisian (ed.) New York: St. Martins Press, pp. 46-47. ISBN 0-312-10169-4.) members  of the dynasty ruled  Armenia intermittently  during the period spanning  the sixth century to at least  the second century BC, first as client kings or  satraps of  the Median and  Achaemenid empires who established an independent kingdom after  the collapse  of the Achaemenid empire, and later as kings  of Sophene and Commagene who eventually succumbed to the  Empire.The Orontids established their supremacy over Armenia around the time of the Scythian and Median invasion in the 6th century BC.(Tiratsyan, Gevork.  (Yerevanduniner). Armenian Encyclopedia. vol. iii. Yerevan, Armenian SSR: Academy of Sciences, 1977, p. 640.) Its founder was I (). His son Orontid united his forces with the Great and killed Medias king. of Chorene calls him the wisest, most powerful and bravest of Armenian Kings. From 553 BC to 521 BC Armenia was Achaemenid Empires ally, but during Is reign, he decided to conquer Armenia. He sent an Armenian named Ddari to suffocate the revolt, later substituting him for the Persian Vaumisa who defeated the Armenians on May 20, BC. Around the same time, another Armenian by the name of Arakha, son of Haldita, claimed to be the son of the last king of Babylon, Nabonidus, and renamed himself IV. His rebellion was short lived and was suppressed by Intaphrenes, Darius bow carrier. After five raids Armenia resisted.Greek cmomander and historian Xenophon provided important information on the Orontid Armenia. After Battle of Gaugamela (331 BC) Orontes III restored independence in Armenia. But in 201 BC, Armenia was conquered by Artashes, an Armenian commander in Seleucid Empire, who was also a descendant of the Orontid dynasty. The last Orontid king Orontes IV was killed, but the Orontids continued to rule in Sophene and Commagene until the 1st century BC. In two inscriptions of king I of Commagene on his monument at Nemrut an Orontes, called Aroandes (son of Artasouras and husband of Artaxerxess daughter Rhodogoune), is reckoned, among others, as an ancestor of the Orontids ruling over Commagene, who traced back their family to I.Armenia as Xenophon saw itGreek mercenary soldiers, ten thousand in number, who had been aiding the younger Cyrus of Persia against his brother Artaxerxes, returned home in 401 BC, after the defeat and death of Cyrus at Cunaxa. On their way back, they passed through Armenia, and the Anabasis (going up), written by Xenophon, their leader, contains some valuable information about that country. Their precise itinerary has not been definitely traced, but according to the generally accepted theory, they crossed the Centrites (Kentrides) River, the modern BohtanSu, north of Til, reached the Teleboas River, the modern KaraSu, in the plain of Mush, and then the Euphrates near Manazkert, fording it where it was only knee-deep. Thence they marched to Olti, the country of the Taochci (the Armenian province of Taiq), south of Kars. From the great rich and populous city of Cumnias, in the Scythian country (the more modern Cumri, still later Alexandropol and now Leninakan), they proceeded through the area of Zarishat and south of Ardahan, and finally through the mountains of the Macroni and Kolchi tribes to the Black Sea port of Trebizond.thumb|left|Silver Rhyton, Yerznka, Armenia, Fifth Century BCE.Armenia is described by Xenophon as a vast and rich country, with Orondas(Orontes) (Erouand, Ervanduni) ruling as satrap and Tiribaz as uparkos or vice-governor. In Xenophons time the Armens had not yet occupied the plain of Ararat, which was then inhabited by Saspeirs, Alarodians (Urarteans) and the oldest native tribes. The Kartuchi (Korduq of the Armenian geography), living in the south of the Centries, were a warlike people, not subjects of the Persians. They and the Armens were in almost continuous conflict, which, says Xenophon, explains why there were no villages in existence on the right bank of the Centrides, in the vicinity of modern Serd.Armen kinship with Khald-UrarteansThe Kartuchi were a sedentary people, with a comparatively high degree of civilization. Their dwellings were described by the Greek soldiers as elegant and furnished with many copper utensils. They had plenty of provisions and wine kept in cemented cisterns. According to Strabo, they were skilled architects, experts in the tactics of besieging fortresses. Their arms consisted of bows and slings. The bows were one and a half yards long, and the arrows more than a yard. This mode of life does not harmonize with cattle-growing nomadic people, such as the Kurds. The Armens therefore, thinks Marquart, must have been kindred of the Khald-Urarteans. The army of Orondas, says Xenophon, besides Armens, included Mards and Khaldian mercenaries. The latter were a doughty people, noted for their long shields and spears. The Khaldian soldiers of Orondas are considered to have been the inhabitants of Sassoun and the Khoyt Mountains, who maintained their independence until their assimilation with the Armens. As to the mercenary Mards, they were, according to Herodotus, an Iranian nomadic tribe, to be identified, in Marquarts opinion, with the modern Kurds. The tenth century Arabian historian Masoudi states that the Kurds acknowledged as their ancestor the chieftain Kurd, the son of Mard. In Armenian history the Kurds have been known as the Mar people.The district of Mardistan, in historic Armenia, corresponds to Artaz, west of the modern Maku, South Iran. The district of Mardali (Mardaghi) must have been located to the south of Erzerum, north of the Bingl sources. The Mards of this section of the country were evidently immigrants from the South, says Adontz. The bulk of the tribe occupied one of the southern areas of Vaspurakan (Van), near the upper course of the Centrides River. Xenophon mentioned particularly the extremely fierce and hardy Chalyb tribe, called Chaldaioi by Strabo, living in the Pontic Mountains, and mostly engaged in iron mining and forging. (The Greek marchers covered the distance through this coastal area  50 parasangs or 150 miles  in seven days.) Several authors classify this people as being of the same stock as the Khaldi-Urarteans. The Taochi and the Phasian tribes, neighbors of the Chalybs, who likewise offered stiff resistance to the Greeks, are represented in the Taiq and Pasian districts of Armenia.The above-mentioned tribes and several others, including the Kimmerian-Scythian settlers from southern Russia, dating from the 8th century BC, were all independent of Persia. Scythian tribes, the Saspeirs of Herodotus, had occupied considerable areas extending from Colchis to Media  around modern Nakhjavan and as far as Kars, Leninakan and the plain of Ararat. Alongside the Kimmerians and Scythians should be listed the Sarmatian tribe, which includes the Siraqs and the Gogs, after whom the Armenian provinces of Shirak and Gougarq seem to have been named. The Mesoch-Mushkians, the Outians and the Pactians were also among the inhabitants of the Armenian plateau, each having its own language or dialect, and particular kind of social life and culture. They were all eventually assimilated with the Armens, adding their numbers to the larger elements from the Khaldi and the Hittites.Armen economics and commerceDespite the agreement entered into between Tiribaz and the Greek chieftains, some of their soldiers insolently burned some of the villages where they were to stop. They even had the audacity to capture the tent of Tiribaz  who, relying on the treaty, seems to have been unprepared  and carried away his silver-footed bedstead and his cups, as well as his bakers and cup-bearers (Xenophon).Finding the villages evacuated, the Greeks spent seven days in sumptuous eating and drinking. The tables everywhere were loaded with the meats of lamb, goat, pig, veal and chicken, as well as bread of barley and wheat. They drank beer from a great jar, sucking it through a tube. The horses of Armenia, says Xenophon, were smaller than those of Persia, but livelier. Being told that horses were sacrificed to the sun, Xenophon gave his old horse, in exchange for a foal, to a village chief, to be sacrificed, after being fattened.Land of plentyBesides plenty of wheat, barley and cereals, the Armen villages had in store raisins, perfumed wine, sesame, fragrant oil of almonds and turpentine. The people were both cattle-breeders and agriculturists. They exported many horses. Herodotus calls the Armens polyprobatoi, rich in animals. Distinction should be made, however, between the civilization in the different parts of the country. Stately houses with towers on the banks of the Centrides River were in striking contrast to the underground dwellings near the sources of the Euphrates. The rural life of the Armens was indicative of a patriarchal or family character. A group of villages was surrounded with barricades and was governed by a village chief or Komarch (archon tes komes) representing the satrap. Payment of taxes to the Persian king was made collectively. The absence of cities was noticeable. Various clans, settled in villages under local chiefs, supplied a specified number of soldiers to the army of the nearest petty king. A general of Darius was one of these kings. By the large numbers of the Armenian army serving under the Great Persian monarch  recruited from one section of the Armenian plateau  we are led to believe that all of the comparatively small number of new settlers were soldiers. The same was true in the Georgian and Albanian lands of the Caucasus, as pointed out by the Georgian historian, J. Tchavakhishvili. The word eri in the ancient Iberian (Georgian) language meant both people and soldiers. The Medes, after subduing the kingdom of Urartu, utilized the Armens in keeping that turbulent people under subjection. Marquart notes that the settling of the warlike Armen colonists in the strategic places in the Armenian highlands was because of their military capacity. From all this, Manandian reaches the conclusion that, as the ancient Slavons, so the ancient Armens were in the period of warring democracy. The same may be said of the Medes and the Persians of old, whose democratic organization and public assemblies point to their having a soldier population.Hence the destruction in the ancient East, even as in the medieval West, of the cultural great powers, had been mainly achieved by the socalled barbarian new peoples, such as the Medes, Persians and Armens. Applying the principle to the Armens, Prof. Marr has remarked, And now there succeeded, one after the other, warlike Aryan peoples, just as in later times came inrushing masses of Turks. These Aryan races who, at that time, were certainly savages by comparison with the natives, were nevertheless strong in their military organization, and subdued the culturally higher races, intermixed with them and created a new world.Attention is called by Manandian to the fact that the commercial intercourse between Babylon and Armenia was carried on for the most part by the Assyrians. Business transactions, limited in Armenia in those days, were principally in the hands of the Semitic peoples, while the Armenians were essentially farmers and cattle-breeders. See also *Dynasty*Urartu*Empire*of Armenia (Antiquity) Notes 
6551850
Timbarra_Gold_Mine
The Timbarra Gold Mine was a highly controversial gold mine located on the Timbarra Plateau, at the head waters of the Clarence River, near New South Wales, Australia. The gold ore body consisted of a greisen type granite. The protracted controversy attracted national and international attention, and catalysed an anti-cyanide extraction campaign in Australia.(Mining Amendment (Cyanide Leaching) Bill 2004, presented to the NSW Parliament http://www.rainforestinfo.org.au/gold/cyanide.htm)Mine historyThe mine was initially developed in the late 1990s by a medium-sized mining company, Ross Mining. After six months the mine went into care and maintenance, and never re-opened. Delta Gold acquired the mine through a take-over of Ross Mining. Eventually the mine was acquired by Dome who were in turn taken over in 2006 by Gold.Placer Dome undertook an intensive rehabilitation programme at the mine site, setting new standards for mining rehabilitation in New South Wales.ControversyTimbarra Gold Mine was subject to intensive protest for several reasons(Memo (2002) and Press Release (2001), Big Scrub Environment Center):* The perceived risk of pollution to the Clarence River, especially from the use of the process.* High diversity of threatened species, including rare frogs, on the site.* Disturbance to an Aboriginal site.* Unsuitable site for heap-leach cyanide mining due to wetland conditions and high rainfall.Ross Mining countered the criticism with arguments in favour of the mine:* Mine provided needed employment and economic stimulus to the local Tenterfield district.* Cyanide would be contained in a closed system designed to handle a one-in-400-year heavy rainfall event.* Mine site was not pristine, being subject to disturbance from previous mining.Anti-mine action took on different forms:* Direct action, including roadblocks by protestors, with over 100 arrests.* Court cases by Aboriginal native title claimants and environmentalists.(Timbarra Protection Coalition Inc v Ross Mining NL 1998 NSWLEC 19 (23 February 1998)http://www.austlii.edu.au//cgi-bin/disp.pl/au/cases/nsw/NSWLEC/1998/19.html?querytimbarra%20)* An intensive media campaign.The controversy surrounding the mine was the subject of a 2002 documentary, Demon Fault, which was commissioned by Australias Broadcasting Service and featured miners, protesters, environmental and legal specialists, local farmers and landowners in a protracted battle over the mining operation.LitigationThe project was the subject of much litigation in the NSW courts. Ross Mining NL had been granted a development consent by the Tenterfield Shire Council pursuant to the EP&A Act 1979. Under s. 77(3)(d1) EPAA, a Species Impact Statement (SIS) was required to be submitted with an application for development consent if the development is likely to significantly affect threatened species. The respondent did not submit a SIS, and the TPC (the applicants) sought to rely upon this to invalidate the development consent. Talbot J who heard the Class 4 proceedings in the Land and Environment Court held that the decision of the Council to accept the application without a SIS was not reviewable as it was not an error of jurisdictional fact and, accordingly, refused to admit evidence on the issue of likely to significantly affect threatened species.The decision of Talbot J of the Land and Environment Court was appealed to the Supreme Court in Timbarra Protection Coalition Inc v Ross Mining NL 1999 NSWCA 8;(1999) 46 NSWLR 55; 102 LGERA 52. The central issue for determination was whether the decision of council to accept a development application without Species Impact Statement (SIS) was reviewable. The Supreme Court had to rule on the question of whether a development likely to significantly affect threatened species involves a jurisdictional fact and whether evidence of the existence or non-existence of that fact was admissible in appeal from councils decision. Spigelman CJ held that the issue of likely to significantly affect threatened species involves a jurisdictional fact. It was held that the decision of council regarding need for SIS was reviewable and related evidence was admissible.ClosureThe mine was closed in 2001 after heavy rainfall resulted in two successive overflows from the cyanide ponds vindicated concerns about the site. Fortunately, cyanide extraction had ceased and actual cyanide levels were low.Then owners, Delta Gold, undertook a Mine Closure Plan which included former protestors as stakeholders. This resulted in a pioneering consensus approach to the rehabilitation that continued throughout the Mines ownership by Placer Dome.The impact from the improved road access to the mine site is an ongoing concern to environmentalists as it has opened up the Timbarra Plateau to potential development, especially agriculture.See also*in Australia*issues in AustraliaReferences
6562580
McIntyre_Mines
The McIntyre mine s an abandoned underground gold mine in Schumacher, Ontario, Canada, which has earned a place in Canadian mining history as one of the nations most important mines. Its iconic headframe, located near downtown Timmins, has come to represent the entire Gold Rush.  The McIntyre also yielded a considerable amount of copper over its life.  There has been an extensive degree of rehabilitation and exploration work performed in and around the old McIntyre Mine property in recent years, and the Porcupine Joint Venture has yet to decide whether or not to continue spending hundreds of millions of dollars on mining out the property or continuing with a closure plan(2007).HistoryPorcupine was formed in 1911, adding land staked by Sandy McIntyre to nearby ground obtained by P. Bickell. Although the initial assays were lean, Bickell kept the company afloat through tough times. Later, as grades improved, he obtained additional ground. In 1919, Bickell left the investment business to become president and then chairman of McIntyre-Porcupine Mines.Between 1912 and 1955 production was valued at $230 million and the company paid $62 million in dividends to shareholders.McIntyre sold his interest for $65,325, of which $60,000 was never collected. He was awarded a life pension for the use of his name although his real name was Alexander Oliphant. The McIntyre (Number 11) headframe was completed in 1927. The six-compartment shaft excavation underneath it was  deep and 160,000 tons of rock, as well as 40,000 tons of water, were removed in the process. The project used 240,000 pounds of powder to blast the rock and  of Douglas fir to timber the shaft.In its early days the McIntyre mine was a nightmare of problems. It was remarked it is doubtful if any major mining corporation anywhere was ever established on a shakier foundation. Mine manager Ennis told how he ran to the bank with hot bullion bars to cover a payroll and how he disappeared underground to hide from creditors.Overcoming the obstacles (thanks to Ennis) the McIntyre Mine went on to set a long list of firsts in mining and milling practices, as well as in health and safety. It was the first mine in Canada to have a metallurgist on the mill staff and employing a graduate engineer as mine superintendent. It was also the first in Canada to use rubber liners in milling and the first in the Porcupine camp to apply square-set and cut-and-fill stope mining. Gunitting was developed there it adapted and introduced flotation to gold milling. They were the first in Ontario to sink a shaft to below 4,000 feet.Always the innovator, Ennis took the lead in mine safety in establishing procedures which gave a daily report on safety conditions underground, a standard that is common today. Under Enniss leadership, McIntyre became internationally famous when it tackled the serious health problem of silicosis. European researchers had discovered that the scarring of lungs caused by silicosis was the result of a complex chemical reaction between silica particles and lung tissue. A McIntyre research group which included the world-renowned Banting Institute of the of Toronto pursued the goal of finding a way of eliminating or reducing the solubility of silica particles by using small quantities of metallic aluminum dust in a two-stage dry that miners passed when they returned to surface. The non-profit McIntyre Research Foundation was formed to further the use of the treatment throughout the world mining industry.From 1912 to 1988 there were 37,529,691 tons milled, producing 10,745,361 ounces of gold, an overall grade of 0.29 ounces per ton.See also*of mines in OntarioExternal links* Canadian Mining Hall of Fame* Porcupine Mining Area
6582549
FC_Tatabnya
  FC Tatabnya is a Hungarian football club based in Tatabnya. They play their home games at Stadion Gyula Grosics.  History The Tatabnyai Sport Klub was founded on February 6, 1910 by Frei, a mining engineer.  At this time several Hungarian towns outside of Budapest had formed football clubs - Debrecen, Miskolc, Gyr.The First World War weakened the team, but in the 1920s the team was still without a doubt the most popular in Tatabnya. Professionalism was introduced into the League, but the team couldnt afford this, and stuck with amateur players. After the end of the Second World War in 1947 the team reached the first division. Current squad 2011 / 2012  (c) European cup history  UEFA Cup Winners Cup  UEFA Intertoto Cup  UEFA Cup  Selected former managers *  Hidegkuti (1966)*  Zambrano (2008-09) Supporters * Ultri The most famous ultras group in Tatabanya. The Ultri was founded on 2000 by some young people.They will be 10 years old the next year. External links * http://www.imscouting.com/teams/hungary/fc-tatabanya/squad/*  Official site*  Turul Ultri Official site* Detailed international matches listTatabnyaTatabnyaClub TatabnyaTatabnyaTatabnyaTatabnyaja:FCTatabnya( )
6595546
Sydney_Beaumont
Bangor CitySydney Beaumont (8 October 18841939) was an English professional footballer and football manager. He played at both half-back and left-wing during his career.Beaumont was born in Wrestlingworth, Bedfordshire, and began his career with Colchester Town. He moved on to Lincoln City, making his league debut in the 1904-05 season. However, he made just five league appearances for the Imps before joining Bedfordshire side Biggleswade & District.He joined Watford in 1909, playing in the Southern League. He played 25 times for Watford before joining Preston North End in 1911, but made just one league appearance before joining Merthyr Town in the 1912 close season. He spent just one season with Merthyr, making fifteen appearances, before joining Troedyrhiw in the summer of 1913. He later finished his playing career with Llanelli.In the summer of 1923, Beaumont was appointed as manager of Third Division South side Aberdare Athletic. Aberdare finished 9th in the 1925/26 season, but a combination of circumstances, including industrial action amongst the local mining community which affected attendances and the burning down of a wooden grandstand, meant that Aberdares poor financial situation deteriorated. At the end of the 1926/27, Aberdare failed to gain re-election to the league and were replaced by Torquay United. Beaumont left that summer, but was soon appointed as manager of Blackpool, another club with severe financial problems at that time. He took over from Frank Buckley and immediately began to dismantle the team and bring in big-money names. His outlook was different from that of his predecessor, and his overhaul of tactics resulted in problems. The team struggled, losing five of their first six league games (a draw at Swansea on the opening day being the exception to the rule). One tactic that did work, however, was his moving Tremelling from centre-forward back to half-back, which resulted in a fruitful partnership with Hampson (a player Beaumont had brought to the seaside).Being a former Preston North End player hardly endeared Beaumont to the Blackpool faithful. As the Seasiders struggled in Division Two, criticism of Beaumont grew. Eventually, in May 1928, with the team in the bottom three, he resigned.(Calley, Roy. Blackpool: A Complete Record 1887-1992, 1992. ISBN 1-873626-07-X)Two months later, he took over as secretary-manager of Bangor City.See also*F.C. season 1927-28References
6610723
Uralmash
Image:Ural Bucket.jpg|frame|right|A bucket of one of the first Uralmash excavators with a Pobeda car parked on it, 1952Uralmash is a heavy machine production facility of the Russian engineering corporation OMZ. The facility is located in Yekaterinburg, Russia. The surrounding residential area where workers live is also called Uralmash.Uralmash () is an abbreviation of , Uralskiy Mashinostroitelnyy Zavod, literally Urals Machine-Building Plant.  Historically, the plant was also called , Uralskiy Zavod Tyazhelogo Mashinostroyeniya, Ural Heavy Machinery Plant or , UZTM, and for a time carried the honorary name of Ordzhonikidze Ural Heavy Machinery Plant, after Ordzhonikidze.HistoryThe Ural Heavy Machine Building Plant began operations in 1933 in compliance with the plans of the Government of the USSR for the industrialization of the country. During the pre-World War II period, Uralmash manufactured its products (furnace equipment, sintering machines, mills, presses, cranes, etc.) for the mining and metallurgical industries located in the Urals and Siberia. The majority of these products were produced from individual designs. At the same time the plant began to develop military equipment, with the production of F.F. Petrov designed Howitzer M-30.During War II large-scale production of armoured materiel was organized at the plant. At first the plant manufactured armoured tank hulls, later expanding to production of T-34 tanks and the SU-122, SU-85, and SU-100 gun tank destroyers based on the T-34 tank design. The self-propelled gun mounts built at Uralmash demonstrated their effectiveness on the battlefield as a successful combination of maneuverability of T-34 tanks and huge fire power of ordnance pieces.After World War II, the state made large investments in the reconstruction and expansion of the Uralmash plant. This modernisation favoured both increased output and the production of new machines and equipment--shovels, rigs, crushers and mills.In the 1950s the state began efforts to equip the aviation and rocket industries with heavy hydraulic presses. Uralmash, in response to this new demand, created a range of this type of equipment. In 1949 the plant produced the first excavator. In 1960s the plant designed and manufactured draglines with booms 90-100 m long. Now more than 200 walking draglines are in operation at mines in Siberia and the Far East. One third of the total coal amount produced by the open casting is mined with the help of draglines.The drilling rigs manufactured by Uralmash were of prime importance in the development of oil and gas regions of the USSR, including West Siberia with its severe climate. The extra deep drilling rigs designed and manufactured at the plant made it possible to reach the depth of 13 km (at the Superdeep Borehole) and to obtain for the first time rock samples approximately 3 billion years old. In addition to land-based rigs, Uralmash also designs off-shore drilling equipment. In accordance with Russian Federation law, Uralmash was transformed in December 1992 into an open-end joint stock company under the name The Ural Heavy Machine Building Plant. In 1996 Uralmash it became part of OMZ, one of Russias largest engineering corporations, founded and initially led by Kakha Bendookidze.In February 2007 OMZ and Metalloinvest agreed to create a common manufacturing complex. OMZ contributed its holdings in Uralmash to the joint venture while Metalloinvest contributed its holdings in ORMETO-YuUMZ. The consolidation will result in the creation of a large machine-building conglomerate with a leading position in the CIS metallurgical equipment market with a joint market share in the metallurgical equipment segment in Russia exceeding 40%.The first director of Uralmash was A. P. Bannikov. The current director is Oleg Danchenko.External links* Official OMZ site (english version)* Official sitees:UralmashOuralmach de Iekaterinbourgnl:Oeralmasj  uk:
6624377
Otto_Piene
Otto Piene (born 18 April 1928 in Laasphe, of Westphalia) is a German artist. He lives and works in Dsseldorf and Massachusetts.BiographyImage:Otto Piene.jpg|220px|right|thumbnail|Otto Piene by WollehOtto Piene was born 1928 in Laasphe and was raised in Lbbecke. Between 1949 and 1953 he studied painting and art education at the Academy of Art in Munich and the Dsseldorf. He was lecturer at the Fashion Institute in Dsseldorf.  From 1952 to 1957 he studied philosophy at the of Cologne.He was a Visiting Professor at the of Pennsylvania beginning in 1964. From 1968 to 1971, he was the first Fellow of the MIT for Advanced Visual Studies (CAVS), founded by Kepes. In 1972, he became a Professor of Environmental Art at MIT. In 1974 he succeeded Kepes as director of the CAVS, in which position he served until September 1, 1993.The of Maryland, Baltimore County awarded Piene an honorary of Fine Arts in 1994. In 1996, he received the Sculpture Prize of the Academy of Arts and Letters, New York.  With  Uecker, Mack and Visser he founded in 2008 the international ZERO foundation. The foundation has the ZERO archives from the three Dsseldorfer artists as well as documents and photos from other related artist.WorksFile:Silver Fire, acrylic and burning on linen by --Otto Piene--, 1973, --The Contemporary Museum, Honolulu--.jpg|thumb|right|300px|Silver Fire, acrylic and burning on linen by Otto Piene, 1973, Contemporary Museum, HonoluluIn 1957, Piene and Mack founded the group ZERO. In 1961, Uecker joined the group.  In 1957 he developed the Grid Picture, a type of stencilled painting made from half-tone screens with regularly arranged points in single colours (yellow, silver, white or gold), for example Pure Energy (1958; New York, MOMA). Pienes work then developed in a variety of forms. The Lichtballette (light ballet) (from 1959) were a development of the Grid Pictures: light from moving torches was projected through grids, thus extending and stimulating the viewers perception of space. This series of works is inspired by Moholy-Nagys Light Space Modulator (1930) and Lgers Ballet Mcanique (1924).(Jonathan T.D. Neil, Otto Piene: Light Ballet and Fire Paintings, 1957-1967 Art Review, May 4, 2010. Accessed 31 January 2011.)Also in 1959, the combination of these grids with sources of fire (candles, gas-burners) produced smoke-traces and fire paintings, in which the paint was burnt. Piene created these Rauchbilder (smoke pictures) as a reference to elementary natural energies. In the fire paintings, he lightly burns a layer of solvent on pigmented paper, developing organic forms from the remnant, or the soot. He continues the practice of smoke pictures through today. Fire and smoke (their traces) are important elements in these pictures. Silver Fire of 1973 is an example of a smoke picture.  He experimented also with multimedia combinations. In 1963, together with Gnther Uecker and Heinz Mack, he became spokesman of Neuen Idealismus (the new idealism). Piene is also noted for exploring new uses for broadcast television. In 1968, along with Aldo Tambellini, he produced Black Gate Cologne, which is cited as one of the first television programs produced by experimental visual artists.1967 marks Pienes involvement with Sky art, a term he coined in 1969 and which allowed him to use landscape and cities themselves as the focal point of his work. For the closing of the Summer Olympics in Munich, Piene created the sky work Olympic Rainbow, made up of five differently coloured helium-filled polythene tubes, each one 600 m long. Between 1981 and 1986 Piene organized four Sky art conferences in the USA and Europe.(Stephan von Wiese, Otto Piene MoMA - The Collection. Source: Oxford University Press. Accessed 31 January 2011.)He took a stab at industrial design in the 1970s with a 500-piece run of the upscale Suomi tableware by Sarpaneva that Piene decorated for the German Rosenthal porcelain makers Studio Linie.()Working as the director of the Center for Advanced Visual Studies (C.A.V.S.) at the Institute of Technology, Piene collaborated in the design of the kinetic sculpture performance Centerbeam first exhibited in Kassel, Germany in 1977.  The C.A.V.S. allowed artists to work using sophisticated techniques and scientific partnership, promoting a highly collaborative environment.()File:Grubenlampe, Halde Rheinpreuen, Blaue Stunde, 2010-10-09, I.jpg|thumb|Otto Piene, Das Geleucht (Mining Lamp), steel, glass, LEDs, 30 m high, 1998-2007 (Rheinpreuen, Moers, Germany)In 1978, Piene was commissioned by the Smithsonian Art Collectors Program to create a print to benefit the educational and cultural programs of the Smithsonian Associates.  The print was to commemorate a Washington, D.C. festival much like the 1977 exhibition in Kassel.  Three lithographs resulted, all titled, Centerbeam, one of which hangs in the ongoing exhibition, Graphic Eloquence, in the Dillon Ripley Center in the Mall.In 1999, Piene presented his idea of a statue called Das Geleucht in the Ludwig Galerie Schloss Oberhausen for the first time. That monument in the form of a lamp ought to be built on the spoil tip Rheinpreuen in Moers, with illumation at night. That project enthused the publicity but as recently as 2006 sponsors were found. Until 2007, the  high monument lightened the spoil tip every night.(http://www.das-geleucht.de/index.htm)(http://www.route-industriekultur.de/panoramen/halde-rheinpreussen/halde-rheinpreussen.html)ExhibitionsPiene had his first solo exhibition at Galerie Schmela, Dsseldorf, in 1959. With Light Ballet, he debuted at Wise Gallery, New York, in 1966. He represented Germany at the Venice Biennale in 1967 and 1971, and exhibited at documenta in Kassel, Germany, in 1959, 1964 and 1977.(Otto Piene - Biography Axel Vervoordt Gallery. Accessed 31 January 2011.) In 1985, he exhibited at the So Paulo Biennial.  Pienes solo exhibitions include retrospectives at the Kunstmuseum im Ehrenhof, Dsseldorf, in 1996 and at the Prague City Gallery Prague, in 2002, and a show at the Museum am Ostwall, Dortmund in 2008-2009.(Otto Piene: Light Ballet and Fire Paintings, 1960-1967 Sperone Westwater Gallery, 19 March 2010. Accessed 31 January 2011.)Position on the art marketSothebys established a first record for works by Otto Piene when it sold Rauchbild, a 1961 oil and charcoal on canvas from the Lenz-Schoenberg collection, for 223,250 ($329,000) in February 2010.(Judd Tully, Fire Paintings and Sky Art: A Q&A with Otto Piene ARTINFO, May 17, 2010. Accessed 31 January 2011.) Only a few months later, Pienes Kleine Sonne (196364) was sold for 85,250 ($126,937)(Otto Piene (b. 1928) Kleine Sonne, Sale 7861 Christies London, Post War and Contemporary Art Day Auction, 1 July 2010. Accessed 31 January 2011.) by the Lauffs Collection at Christies London.References(Publications* ZERO, Internationale Knstler Avantgarde, exhibition catalog published by Museum Kunst Palast and Cantz, with essays by Jean-Hubert Martin, Valerie Hilling, Catherine Millet and Mattijs Visser, Dsseldorf/Ostfildern 2006, ISBN 3-9809060-4-3* Artempo, Where Time Becomes Art, exhibition catalog published by Civici Veneziani, with essays by Jean-Hubert Martin, Heinz Norbert Jocks, Massimo Cacciari, Giandomenico Romanelli and Mattijs Visser, MER Paper Kunsthalle Ghent 2007, ISBN 978-90-76979-47-2* ZERO in NY, exhibition catalog edited by Mattijs Visser, published by the ZERO foundation and Sperone Westwater, New York/Dsseldorf/Ghent 2008, ISBN 978-90-76979-73-1*Busch, Julia M., A Decade of Sculpture: the New Media in the 1960s (The Art Alliance Press: Philadelphia; Associated University Presses: London, 1974) ISBN 0-87982-007-1* Radford, Georgia and Warren Radford, Sculpture in the Sun, Hawaiis Art for Open Spaces, University of Hawaii Press, 1978, 95.External links*Work example* ZERO foundation* ZERO group*Pienes Centerbeam, The Smithsonian Art Collectors ProgramPienePienePienezh:
6644050
Mestanza
Mestanza Mestanza is a town in Spain, in the province of Ciudad Real, which belongs to the community or region of Castilla-La Mancha. It has a surface of 370 km  with a population of  821 inhabitants; population density 2.22 inhabitants/km . The towns municipal district includes the villages of Hoyo and Solanilla del Tamaral. It is located south of Puertollano, in the impressive Valley of Alcudia, with the Montoro reservoir within the area, close to mountain range Sierra Madrona. Major festivities are celebrated on the day of San Pantalen, and also celebrated on July 25 to 29. The other great celebration in Mestanza is the day known as El Voto (literally the vow or oath to the Virgin Mary), an old traditional pilgrimage celebrated on the last Sunday of May every year. The image of the Virgin Mary is then taken to the chapel located on the outskirts of the town. PrehistoryVarious cultures have settled in this area from prehistoric times to present days. There are paleolitic paintings in the rocky shelters of Fuencaliente and Solana del Pino. In the area near the village Mestanza itself there are archeological sites in La Tabernera, El Chupn and Callejones de Ro Fro, with remains of schematic painting in Puente Mercedes (El Hoyo). Old ageRoman presence became important due to the exploitation of mines in the town of Sisapo (La Bienvenida). This Roman mining complex was located in the western part of the Valley of Alcudia, and was connected with the Roman town of Cstulo (now Linares) to facilitate transportation of raw materials from the mines. An example of  mining exploitation from Roman times is Minas Digenes, in operation until the nineteen seventies. Thus the landscape was modeled since Roman times, with overexploitation of forests in favor of intensive mining, documented from old time because Cayo Mario, brilliant strategist and 7 times consul during the last period of the Roman Republic, based his fortune on the mining concessions in the mountains called Sierras Marinicas, named after him (Sierra Morena and Sierra Madrona).Middle AgesIn the days of the Muslim kingdoms, in the location of the present town, there was an Arab castle, around which a mosque was built, and around them grew the town. The name Mestanza, of Bereber origin, Mistasa, means mosque. The town was conquered by Christian king Alfonso IV in 1086. The Order of Calatrava made this area a Royal Dehesa (royal pastures), in recognition for having been for many centuries one of the largest spaces for receiving transhumant herds in the winter months. The cattle organization called Mesta, brought sheep here through a dense network of cattle paths. That is why the Cross of the Order of Calatrava, the mutton and the sheep are in the coat of arms of the village. This ancient custom of carrying the herds in winter to the valley of Alcudia, remains at a lower level today, as transhumance routes for livestock has have been replaced by modern means of transportation such as rail or road. Families who live in the valley in winter are known as Serranos as they come from the mountains (sierras) in Guadalajara, Soria, Teruel and other provinces. Modern AgeThe economy in Mestanza was based on mining and grazing with occasional help from hunting. Mining is focused mainly on coal mining from the late nineteenth century until the mid-twentieth century (in nearby town Puertollano) and in the silver mineral galena (lead and silver) in the valley or El Hoyo and Solanilla del Tamaral, leading to the creation of a new parish district, Las Navas de Riofro, near the new mining locations, later abandoned in 1927. Due to isolation, the government of General Franco decided to build an oil shale distillation plant in nearby Puertollano, requiring large amounts of water, so a dam was built, the Montoro Dam, which supply water to industrial plants through a tunnel in the mountains of Sierra de Mestanza, plus the necessary water pumping plants. The Montoro dam was oprned by General Franco in 1950, and stores water from rivers Montoro and Tablillas. After the end of the international blockade, the distillation plant was replaced by the current oil-refining plant, proceeding to the gradual closure of the mines. Open coal mines in Puertollano are now only for power supply.DemographyDemographic Evolution in Mestanza from 1991 to 20041991       989	1996 1.003	2001       8902004       830 an:Mestanzaca:Mestanzaes:Mestanzaeo:Mestanzaeu:Mestanzafr:Mestanzait:Mestanzapt:Mestanzaru:uk:vi:Mestanzawar:Mestanza
6669882
M-95_(Michigan_highway)
next_route96M-95, designated as the Leif Erickson Memorial Highway,() is a state trunkline highway in the Upper Peninsula of the US state of Michigan. Running from Kingsford to near Champion in Humboldt Township, it is the main connection between Iron Mountain and Marquette along with US 41.M-95 was previously designated as M-45. The number was switched when US 45 was designated in Michigan. The trunkline incorporates a portion of the former M-12 which became US 2. A section of the highway near Republic was turned over to Marquette County during a rerouting of the highway in the 1940s, becoming County Road 601.Route descriptionStarting on a bridge across the River, M-95 runs north along Carpenter Avenue in Kingsford. It turns east along Ludington Street in Iron Mountain and joins the US 2/US 141 concurrency out of town to the north, following Stephenson Avenue. Near the state line northwest of Iron Mountain, M-95 turns northward as a solo route through northern Dickinson County. There is a concurrency with M-69 from Randville to Sagola. Randville is just south of the junction with M-69 where the mining settlement formed because of the nearby Groveland Mine and was a station on the and Northern Railroad in 1880. A post office was in operation in Randville from 1891 until 1932.(()File:Channing depot.jpg|thumb|left|The old railway depot in Channing. The and Lake Superior Railroads F7 #600 can be see to the right.Near Sagola is a mill owned by Louisiana-Pacific that makes strand board. The surrounding forest lands near the highway provide trees for the mill.() Sagola  was formed, when in about 1885, five Chicago men formed the Sagola Lumber Company to harvest pine timber in the area. The name was derived from the local Indian word for welcome. A post office was first established there in 1889.(() North of Sagola is the community of Channing which began as a railroad junction called Fort Siding. In 1892, a post office was established named Channing, after John Parke Channing, a mining engineer who surveyed the area.()()M-95 crosses the River at the Marquette County line. It is here that M-95 also crosses over from the Time Zone to the Time Zone at the county line south of Lake. From there it bypasses Republic and the former Republic Mine Complex to the west. Republic is divided into two smaller communities of North Republic and South Republic by the mine complex. Known for its sandy beachfront along the Michigamme River west of downtown North Republic, the beach is located just upstream of the Republic Dam. In South Republic is a roadside park maintained by the Department of Transportation (MDOT) that provides a picnic area and canoe access to the river.()() M-95 comes to an end north of a railroad crossing at an intersection named Koski Corners.((HistoryFrom its inception until 1934, M-95 held the M-45 designation. It was renumbered to avoid confusion with the then new US 45 designation in the Upper Peninsula. The original M-95 was an access route to State Park which was redesignated as M-211.(()()The original roadway that became todays M-95 started in Sagola and run northward to M-15 (today US 41/M-28).( M-45 was extended by 1927 to replace portions of M-12 that were not used in US 2.() It would later be extended in 1932 to the state line south of Kingsford.() The total of M-45 was converted to M-95 in 1934 as a realignment near Witch Lake is completed.(M-95 was rerouted in 1942 from Republic north to Humboldt Township. This new  section replaced the last section of gravel roadway that was transferred to Marquette County as County Road 601.() Another rerouting in the Republic area moved the trunkline in 1957 to bypass South Republic.() The former roadway was partially closed to become part of the Republic Mine. M-69 was shortened, eliminating the concurrency with M-95 in 1960 or 1961.()() M-69 was re-extended back to its pre-1960 routing in 1991, restoring the concurrency in the process.()()Major intersectionsnotesWisconsin state linenotesSouthern end of US 2/US 141 concurrencynotesNorthern end of US 2/US 141 concurrencynotesSouthern end of M-69 concurrencynotesNorthern end of M-69 concurrencynotesReferencesExternal links*M-45 at Michigan Highways*M-95 at Michigan Highways*M-95 at Michigan Highway Ends
6686987
Centauri_Dawn
Centauri Dawn is the first book in the trilogy novelization of the popular game Meiers Alpha Centauri. The trilogy was written by the games story developer Ely and describes the struggles of the colonists on Chiron - a habitable planet in the Centauri system, after their colony ship Unity suffered major damage and the survivors were forced to land in colony pods (this is described in the short story Journey to Centauri, available for download from the official website http://www.firaxis.com/smac/story.cfm).Book synopsisSeveral decades pass since Planetfall. Each colony pod becomes a colony, initially independent. After contact is made between several colonies, trade relations are established, but are strained because each colony develops its own ideology. For example, the Gaians belief that Chiron (AKA Planet) is alive contrasts sharply with the Morganites complete disregard for ecology in favor of heavy mining. Tensions increase between the factions, particularly between the Peacekeepers with their UN-like attempts to maintain peace at any cost and the Spartans who believe strength is the key to survival. The discovery of a Unity Datalink lights the fuse on the brewing conflict. Initially found by the son of Colonel Corazon Santiago - the leader of the Spartans, the Datalinks are taken by the Peacekeepers who discover that they contain technology to make nerve gas. Convinced that such technology cannot fall into the hands of the Spartans, Commissioner Pravin Lal of the Peacekeepers refuses Santiagos demands.The conflict between the two factions is inevitable, as the Spartan forces enter Peacekeeper territory and lay siege to their main base - United Nations HQ. While the Peacekeepers fight valiantly, they are greatly outnumbered and outgunned by the warlike Spartans. Because of Lals reluctance to use nerve gas to obliterate the Spartan forces, United Nations HQ falls, and Lals wife, son, and grandson are killed in the process. Santiagos own son also dies during the siege.This story is as much about the children of Pravin Lal and Corazon Santiago as it is about the two leaders. While neither of the two leaders sons wants war, they are thrust right in the middle of it, leading up to the final confrontation between them, in which Lals son kills Santiagos on the battlefield. Infuriated, Santiago sends a team of her elite troops to storm the Peacekeeper base, while she herself finds her sons murderer and kills him in front of his father. Thus both men pay the price for a disagreement between their respective parents. Also, Pravin Lals wife was hurt before planetfall and hes been keeping her in suspended animation until he finds a way to cure her. Her stasis pod is damaged in the fighting, and she dies completely. The UNHQ is sacked, but some of the population escapes to safety in Gaian territories, including Pravin Lal. Influences While the exposition is drawn from the plot of the computer game, much of the siege and subsequent events draw heavily from Homers Iliad. Some concepts are drawn directly from Iliad; Santiagos personal guard detachment bears the name of Myrmidons, referencing the soldiers under the command of Achilles. A representation of the single combat between Achilles and Hector is mirrored in Centari Dawns battle between Victor Santiago and Jahn Lal, although in this version, the Hector analogue is victorious. The conclusion of the story is taken intact from Iliad, as the aging Pravin Lal, father of the slain Jahn, enters the Spartan camp to beseech Santiago for the body of his son.External links* Official site
6704584
Hibernia_mines
The Hibernia mines are a series of iron mines in northern Jersey, worked from pre-Revolutionary times until 1916. An exploratory shaft was drilled in the 1950s but was not worked, and the shafts and adit were partly or totally sealed in 1972 and 1989.After its closure, the mine became the largest bat hibernaculum in New Jersey, with as many 30,000 bats each winter.()  In 2010, less than 10% that number was found in the mine following an outbreak of nose syndrome.()History directly from Munsells History of Morris County, New Jersey  (1882) p. 65The Hibernia mines are upon one vein, extending at least  in length. Where it cropped out of the south side of the hill at Hibernia it was operated by Samuel Ford, Stirling and those who preceded them, and adjoining to the northeast the Ford mine was operated, as we have seen, by Jacob Ford and his lessees and grantees. But those operations were small compared with the mining of the last thirty years. Taking them in order, the mine to the southwest is the Beach mine, owned by the New Jersey Iron Mining Company, formerly by Poppenhusen, who purchased of Dr. C. Beach. It was first opened about the close of the war, and is now being operated by the Andover Iron Company. Next to this is the Theo. Wood mine, the oldest opening of them all, and covering the vein on the side and foot of the Hibernia hill. It formerly belonged to the two sons of Benjamin Beach, Chilion and Samuel Searing Beach. The share of Chilion was bought by his son Columbus, and Thomas Willis, of Powerville, purchased the other half. Dr. Beach and Willis sold the mine, January 11, 1853, to Theodore Wood for $14,000, which was supposed to be an excellent sale; but in 1865 it was sold to Conrad Poppenhusen for five times that amount. It belongs now to the New Jersey Iron Mining Company, which leases it to the Andover Iron Company. With the other mines owned or leased by the latter company it is under the management of Richard George. Next in order is the Old Ford mine, now owned by the Iron Company. This company, being the lessee of the mines beyond, has not driven its Ford mine so rapidly as those leased by the company, holding it in reserve. Next to this mine are the Crane mine, belonging to the estate of Mrs. Eliza A. Crane, one of the daughters of Colonel William Scott, and the De Camp mine, belonging to the heirs of Mrs. Augusta DeCamp, wife of Edward DeCamp and another one of the daughters of Colonel Scott. Both of these mines and the Upper Wood mine are and have been for many years leased and operated by the Glendon Iron Company, whose general superintendent and manager is George Richards, of Dover. The Upper Wood mine, so called from having once been owned by Theodore T. Wood, and to distinguish it from the one under the hill, formerly belonged to Elijah D. Scott, a son of Colonel William Scott. Beyond the Upper Wood mine is the Willis mine, which was once the property of Araminta Scott, another of the daughters of Colonel Scott. It is now operated by the Iron Company and belongs, as does also the Upper Wood mine, to the New Jersey Iron Mining Company.An underground railroad has been constructed from the foot of the hill northeast upon or in the vein through the bowels of the mountain, which brings the product of all the upper mines to the terminus of the Mine Railroad, on which all the ore of the Hibernia mines goes to market. The tonnage of this road, almost entirely made up of the product of these mines, was 99,123 tons in 1879.See also* CanalReferences*External links*Photos of the Hibernia mine and other abandoned mines in New York and New Jersey*History of iron mining in the northeast United States and elsewhere, with photos
6718436
Beipiao
Beipiao () is a city in Chaoyang prefecture, Liaoning province, in China. It has a population of 202,807. The main industry in the area is coal mining. With vertical shafts of almost 1000m, these are some of the deepest coal mines in China. The coal produced is used for coking. National Forest Park is located in the northwestern part of Beipiao city.The dinosaur Beipiaosaurus was named after the city where its fossils were found nearby.Administrative Divisions(-)There are 7 subdistricts, 7 towns, 17 townships, and 2 townships under the administration of the city.Subdistricts:*Nanshan Subdistrict (), Subdistrict (), Subdistrict (), Subdistrict (), Chengguan Subdistrict (), Subdistrict (), Subdistrict ()Towns:*Baoguolao (), Heichengzi (), Xiguanying (), Shangyuan (), Wujianfang (), Daban (), Taohuatu ()Townships:*Township (), Sanbao Township (), Township (), Township (), Township (), Township (), Township (), Township (), Township (), Township (), Township (), Township (), Township (), Township (), Township (), Township (), Township (), Mongol Ethnic Township (), Manchu Ethnic Township ()ReferencesExternal linksde:Beipiaofr:Beipiaoja:ru:sco:BeipiaoPhiuwar:Beipiaozh:
6730884
St_John_Ambulance_(England_and_the_Islands)
St John Ambulance is a volunteer-led, charitable organisation dedicated to the teaching and practice of aid (Charity Commission) in England, Ireland, the of Man and the Islands. It is one of two affiliates of the international John Ambulance movement in the Kingdom. The organisation is a subsidiary charity of the Priory of England and the Islands of the Order of St John.HistoryIn the 1820s the Knights of Malta living in France offered knighthoods to specific people supporting the of Malta in Great Britain, irrespective of their Christian denomination. Their approach was not part of the official policy of the Order of Malta, but the English Knights devoted themselves to charitable activities, which were organised into what became known as Foundations.  This British group carrying out very substantial charitable activities was recognised and incorporated in 1888 as the Grand Priory of the Order of the Hospital of Saint John of Jerusalem in England. Britain was one of the first countries to become industrial and in the 19th century there were many dangerous workplaces. Accidents were frequent but workers rarely saw a doctor in time. Death or disability from untreated injuries was common. Members of the Order of St John wanted to find a way to help. They decided to train ordinary people in first aid so accident victims could be treated quickly and on the spot, and in 1877 they set up St John Ambulance to do this. Classes were set up across the country, particularly in workplaces and areas of heavy industry, but also in villages, seaside towns and middle class suburbs.In 1887 trained volunteers were organised into a uniformed Brigade to provide a first aid and ambulance service at public events. In many parts of Britain, St John was the first and only provider of an ambulance service right up to the middle of the 20th century, when the National Health Service was founded. When there were far fewer doctors and hospital beds than today, St John nurses looked after the sick and injured in their own homes. There were originally three charitable Foundations of the modern Order. One, which became The St John of Jerusalem Eye Hospital Foundation, was established in 1882.  The St John Ambulance Association, which was concerned with training the public in first aid, was established in 1877.  And, the third was The St John Ambulance Brigade, which provided first aid care to the public. It had its origins in 1873, and became a Foundation in 1887.  The St John Ambulance Association and The St John Ambulance Brigade were amalgamated in 1974 to form the present St John Ambulance Foundation. St John Ambulance was originally divided into two fields, teaching first aid to workplace employees via the St. John Ambulance Association, and providing uniformed medical volunteers to cover public and private events via the St. John Ambulance Brigade.  However, these two entities merged in 1968 to form a single unified St. John Ambulance, providing both training and first-aid cover.Within the Priory of England and the Islands, the organisation is broken down into Counties.  The boundaries and areas of these Counties are determined by the organisation itself rather than strictly adhering to national borders.  The Islands (Guernsey, Jersey and the Isle of Man(Microsoft Word - Priory Rules 2006 FINAL.doc)) are also considered counties for the purposes of administration. St John Ambulance in Northern Ireland is now no-longer administered by National Headquarters, however an advisory relationship still exists.During 2006 St John Ambulance (England & the Islands) trained 551,000, cared for 137,000 people and worked with 20,000 young (age 5-17) volunteers. St John Ambulance volunteers gave 5,700,000 hours of service.(Annual reports) Key dates within the history of St John Ambulance in England *1540: The original Order of St John, the Hospitallers is disbanded in England by Henry VIII*1826: An idea to re-establish the Order within England is put forward by some remaining French Knights of the original worldwide Order*1841: The St Johns Day Declaration is prepared to seek official recognition of the new Order by the original Order, now known as SMOM*10 July 1877: St John Ambulance Association forms to teach first-aid in large railway centres and mining districts*June 1887: St John Ambulance Brigade is formed*14 May 1888: English Order of St John is granted royal charter by Victoria*1908 By reciprocal agreement St John Ambulance ceases to operate in Scotland and St Andrews Ambulance Association ceases to operate in England*March 1922: Cadet units are started*1968: The Association and Brigade merge to form a unified St John Ambulance*January 1987: Badger setts are introduced to celebrate 100 years since the formation of the Brigade*1999: The Priory of England and the Islands is formedFirst aid servicesSt John Ambulance volunteers and employees attend thousands of events every year providing first aid to the sick and injured.  This service is provided free at the point of delivery, although a charge may be made to the event organiser for attendance at events.In addition to providing first aiders for events, where necessary St John Ambulance can provide mobile treatment centres, ambulances, Healthcare Professionals and other medical provision.St John Ambulance cover many large events all across England and Wales. Being a national organisation (but run day to day locally) they have the ability to get many members from all over the country, providing all the infrastructure needed for event medical cover. This covers things such as the first aid staff providing the frontline treatment, the mobile treatment centre they are working in, their own command structure, and their own communcations. Many areas have good working relationships with the local NHS services, and so may also take NHS resources into St John command at events, making it much more efficient to manage.Training servicesSt John Ambulance also runs courses for external individuals, in a variety of different skills and medical issues. The First Aid at Work course is used by many companies to train designated individuals as first-aiders, as required by employment laws.The Community First Aid suite has recently been released offering the community a variety of low cost first aid courses at convenient times.  They also provide useful training courses for people of all ages.Transport servicesSt John Ambulance owns a large number of ambulances and transport vehicles, which are used for commercial and charitable patient transport services and emergency use.St John Ambulance employees and volunteers provide support to the NHS Ambulance Services in some areas, responding to Patient transport requests, 999 calls at busy times, and assisting the statutory emergency services during times of major incident.St John Ambulance have specially adapted ambulances for the purposes of the transport of critically acute paediatric patients, although the St John Ambulance staff are not involved in the direct treatment of the patients they provide Emergency Drivers with the vehicles to transport the patients.  This service was part of and seen in the One documentary series Emergency in 2010 which followed followed the Doctors and Nurses of the CATS (Childrens Acute Transport Services) based in London. Youth services :For more information on Cadets, see John Ambulance Cadets in the UK.St John Ambulance is also a major youth organisation, with over half its membership being made up of those aged 25 and under. Cadet units are run for those 10 to 17, and Badger Setts are provided for younger children aged 5 to 10. These groups are similar to the Scouts, although there is a greater emphasis on teaching first aid. Members aged 16 or 17 are encouraged to transfer to First Aid Services units if they wish to continue training in First Aid, to become Youth Leaders within their unit.Super Badger AwardSt John Badgers work towards the Super Badger Award. This award consists of members completing 12 subjects, such as Creative, Global and Wild Badger. The award is split into 5 sections, where Badgers advance through completing more subjects.Grand Prior Award schemeThe Grand Prior Award is the primary award designed for Cadets. The award is an essential part of Cadet life, and was updated in 2004 after around 50 years of retaining the previous programme. The award consists of completion of 24 subject areas over the period of Cadet membership, until the age of 21. There is no maximum time limit (other than age restrictions) upon completion of the award, however the award should not be completed in fewer than 3 years from the commencement date. The subject areas range from topics such as photography and clerical skills to childcare and crafts. The award is seen as the highest award a Cadet can achieve, and is one of the only badges, as well as the Amalfi Award, 1000 hours service badge, National Competition Winners badge and Sovereigns Award, which may be retained on the adult uniform.Every year a reception is held at Palace and is attended by HRH The Princess Royal to celebrate chosen individuals who have gained their Grand Prior Award.Amalfi ChallengeThe Amalfi Award was launched in recognition of the need for a programme after the Grand Prior Award. The Amalfi Challenge is open to all cadet and adult members aged 16 to 25. The structure of the award focuses on personal task set by the individual. These tasks are categorised into service, relationships, society and challenge. Each participant has to undertake 12 tasks and at completion of 4, 8 and 12 subjects a badge is awarded.Cadet LeadershipCadets in St John Ambulance are encouraged to attend Cadet Leadership courses. These courses are progressive and intended to give cadets the skills to take a more active role within their divisions. The courses teach skills which enable cadets to be promoted to NCOs within their divisions. They can then progress and attend further courses designed to improve said skills. Ideally all cadets promoted to the ranks of Cadet Corporal or Cadet Sergeant should have completed Cadet Leadership 1, and those promoted to Leading Cadet should have completed Cadet Leadership 2. Both Cadet Leadership courses also count a subject towards the Cadets Grand Prior Award. Following the Cadet leadership 2 course, Cadet Leadership 3 allows Cadets to learn the skills required to take on an assistant youth leader role within their division, and includes the BTEC-accredited Essential skills in youth work course.LINKS unitsSt John Ambulance units dedicated to meeting the needs of student and university communities can be found at many institutes of higher education across England, Wales and Northern Ireland.  These units, known as LINKS units, were originally established at universities to form a link between cadet and adult membership, allowing members to carry on their membership and maintain their skills whilst in higher education.  However, LINKS units have become integral parts of the student community and the majority of members new to St John Ambulance at point of joining, as students new to university look for societies to join.LINKS units differ from most other sections in that they do not use a rank structure, instead having a democratically elected committee.  This is due to the fact that, as well as being a unit within St John Ambulance, a LINKS unit typically exists as a society in the universitys union, and as such must have a committee structure.As well as providing first aid training to the student community and first aid cover at student events, LINKS members can be found frequenting other events attended by mainstream St John Ambulance units.Youth LeadersIt is essential that as a large major youth organisation as well as a first aid organisation that its Youth Leaders are trained appropriately to be youth leaders within the organisation, Youth Leaders teach first aid; the Grand Prior Award Subjects; organise weekly meetings; social activities and games. Youth Leaders often attend the BTEC-accredited Essential Skills in Youth Work course to which St John Ambulance offers to all its members for the role of a Youth Leader, support is offered by Divisional Officers and County Staff Officers to members in this role where it is required for them to perform to their full potential.First aid and medical equipment services (St John Ambulance Supplies)St John Ambulance Supplies (often abbreviated to SJS) is a trading sub-division of St John Ambulance providing first aid and Medical equipment and consumables, training equipment, publications, health and safety equipment and clothing.  Where a markup is made, surplus from sales are diverted into supporting the charitable work of the Order of St John and the St John Ophthalmic Hospital in Jerusalem.SJS opened its doors at St Johns Gate in Clerkenwell on 12 February 1879 and was originally known as The Stores Depot.  It is now a major commercial operation supplying to the public, private and voluntary sector. SJS is also the only approved supplier of St John Ambulance uniform, clothing and branded merchandise.Vehiclesthumb|right|250px|St John Ambulance Crusader ambulance in a London street. As individual (local) Divisions of St John Ambulance have historically been responsible for providing their own vehicles, these have taken many and varied forms, beginning with horse-drawn ambulances. Even into the late twentieth century, and with some centralisation of control, and classification of vehicle types such as Motor Ambulance Units (the title arising historically as a distinction from horse-drawn units), First Aid Posts, and Rapid Deployment Vehicles, there remained within the organisation an enormous range of deployed vehicles of different types, and even assorted local vehicle liveries. Some ambulances were donated second-hand from industrial plants, some were purchased (from different suppliers), and some were local conversions of commercial vehicles. At the start of the twenty-first century new legislation regarding emergency ambulances effectively rendered a significant proportion of the then current St John Ambulance fleet redundant. The solution was the development of a specialist St John Ambulance vehicle, which was designed jointly by the organisation and vehicle manufacturer Renault. The result was the Crusader 900 ambulance.An early assessment suggested that 100 of the Crusader ambulances (costing, at that time, 40,000 each) would be required immediately, representing an investment of 4 million. In 2000 St John Ambulance committed itself to raising 2 million by public subscription, whilst English and Welsh Freemasons committed a further 2 million, supplying 50 Crusader ambulances which were handed over in local ceremonies across the country during 2000 and 2001.(See references on the Mark Master Masons website of Gloucestershire & Herefordshire, here.)(Referenced by the Mark Master Masons of County Durham on their charity webpages, here.) This very large donation allowed the rapid transformation of the national St John Ambulance fleet of front-line ambulances within a much shorter time-scale than could otherwise have been possible. Subsequently many local Provinces of Freemasons have maintained relations with their local St John Ambulance County units, and supported the running costs of these vehicles, or even donated further (additional) Crusader ambulances.(Hertfordshire Freemasons presented their ambulance to Hertfordshire St John Ambulance in 2001. in 2005 they donated a second vehicle, as referenced on their news website, here.)By the year 2004 the national St John Ambulance emergency vehicle fleet was in a standard corporate livery, and was based upon four different vehicle types, as follows:(Fleet details outlined in the St John Ambulance Supplies Department publication The New Driving Force, first published June 2004, by SJS, London, EC1V 7NE.)thumb|right|250px|Image showing the various vehicles St John Use (Left to Right: 2 Crusaders, a Challenger, a Companion Plus and 2 further Crusaders) * Crusader - a front-line emergency ambulance, based on the Master commercial vehicle, with a patient transport version also available;* Challenger - a 4-wheel drive emergency ambulance, based on the Patrol, but with additional headroom, for rural and off-road deployment;* Cobra - a 4-wheel drive support unit, also based on the Nissan Patrol, capable of deploying a team of up to 7 personnel with full first aid or forward incident equipment;* Companion Plus - an MPV type support vehicle, based on the Zafira, for duties similar to the Cobra (above) where 4-wheel drive is not a requirement.These were (and remain) complemented by the Companion, a non-emergency version of the Companion Plus, not fitted with sirens or blue lights, and used for patient transport, first-aid post base, and other general duties.Specialist transportSt John Ambulance also maintains specialist transport options in particular locations, such as the motorcycle paramedic responders based in London, cycle emergency responders deployed nationwide, and horse-mounted units maintained in some rural areas.Volunteer membershipThe majority of St John Ambulances Event First Aid Services and Youth Services are provided by its volunteers.  Approximately 40,000 volunteers aged from 5 upwards are members across the organisation. Training and skills Volunteers receive training according to the role they fulfil.  Those volunteering to provide Event First Aid services are offered a number of first aid qualifications, ranging from a basic emergency life support course and the further first aid modules, which deal with common injuries and ailments, through to Emergency Transport Attendant training which covers many of the competencies of the Health Service Ambulance Technicians.  The training for those delivering Youth Services comprises emergency life support training, coupled with training from the organisations own youth leader training suite including Essential skills in youth work and Leadership skills in youth work, depending on the volunteers role.(St John Ambulance Youth leader training suite)In addition to medical training offered, members have the opportunity to carry out other operational roles. These include event planning, event management, radio communcations/control, plus other support roles such as providing member refreshements at events etc. Qualifications in First Aid and Allied Subjects Qualification levels for first aid volunteers (in order that they have to be achieved):*Observer*First aider (FA)*Advanced first aider (AFA)(also qualified in use of an Automated External Defibrillator)(HQC 014/07 Appendix C)*Patient transport attendant (PTA)*Emergency transport attendant (ETA)Members start as an observer (usually whilst waiting for membership application to be processed and a suitable date to attend the First Aider course), become a first aider, then can move on to advanced first aider, then if suitable a patient transport attendant (PTA), then finally emergency transport attendant (ETA) which bears some resemblance to the NHS ambulance technician role.Beyond the initial qualifications, members can train in additional medical skills, such as administration of medical gases, and use of an external defibrillator (AED). For those wishing to go further still, the organisation runs two internal qualification courses known as Patient Transport Attendant and Emergency Transport Attendant (formerly Ambulance Aid level 1 and 2 respectively). These build upon the first aid skills with additional skills required for ambulance crewing. Those attaining the first level are allowed to crew St John vehicles and provide Patient Transport services (PTS). Those attaining the second level are additionally called upon to crew emergency ambulances as necessary. Training of the Ambulance Aid courses (especially the second) are sometimes undertaken or supplemented by the NHS Ambulance Services.The use of Cycle Response Units has been introduced by the organisation. The cycles used by St John Ambulance are custom designed and built for the task, with strengthened frames to take the extra weight of the large quantity of medical equipment they carry, including oxygen cylinders and AEDs. Members acting as Cycle Response Units are additionally trained with commercial cycling courses and must demonstrate a reasonable level of fitness.  They wear a dedicated cycle uniform, replacing the conventional operational uniform. Healthcare Professionals Qualified healthcare professionals may also volunteer their time in St John Ambulance. These include:*Paramedics*Nurses*Midwives*Operating Department Practitioners*DoctorsAll healthcare professionals have their qualifications and professional status checked with the appropriate regulatory body before practicing in St John Ambulance. Professionals can carry out any skill appropriate to their type, level of training, competence and when relevant to the situation or patient. Healthcare professionals wear coloured rank slides to distinguish them from internally-trained first aiders and ambulance personnel. With the exception of Paramedics/IHCD Ambulance Technicians, any HCP wishing to work on an ambulance though must become a PTA/ETA, but many parts of the training can be skipped depending on the HCPs professional training already undertaken. This is to ensure that the HCP is prepared for working in an ambulance/emergency environment (which they maynever have done since their initial training).Student Nurses and Medical Students may act in their role as a student on duty under the supervision of a registered practitioner of the same profession, however at present St John Ambulance does not have any provision Student Paramedics in the same way which they do Student Nurses or Medical Students. Coloured stripes are added to the rank slides to indicate they are acting in that role.StructureNational HeadquartersThe National Headquarters of St John Ambulance in England is located in the Clerkenwell area of London. Clerkenwell has been associated with the order of St John throughout its history. St John Ambulance units in the Crown Dependency territories of Jersey, Guernsey, and the of Man are also administered from this National Headquarters, and these island groups give the associated langue of the Order of St John its formal name of England and the Isles. The National Headquarters of St John Ambulance includes the administrative hub of the organisation, the offices of various departments, the offices of the Chief Commander, and a supplies (equipment) department which trades as an independent company.RegionThe organisation is divided into nine Regions for purposes of both administration and competition (regular competitive exercises are staged to test the competency of volunteers under pressure). The Regions, and the county areas they contain, are as shown below.* Southern - Berkshire, Buckinghamshire, Dorset, Hampshire, Isle of Wight, Oxfordshire.* South East - London, Kent, Surrey, Sussex.* South West - Avon, Cornwall, Devon, Gloucestershire, Somerset, Wiltshire.* Central - Shropshire, Staffordshire, Warwickshire, West Midlands (including Herefordshire and Worcestershire).* East Midlands - Derbyshire, Leicestershire & Rutland, Lincolnshire, Northamptonshire, Nottinghamshire.* Eastern - Bedfordshire, Cambridgeshire, Essex, Suffolk, Norfolk, Hertfordshire.* North West - Cheshire, Merseyside, Lancashire, Greater Manchester, Cumbria.* North East - North Yorkshire & Teesside, South & West Yorkshire, Northumbria, Humberside, Durham.* The Islands - Guernsey, Jersey, Isle of Man.CountyThe County (or sometimes District) is the basic command unit of St John Ambulance, each with a County/District Headquarters, and a range of departments and support staff to facilitate the activities of volunteers in the subordinate units. There are 44 counties/districts at this level.In Jersey and Guernsey, which are independent states rather than British counties, the alternative term Bailiwick is employed.AreaCounty administrations are often sub-divided into areas/sectors/zones, with area staff officers (or similar) reporting to the county administration. Historically they were each headed by their own area commissioner.DivisionThe local unit of St John Ambulance is the division (or unit). Divisions historically were ambulance divisions (for men), nursing divisions (for women) and ambulance cadet divisions and nursing cadet divisions for boys and girls respectively. In modern times, only a few single-sex divisions remain, and most are either termed combined division (men and women together) or quadrilateral division (men and women, boys and girls under one command structure). Other types of local units exist, such as Badger Setts (for 5-10-year-olds), and specialised groups such as cycle response units, LINKS units within universities, and sometimes informal social groups, each with a distinctive command, management or leadership structure. Uniform and ranks  Uniform The St John Ambulance uniform is well-known to the general public. All orders of dress (as described below) make provision for displaying the insignia of the wearers rank within the organisation. Members are required to wear uniform when providing first aid or transport services, both for identification and to present a professional image.  It is protected by law(Chartered Associations (Venerable Order of St John of Jerusalem) Protection Order 1927) and may only be worn by registered members.  Unlike the uniform of other volunteer organisations, the St John uniform is relatively formal and is similar to a Police uniform, for which members are sometimes mistaken.The uniform has been updated several times since original creation and is due to be revised further by 2012.There are nine orders of dress intended for different situations. No.1 and No.2 are formal ceremonial dress uniforms, the former with a tailored uniform jacket, the latter without; No.3 and No.4 are less formal, suitable for nursing duties in other medical establishments and during hot weather; No.5 is the basic operational uniform; No.6 is a casual uniform for training and informal events; No.7, No.8 and No.9 are operational uniforms for specific tasks, corresponding respectively to Patient Transport Services, Community First Responder, and Cycle Responder. The two most widely used are No.2 (dress uniform without tailored jacket) and No.5 (operational uniform).  Where there is no access to full uniform, LINKS members may wear a uniform polo shirt in place of the formal shirt.High visibility garments may be worn over the uniform, adopting the yellow/green two-tone generally accepted for emergency medical services.  An alternative No.5 operational uniform is a green two-piece suit, similar to those of paramedics and technicians from many other ambulance organisations; this has most commonly been worn by members operating as an ambulance crew, but may also worn by first aiders.Other priories and countries have various regional variations of uniform, but most are loosely based on the same design as the English uniform. Rank St John Ambulance has a wide and complicated rank structure, both nationally and locally, with different departments, teams and roles. The rank markings and local structure are similar in some respects to the army.The highest ranking officer in the organisation is the Chief Commander based at the National Headquarters, London, currently this office is held by Mick Messenger, former commander of London Prince of Wales district, at this moment he is in the role in an acting capacity after the retirement of Roger Chatterton.At a county level the County Commander is the most senior officer in the county and is responsible for an area, such as Cornwall or Humberside, each county has a single Commander who will run them.At local or town (Divisional) level, a Superintendent is usually in charge, with a 2 or 1 pip officer as their deputy. There may be additional 1/2 pip officers for larger divisions responsible for certain sections (e.g. adult members, cadet members etc.) although these role may also be fulfilled by Sergeants and Corporals. Sergeant(s) and Corporal(s) provide support and general day to day unit management, as well as management and member support at events.See John Ambulance Ranks and Insignia for the St John Ambulance ranking structure. St John Ambulance in the British Armed forces St John Ambulance now has British divisions running where there are a large amount of British servicemen and women with their families overseas. These are namely in Germany and Cyprus. The divisions are directly linked to the UK and national headquarters so that members can transfer to another division or county as they would be able to do at home. The overseas divisions are classed as one whole extra county for the UK in the St John Ambulance structure. The shoulder flash on the uniform states St John Ambulance Germany as it would say, for example, St John Ambulance London District which shows that they are directly linked to the UK. St John Ambulance British Forces Overseas is run by a volunteer paramedic with links to the military. Members are able to be trained in a the full-range of St John Ambulance Qualifications. The majority of the volunteers hold positions as First Aiders or Advanced First Aiders; however, recently some members have been trained up to Patient Transport Attendant (PTA) or Emergency Transport Attendant (ETA) qualifications.The overseas forces divisions were originally founded in 1980. They remained very strong for several years, however, as the forces in Germany were reduced many divisions closed. Over the past few years, St John Ambulance is again making a strong return to British Forces Germany and in the past year a series of divisions were re-opened across Germany.Until last year, they had a number of ambulance available for public use; but these were decommissioned and an ambulance from the UK borrowed for use in Germany. A car was also donated by a local dealership for use of the training services or transport of volunteers. Current attempts are being made to raise funds to purchase the new Crusader Ambulances that St John Ambulance are using in the UK to further benefit the forces communities.St John Ambulance British Forces does not just provide medical cover for events, but just as in the UK they provide commercial first aid training, quite often run in co-ordination with Military Education Centres. There is a strong team of first aid trainers across Germany who can teach the range of civilian first aid courses include the HSE-approved First Aid at Work. They are the lone supplier of these courses to soldiers and civilians in the British Forces.St John Ambulance British Forces Overseas works closely with the German Ambulance Services, particularly the sister organisation Johanniter in providing first aid and ambulance cover German public events where many British or English Speakers are expected to attend. Members can occasionally be seen on their non-emergency and emergency vehicles responding to public calls. St John Ambulance can also be seen working with Malteser, the Red Cross and local fire brigades which provide ambulance services. The German Emergency Services equally assist St John Ambulance at British events on military areas where a high number of German civilians are expected to attend. Relations with the Order of St John and other organisations Although the Order of St John is largely seen as a Christian organisation for historical reasons, St John Ambulance does not restrict membership to nor promote any particular religion or denomination. Technically, it falls under the sovereignty of The Queen, and thus is linked to the of England; however, this relationship is more tradition than authority, and adult members are not required to pledge allegiance to or support either the monarchy or the Christian faith. Cadet members do still make a pledge upon joining to the monarch and God; however, this is again largely seen as tradition, and there is no pledge to the Church of England.St John Ambulance often serve alongside the British Red Cross, whose members also undergo advanced training in aid and event cover, the British Red Cross also provides general humanitarian aid, both organisations work together in times of civil emergency or crisis. Andrews Ambulance Association is the equivalent organisation in Scotland. Together these three Voluntary Aid Societies publish the official First Aid Manual, the de facto guide for emergency first aid.See also*John Ambulance*John Ambulance Ranks and Insignia*John Ambulance Brigade of Ireland*Order of St. John*Medal of the Order of St John*of the Venerable Order of St JohnReferencesExternal links*St John Ambulance - The Priory of England and the Islands*Caring on the Home Front A website dedicated to the memories of St John Ambulance and British Red Cross volunteers during World War II.*
6736927
Merrill_Cook
 religion  Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints Merrill Cook (born May 6, 1946) was a Republican member of the States House of Representatives from Utah.Cook, a member of Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints() was born in Pennsylvania, and raised in Lake City, Utah. He graduated from East High School in 1964 and the of Utah( in 1969 and earned an M.B.A. from Business School in 1971. Upon receiving his degree, Cook was hired as a budget analyst by D. Little, Inc. He left the corporation in 1973 to co-found Cook Slurry Company, a mining explosives manufacturer.  Merrill Cooks father was the noted scientist A. Cook who, among his many accomplishments, pioneered the development of slurry explosives.Merrill is married to Camille Sanders Cook.  They have five children.Cook made his first run for office in 1984, when he lost a bid for the Board of Education. In 1985, he ran for mayor of Salt Lake City and lost to DePaulis.  He made an unsuccessful bid for the Lake County commission in 1986.Cook had been a lifelong Republican, but in 1986, he broke ranks and formed the Independent Party.  He ran as that partys gubernatorial candidate in 1988 and got 22% of the vote,(All election results taken from www.elections.utah.gov/electionresults.html and http://www.clerk.slco.org;) siphoning off enough votes from Democrat Ted Wilson to hand incumbent Republican Norm Bangerter another term.   In 1992, he ran again and came in second to Leavitt with 34%, with Democrat Stewart Hanson coming in at 23%. He was also that partys nominee for the 2nd District in 1994, coming in third with 18%.However, in 1996, after incumbent Republican Greene announced she wouldnt run for reelection due to a scandal, Cook rejoined the Republican Party. He managed to come in second at the state convention behind the choice of the party establishment, Salt Lake City accountant R. Todd Neilson, getting just enough votes to deny Neilson the nomination outright. Cook won the primary a few months later by 4 percentage points.  He faced future Salt Lake City mayor Anderson in the general election. Calling Anderson too socially liberal for Utah,( Cook won with 56 percent of the vote despite losing the districts share of Salt Lake City.In 1998, Cook was accused of instances of erratic behavior. He was briefly banned from state Republican headquarters after an obscenity-laced tirade, his reaction to being told his name had been eliminated from a GOP get-out-the-vote effort to which Cooks campaign had contributed $25,000.  He, nevertheless, won by 10 percentage points. He demoted his chief of staff Jenson a few days after the election; in an email, Jenson told her colleagues, Merrill has taken up permanent residence in whacko land. If he asks you to fax his underwear to the speakers office, please just do it.()In 2000, the Democrats nominated environmental consultant Matheson, the son of former popular Democratic governor Matheson. Polls showing Cook far behind Matheson made many Republicans nervous about their chances of holding the seat, even though the national party strongly backed Cook. However, in an ominous sign, Cook was forced into a primary against computer tycoon Derek Smith, who was making his first run for elected office. In the primary, Smith defeated Cook by a 15-point margin, taking 57 percent to Cooks 42 percent. Matheson easily defeated Smith at the election in November.Cook ran for mayor of Salt Lake County in 2004 as an independent, but garnered only 8 percent of the vote in a race won by Democrat Corroon.  In 2006 he tried to challenge 3rd District Congressman Cannon but was eliminated on the first ballot.He ran for his old seat in the 2nd district in the 2008 election.(Deseret Morning News | Cook to seek GOP nod to take on Matheson) Cooks political activities have largely been enabled by self financing.  His personal expenditures for campaigns for office and ballot initiatives have been over $4 million (http://deseretnews.com/dn/view/0,1249,600118276,00.html.) Cook lost the Republican nomination to Dew at the Utah State GOP Convention on May 10, 2008 where Dew received 69% of the vote.(Utah Republican Party)He ran for the Republican nomination for U.S. Senate in 2010 against incumbent Bob Bennett, but did not make it past the first round of balloting at the state convention.Electoral history{| classwikitable stylemargin:0.5em ; font-size:95%|+ : Results 1994&ndash;1998()!|Year!!|Democrat!|Votes!|Pct!!|Republican!|Votes!|Pct!!|3rd Party!|Party!|Votes!|Pct!!|3rd Party!|Party!|Votes!|Pct!|-|1994|| || alignright |66,911| |36%|| || alignright |85,507| |46%|| |Merrill Cook| |Independent| alignright |34,167| alignright |18%|||||||-|1996|| || alignright |100,283| |42%|| |Merrill Cook| alignright |129,963| |55%|| |Arly H. Pedersen| |Independent American| alignright |3,070| alignright |1%|| |Catherine Carter| |Natural Law| alignright |2,981| alignright |1%| |*|-|1998|| |Eskelsen| alignright |77,198| |43%|| |Merrill Cook| alignright |93,718| |53%|| |Larsen| |Independent| alignright |3,998| alignright |2%|| |Brian E. Swim| |Libertarian| alignright |1,390| alignright |1%| |**Write-in and minor candidate notes:  In 1996, write-ins received 24 votes.  In 1998, Arly H. Pedersen received 813 votes and Robert C. Lesh received 524 votes.See also*States Senate election in Utah, 2010ReferencesExternal links**Merrill Cook for CongressCookCook
6747424
Jupiters_moons_in_fiction
thumb|right|Galilean moons of JupiterJupiters extensive system of natural satellites  in particular the four large moons (Io, Europa, Ganymede and Callisto)  has been a common fiction setting. Satellite system Some references in fiction focus on more than one moon, or do not refer to a specific moon. Literature * C. Clarkes short story, Five (1953), has most of the action in the Jupiter system.  Clarke also concentrates heavily on the system in his Odyssey series.* In Ship (1949) and Shock (1950) by Williamson, the Jovian moons are colonised by the Union, which transfers its government there after the United States builds a nuclear base on the Moon, which enables the Americans to dominate the whole of Earth. The Jovian Soviet is one of the main powers contending for control of the mineral wealth of the Belt.* The novels of Stanley Robinson, including Memory of Whiteness (1985), Green Mars (1993) and Blue Mars (1996) depict numerous ideas about the future colonization of Jupiter, although they focus more on the moons than on the planet itself.* The Ilium/Olympus novels of Simmons depict numerous biomechanical organisms, called moravecs, that dwell on the Galilean moons and in the Belt.* The novel Runaway Robot by Lester Del Ray.*In Larklight the moons of Jupiter have been colonised by the British empire and are the furthest outpost. Certain spores can have effects on their mind, though this is now only used for advertising. Millenia ago they warred with each other for control of other moons and used spores for this, until a spore produced by the King of Chumbley, but which blew back towards Chumbley, made them all peacful. Jupiter is inhabitated by sentinent storms, the largest of which, Old Thunderhead, was and is worshipped by some Jovians as a God. Film and television * In the anime Bebop (1998), various episodes take place on Jupiters moons. In Mushroom Samba the crew was on its way to Europa, but had to land on Io.  The two-part episode Jupiter Jazz takes place on Callisto, and Ganymede Elegy, obviously takes place on Ganymede (There are also several reference to Titan throughout the series and in the movie, Bebop: Knockin On Heavens Door).* The motion picture 2010 involves Io and Europa.* The Canadian science fiction TV series Starhunter often used the Jupiter system as the backdrop for the action, including a metropolis on Io called Syn City, and a space station called Clarke Station (presumably a tip of the hat to Arthur C. Clarke.) Various other moons are mentioned, including a prison on Ganymede.* The British science fiction TV show Red Dwarf mentions the moons of Ganymede and Titan in the first two series.  Coincidentally, the ship Red Dwarf is part of the Jupiter Mining Corporation. Games * In The Lost Episodes of Doom, an unofficial expansion pack for the game Doom, the three episodes take place on Io, Callisto, and Jupiters Great Red Spot (which was actually a gateway to Hell).* The futuristic racing computer game POD - Planet of Death takes place on Io where after colonization for mining, a corrosive biosubstance known as Pod, emerges from under the ground devoring the moon, eventually tearing it apart.Comics*In Comics #29 a minor moon of Jupiter, Pan, is shown. A cult that gives sacrifices to a four-armed beast is shown, which the God Mars takes over the High Priestess of to try spreading war. Io thumb|IoIo is the closest of the Galilean satellites to Jupiter.  It is almost the same size as Earths Moon. Because of its position, it is subject to constant tidal flexing and heavy radiation from Jupiters magnetic field.  Since 1979, it has also been known for its abundant volcanism. Literature * Mad Moon (1935), short story by G. Weinbaum. Io is home to two native races, the moronic balloon-headed loonies and the ratlike slinkers.* Starr and the Moons of Jupiter (1957), young adult novel by Asimov. Climactic confrontation between Lucky and a Sirian spy on Io.* Very Pulse of the Machine (1998), award-winning short story by Swanwick. Features the volcanic, sulfurous landscape of Io, as well as the powerful electrical flux between Io and Jupiter.* Ilium (2003), novel by Simmons. Ios magnetic tube is used to hyper-accelerate spacecraft throughout the solar system. It is also the home of a moravec named Orphu. Art * Back cover illustrations for Adventures (May 1940) and Stories (July 1941) by R. Paul. Io was inhabited by furry, black-and-white intelligent beings living in the city of Crystallis, built entirely of crystals. Film and television *Outland (1981), starring Connery. Set in a mining colony on Io.*2010 (1984) - sequel to 2001: A Space Odyssey. The ship from 2001 (the Discovery) is in orbit around Io where a joint Soviet and U.S. mission revive the ship and solve the mystery of the Monolith.*V:The Series (19841985) NBC TV series. Io is destroyed (vaporized) by the most powerful single weapon possessed by the Visitors from Sirius, the Particle Beam Triax.*Five Faces of Darkness, episode of The Transformers television cartoon. Autobots; Blurr and Wheelie end up stranded on Io after a Decepticon attack.*Dwarf (19881999) television comedy. Character Rimmer was born and raised on Io.*Exosquad (19931995), animated television series. Io is the  Exofleets main base of operations after the Neosapien conquest of the homeworlds and the scene of several critical battles in the Terran-Neosapien War in the shows second season.*5 (19931999), television series. Io is home to an Earth Alliance colony, second in size only to the colony on Mars. The Sol systems jumpgate is stationed in orbit around Io along with an Orion-Class Starbase serving as a transfer station for all spacecraft entering or leaving the system. There is also a research colony on Ganymede and a ice mining operation that is referred to as a real cesspool of crime on Europa.*from Jupiter (1994), Australian ABC television series. Colonists in a mining colony on Io must evacuate to the orbiting space station KL5 when the moons core destabilises.*Odyssey: Voyage To The Planets (2005), BBC docudrama about a hypothetical manned mission to various points of the System. An astronaut lands on Io to collect samples of its rocks. Due to radiation risks and the astronaut becoming exhausted, the EVA on Io is aborted early and the samples are abandoned.*Heroic Age (2007), anime. Jupiter is destroyed when a high-powered energy gun is used to knock Io out of orbit.  It plummets into the atmosphere and ignites it, and intervention by the Silver and Bronze fleets leads to a cataclysmic explosion. Games *II (1982) computer game. The player must travel through various worlds, including Io, to complete the game.*Pipeline (1989), Software computer game. Set on a sulfur mine on Io.*Descent (1995), computer game. Level 11 is set in a sulfur mine on Io.*Disruptor (1996), game for Sony PlayStation. A level is set within the sulphurine mines of Io.*Doom (1996) computer (and Sony PlayStation) game. The first set of levels, Evilution, takes place on a research base on Io.*POD - Planet of Death (1997) computer racing game. After colonization for mining, a corrosive biosubstance known as Pod emerges from the ground, devoring the moon, eventually tearing it apart.*ZeroZone (1997), computer game. Io is one of the settings.*Battlezone I (1998), computer game. Some missions are set on the surface of Io and Europa.  Ganymede is featured exclusively in the Red Odyssey expansion.*Halo (2001), Xbox game. Early in the series backstory, the Nations Colonial Advisors on Io came under attack by Frieden secessionist forces which eventually led to the Interplanetary War. Later, in Halo 2, detector stations on Io pick up a space-time whisper that warns of Covenant vessels approaching Earth via slipspace. Europa thumb|right|EuropaEuropa is the smallest of the four Galilean satellites and the second closest to Jupiter. It is theorized to have an ocean of liquid water underneath its icy surface; the thickness of the ice is much debated.  The probable presence of the water ocean has made it a favored location for modern fictional speculation about life in the system. Literature * Odyssey Two (1982) and Odyssey Three (1988) by C. Clarke. Aliens taking interest in the primitive life forms under Europas ice transform Jupiter into a star to kick-start their evolution. Fifty years later, Europa has become a tropical ocean world from which humans are banned.* Cairn (1936), short story by G. Weinbaum. Europa has a small Earthlike area on its Jupiter-facing side.* Schismatrix (1985) by Sterling. Europa is inhabited by genetically re-engineered posthumans as a philosophical/political statement by Abelard Lindsays Lifesiders clique.* Forge of God (1987) by Bear. Europa is destroyed by aliens who use chunks of its ice to terraform planets.* A Spy in Europa (1997), short story in the Space series by Reynolds. An advanced human society called the Demarchists live in colonies on Europa on the underside of the ice crust at the top of the subsurface ocean. In later novels they become one of three social groups that dominate interstellar colonization. The race of genetically altered humans adapted to live in the subsurface ocean who feature in A Spy in Europa also appear later in Reynoldss 2006 short story Grafenwalders Bestiary.* Ice Dragons Song (1998), novella by Sparhawk. A 12 year old treks across the face of icy Europa.* Europa Strike (2000) by Ian Douglas. A massive ancient alien spacecraft lies in an ocean beneath the moons surface, the discovery of which leads to a battle between Chinese forces and US Marines in 2067.* Outlaws of Europa (2002) by Michel Savage. Europa has been turned into a prison planet.()* Ilium (2003) by Simmons. Creatures from Europa feature prominently.* Riding the White Bull (2004), short story by R. Kiernan. Probes discover an ecosystem in the sea beneath Europas ice and subsequently infect Earth with a sentient Europan microbe.* Ocean (2004), comic book by Warren Ellis. An ancient race of aliens is discovered in hibernation below the surface of Europa. At the climax the moon is destroyed by a horrific weapon.* The Quiet War (2008) by J. McAuley. Europas subsurface ocean is home to the only non-Terran (microbial) life in the solar system, although as a result of panspermia from a microbe-laden meteorite from an early solar system bodys collision with Earth billions of years ago.* Europa: book one of Black Chronicles, by author Sanderlin was released in January 2010 through Tate Publishing. The storys main character resides on a mining colony and constructs an A.I. submersible in order to explore the moons subsurface ocean. Art * Back cover illustrations for Stories (September 1940, January 1942) by R. Paul. Europa is inhabited by red, beetle-like intelligent beings who ride domesticated centipedes and live inside immense transparent plastic domes in a city called Oor. Film and television * The movie 2010 based on the similar book by Arthur C. Clark briefly depicts Europa.* In the anime series Geneshaft, Europa is not merely a moon, but a giant computer housing an AI called Oberus. Oberus uses Rings of its own creation to monitor the evolution of humanity and acts as a failsafe, should humanity threaten the natural order of the universe. In the final episode of the series, Oberus is forced to run its final program, attempting to use its rings to crush the sun. It is stopped from completing the process when the Shaft creates a Ring around Europa, terraforming the entire moon.*In the anime series Seed, George Glenn explores the moon and finds evidence of alien life forms.* In the Futurama episode Put Your Head on My Shoulder, Fry, Amy and Dr Zoidberg go on a picnic to Europa.*of a Distant Star features Europa as a United Nations Naval Base, where it is visited by the Lysithea, a battleship that shares its name with another one of Jupiters moons. Games * In the video game Infantry, large cities lie underneath the ice sheets of Europa.* In the video game Battlezone, Europa is featured as a cold, ice covered world, where battles take place in cracks between the ice.* The computer game Abyss: Incident at Europa involves an underwater base in Europas ocean.* The computer game Descent has two levels set on Europa: level 13 (Europa Mining Colony) and level 14 (Europa CO2 Mine). Its second sequel, 3 also has a level on Europa in which the player must destroy an energy refinery. The game depicts Europa as a snowy landscape.* In the role-playing game Space (2002), life is discovered around vents in the oceans of Europa. Subsequently, a war begins under the ice between those who seek to preserve the native microbial fauna and those who wish to adapt sapient life of Earthly origin to live near the vents.* In the video game StarLancer, the introductory cinematic depicts a surprise attack on Fort Kennedy located on Europa.* In the PS1 game Heart, Europa is one of three of Jupiters moons on which you battle to defend the mining outposts from the Drakken Group, a huge conglomerate comprising a few hundred of the worlds biggest corporations.* The PC action/ shooter Absolute Zero depicted a battle between strange aliens that rose from the ice of Europa and the human colonists.* The Amiga game Uropa 2, is set on the surface, and in underground bases of Europa. Music * Rosetta released Galilean Satellites in 2005 with Translation Loss. The album revolves around an astronauts voyage to Europa, in a quest for solitude, only to find himself longing for what hes left behind on Earth.* The song The Tale of Europa by The Phenomenauts uses a conflict between humans and fictional Europan aliens to draw parallels to human wars on Earth. Ganymede thumb|right|GanymedeGanymede is the third of the Galilean moons from Jupiter.  It is the largest moon in the system, bigger than the planet Mercury, almost 52% larger than the diameter of the Moon and with twice its mass. It is 77% the diameter of Mars. Ganymedes size made it a popular location for early science fiction authors looking for locations beyond Mars that might be inhabitable by humans. In reality, Ganymede is a cold, icy, cratered world with a vanishingly thin atmosphere. Literature * In the short story Moon (1938) by G. Weinbaum and Helen Weinbaum, most of Ganymedes surface is flooded every three months due to Jupiters tides.* In the short story on Ganymede (1940) by Asimov, native beings on Ganymede are introduced to the holiday.* In the short stories Final (1941) and Unintentional (1942) by Asimov, a conflict arises between humans living on Ganymede and the inhabitants of Jupiter.* In A. Heinleins work:()** In in the Sky (1950), a young man, Bill Lerner, and his family move to Ganymede. The story describes the terraforming and colonization of this satellite. The novel assumes that Ganymede has a rocky surface under an ice layer.** In The Rolling Stones (1952), Ganymede is mentioned in passing as a human colony.** In Star (1956), Ganymede is represented by a political party.** In Will Fear No Evil (1970), the Lunar Commission proposes terraforming Ganymede.** In Cadet (1948), a recruit is a third generation colonist from Ganymede, and a mission is sent there.** In Star (2006; written by Robinson from the notes of R.A. Heinlein), Ganymede is a birthplace of the novels protagonist, Joel Johnston.* Bracketts short story The Dancing Girl of Ganymede (1950) is set on a volcanic, jungle-covered Ganymede.* In Andersons novella The Snows of Ganymede (1954), a party of terraformers visits a settlement on Ganymede called X which was established two centuries earlier by American religious fanatics.* In del Reys novel Outpost of Jupiter (1963), a plague strikes the human settlement of Outpost on Ganymede. In another novel, Space Jockey, Ganymede is a former penal colony of Earth, now independent and distrustful of terrestrials.* In Poul Andersons Worlds to Conquer (1964), human settlers on Ganymede, threatened by the power-mad captain of a space warship, make contact with a sympathetic culture on the Jovian surfacetribespeople menaced by invading cruel barbariansand eventually manage to help each other overcome their respective enemies.* Ganymede is referred to in virtually all of K. Dicks novels from the 50s and 60s, although it seldom receives more than a brief mention, with two exceptions. In of the Alphane Moon (1964), we are introduced to Lord Running Clam, an intelligent mold from Ganymede. Ganymede Takeover (1967) involves sentient wormlike gestalt aliens who have invaded Earth.* In the Lester del Rey novel The Runaway Robot (1965), the main character Paul and his robot live in a colony on Ganymede at the beginning of the story.* The Goddess of Ganymede and Pursuit on Ganymede (1968). and planet adventure by Resnick.* James P. Hogan wrote a series that eventually spanned five books (Inherit the Stars (1977), The Gentle Giants of Ganymede (1978), Giants Star (1981), Entoverse (1991) and Mission to Minerva (2005)) in which an alien race which inhabited a destroyed fifth planet between Mars and Jupiter is discovered in the hulk of an abandoned spacecraft discovered on Ganymede.* In the series of novels collectively called of a Space Tyrant (198386) by Anthony, the moon is analogous to 20th century Cuba, and is the focus of a futuristic missile crisis.* In C. Clarkes novel Odyssey Three (1987), Ganymede is warmed by the new sun Lucifer and contains a large equatorial lake. It is the centre of human colonization of the Jovian system.* The 1991 science fiction novel Buddy Holly Is Alive and Well on Ganymede, by Denton (ISBN 0-688-10822-9 and ISBN 0-380-71876-6), begins when television sets throughout the world suddenly begin broadcasting a concert by an apparently living Buddy Holly, who says he is on Ganymede.* The majority of events in Ganymede Club (1995), a science fiction mystery by Sheffield, take place on Ganymede.* Yo visite Ganmedes (visited Ganymede, 1970) by Peruvian writer Ibrahim relates in first person the story of a friend Pepe that keeps contacts with a civilisation in Ganymede. In this perfect civilisation, whose inhabitants communicate via telepathy, there are no wars or illnesses. The book follows the religion line and plays with the story being actually true.* In the 1998 science fiction novel Bloom by Wil McCarthy, Earths ecosystem is destroyed by a goo, annihilating all biological life.  The grey goo then develops its own unique ecosystem.  The only human survivors are colonists on Jupiters moons and in the asteroid belt.(McCarthy, Will Bloom New York:1998Ballantine Del Rey Books)* In the novel Orphanage (2004) by Buettner, an alien race uses Ganymede as a staging area for a war against Earth.*In J. McAuleys The Quiet War (2008), Ganymede is one of the earliest sites for human colonisation in the outer solar system. Due to its proximity to Jupiter, its inhabitants live several kilometers beneath its ice cover. It is one of the dominant forces in Outer system politics due to its early settlement.* In the short story Marooned by W. Campbell, Jr, the advanced base camp of the Corliss Jovian exploration mission is set on the frozen surface of Ganymede. Art * In R. Pauls series of back cover illustrations for Stories (October 1940, February 1942), Ganymede was inhabited by ferocious tiger-women who ride Dinosaurs. They live in the crater city of Gatos, which derives its power from the moons magnetic field. Film and television * The made-for-TV German movie Ganymed (1977) tells the story of five astronauts returning from an expedition to Ganymede. They find a seemingly desolate Earth and are trying to find out what happened while they were in space.* In the Rangers TV series (1993-), Ganymede is the hiding place chosen by Zordon as the hiding space for a fleet of Zords known as the Mega Vehicles, which combine to form the Mega Voyager. The Space Rangers locate these Zords after winning Key Cards from Darkonda in a card game. (Flashes of Darkonda, The Rangers Mega Voyage).* In the fiction TV series 5 (19931999), the Shadows bury a ship under the surface of Ganymede, which is dug up during the third season episode Messages From Earth (1996).* In Battleship Yamato also called Blazers, Ganymede has a base where the Yamoto/Argo goes for repairs while fighting the Comet Empire.* In the anime series Bebop (1998), Ganymede is depicted as an aquatic planet, a terraformed world that is entirely covered in water. Animal life, most likely created by human intervention, is also depicted, such as the Ganymede searat, a species of rodent-like seal. About 7 million people live on it in floating colonies which are supported on large barge-type foundations. The character Jet Black was a police officer on Ganymede, and presumably was born there. Jet also has a watch that is apparently from Ganymede which seems to imply a 30-hour day. Jet has been quoted during the series (Episode Hard Luck Woman) saying A womans heart is as fickle as the skies of Ganymede.* In the anime series Geneshaft, Ganymede is the home of a human research outpost. It is also the former home of the extinct race that are assumed to have created humanity, the Giants of Ganymede. Their technology was unearthed and studied, culminating in the construction of the Bilkis and the Shaft.* In the anime Robo Armageddon, after Invaders caused Jupiter and many of its moons to become a new Getter Ray Sun, Ganymede was thrown out of its orbit beside Jupiter and was then on a collision course with Earth, prompting the Getter Robos to stop the disaster.* Ganymede is the location of a mining colony in the series to Jupiter. Games * In the 32nd Millennium of the 40,000 (1987) Universe, Ganymede is destroyed during a Warp Core experiment that goes horribly wrong.* In the DOS game Must Fall: 2097, the prize for victory in the tournament is the development right to Ganymede, which is also the home of the Angels, who seek to prevent their home being developed.* In the PC game FOM, Ganymede is a space colony which has been terraformed to support humanity.* In the game Target Earth for Genesis, the first level Assault on Ganymede, takes place on a space station set on Ganymede where the space-outcast enemies make their first strike.* In the PS1 game Heart, Ganymede is one of three of Jupiters moons on which you battle to defend the mining outposts from the Drakken Group, a huge conglomerate comprising a few hundred of the worlds biggest corporations.* In the PC game Shadowgrounds and its sequel Survivor, the story takes place in colonized and terraformed Ganymede.* In Halo 3, the EVA armor was built in a zero-g testing facility on Ganymede.* In Spore, Ganymede is one of the planets (or, in this case moons) from the Sol system that the player can terraform and colonize. Callisto thumb|right|CallistoCallisto is the outermost of the Galilean satellites.  It is a large moon, only slightly smaller than the planet Mercury.  It is cold, icy, and heavily cratered, with a very tenuous atmosphere.  Despite its size, it has not been featured in fiction as much as the other Galilean satellites. Literature * In P. Lovecrafts Beyond the Wall of Sleep (1919), the writer mentions in passing the insect-philosophers that crawl proudly over the fourth moon of Jupiter.* In Asimovs story Callistan Menace (1940), Callisto has an atmosphere of carbon dioxide and is inhabited by large slugs that use magnetic fields to stun their prey.* Carters eight-novel series (19721978), consisting of of Callisto,  Legion of Callisto,  Pirates of Callisto,  Empress of Callisto,  Wizards of Callisto,  of Callisto,  of Callisto and  of Callisto,  is set on an inhabitable Callisto.* In Anthonys science fiction series Bio of a Space Tyrant (1983-), Callisto is the home planet of Hope Hubris, the Tyrant of Jupiter.* The protagonist of McCaffreys telepathic-society novel Rowan (1990) lives in a terraformed dome on Callisto.* Stanley Robinsons novel Blue Mars (1996) contains a description of a flourishing colony on Callisto.* In the novel Wheelers by Ian Stewart and Jack Cohen, a number of alien artifacts are found on Callisto shortly before the Galilean moons are observed to move, triggering the main events of the story.* In K. Dicks short-story Mold of Yancy, colonists on Callisto conform to the messages of the near-constant broadcasts of the eponymous public commentator, Yancy, as he comments on almost every aspect of daily life.*In J. McAuleys The Quiet War (2008), Callisto is home to one of the earliest Outer solar system colonial settlements, and has recently been gifted a genetically engineered biome.* In A. Heinleins in the Sky (1950) colonists on Ganymede mention that efforts to introduce an atmosphere have begun on Callisto. Comics/Manga * In the manga version of the Japanese animated TV show Battleship Yamato, (Starblazers), the Yamato headed for Callisto on a rescue mission.  It was here that the Yamato (known as the Argo) was held hostage by Gamilon forces.* In the Comics storyline World of New Krypton, 100,000 Kryptonians create a counter-Earth in the solar system to be their new home. They take Callisto to be their moon in order to provide tides for their new planet. Art * In R. Pauls series of back cover illustrations for Stories (August 1940, December 1941), Callisto was inhabited by blue-skinned, white-haired, four-tentacled humanoids.  Their city, Serenis, consists of colonnaded dwellings around the rim of a green lake. Film and television * Moon (1990) was a short-lived British opera. It was set on a space university that orbited Callisto.* Bebop (1998) features a snowy, Siberia-like Callisto, filled with fugitives and populated only by men.* Terrahawks (1983) Series 1, Episode 8, The Sporilla is set in a radio surveillance post on Callisto. Games * In the game of the Enders: The 2nd Runner (2003), the protagonist, Dingo Egret, finds the Orbital Frame Jehuty buried in ice under Callistos surface. It is also on Callisto, that Metatron is discovered.* In the video game series G-Police, your character is a pilot for a police force on Callisto.* In the computer game Descent, level 12 takes place at the Callisto Tower Colony.* In the PS1 game Heart, Callisto is one of three of Jupiters moons on which you battle to defend the mining outposts from the Drakken Group, a huge conglomerate comprising a few hundred of the worlds biggest corporations.* In the arcade game Commando, Callisto is the last stage, and headquarters of the games main villain Scumocide. Other moons  Amalthea thumb|right|Two views of AmaltheaAmalthea, or Jupiter V, is the third moon from Jupiter and the largest of the satellites of Jupiter.* C. Clarkes short story Five (1951) is set on Amalthea; its plot depends on the moons weak gravity, and explores what might happen if an astronaut were thrown from its surface.* Blishs Cities in Flight series begins with the story They Shall Have Stars (1956), where a base has been established on Jupiter V. This base is the remote operations centre for the Bridge Project on Jupiter proper.* Way to Amalthea is a scifi story by and Arkady Strugatsky written in 1959.* In an early draft of 2001: A Space Odyssey novel the giant monolith is located on the surface of Amalthea (according to C. Clarke in Lost Worlds of 2001 1972).* In the SHMUP Sol-Deace, the strongest line of the villains defense and sixth level is on Amalthea.* Paul Preuss Prime series book five, The Diamond Moon, and six, The Shining Ones, deal with the exploration of Amalthea.* In the X-Entertainment Calendar, the villains Hare Winningham and Hssxxllo Usall were imprisoned on Amalthea.* In the 1982 TV series of Astroboy, Amalthea is destroyed by the illegal test-firing of an anti-proton gun, with disastrous consequences.* In Simmonss Olympos, the moravec Retrograde Sinopessen is a member of the Five Moons Consortium from Amalthea. Pasipha Pasipha (Jupiter VIII) is used as a setting in John Varleys novel Ophiuchi Hotline, though it is referred to by its pre-1975 name, Poseidon. Sinope Sinope, or Jupiter IX, is a small irregular satellite of Jupiter.  From the time of its discovery in 1914 until the discovery of Megaclite in 2000, it was the outermost of Jupiters known moons. It is still the most distant Jovian moon to have a diameter of more than 10 km.* In Asimovs 1957 novel Starr and the Moons of Jupiter, an experimental ship design is located on Jupiter Nine. Asimov erroneously calls the moon Adrastea, although in 1957 it had no official name and had been unofficially dubbed Hades, while Adrastea was unofficially used for Jupiter XII (now called Ananke). Asimovs confusion may have arisen from the fact that, of the moons known in the 1950s, Jupiter IX was the twelfth most distant from Jupiter, and Jupiter XII was the ninth.  To add to the confusion, Adrastea is now used as the name of an inner satellite of Jupiter that was not discovered until 1979.* In Exosquad (19931995), Sinope was the location of the Neosapiens top-secret super-weapon, Fusion Pulse Cannon. After the Cannon has been destroyed by the Terrans, Sinope was blown to asteroids by the explosion and, thus, ceased to exist. Other * The B-movie Maidens from Outer Space (1956), features a space mission to Jupiters thirteenth moon.  This cannot refer to the moon now numbered Jupiter XIII (Leda), as it was not discovered until 1974, long after the film was made. References di Giove nella fantascienza
6754249
Metal_mining_in_Wales
mining in Wales affected large areas of what are now very rural parts of Wales and left behind a legacy of contaminated waste heaps and a very few ruined buildings.There are a number of areas that have been mined for a variety of metals.Lead and silver200px|thumb|right|Cwmystwyth Mine from the hill-side immediately above the mine. Winter in 1985 when many buildings were still standingThe principal areas were centred on the upland areas of the Ystwyth and Rheidol with some outliers to the east in the catchment of the Severn and some to the south in the headwaters of the Teifi. The largest of these mines were the Cwmystwyth and Rheidol United mines in Cwm Rheidol. The ore extracted was Galena which in many cases had a high silver content, especially at Cwm Ystwyth. It also occurred alongside large quantities of sphalerite, the principal ore of Zinc. However, the zinc was only occasionally processed and much remains on the very extensive discard heaps around the mines.Amongst the very many mines that have existed the following list identifies those known to have existed between the 17th and 19th centuries in north Cardiganshire and west Montgomeryshire:Aberffrwd, Alma, Blaenceunant, Blaencwmsymlog, Bron floyd, Bryn Glas, Bwa Drain, Bwlch, Cwm Mawr, Cwmystwyth, Cwm Ystwyth South, Cwm Ystwyth West, Cwmbryno, Cwmdarren, Cwmsymlog, De Broke, Dyffryn Castell, Elgar, Esgair Lle, Esgairmwyn, Fron Goch, Fron Goch East, Gelli, Glog fach, Glog Fawr, Goginan, Goginan west, Graig Goch, Grogwynion, Gwaith coch, Lisburne South, Llwynmalus, Logau Las, Melindwr, Mynyddgorddu, Nanteos, Pen Rhiw, Powell, Rheidol United, Temple, YstumtuenMetal mining in the Forest dates back to the 17th century, but its heyday came in the latter half of the 19th century.  These mines predominantly produced lead and zinc, and the last mine to close - Park Mine - closed in the 1960s.(mindat.org)Smaller areas of lead exploitation included Halkyn Mountain in Flintshire and in the Clyne valley in west Swansea.ArsenicAlthough Arsenic is not a metal it has been mined in association with metals and in Wales commercial extraction has probably only occurred in the Clyne valley near SwanseaCopper mining is probably the oldest known mining activity in Wales with documented evidence of age mining on the Orme near Llandudno and at Copa Hill in the valley of the Ystwyth in Ceredigion. Further copper discoveries were exploited in Snowdonia just to the east of Beddgelert where the Copper Mine, within the National Park, gives an idea of the conditions faced by copper miners and is a popular tourist attraction. In the 18th centuries the massive deposits of copper together with a range of other metals was discovered and exploited at Mountain on Anglesey.GoldGold was mined as early as the Roman occupation at Dolaucothi in Carmarthenshire and possibly elsewhere. In the 19th century gold was being extracted from a number of small mines at the southern end of Snowdonia with most activity centred in the valley of the Mawddach and its tributaries.IronCommercial ore exploitation has been relatively uncommon in Wales, despite the dominance of the iron and steel industry in South Wales.  Probably the only commercial exploitation took place in the of Glamorgan.  The of Dean was an important source of iron for many centuries, and dates from at least the Roman period.Leadore was first mined in Wales during Roman times at Halkyn to be smelted at Flint. The lead that was produced there was stamped with the inscription Deceangli, which was the name of the Celtic tribe occupying the area. In the 17th century an intensive period of Welsh lead mining commenced, bringing a large number of miners from Derbyshire into Wales. There are substantial reserves of the metal in Cardiganshire, probably first exploited in the Roman period, and extensively during the revival of metal mining in the reign of Elizabeth I.ReferencesExternal links* AditNow -  Photographic database of mines* Welsh Mines Society - Society with a focus on the research, recording and exploration of the metal mines of Wales
6760857
Cliffs_Shaft_Mine_Museum
 designated_other1_color  CornflowerBlue}}The Cliffs Shaft Mine Museum is a former iron mine, now a heritage museum, located on Euclid Street between Lakeshore Drive and Spruce Street in Michigan. The museum, operated by Marquette Range Iron Mining Heritage Theme Park Inc., celebrates the history of the Iron Range. The site was designated a state of Michigan historic site in 1973( and placed on the Register of Historic Places in 1992.(HistoryThe Iron Cliffs Company was established in 1865 by a group of New Yorkers including J. Tilden.()  They obtained property in Marquette County and opened their first mine, the Barnum Mine, in 1867.  Two shaft, the A and B were sunk.  The company obtained three more mine pits by 1870.  In 1877, Iron Cliffs began exploratory drilling on this site overlooking Ishpeming.  Drilling uncovered ore, and in 1879 the company opened the Cliffs Shaft, then known as the New Barnum.(()  A new boiler house and engine house were built on the site in the early 1880s.(In 1888, the name was changed from New Barnum to the Cliffs Shaft.( However, more changes were afoot: in 1891, the assets of the Iron Cliffs Company were merged with that of other iron companies in the area, including the Mine and the Cleveland Mine, to form the Iron Company, with G. Mather as president of the merged company.()  A new dry was built after a disastrous fire in 1901.  The original timber headframes over the A and B shafts were replaced with concrete headframes in 1919; a larger modern C shaft and headframe was built in 1955.(The mine was at one time the nations largest producer of hematite, and shipped ore every year but one from 1887 until its eventual close.( Mining at this site continued until 1967, marking the end of underground iron mining in the area.(The Cliffs Shaft mine complex was listed on the Register of Historic Places in 1992. It is commemorated by a Michigan Historical Marker (Cliffs Shaft Mine, Michigan Historical Markers) In 1998, the former owners of the mine donated the majority of the property of the Cliffs Shaft mine to the nonprofit group so that a museum could be created there.  The museum opened in 1999.()DescriptionFile:Cliffs Shaft obelisk.jpg|thumb|left|Headframe, c. 1919 just after completionAbove ground, the Cliffs Shaft site covers 15 acres and includes three headframes and eight other buildings.  1919 headframesThe two 1919 headframes, mirror images of each other,( are unusual as a collaboration between mining engineers and a professional architect.(In 1919, Cliffs Shaft engineers determined that the two wooden headframes atop their A and B shafts were deteriorating and would soon be unsafe.() When Cliffs Shaft engineers presented company president William G. Mather with proposals to update the headframes, Mather suggested that, because of the prominence of their location, the headframes combine practicality with architectural beauty.(  The company retained George Maher, a School architect from Chicagos Condron Company, to design the new headframes.( Maher came up with a distinctive obelisk-shaped, Egyptian Revival design for the headframes.The company immediately began building the new headframes around the old wooden ones.(  The new headframes were of reinforced concrete, with an interior measurement of 33 feet square at the base, eventually tapering to 21 feet square at the top.  A pyramidal roof brought the full height to 96 feet 9 inches.(  The structres are substantially similar, but mirror-images of each other.  The positions of interior beams were largely determined by available openings in the wooden headframes being built around.  Work continued from July into December of 1919.1955 headframeThe third headframe was built in 1955 of concrete with metal facing.  It was the first Koep Hoist built in the western hemisphere.(Other structuresThe site also includes includes the single-story stone boiler house and engine house (1880), the single-story brick dry house (1901-1902), a laboratory (c.1917),  a brick blacksmith shop, and the brick mine office building.(UndergroundUnderground, the Cliffs Shaft Mine was one of the largest iron mines in Michigan, containing 65 miles of tunnels running to depths of 1,358 feet.(  It continues to be one of the best-preserved examples of underground mining in the Iron Range.MuseumVisitors can see mining artifacts, photographs and equipment, as well as a chemical lab, blasting items, and the engine house with its air compressor room. Tours are available. The museum also displays the mineral collections of the Ishpeming Rock and Mineral Club.ReferencesExternal links*James D. Schuster - Marquette Range Iron Mining Heritage Theme Park Inc.*Hunts Guide to Michigans Upper Peninsula - Visitors information about the mine*Marquette Mining Journal (2 May 2008): Cliffs Shaft Mining Museum - Remnants of history*Local page about the mine
6769829
Asia_Energy
Asia Energy plc  is a new company,without any history of previous mining experience, quoted in the London Investment Market, set up to exploit open cast mining opportunities in the Phulbari region of Bangladesh. Asia Energy now trades under the name Global Coal Management.Company overviewAsia Energy was incorporated in London in September 2003 and acquired 100% of Asia Energy Corporation Pty Ltd, which held the licences to explore and mine the Phulbari Coal Project.Asia Energy Corporation Pty Ltd entered the coal mining scenario in 1998 by buying the mining contract originally awarded to international coal giant BHP on August 20, 1994.http://www.bangladeshnews.com.bd/2006/08/28/agreement-with-asia-energy-option-open-for-govt-to-make-pro-people-deal/BHP Billiton Mitsubishi Alliance (BMA) is Australias largest coal producer and a leader in the international coal industry. http://www.bmacoal.com/opencms/export/sites/bccom/index.html BHP claims it sold its rights for strip mining at Phulbari because the coal is deeper than 130 meters (it is at 151 meters depth).Asia Energy must pay Deepgreen Minerals Corporation $1 per tonne of ore sold.http://www.asia-energy.com/presentations/Asia_Energy_Prospectus.pdf#search%22BHP%20contract%20with%20%22asia%20Energy%20PLC%22%22http://www.minesite.com/CompanyDynamic.php?ID112Deepgreen ceased to be listed when it merged with Cambrian Mining in 2004 http://www.delisted.com.au/CompanyDisplay.aspx?id2587.Phulbari shootingsOn the 30th August 2006 the Guardian newspaper reported that six protesters had been shot dead, allegedly by paramilitary forces, when a crowd of 30,000 people stormed the local offices of Asia Energy.On the 31st August 2006 the Scotsman newspaper reported further unrest the day after the shootings when widespread half day strikes were organised. The Bangladesh government has placed a ban on further protests at the mine site. Gary Lye, chief executive of Asia Energy Corporation (Bangladesh) Pty Ltd, is quoted as saying It is up to the authorities to determine exactly what happened, but it would appear that the unforgivable events and the needless loss of life and suffering that took place yesterday in Phulbari are entirely the fault of the organisers (of the protest)http://business.scotsman.com/latest.cfm?id1262102006.Asia Energy has since had its right to mine in Bangladesh withdrawn. http://www.bangladeshnews.com.bd/2006/08/31/govt-agrees-to-say-no-to-asia-energy/Suspension of tradingOn news of the withdrawal of mining rights, shares in Asia Energy PLC crashed, falling from 284p to 117.5p in a single day. The company requested trading be suspended, on 31 August 2006, saying Asia Energy PLC (the Company) became aware this morning of press reports quoting a junior minister in Bangladesh stating that the Bangladesh Government is canceling all existing agreements with Asia Energy.  The Company had not received any communication from the Government to this effect.  In view of this the shares of Asia Energy were suspended from trading on the AIM Market at 08:40 hrs (BST) this morning. http://www.londonstockexchange.com/LSECWS/IFSPages/MarketNewsPopup.aspx?id1289924&sourceRNSReturn to tradingThe company resumed trading on the London AIM on 6 October 2006, saying The Company has received no notification from the Government of Bangladesh of any changes to the terms of the Companys contract and the Directors do not believe that there are any grounds for the contract to be terminated.http://www.londonstockexchange.com/LSECWS/IFSPages/MarketNewsPopup.aspx?id1312774&sourceRNS After its first full day back, the shares stood at 95p, compared to 665p on the 11th October 2005.Name changeAfter the fatal shootings, on 11 January 2007 Asia Energy changed its name to Global Coal Management PLC at the same time as maintaining that it was fully committed to the Phulbari Coal Project in Bangladeshhttp://www.asia-energy.com/announcements/2007Q1/070111.php.The AIM-listed company has subsequently changed its name to GCM Resources plc, and has invested in coal and uranium projects in other countries.  The Asia Energy name is still used in BangladeshEnvironmental impactA serious concern of open pit mining is its environmental impacts. The method requires the mine area to be completely dewatered so that the hollow of the mine does not get immersed in water.  Large pumps are required to suck out underground water around the mine round-the-clock during the entire lifetime of the project. Asia Energys solution is to distribute the water pumped out among the farmers, but in Bangladesh, problem of arsenic contamination is severe.According to a high official in Asia Energy, topsoil will be removed and preserved once the mining operation begins in a particular block. Topsoil will be brought back and spread on the top of the area filled in. But no one can say when the land becomes cultivable again. The other question is: will the company fill the hollow with the same care as it is done in the developed countries?See alsoInvestment MarketExternal links*World Development Movement - report and video http://www.wdm.org.uk/campaigns/others/bangladeshmine/indepth.htm*Phulbari, Asia Energy and Grassroots Revolt - Philip Gain http://www.meghbarta.org/nws/nw_main_p01b.php?issueId6&sectionId20&articleId471*Asia Energy Website http://www.asia-energy.com/*Mines and Communities http://www.minesandcommunities.org/Action/press730.htmhttp://www.minesandcommunities.org/Action/press984.htm*Asia Energy is a stock market SCAM http://salamdhaka.blogspot.com/2006/08/asia-energy-is-stock-market-scam.html*Cambrian Mining sells shares in Asia Energy PLC.http://www.cambrianmining.com/mainNews.aspx?id17*The Scotsman article http://business.scotsman.com/latest.cfm?id1262102006*Citywire report on the resumption of trading.*Bangladesh Environment Network.*http://www.gcmplc.com/
6776725
Cisco_Oil_Field
Cisco Oil Field is an field located in County, Utah.  The field was discovered in 1924 in the now abandoned town of Utah.  It is one of the oldest oil fields in the state of Utah.New production was discovered in the Cisco townsite during 2005 drilling by a Reno, Nevada-based oil company.(Pacific Energy and Mining Cisco Project)The field produces from channel sands in the Mancos, Dakota and Morrison formations.  gas is produced from the Mancos and Dakota formations, while the Morrison production is mostly oil.The oil gravity is 3435 degree API while the natural gas is . References 
6785721
Zaozyorny,_Krasnoyarsk_Krai
File:Zaozyornaya station.jpg|right|thumb|250px|Zaozyornaya station on the RailwayFile:Barga River.JPG|thumb|right|250px|RiverZaozyorny () is a town and the center of Rybinsky District of Krai, Russia, located on the River (Yeniseis basin), the affluent of the Kan, 166 km east of Krasnoyarsk on the 4,263 km of the Railway (Zaozyornaya railway station).  Population: The name of the town is an adjective meaning beyond the lakes, referring to the lakes on the south the town is abutting on.(Krasu.ru)It was established in 1776 as the sloboda of Troitsko-Zaozyornaya in the land owned by the Monastery. The main occupation of the settlers was mica mining; later mining. In 1934, it was granted the status of settlement and renamed Zaozyorny due to the anti-religious matters (the Troitsko- part of the name means of the Trinity).  It was granted town status in 1948.In the Soviet era, a number of plants and factories were built in Zaozyorny: electronic parts, brick, baking with a huge elevator, milk, furniture, and sewing factories. All of them become barely functional after the dissolution of the Soviet Union. In the beginning of the 2000s, the furniture and sewing factories have been funded by the Krasnoyarsk companies and become functional again while the mica mill yet remains in crisis.(Newslab.ru)In 2002 and 2006, the town faced a critical situation with the heating functionality due to the local governments financial crisis.(Newslab.ru)(Newslab.ru)References*Comprehensive article on the history of the town (up to the 1980s) *Zaozyorny in the Moj Gorod encyclopedia *The Trans-Siberian Railway stations of the Eastern Siberia *Zaozyorny news External links*Coat of arms *Weather in Zaozyorny ar:de:Saosjornyes:Zaoziornieo:Zaozjornijfr:Zaoziornyno:Zaoziornyjnn:Zaoziornyjpl:Zaoziornyjru:(Krasnojarskin aluepiiri)Krasnoyarsk KraiKrasnoyarsk KraiKrasnoyarsk Kraizh:
6796537
Armagh,_South_Australia
ClareArmagh is a small historic village in the western Valley, about 137 km north of Adelaide, Australia.HistoryThe village was named after the town and county of Armagh in Ireland. It was founded in 1850 to benefit from the new copper mine, operated by  the Royal Mining Company at nearby Emu Flat. The mine was built as part of a mania for copper mining prompted by the large copper finds at Burra and Kapunda but, though some mining efforts continued until 1910, was never successful commercially.().The town todayToday the hills around Armagh are known for the production of wine and oil. Most of the old town has vanished leaving only a brick kiln, claypit, a few houses and the Miners Home Hotel, now a private museum.References External links *Clare & Gilbert Valleys Council*Clare Valley Tourismleft|thumb|300px|The old disused kiln and chimney
6814366
Black_Moshannon_State_Park
 website  Black Moshannon State ParkBlack Moshannon State Park is a  Pennsylvania state park in Rush Township in Centre County, Pennsylvania in the United States. It surrounds Black Moshannon Lake, formed by a dam on Moshannon Creek, which has given its name to the lake and park. The park is just west of the Front,  east of Philipsburg on Route 504, and is largely surrounded by State Forest. A bog in the park provides a habitat for diverse wildlife not common in other areas of the state, such as plants, orchids, and species normally found farther north. As home to the largest reconstituted bog/wetland complex in Pennsylvania,( Note: Despite the title, there are twenty-one parks in the list, with Colton Point and Harrison State Parks treated as one.) the park was chosen by the Pennsylvania Bureau of Parks for its Twenty Must-See Pennsylvania State Parks list.Humans have long used the Black Moshannon area for recreational, industrial, and subsistence purposes. The Seneca tribe used it as hunting and fishing grounds.  European settlers cleared some land for farming, then clear-cut the vast stands of old-growth White Pine and Eastern Hemlock to meet the needs of a growing nation during the late 19th century. Black Moshannon State Park rose from the ashes of a depleted forest that was largely destroyed by wildfire in the years following the lumber era. The forests were rehabilitated by the Conservation Corps during the Depression of the 1930s. Many of the buildings built by the Civilian Conservation Corps stand in the park today and are protected on the list of Register of Historic Places in three historic districts.Black Moshannon State Park is open year-round for recreation and has an extensive network of trails which allow hiking, biking, and viewing the bog habitat at the Black Moshannon State Natural Area. The park is in Pennsylvania Bird Area #33, where bird watchers have recorded 175 different species. It is also home to many rare and unusual plants and animals, due to its location atop the Plateau; the lake is at an elevation of about . Much of the park is open for hunting and the lake and creek are open for fishing, boating, and swimming. In winter it is a popular destination for skiing, and was home to a small downhill skiing area from 1967 to 1982. Picnics and camping are also popular, and the Friends of Black Moshannon State Park group promotes the park and all of the recreational activities associated with it.HistoryNative Americansthumb|300px|right|Black Moshannon State Park, Lake, and CreekHumans have lived in what is now Pennsylvania since at least 10,000 BC. The first settlers were Paleo-Indian nomadic hunters known from their tools.()( Note: For a general overview of Native American History in the West Branch Susquehanna watershed, see  Note: ISBN refers to the Heritage Books July 1996 reprint. URL is to a scan of the 1892 version with some OCR typos.) The hunter-gatherers of the Archaic period, which lasted locally from 7000 to 1000 BC, used a greater variety of more sophisticated stone artefacts. The period marked the gradual transition to semi-permanent villages and horticulture, between 1000 BC and 1500 AD. Archeological evidence found in the state from this time includes a range of pottery types and styles, burial mounds, pipes, bows and arrow, and ornaments.(Black Moshannon Creek is in the Branch Susquehanna River basin, whose earliest recorded inhabitants were the Iroquoian-speaking Susquehannocks. They were a matriarchial society that lived in large houses in stockaded villages. Decimated by disease and warfare with the Five Nations of the Iroquois, by 1675 they had died out, moved away, or been assimilated into other tribes.(( Note: ISBN refers to 1998 impression)After this, the lands of the West Branch Susquehanna River valley were under the nominal control of the Iroquois.( The Iroquois lived in long houses, primarily in what is now York, and had a strong confederacy which gave them power beyond their numbers.( To fill the void left by the demise of the Susquehannocks, the Iroquois encouraged displaced tribes from the east to settle in the West Branch watershed, including the Lenape (or Delaware).(The Seneca, members of the Iroquois Confederacy, were inhabitants in the area of Black Moshannon Lake, which was a series of beaver ponds at the time. They and other Native Americans, including the Lenape, hunted, fished, and traded in the region.(( The Shamokin Path, the major native eastwest path connecting the Susquehanna and River basins, crossed Black Moshannon Creek at a ford a few miles downstream from the park; however, no trails of the indigenous peoples are recorded as having passed through the park itself.( The parks  Indian Trail for hiking and cross-country skiing recalls such native paths as it runs through an open forest of oak and pine trees, with occasional clearings and a grove of hawthorns.((The and Indian War (17541763) led to the migration of many Native Americans westward to the Ohio River basin.( On November 5, 1768, the British acquired the New Purchase from the Iroquois in the of Fort Stanwix, including what is now Black Moshannon State Park.( After the Revolutionary War, Native Americans almost entirely left Pennsylvania.(While there are no known archeological sites within Black Moshannon State Park,((( the name Moshannon () is derived from a Lenape (or Delaware) name for Moshannon and Black Moshannon Creeks: Moss-hanne, which means moose stream or elk stream.() The name Black Moshannon refers to the dark color of the water, a result of plant tannins from the local vegetation and bog.()Lumber erathumb|right|The CCC-built beachhouse on the shores of Black Moshannon Lake near the bridge, where Antes Tavern and village were once located.Prior to the arrival of Penn and his Quaker colonists in 1682, it has been estimated that up to 90 percent of what is now Pennsylvania was covered with woods: over  of White Pine, Eastern Hemlock, and a mix of hardwoods.() The forests near the three original counties, Philadelphia, Bucks, and Chester, were the first to be harvested, as the early settlers used the readily available timber to build homes, barns, and ships, and cleared the land for agriculture. The demand for lumber slowly increased and by the time of the Revolution the lumber industry had reached the interior and mountainous regions of Pennsylvania.((Lumber became one of the leading industries in Pennsylvania.( Trees were used to furnish fuel to heat homes, tannin for the many tanneries that were spread throughout the state, and wood for construction, furniture, and barrel making. Large areas of forest were harvested by colliers to fire iron furnaces. Rifle stocks and shingles were made from Pennsylvania timber, as were a wide variety of household utensils, and the first wagons.( The Philadelphia&ndash;Erie Pike (present day Route 504) opened the Black Moshannon area to settlers by 1821. The first settlers opened the Antes Tavern along the Pike, trapped fur-bearing animals, and cleared land for farming.(By the mid-19th century, the demand for lumber reached the area, where Eastern White Pine and Eastern Hemlock covered the surrounding mountainsides. Lumbermen came and harvested the trees and sent them down Black Moshannon and Moshannon Creeks to the West Branch Susquehanna River, then along that to the Boom and sawmills at Williamsport.(( Note: For a general overview of lumber history in the West Branch Susquehanna watershed, see )  Lumber was also transported by sled and wagon over the ridges and through the valleys to Philipsburg, Julian and Unionville.()thumb|The Moshannon School served Antes in the late 1800s and closed in 1926. It is the only building from the lumber era left in the park.The Beaver Mill Lumber Company became one of the largest single lumber operations in all of Pennsylvania, and four lumber boomtowns, Beaver Mills, Star Mill, Underwood Mills, and Antes, altered the landscape in the Black Moshannon area.( A dam was built at the site of an old beaver dam,( and the mill ponds for the lumber mills flooded the old beaver ponds. The communities featured stores, blacksmith shops, liveries, taverns, schools, and even a bowling alley. The area helped to meet the nations need for timber in mining operations, construction, and railroads.(A number of trails in the park today recall this time. The  Seneca Trail for cross-country skiing and hiking passes through a second growth forest of oak and cherry trees that shade the stumps of the old growth pines harvested during the lumber era.(( The Shingle Mill Trail is a  loop that begins at the main parking area near the dam on Black Moshannon Lake and follows the banks of Black Moshannon Creek to the Allegheny Front Trail and back.(( The remains of Star Mill, a sawmill built in 1879 that operated until the end of the lumber era, are on the  Star Mill Trail. This loop trail for hiking and cross-country skiing is flat, with a view of Black Moshannon Lake.(This boom era was not to last; before long the lumber was gone, and once the trees were all clear-cut, the loggers left the area. The lumbermen left behind a barren landscape that was devastated by erosion and wildfires. In the late 19th and early 20th centuries, the of Pennsylvania bought thousands of acres of deforested and burned land, then began the project of reforestation. By the 1930s, the land that became Black Moshannon State Park was already a place for picnics and camping, on the aptly named Tent Hill, and people swam and fished in the old mill pond.( The  Tent Hill Trail still runs from the campsites to the beach on Black Moshannon Lake.((Civilian Conservation Corpsthumb|right|Men of CCC Company 359 working on the dam in Black Moshannon State Park, c. 1936The Conservation Corps (CCC) was a work relief program for young men from unemployed families, established in 1933. As part of President D. Roosevelts Deal legislation, it was designed to combat unemployment during the Great Depression. The CCC operated in every state.()The original facilities at Black Moshannon State Park were constructed by the Civilian Conservation Corps, from 1933 to 1937. The CCC created many jobs for unemployed industrial workers from throghout the United States. Black Moshannon State Park is the result of one of many projects undertaken by the CCC throughout central Pennsylvania.(()Beaver Meadow CCC Camp S-71 was built in May 1933 near the abandoned village of Beaver Mills, and was one of the first to expand recreational facilities in Pennsylvania.() Over 200 young men moved in and began the work of conserving soil, water, and timber in the area. They cut roads through the growing forest to aid in fighting the wildfires that sprang up, and planted many acres of Pines as part of the reforestation effort.()Most of the CCC-built park facilities are still in use today, including cabins, picnic pavilions, a food concession stand, and miles of trails. Early on, the CCC constructed a dam at Black Moshannon Lake, on the site of the former mill pond dam.((( CCC Camp S-71 closed in January 1937 and Black Moshannon State Park opened that same year.()Historic districtsright|thumb|300px|Map of Black Moshannon State Park with the outlines of the three historic districts shown in redIn 1987, three separate historic districts incorporating the existing CCC structures in Black Moshannon State Park were placed on the Register of Historic Places.() The structures in all three districts were built between 1933 and 1937 and are designated as part of either the Beach and Day Use, Family Cabin, or Maintenance Historic Districts.Eighteen structures in the Beach and Day Use Historic District are protected as contributing properties, including seven standard pavilions, a larger picnic shelter, and three water pump shelters. These last were built of native stone and covered with pebbles, and have since been converted to small picnic pavilions. The concession building, beach bathhouse, and museum are also protected.() Four open pit latrines with wane edge siding and hipped roofs are also contributing structures to the Beach and Day Use district.(The Family Cabin Historic District consists of 16 contributing properties: 13 log cabins, one lodge, and two latrines. Cabins 1&ndash;12, half with one room and half with two, are in a line along a road, similar to 1930s motor courts. The cabin layout at Black Moshannon State Park is unique compared to CCC-built cabins at other Pennsylvania state parks.( The cabins at the other parks reflect the rustic style of cabin layout promoted by the Park Service. The Lodge, also known as Cabin 13, is a large rectangular clapboard-sided building with a stone fireplace, while Cabin 14 is L-shaped with an open porch. Two pit latrines built by the CCC are also contributing structures.(The Maintenance Historic District includes four CCC-built structures.() The storage building is a wood-frame structure with a gable roof, similar to military storage buildings built in the 1930s and 1940s. A three-bay garage of standard military design is included in this historic district, as is the gas pump house with an extended eave to protect the pumps. The rangers residence is a -story gable-roofed house, with modern aluminum siding.(thumb|right|CCC-built rustic cabins were added to the NRHP in 1987 and are still rented by visitors.Modern eraSince its establishment in 1937, Black Moshannon State Park has undergone several changes. In 1941, Governor Arthur James announced plans to expand the park to  by annexing surrounding state forest land.() Black Moshannon Airport was built on land taken from the state park and State Forest just prior to the World War,( was operational by 1942,() and re-named Mid-State Airport in 1962.()  As of 2008, it is officially known as Mid-State Regional Airport and covers .(, effective 2007-12-20. Airport IQ 5010. Retrieved on April 18, 2008.) While the airport has been designated a Opportunity Zone to encourage business growth,() there are limitations in state law that prohibit any further development on park or forest lands.()The CCC-built dam forming Black Moshannon Lake was replaced in the 1950s by the current structure.( On November 11, 1954, the park was officially named Black Moshannon State Park by the Pennsylvania Geographic Board. The park experienced major developments between 1971 and 1980.( As of 2008, post-war facilities include the rangers station, six modern cabins, boat launches, showerhouses, and modern restroom facilities.  The CCC-built Museum is now the Environmental Learning Center.(()There is a wastewater treatment plant near the dam for effluent from the park, airport, and some private homes.(thumb|right|The current dam forming the lake on Black Moshannon Creek was built in the 1950s.Black Moshannon State Park was the site of a resort from the 1960s until 1982. The state legislature authorized construction of ski facilities at the park in 1961,() which were operational by 1965.() Although managed by the state, a commercial operator was sought as early as 1969,( and in 1980 it was leased to a private contractor, before being closed in 1982.(() The ski area was primitive by modern standards: skiers were lifted to the top of the slope by one of two tow ropes or Poma lifts,() and the slopes had about  of vertical drop.() As of 2008, the ski lodge remains  and is rented out to park visitors,( while the Ski Slope Trail is a  hiking trail that follows the former ski slope. It begins at the parking area near the dam, climbs Rattlesnake Mountain, and crosses Pennsylvania Route 504 near a historical marker for the Philadelphia&ndash;Erie Turnpike.(By the 1980s, the park started to receive official recognition for its unique resources. The three Historic Districts were added to the National Register of Historic Places in 1987 in recognition of their CCC-built structures.( That same year the state celebrated Black Moshannon State Parks 50th Anniversary.()  In 1994, the DCNR established the Black Moshannon Bog Natural Area as part of a program to recognize areas of unique scenic, geologic or ecological value.(( By 2001 yearly attendance at Black Moshannon State Park was over 350,000.() As of 2008, the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources (DCNR) Bureau of Parks, which administers all 120 Pennsylvania state parks, had chosen Black Moshannon as one of twenty-one parks for its Twenty Must-See Pennsylvania State Parks list, citing its location atop the Allegheny Plateau and within the state forest, its many trails and rare plants, and its status as a state park natural area and the largest reconstituted bog/wetland complex in Pennsylvania.(Geology and climatethumb|right|The bog and lake, as seen from the PA Route 504 bridge, are made possible by the underlying sandstone.The rocks underlying the Black Moshannon Creek drainage basin are primarily shale, sandstone, and coal.() Three major rock formations are present in Black Moshannon State Park, all from the Carboniferous period. These sedimentary rocks formed in or near shallow seas roughly 300 to 350 million years ago.()  The Mississippian Burgoon Formation is composed of buff-colored sandstone and conglomerate. The late Mississippian Chunk Formation is formed with grayish-red shale, siltstone, sandstone, and conglomerate. The third is the early Pennsylvanian Formation, which is a gray conglomerate that may contain sandstone, siltstone, and shale, as well as anthracite coal.(()The park is at an elevation of  atop the Plateau,( accessdate  2007-12-12 ) just west of the Front, a steep escarpment which rises  in , and marks the transition between the Appalachians to the east and the Allegheny Plateau to the west. The Allegheny Plateau and Appalachian mountains were all formed in the orogeny some 300 million years ago, when Gondwana (specifically what became Africa) and what became North America collided, forming Pangaea.(()The lake within the park is at an elevation of about , and the park itself sits in a natural basin. The basin and the underlying sandstone trap water and thus form the lake and surrounding bogs.(( The higher elevation leads to a cooler climate, and the basin helps trap denser, cooler air, leading to longer winters and milder summers.(The cooler climate also means the park is home to animals and plants typically found much further north.( The Allegheny Plateau has a climate, with occasional severe low temperatures in winter and average daily ranges of 20 F (11 C) in winter and 26 F (14 C) in summer.() In 1972, long-term average monthly temperatures ranged from a high of  in July to a low of  in January.(Note: Although the report says it was prepared by outside consultants, it does not identify them.) The mean annual precipitation for the Black Moshannon Creek watershed is 40 to 42 inches (1016 to 1067 mm).( The soil in the park is mostly derived from sandstone and as such does not have much capacity to neutralize acid rain.( The highest recorded temperature at the park was  in 1988, and the record low was  in 1994.(dateAugust 2010EcologyWithin Black Moshannon State Park there is a State Park Natural Area protecting the bogs.( The park itself is part of a much larger Bird Area (IBA), which includes most of the surrounding state forest, airport, and private properties.(Bog Natural AreaThe bogs at the park contain large amounts of sphagnum moss; this decomposes very slowly, causing layers of dead moss to build up at the bottom of the bog, creating peat.() In 1994,  of bog at the state park were protected as the Black Moshannon Bog Natural Area;( this was originally conceived as part of the State Parks 2000 strategic plan of the DCNR, and fourteen years later the total area of bog protected as a Natural Area had increased to .()Most bogs exist in glaciated areas, but Black Moshannon State Park is on the Allegheny Plateau. This area was not covered by glaciers during the last ice age. The bogs formed here because of the beds of sandstone that lie flat, a short distance below the surface of the earth. The sandstone formations in the park do not absorb water very well, so any depression in them will collect water, as has happened here.( The bogs extend the shores of the lake. Migratory shorebirds that visit here include Greater and Yellowlegs, Sandpiper, Sandpiper, and the Sandpiper, which has been confirmed as using the IBA as a breeding grounds.(The water in the bog is low in nutrients and high in acidity, which makes it difficult for most plants to live there. Only specialized plants can thrive in the park bogs: there are three species of carnivorous plants and seventeen varieties of orchid. Wild cranberries and blueberries grow in the bog along with sedges, Leatherleaf shrubs, Arctic Cotton Grass, and viburnums. The bogs are all protected by the state of Pennsylvania.(WildlifeImage:Black Moshannon SP Museum.jpg|thumb|Black Moshannons waters are dark with tannins (CCC-built museum in the background).White-tailed Deer, Turkey, Grouse, opossum, Raccoon, hawks, chipmunks, porcupine, woodpeckers, and flying, Red, and Gray Squirrels are all fairly common in the park. Black Bears also inhabit Black Moshannon State Park.(() Many of these animals were decimated due to the effects of deforestation, pollution and unregulated hunting and trapping that took place during the late 19th century.() Hunting controls established by the Game Commission and the work of the  Civilian Conservation Corps and Pennsylvania Department of Conservation and Natural Resources in re-establishing the second growth forest have led to the strong comeback of game species at Black Moshannon State Park and throughout the forests of Pennsylvania.(The lake is home to Beavers, as well as Blue Heron, swans, Snow Geese, Loons, and many other types of waterfowl, with Goose, Duck, Mallard, and Duck the most commonly seen. The bogs, marshes, and swamps contain frogs and salamanders, and provide a habitat for plants like the plant and sundew. Black Moshannon State Park is home to many common species of songbirds, including Ovenbirds.(((The conifer and mixed-forests of the park and its surroundings provide habitats for Saw-whet Owl, Vireo, Thrush, Junco, and Magnolia, Pine, Yellow-rumped, Blackburnian, and Green Warblers. The deciduous forests provide habitats for songbirds, such as Tanager and Vireo.(An outbreak of the non-native moth in the mid-1980s nearly devastated the woods in a small valley. Selective timber cuts harvested the trees that were affected by species of moth. Today the  Sleepy Hollow Trail for hiking and cross-country skiing loops through the new growth in the area, which provides an ideal habitat for populations of White-tailed Deer and Wild Turkey.((Important Bird AreaPennsylvania Important Bird Area #33 encompasses . The land includes parts of the state park and surrounding Moshannon State Forest, as well as State Game Lands No. 33, Mid-State Regional Airport (which borders both the park and forest), and some other nearby parcels of private land. The Pennsylvania Society has designated  of Black Moshannon State Park as an IBA, which is an area designated as a globally important habitat for the conservation of bird populations.()thumb|right|A family of Canada Geese on Black Moshannon Lake, which provides habitat for migratory waterfowl and shorebirds.Ornithologists and bird watchers have recorded a total of 175 species at the IBA. Several factors contribute to the high total of bird species observed: there is a large area of forest in the IBA, as well as great habitat diversity. The location of the IBA along the Allegheny Front also contributes to the diverse bird populations.(Black Moshannon Lake and the bogs of the Natural Area are especially important to the IBA. They serve as a stopover for migratory waterfowl and shorebirds. Waterfowl observed at the park include Pied-billed and Grebes, Common Loon, Black Duck, Duck, Blue-winged and Teal, Swan, Duck, Hooded and Merganser, Greater and Scaup, Pintail, Bufflehead, Wigeon, and Shoveler.(Pennsylvania IBA #33 is on the Allegheny Front, which is along a prime migratory path for a variety of birds of prey. The Eagle, Eagle, Osprey, and Northern Harrier pass through the area during their annual migration periods. It is possible that the Bald Eagle may nest within the IBA, but this has not been confirmed. Raptors which do nest in the forests of the IBA include the Goshawk, Red-shouldered, Broad-winged, Red-tailed, Sharp-shinned, and Hawks.(The cool, damp habitat provided by the bogs at Black Moshannon State Park provides a home for some birds that are at the southern limit of their habitat in central Pennsylvania. The Warbler and Waterthrush nest in the bogs, as do the Flycatcher, Yellowthroat, Sparrow, Blackbird, and Catbird. The Flycatcher, which is designated as locally extinct in Pennsylvania, has been seen during the breeding season at Black Moshannon State Natural Area. Bird watchers have observed nesting Owls in the IBA, as well as Rail and Sora.(RecreationCabins, camping, swimming, and picnicsthumb|right|A former pumphouse, built by the CCC, is now a picnic shelter.Nineteen cabins can be used by visitors at Black Moshannon State Park. Thirteen are rustic cabins, built by the CCC, with electric lights, a kitchen stove and a wood burning stove, refrigerator, and bunk beds. Six are modern cabins, including the former ski lodge,( with electric heat, a bedroom, living room, kitchen, and bath. All cabin renters need to bring their own household items such as linens and cookware.(()There are eighty campsites at Black Moshannon State Park. Each campsite has access to washhouses with flush toilets, showers, and laundry tubs. The campsites also have fire rings and picnic tables. There is also an organized group tenting area, which can accommodate a group of up to 60 persons.(The sandy beach on Black Moshannon Lake is open from Day weekend through Day weekend, and the beach bathhouse was built by the CCC.( Beginning in 2008, lifeguards will not be posted at the beach.()There are eight picnic pavilions built by the CCC in the park, which can be reserved for a fee. In addition to the pavilions, Black Moshannon State Park has 250 picnic tables in four large picnic areas. The use of these picnic tables and unreserved pavilions is first come, first served, and they are free of charge.(Boating, fishing, and huntingthumb|Black Moshannon Creek just downstream of the dam and lakeBoating is a popular use of the waters of Black Moshannon Lake, which covers . Canoes, sailboats, and motor boats are all permitted on Black Moshannon Lake, provided they are properly registered with the state.( Edward Gertler, author of a series of canoeing books, calls Black Moshannon Creek about the best whitewater run in the West Branch Susquehanna Watershed in Keystone Canoeing,() and the first  stretch of Class 2+ whitewater for canoeing and kayaking begins in the park, just downstream of the dam.Cold water fishing is available in Black Moshannon Creek and several of its tributaries, where anglers will find Rainbow and Trout that have been stocked there for sport fishing by the Fish and Boat Commission. Black Moshannon Lakes waters are warmer than those of the creek, and so hold many different species of fish, including Bass, Muskellunge, Perch, Pickerel, Bullhead Catfish, Pike, Bluegill, and crappie.(Hunting is permitted in most of Black Moshannon State Park. It helps to prevent an overpopulation of animals and the resulting overbrowsing of the understory.( The most common game species are Ruffed Grouse, Eastern Gray Squirrel, Wild Turkey, and White-tailed Deer. However, the hunting of Groundhogs is prohibited.(TrailsThere are  of trails at Black Moshannon State Park that are open to hiking, biking, skiing, and snowmobiling. All trails are open to hiking, most are open to skiing during the winter months, and select trails are open to snowmobiles and bikes.() The park is especially popular among cross-country skiing enthusiasts due to its high elevation.() Skiers will find trails that are largely free of rocks, with a layer of grass beneath the snow. Sleepy Hollow, Seneca, Indian, and Hay Road Trails are most frequently used.( Seven of the parks thirteen trails are described above, the remaining six follow.thumb|right|The Bog Trail boardwalk with an explanatory sign visible*Allegheny Front Trail is a  hiking trail that passes through Black Moshannon State Park and Moshannon State Forest. It was built in the late 1990s and offers several vistas looking out from atop the Allegheny Front.(()*Bog Trail is a  boardwalk hiking trail that was built by the Pennsylvania Conservation Corps and has received awards for its  handicapped accessibility.( Bog Trail loops through the bog at the park passing by lilies, sedges, rushes, Leatherleaf, and various carnivorous plants. Visitors may observe waterfowl and wildlife in the bogs.( Access for the handicapped is provided at the boating area.(*Dry Hollow Trail is a  trail open to hiking, cross-country skiing, mountain biking, and snowmobiling. It is in a narrow valley at the base of the former ski slope. The hollow consists of open woods with mountain laurel and meadows.(*Hay Road Trail is a  trail that is open to hiking and cross-country skiing.( An old road overgrown with grass, it passes through a mixed-oak and Black Cherry forest. It was formerly used by farmers to gather grasses from the marshes of what is now Black Moshannon State Park.(*Moss-Hanne Trail is an  loop trail through the Black Moshannon Bog Natural Area. It is open to hiking and cross-country skiing. The trail passes through pine plantations, hardwood forests, spruce groves, hemlock-filled bottomlands, patches of wild blueberries, and by beaver ponds. The area is marshy; waterproof footwear is recommended and parts of the trail are boardwalks.(*Snowmobile Trail is a  trail that runs parallel to Dry Hollow Trail. It provides access to the many miles of trails in Moshannon State Forest that are open to recreational snowmobiling. It is open during summer months for hiking and mountain biking.(Friends of Black Moshannon State Parkthumb|Pavilion 4, a contributing property to the Beach and Day Use Historic District since 1987The Friends of Black Moshannon State Park is a volunteer organization that promotes the recreational use of the park through a summer festival. The group also works with the park staff to maintain the park lands, serve as campground hosts, survey the Bluebird population, and organize conservation projects.()The Summer Festival usually takes place over the third weekend of July. Events at the festival recall the lumbering history of the park. Log rolling, axe throwing, and cross-cut sawing events are held, as are horseshoe and watermelon seed spitting contests.( Black Moshannon Lake is open to canoe races and fishing. A Saturday night bonfire party is held at the beach, with live entertainment and refreshments.(Nearby state parksThe following state parks are within  of Black Moshannon State Park:( Note: shows Black Moshannon State Park)()ReferencesExternal links* Estatal Black Moshannondtat de Black Moshannonstanowy Black Moshannon
6823202
Lula,_Sardinia
Lula () is a comune (municipality) in the of Nuoro in the Italian region Sardinia, located about 220  km north of the regional capital Cagliari and about 40  km northeast of the provincial capital Nuoro. As of 31 December 2004, it had a population of 1,626 and an area of 147.9 km.(All demographics and other statistics: Italian statistical institute Istat.)The citizens of Lula are called Lulesi, Lula is located on the bottom of Mount Albo, an amazing chain of white limestone, full of natural caves and stalactites.In the Mount Albo live rare specie of wild cat and a couple of Real eagle, very important are its old age forests.Lula has been a mine important centre, Guzzuras mine has been started by the Romans, and Sos enattos mines use to occupy thousand of workers until last century. Famous was the strike against the Jew company Jacob.The Lulas mine centre is part of Sardinian Geo Mining, it is park recognize from UNESCO and declared a Human Heritage sitePatron saint: Santa Maria Assunta 15th of May.September is a month which took place three very important country Holy day, in honour of: Lady of Miracles first week end of September. San Nicola second week end of the month and San Matthew the third week end of the month.Prior is leader of a group of person choosing by extraction that is in charge for one year to organize the fest in honour of the saint.Every holy day has a prior, during the day there is a holy mass, traditional dance, tenores  typical Sardinian songs.Prior offer to the pilgrims typical lulesi dishes and local wine, hundreds people join the fest every year.Important citizens: Paolo Calia has been Federico Fellini set designer, appreciate painter live in Paris France.Books about the village; Le bacchette di Lula A. Bernadini.Several quotation about Lula and its tradition and event appears in the books of Sardinian Nobel price Grazia Deledda.  Lula borders the following municipalities: Bitti, Dorgali, Galtell, Irgoli, Loculi, Lod, Onani, Orune, Siniscola.thumb|left|250px|Sheep near Lula Demographic evolution Colors  id:lightgrey value:gray(0.9)  id:darkgrey  value:gray(0.8)  id:sfondo value:rgb(1,1,1)  id:barra value:rgb(0.6,0.7,0.8)ImageSize   width:455 height:303PlotArea    left:50 bottom:50 top:30 right:30DateFormat  x.yPeriod      from:0 till:3000TimeAxis    orientation:verticalAlignBars   justifyScaleMajor  gridcolor:darkgrey increment:1000 start:0ScaleMinor  gridcolor:lightgrey increment:200 start:0BackgroundColors  canvas:sfondoBarData  bar:1861 text:1861  bar:1871 text:1871  bar:1881 text:1881  bar:1901 text:1901  bar:1911 text:1911  bar:1921 text:1921  bar:1931 text:1931  bar:1936 text:1936  bar:1951 text:1951  bar:1961 text:1961  bar:1971 text:1971  bar:1981 text:1981  bar:1991 text:1991  bar:2001 text:2001PlotData  color:barra width:20 align:left  bar:1861 from: 0 till:1160  bar:1871 from: 0 till:1249  bar:1881 from: 0 till:1362  bar:1901 from: 0 till:1796  bar:1911 from: 0 till:1972  bar:1921 from: 0 till:1907  bar:1931 from: 0 till:2037  bar:1936 from: 0 till:2000  bar:1951 from: 0 till:2214  bar:1961 from: 0 till:2397  bar:1971 from: 0 till:2112  bar:1981 from: 0 till:1952  bar:1991 from: 0 till:1791  bar:2001 from: 0 till:1657PlotData  bar:1861 at:1160 fontsize:XS text: 1160 shift:(-8,5)  bar:1871 at:1249 fontsize:XS text: 1249 shift:(-8,5)  bar:1881 at:1362 fontsize:XS text: 1362 shift:(-8,5)  bar:1901 at:1796 fontsize:XS text: 1796 shift:(-8,5)  bar:1911 at:1972 fontsize:XS text: 1972 shift:(-8,5)  bar:1921 at:1907 fontsize:XS text: 1907 shift:(-8,5)  bar:1931 at:2037 fontsize:XS text: 2037 shift:(-8,5)  bar:1936 at:2000 fontsize:XS text: 2000 shift:(-8,5)  bar:1951 at:2214 fontsize:XS text: 2214 shift:(-8,5)  bar:1961 at:2397 fontsize:XS text: 2397 shift:(-8,5)  bar:1971 at:2112 fontsize:XS text: 2112 shift:(-8,5)  bar:1981 at:1952 fontsize:XS text: 1952 shift:(-8,5)  bar:1991 at:1791 fontsize:XS text: 1791 shift:(-8,5)  bar:2001 at:1657 fontsize:XS text: 1657 shift:(-8,5)TextData  fontsize:S pos:(20,20)  text:Data from ISTATReferencesan:Lvula(Nuoro)(Sardinien)(Italia)(provinco Nuoro)eu:Lula(Italie)Italia(Italia)(NU)(Itali)()(NU)pms:Lula(Wochy)(Itlia)()sc:LvulaItaly()(Litaliyn)Italya
6828623
Cabot_36
The Cabot 36 sailboat is a Canadian classic keelboat that was built in the 1970s in Nova Scotia from plans and drawings by the famous design team of Ted Brewer and Bob Walstrom.  Only 49 Cabots were produced by Cabotcraft Industries, which folded in the late 70s when orders and government funding diminished and the market for sailing vessels hit a slump in both Canada and the U.S.Cabotcraft IndustriesCabotcraft Industries (CCI) was the result of a financial partnership between the Cape Breton Development Corporation (Devco), and two Toronto entrepreneurs and boaters, Fred Karp, V.P. at Speedy Muffler, and advertising executive, Jerry Goodes.  CCI began operations at Pt. Edward Industrial Park, Sydney, N.S. in late 1972 or early 1973, in World War I naval buildings that had been converted by the Coast Guard for bringing small craft out of the water. In the early seventies, the mining industry in Cape Breton was on the wane.  Devcos mission was to put unemployed miners back to work.  Many of the men who went to work for Cabotcraft Industries were miners who learned a new trade in boat building. They might have thought they had not left the mines.  Working at CCI was rugged: Coal dust was used for tire grip in the winter snow, resin dust glittered in the sunlight coming through worn windows, and the first crew often dressed inside for winter temperatures. DevelopmentJim Marsh, John Perring and Bob Wallstrom did the lofting from Wallstroms own plans, and line drawings from Ted Brewer, who had begun in his designs to take a bite out of the aft section of the traditional full keel, giving greater steerage in reverse. Intended for cruising in comfort in North Atlantic conditions, the Cabot 36 included an ample galley and storage below, and her construction was rugged, with a core of Airex foam. Ted Brewer challenged invited visitors to take a swing with an axe at a piece of the Airex foam. The Cabot was not a racing vessel, but it pleased buyers looking for safety, steady tracking, and comfort below.Getting the first boat to show in 1974 was a scramble. The crew, traveling in a Winnebago, worked at every stop to build and finish the interior as the convoy headed to Annapolis, towing the Cabot behind an old 50s Mac Truck. Administrative changesAbout 1975, after a dozen or so boats had been produced, Fred Karp and Jerry Goodes left, and Devco took the company over.  John Perring replaced Jim Marsh at the helm for an interim period before Devco hired Roy Mac Keen, who had been working in their Tourism division, in part on Cruising Cape Breton, a successful navigational guide to the Bras dOr Lakes. Mac Keen (as President) and Perring presided over the bulk of production to the companys end in July 1978.Economic conditions were bad for all boat builders in the late 70s. Competition was fierce and the energy crisis had begun to drive up the price for resins.  CCIs relative isolation from its main suppliers meant it always struggled to keep costs down. It was also not until sometime in 1975 that the facility had been improved enough to handle a line of ten boats under construction.ClosingIn an attempt to diversify, the company had plans to do a 30-foot version of the boat, and molds had been done (and a few lay-ups) for the 41-foot Cape Islander fishing vessel. But these and other ventures into commercial applications of fibreglass could not save the company. Devco closed the operation in July 1978 after 49 boats, some as kits, had been completed.The molds then languished for years in Nova Scotia fields, occasionally being visited by sailors who yearned to have their own Cabot 36. Rumors sometimes spread that a new company had been formed to bring her back, but nothing materialized.Eventually, Brian Smyth, engineer and chief technical wizzard with Yachtsmiths International, heard of their survival, but it wasnt until 2002 that he fell in love with a Cabot 36, moored next to him in the Bahamas. On his return home, he and a partner went in search of the molds and plans were laid for a new line of production.Most of the original fleet still sail the world, and you can connect with current and past owners of this boat which gained a reputation for toughness, sea-kindly sailing and comfort in long passages.
6834908
Machine_guidance
The term Machine Guidance is used to describe a wide range of techniques which improve the productivity of agricultural, mining and construction equipment. It is most commonly used to describe systems which incorporate GPS, Motion Measuring Units (MMU) and other devices to provide on-board systems with information about the movement of the machine in either 3, 5 or 7 axis of rotation. Feedback to the operator is provided through audio and visual displays which allows improved control of the machine in relation to the intended or designed direction of travel.See also* of emerging technologies
6847247
Coolidge_Dam
 extra              The Coolidge Dam is a concrete multiple dome and dam  southeast of Arizona on the River. Built between 1924 and 1928, the Coolidge Dam was part of the San Carlos Irrigation Project. Coolidge Dam was named after the 30th US President, Coolidge and was dedicated by President Coolidge on March 4, 1930. The design and construction engineer was Neuffer, who oversaw much of the construction undertaken by the Bureau during the 1920s in Arizona and Mexico.Coolidge Dam impounds Carlos Lake in the Carlos Apache Indian Reservation. The project irrigates 100,000 acres (400 km).Since the water is impounded so it can be released when farmers need it, San Carlos Lake is often at a low level except in wet periods. When former President Coolidge dedicated the dam in 1930, the dam had not begun to fill. Cherokee humorist Rogers looked at the grass in the lake bed, and said, If this were my dam, Id mow it.(Coolidge Dam Celebrates 78th Anniversary | Copper Country News)HistoryConstructionCoolidge Dam was constructed by the of Indian Affairs (BIA), which also owns and operates it, at a cost of US$10 million.() It was built between 1924 and 1928. The overall structure used  of concrete and consists of three domes, which are supported by massive buttresses on  centers. It rises , with a crest length of . Two uncontrolled ogee crest spillways are concrete lined and located on each abutment.()Opposition from Apache tribeConstruction of the dam incurred opposition from the Apache tribe, who feared a violation of their treaty rights, according to an author writing for the Writers Project::A compromise was finally made with the Indians, and the tribal grounds and the old camp from which Geronimo started his bloody raids now lie deep under the waters of the reservoir. It was proposed to disinter the bodies but the Apache vehemently objected to what they considered desecration of the dead, so a concrete slab was laid over the principal burial ground at a cost of $11,000.()Hydroelectric power generationAs part of the Carlos Indian Irrigation Project (SCIIP), Coolidge Dam generates electricity from a hydroelectric plant. A diesel electric generating plant also run by the Project was built simultaneously and located on reservation land near the town of Coolidge. Both facilities provide power for irrigation wells, local towns, rural users and mining operations.() The electric plant at the dam was completed and began generating electricity in 1935, and the diesel plant was completed in December of that year and produced electricity the following year.()Structural modificationsIn 1988, the of Reclamation completed a study that concluded that the dam needed modifications to prevent a failure should a significant flood or an earthquake occur. Earlier floods that had resulted in water topping the dam had eroded the abutments, and the buttresses were judged to be unstable. Work started in 1991 and included an access road to the downstream side of the dam. The work concluded in 1995. The final cost was estimated at $US46.5 million.()Flood of 1993In January of 1993, heavy rainfall (up to three times the normal amount) in Arizona filled San Carlos Lake and the operators were forced to release excess water. The ground was saturated, and the continuing rainfall ran off into the streams and rivers. In addition, the weather pattern for the year caused higher than normal temperatures in areas that would typically remain under snow. These areas received rain instead of snow, and the rivers began to run earlier and with far more volume than normal. Rivers in the southern part of Arizona at that time contained anywhere from three to nearly six times their normal amount of water. To complicate matters, the snowpack was already 150% the normal amount. Dam operators for Coolidge Dam released water in record levels because storage capacity had been reached.()As a result of the heavy water releases, several El Paso Natural Gas pipelines, which crossed the Gila River near Coolidge, Winkleman, and Kelvin were scoured or uncovered by the force of the water and failed. The water flow was concentrated through the release gates, as opposed to letting the water overtop the dam, which would have created a different scour rate. The force of the Gila River undermined and ultimately caused the failure of the north and south abutments of the bridge crossing at Attaway Road, upstream from Coolidge. The estimated flow from Coolidge Dam during January of 1993 was 927 cubic meters per second, about seven times the expected maximum release rate, 133 cubic meters per second, and was the highest release rate for the dam since its construction. Discharge at Winkleman was recorded at 1050 cubic meters per second on January 20, 1993. Winkleman Flats, a small area near Winkleman, was flooded as well.( However, despite earlier concerns about the dams safety, it survived the flood even though retrofit work was in process at the time.Recreational use|thumb|right|Gila River downstream from Coolidge DamFishing and boatingSan Carlos Lake is stocked periodically, and when the winter has experienced average or above average precipitation, is one of the largest lakes in Arizona. The San Carlos Apache Tribe Recreation & Wildlife Dept. stocks several species of fish using various methods to create a good fishing environment. Several species are self-sustaining:* sunfish (Lepomis sp.)* bass (Micropterus salmoides)* black crappie (Pomoxis nigromaculatus)* channel catfish (Ictalurus punctatus)* flathead catfish (Pylodictis olivaris)Other fish are stocked from cold-water fisheries including trout and trout. Jet-skiing, water skiing and boating are allowed. Individuals who are not members of the San Carlos Apache tribe who wish to use the lake must contact the tribal office for a permit since the lake is on tribal land.()Bicycle trailBicyclists can ride the access road to the dam face and back. The route is scenic and little-traveled, and rises a total of about 700 feet along the 13 mile route. The elevation at the dam is about the same as the starting point, so the trip is not strictly a climb, but peaks about the middle of the distance and then descends again to about 2,600 ft. When they reach the dam, cyclists can either return to the starting point along the two-lane paved road, or they can continue eastward along the rougher part of the road until it rejoins Route 70. Before traveling on the reservation, non-tribe members must obtain a permit. A bike or other rugged type bicycle is recommended for cyclists traveling east from the dam to Rte 70.()ReferencesExternal links*USBR Coolidge Dam Website *http://lcweb2.loc.gov/cgi-bin/query/S?pp/hh:@field(SUBJ+@od1(ARIZONA--Pinal+County--Peridot+vicinity Coolidge Dam photo series from American Engineering Record *Southwest Tribal Fisheries Commission - San Carlos Apache Tribe*San Carlos Apache Tribe Recreation & Wildlife Dept. - hunting permission forms and information about fishing permits*The American Southwest: San Carlos Lake*http://web.archive.org/web/20011031185425/http://www.usbr.gov/cdams/dams/coolidge.htmlDamno:Coolidge-demningen
6857628
Charles_Adams_(Colorado)
Charles Adams, born Charles Schwanbeck (December 19, 1845 &ndash; August 19, 1895), was a States Army officer, US Indian agent, diplomat and businessman. In 1879 he secured the release of five hostages taken captive by the River Utes after the Meeker Massacre, and held an official inquiry into their treatment. In 1880 he was appointed minister to Bolivia, where he served for two years. Returning to Colorado, he became involved in mining and water development.Early life and educationBorn in Pomerania, Germany in 1845, Charles was the son of Karl Heinrich and Maria J. Mackman Schwanbeck. His family immigrated to the United States after the of 1848 in Germany.CareerSchwanbeck fought as a young man in the late years of the Civil War. After the war he migrated to the Territory.  About 1870, he was appointed a brigadier general of the Militia, by when he had changed his surname to Adama.  In addition, he was appointed as US Indian Agent to the Tribe, serving through 1874. There were distinct groups of Utes in Colorado, although settlers often could not distinguish them. Adams dealt primarily with the White Rivers and Utes. During these years, Adams established good relationships with Ouray and his wife Chipeta of the Uncompahgre Utes.  This friendship was useful in helping him negotiate the release of five captives (three women and two children) taken by the Utes in 1879 after the Meeker Massacre, as part of the River War.  In 1875 Adams was appointed a post office inspector but he also continued with the militia.Marriage and familyAdams dropped the Schwanbeck surname sometime around 1870, when he married Margaret Thompson Phelps.  DiplomatIn 1880, Adams was appointed the United States minister to Bolivia.  In that position, he served as the arbitrator of conferences on the Bolivia and Chile Wars.  He remained in that position through 1882.Returning to Colorado with the change in presidential administrations, Adams became engaged in the manufacture of glass, and mining and mineral water development.  He died at the age of 50 in Colorado, in 1895.References*Who Was Who in America: Historical Volume, 1607-1896. Chicago: Quincy Whos Who, 1963.
6864953
Rodolfo_Stange
General Rodolfo Stange Oelckers (b. September 30, 1925) is a Chilean politician and former senator. He was a member of the Government Junta that ruled Chile from 1973 to 1990, representing the police force (de Chile). He was elected Senator in 1998, finishing his term in 2005.Stange was born in Montt, in the south of Chile. He was the son of Osvaldo Stange and Ina Oelckers, of ancestry. Because of his, he studied in the German Institute of Puerto Montt and later in the Liceo de Hombres. He joined the Military in 1945 and the Carabineros two years later. Thanks to a scholarship, Stange was able to continue his university studies in Germany and upon his return he became a teacher of Police Sciences and Police Administration. In 1970, Stange was named Administrative Chief of the School of Carabineros. Later, he was appointed the Coronel Director of the Superior Institute of Carabineros. In 1977, he became President of the Mining Company of Vallenar. During the presidency of Pinochet, Stange rose through the ranks until becoming General Subdirector of the police force in June 1982. When General Director Csar Mendoza Durav resigned on August 2, 1985, Stange was duly appointed to that post, serving ex officio as member of the government junta. Stange continued serving as general director after Pinochets presidency ended in 1990.After finishing his term as General Director of Carabineros in 1995, Stange dedicated himself to politics. he joined the Democratic Union and in 1997 was elected to the 17th Senatorial Circunscription (South Los Lagos). While in the Senate, from 1998 to 2006, Stange initially participated in  the Commission of the Environment and the Commission of Maritime Issues, Fishing, and Aquaculture. He later joined the Commission of Government, Decentralization and Regionalization, the Commission of Public Works, and the Special Commission of Security. Source * Profile from the Chilean Library of CongressStange
6870342
Multi-document_summarization
Multi-document summarization is an automatic procedure aimed at extraction of information from multiple texts written about the same topic. Resulting summary report allows individual users, so as professional information consumers, to quickly familiarize themselves with information contained in a large cluster of documents. In such a way, multi-document summarization systems are complementing the aggregators performing the next step down the road of coping with overload.Key benefitsMulti-document summarization creates information reports that are both concise and comprehensive.With different opinions being put together & outlined, every topic is described from multiple perspectives within a single document.While the goal of a brief summary is to simplify information search and cut the time by pointing to the most relevant source documents, comprehensive multi-document summary should itself contain the required information, hence limiting the need for accessing original files to cases when refinement is required.Automatic summaries present information extracted from multiple sources algorithmically, without any editorial touch or subjective human intervention, thus making it completely unbiased.Technological challengesThe multi-document summarization task has turned out to be much more complex than summarizing a single document, even a very large one. This difficulty arises from inevitable thematic diversity within a large set of documents. A good summarization technology aims to combine the main themes with completeness, readability, and conciseness. Document Understanding Conferences, conducted annually by NIST, have developed sophisticated evaluation criteria for techniques accepting the multi-document summarization challenge.An ideal multi-document summarization system does not simply shorten the source texts but presents information organized around the key aspects to represent a wider diversity of views on the topic. When such quality is achieved, an automatic multi-document summary is perceived more like an overview of a given topic. The latter implies that such text compilations should also meet other basic requirements for an overview text compiled by a human. The multi-document summary quality criteria are as follows:*clear structure, including an outline of the main content, from which it is easy to navigate to the full text sections*text within sections is divided into meaningful paragraphs*gradual transition from more general to more specific thematic aspects*good readabilityThe latter point deserves additional note - special care is taken in order to ensure that the automatic overview shows:*no paper-unrelated information noise from the respective documents (e.g., web pages)*no dangling references to what is not mentioned or explained in the overview*no text breaks across a sentence*no semantic redundancy.Real-life systemsThe multi-document summarization technology is now coming of age - a view supported by a choice of advanced web-based systems that are currently available.* Ultimate Research Assistant - The Ultimate Research Assistant performs text mining on Internet search results to help summarize and organize them and make it easier for the user to perform online research. Specific text mining techniques used by the tool include concept extraction, text summarization, hierarchical concept clustering (e.g., automated taxonomy generation), and various visualization techniques, including tag clouds and mind maps. To use this tool, the user types in the name of a topic, and the tool will search the web for highly relevant resources, and organize the search results into a rich, easy-to-understand research report.* iResearch Reporter - Commercial Text Extraction and Text Summarization system, free demo site accepts user-entered query, passes it on to Google search engine, retrieves multiple relevant documents, produces categorized, easily-readable natural language summary reports covering multiple documents in retrieved set, all extracts linked to original documents on the Web, post-processing, entity extraction, event and relationship extraction, text extraction, extract clustering, linguistic analysis, multi-document, full text, natural language processing, categorization rules, clustering, linguistic analysis, text summary construction tool set.* Newsblaster is a system that helps users find the news that is of the most interest to them. The system automatically collects, clusters, categorizes, and summarizes news from several sites on the web (CNN, Reuters, News, etc.) on a daily basis, and it provides users a user-friendly interface to browse the results.* NewsInEssence may be used to retrieve and summarize a cluster of articles from the web. It can start from a URL and retrieve documents that are similar, or it can retrieve documents that match a given set of keywords. NewsInEssence also downloads hundreds of news articles daily and produces news clusters from them.* NewsFeed Researcher is a news portal performing continuous summarization of documents initially clustered by the aggregators (e.g., News). NewsFeed Researcher is backed by the free online engine covering major events related to business, technology, U.S. and international news. This tool is also available in the on-demand mode allowing a user to build a summary on any selected topic.* Shablast is a universal search engine that produces multi-document summaries from the top 50 results returned by Microsofts Bing search engine for a set of keywords.As the quality multi-document summaries are becoming to resemble the overviews written by a human, one cannot exclude that their use of extracted text snippets can one day face some copyright issues. This potential case should be regarded from the point of the use copyright concept.Bibliography* Gnes Erkan and Dragomir R. Radev. Lexrank: Graph-based centrality as salience in text summarization. Journal of Artificial Intelligence Research (JAIR), 2004. http://clair.si.umich.edu/~radev/papers/lprj.pdf* Dragomir R. Radev, Hongyan Jing, Malgorzata Sty, and Daniel Tam. Centroid-based summarization of multiple documents. Information Processing and Management, 40:919938, December 2004. http://clair.si.umich.edu/~radev/papers/centroid.pdf* Kathleen R. McKeown and Dragomir R. Radev. Generating summaries of multiple news articles. In Proceedings, ACM Conference on Research and Development in Information Retrieval SIGIR95, pages 7482, Seattle, Washington, July 1995. http://clair.si.umich.edu/~radev/papers/sigir95.pdf* C.-Y. Lin, E. Hovy, From single to multi-document summarization: A prototype system and its evaluation, In Proceedings of the ACL, pp. 457464, 2002*Kathleen McKeown, Rebecca J. Passonneau, David K. Elson, Ani Nenkova, Julia Hirschberg, Do Summaries Help? A Task-Based Evaluation of Multi-Document Summarization, SIGIR05, Salvador, Brazil, August 1519, 2005 http://www.cs.columbia.edu/~ani/papers/f98-mckeown.pdf*R. Barzilay, N. Elhadad, K. R. McKeown, Inferring strategies for sentence ordering in multidocument news summarization, Journal of Artificial Intelligence Research, v. 17, pp. 3555, 2002*M. Soubbotin, S. Soubbotin, Trade-Off Between Factors Influencing Quality of the Summary, Document Understanding Workshop (DUC), Vancouver, B.C., Canada, October 910, 2005 http://duc.nist.gov/pubs/2005papers/freetext.sergei.pdf*See also* summarization* mining* aggregatorsExternal links*Document Understanding Conferences*Columbia NLP Projects*NewsInEssence: Web-based News Summarization
6876114
Cardiff,_Maryland
Cardiff is an community in Harford County, Maryland, States. The population was 518 at the 2000 census. Zipcode for the area is 21160. It takes its name from the Capital city of Wales.GeographyCardiff is located directly on the line, or Maryland - Pennsylvania border. It borders the incorporated town of Pennsylvania. It connects to the village of Whiteford, and is a short distance away from the areas of Street and Pylesville.CommerceAll businesses are on Main Street, which runs from Whiteford to the Pennsylvania border, or Dooley Road, running from Main Street to Route 165. The town has a post office, several shops, garages, and churches, a fire hall, a general store, and a new supermarket.HistoryCardiff is located in a very slate-rich region, which created the towns early industries. Cardiff was formerly the mining center of Harford County. Stone from the mines may have been used in the construction of the State Building. The mines and quarries have all but shut down now, and the town has become a farming hub. Formerly home of Slate Ridge Elementary School, shut down in the early 1980s, the building is now used for apartments.The town, a part of the Historic District, was added to the Register of Historic Places in 2005.()(Maryland Historical Trust: Listing for Whiteford-Cardiff Historic District)ReferencesExternal links*Whiteford-Cardiff Historic District, Harford County, including photo dated 2004, at Maryland Historical Trust*Boundary Map of the Whiteford-Cardiff Historic District, Harford County, at Maryland Historical Trust
6888081
Toquima_Range
right|Location of the Toquima Range within NevadaThe Toquima Range is a line of mountains in northwestern Nye County, in central Nevada in the western States.  From Hickson Summit on U.S. Route 50, the range runs for approximately 71 miles (115 km) to the south-southwest.  To its west are Smoky Valley, scenic State Route 376, and the large Range.  To the east are remote Monitor Valley and the Range.  Lying to the south of the range are Route 6 (Nevada) and the community of Tonopah, while to the north is U.S. Route 50 (The Loneliest Highway in America), leading to the small community of Austin.  none|thumb|Cliffs on the eastern flanks of Mt. Jefferson, in the Toquima Range.The high central section of the Toquima Range is a large area of subalpine tundra.  Three summits here comprise Mt. Jefferson, the highest points in the range (and in all of central Nevada).  The southern summit rises to an elevation of 11,941 feet (3639 m).  This section of the range is protected as the Alta Toquima Wilderness Area.South of this area are the historic mining district of Manhattan, Spanish Peak (10,746 ft, 3275 m), and Mountain (10,907 ft, 3324 m).  To the north are Peak (10,507 ft, 3202 m) and Rock Mountain (10,156 ft, 3095 m). References *  External links * NevadaWilderness.org: Toquima Range
6897555
Guillaume_Daniel_Delprat
Guillaume Daniel Delprat (1 September 1856 &ndash; 15 March 1937) was a Dutch-Australian metallurgist and engineer.(Graeme Osborne, Delprat, Guillaume Daniel (1856 - 1937), Dictionary of Biography, Vol. 8, MUP, 1981, pp 274-276. )Delprat was born in Delft, Holland, son of Major General Felix Albert Theodore Delprat (1812-1888), later minister of war, and his wife Elisabeth Francina, ne van Santen Kolff.Delprat attended a high school in Amsterdam and later became an apprentice engineer on the Tay Bridge. From 1879-82 Delprat worked in Spain at the Tharsis Sulphur and Copper Mines.(Delprat migrated to Australia with his wife and children in 1898 to join mining company BHP as assistant to the General Manager during the chairmanship of Neale Wigg and was promoted to General Manager on 1 April 1899,(Intercolonial: New South Wales The West Australian 21 April 1899 p.5 accessed 21 April 2011) a position he held until 1921. He was credited with pioneering the flotation process of sulphide ore separation and also laying the foundations for BHPs future commercial success. Delprat pushed for moving the companys smelters to Pirie and for the construction of the Knob railways.(In 1935 Delprat was the first recipient of the medal of the Australasian Institute of Mining and Metallurgy.()References
6902857
Keiyo_District
Keiyo District (also known as Elgeyo district or Elgeiyo) is an administrative district in the Valley Province of Kenya. The district was formed in 1994, when Elgeyo/Marakwet-District was split into two, the other half is District of today. Keiyo District has a population of 143.865 http://www.cck.go.ke/html/final_annex1_cover_status.pdf. Its capital is located in the Iten/Tambach town.Local people are mostly of the Keiyo Tribe. Some famous Kenyan runners come from the district, including Saaeed Shaheen (born Stephen Cherono). The area is used by local and foreign athletes for high-altitude training. Mining of fluorite by the Fluorspar Company is the largest industry in the district (The East African, September 15, 2008: Flourspar enters European market despite Chinese competition (page 2))(Kerio Valley Development Authority: Mineral Resources Exploration )   Local authorities Keiyo District has two local authorities: *Iten/Tambach town (population: 31,813; urban population: 3,968)*Keiyo county council (population: 112,052; urban population: 1,868) Administrative divisions  Constituencies The district has two constituencies: *North Constituency*South Constituency See also *Kaptarakwa, a village in the Chapkorio division of Keiyo District*Kimwarer, a town in the Soy Division of Keiyo district References  External links *Kalenjin Online - Keiyo District*Keiyo Heritage - Keiyo District*http://www.keiyonline.comDistrictde Keiyoya Keiyonl:Keiyosv:Keiyo
6919071
Iragna
Iragna is a municipality in the district of Riviera in the canton of Ticino in Switzerland.HistoryIragna is first mentioned in 1210 as Inagna.(Iragna was one of the ten village cooperatives (Vicini), which formed the municipality of Levantine.  It belonged to the valley community in 1441 when the entire Levantine along with Lodrino and its hamlets were conquered by Uri.  At that time Iragna became part of the Vicariate of the of Milan.  Under Milan, the long-established citizens of the village were allowed to select their own bailiff.  In the first half of the 17th Century the population of Iragna was involved in a series of witch trials.(The church of SS Eusebio e Gaudenzio has been in use since 1210.(    Since Iragna was on a road that offered an alternative route to the traditional trans-alpine route through Biasca, it possessed a travellers hospice starting in 1288.  The hospice was supported and directed by the hospice in Pollegio.( Iragnas chestnut forests were used to provide wood to residents of the middle and upper Leventina.  Granite mining has been a major source of income since the end of the 19th Century.(GeographyIragna has an area, , of .  Of this area,  or 4.4% is used for agricultural purposes, while  or 67.0% is forested.   Of the rest of the land,  or 4.1% is settled (buildings or roads),  or 1.6% is either rivers or lakes and  or 19.7% is unproductive land.  Of the built up area, housing and buildings made up 0.9% and transportation infrastructure made up 0.3%.  Power and water infrastructure as well as other special developed areas made up 2.3% of the area  Out of the forested land, 53.8% of the total land area is heavily forested, while 11.4% is covered in small trees and shrubbery and 1.8% is covered with orchards or small clusters of trees.  Of the agricultural land, 3.2% is used for growing crops.  All the water in the municipality is flowing water.  Of the unproductive areas, 11.5% is unproductive vegetation and 8.3% is too rocky for vegetation.(Altitudine, superficie, secondo il genere di utilizzazione, rilevazione 1992/1997, e densit della popolazione, nel 2000  accessed 25 October 2010)The municipality is located in the Riviera district, on the right bank of the Ticino river.Coat of armsThe blazon of the municipal of arms is Vert a tau cross inverted wavy between two bells or.(Flags of the World.com accessed 08-February-2011)DemographicsIragna has a population (lcon) of .  , 21.7% of the population are resident foreign nationals.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office - Superweb database - Gemeinde Statistics 1981-2008  accessed 19 June 2010)  Over the last 10 years (19972007) the population has changed at a rate of 11.6%.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office accessed 08-February-2011)  Most of the population () speaks language (449 or 91.4%), with German being second most common (12 or 2.4%) and Serbo-Croatian being third (9 or 1.8%).  There are 3 people who speak French and 1 person who speaks Romansh.(, the gender distribution of the population was 48.8% male and 51.2% female.  The population was made up of 203 Swiss men (35.7% of the population), and 74 (13.0%) non-Swiss men.  There were 242 Swiss women (42.6%), and 49 (8.6%) non-Swiss women.(  Of the population in the municipality 199 or about 40.5% were born in Iragna and lived there in 2000.  There were 134 or 27.3% who were born in the same canton, while 33 or 6.7% were born somewhere else in Switzerland, and 122 or 24.8% were born outside of Switzerland.(  In  there were 4 live births to Swiss citizens and 1 birth to non-Swiss citizens, and in same time span there were 4 deaths of Swiss citizens and 3 non-Swiss citizen deaths.  Ignoring immigration and emigration, the population of Swiss citizens remained the same while the foreign population decreased by 2.  There was 1 Swiss man who immigrated back to Switzerland.  At the same time, there were 5 non-Swiss men who emigrated from Switzerland to another country and 1 non-Swiss woman who immigrated from another country to Switzerland.  The total Swiss population change in 2008 (from all sources, including moves across municipal borders) was a decrease of 3 and the non-Swiss population change was an increase of 6 people.  This represents a population growth rate of 0.5%.(  The age distribution, , in Iragna is; 55 children or 9.7% of the population are between 0 and 9 years old and 66 teenagers or 11.6% are between 10 and 19.  Of the adult population, 63 people or 11.1% of the population are between 20 and 29 years old.  91 people or 16.0% are between 30 and 39, 100 people or 17.6% are between 40 and 49, and 70 people or 12.3% are between 50 and 59.  The senior population distribution is 46 people or 8.1% of the population are between 60 and 69 years old, 54 people or 9.5% are between 70 and 79, there are 23 people or 4.0% who are over 80.(01.02.03 Popolazione residente permanente  accessed 23 November 2010)  , there were 196 people who were single and never married in the municipality.  There were 251 married individuals, 21 widows or widowers and 23 individuals who are divorced.(STAT-TAB Datenwrfel fr Thema 40.3 - 2000   accessed 2 February 2011) the average number of residents per living room was 0.61 which is about equal to the cantonal average of 0.6 per room.  In this case, a room is defined as space of a housing unit of at least  as normal bedrooms, dining rooms, living rooms, kitchens and habitable cellars and attics.()  About 59.5% of the total households were owner occupied, or in other words did not pay rent (though they may have a mortgage or a rent-to-own agreement).(Urban Audit Glossary pg 17)  , there were 190 private households in the municipality, and an average of 2.5 persons per household.(  There were 51 households that consist of only one person and 7 households with five or more people.  Out of a total of 194 households that answered this question, 26.3% were households made up of just one person and 5 were adults who lived with their parents.  Of the rest of the households,  there are 47 married couples without children, 76 married couples with children  There were 8 single parents with a child or children.  There were 3 households that were made up unrelated people and 4 households that were made some sort of institution or another collective housing.(   there were 163 single family homes (or 79.1% of the total) out of a total of 206 inhabited buildings.  There were 28 multi-family buildings (13.6%), along with 3 multi-purpose buildings that were mostly used for housing (1.5%) and 12 other use buildings (commercial or industrial) that also had some housing (5.8%).  Of the single family homes 2 were built before 1919, while 13 were built between 1990 and 2000.  The greatest number of single family homes (81) were built between 1919 and 1945.(Federal Statistical Office STAT-TAB - Datenwrfel fr Thema 09.2 - Gebude und Wohnungen  accessed 28 January 2011)   there were 251 apartments in the municipality.  The most common apartment size was 4 rooms of which there were 78.  There were 13 single room apartments and 74 apartments with five or more rooms.  Of these apartments, a total of 190 apartments (75.7% of the total) were permanently occupied, while 55 apartments (21.9%) were seasonally occupied and 6 apartments (2.4%) were empty.(  , the construction rate of new housing units was 5.5 new units per 1000 residents.(  The vacancy rate for the municipality, , was 0.38%.(The historical population is given in the following chart:()(Swiss Federal Statistical Office STAT-TAB Bevlkerungsentwicklung nach Region, 1850-2000  accessed 29 January 2011)Colors  id:lightgrey value:gray(0.9)  id:darkgrey  value:gray(0.8)ImageSize   width:1080 height:210PlotArea    height:150 left:100 bottom:50 right:100AlignBars   justifyDateFormat  x.yPeriod      from:0 till:500TimeAxis    orientation:verticalAlignBars   justifyScaleMajor  gridcolor:darkgrey increment:100 start:0ScaleMinor  gridcolor:lightgrey increment:20 start:0PlotData  color:yellowgreen width:40   mark:(line,white) align:center  bar:1567 from:start till:400 text:ca. 400   bar:1801 from:start till:209 text:209  bar:1850 from:start till:374 text:374  bar:1860 from:start till:328 text:328  bar:1870 from:start till:342 text:342  bar:1880 from:start till:307 text:307  bar:1888 from:start till:263 text:263  bar:1900 from:start till:344 text:344  bar:1910 from:start till:396 text:396  bar:1920 from:start till:328 text:328  bar:1930 from:start till:293 text:293  bar:1941 from:start till:270 text:270  bar:1950 from:start till:260 text:260  bar:1960 from:start till:311 text:311  bar:1970 from:start till:417 text:417  bar:1980 from:start till:434 text:434  bar:1990 from:start till:447 text:447  bar:2000 from:start till:491 text:491PoliticsIn the 2007 federal election the most popular party was the SP which received 33.79% of the vote.  The next three most popular parties were the FDP (22.36%), the CVP (20.81%) and the League (16.25%).  In the federal election, a total of 150 votes were cast, and the turnout was 44.0%.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office, Nationalratswahlen 2007: Strke der Parteien und Wahlbeteiligung, nach Gemeinden/Bezirk/Canton  accessed 28 May 2010)      In the  Gran Consiglio election, there were a total of 340 registered voters in Iragna, of which 215 or 63.2% voted.  3 blank ballots were cast, leaving 212 valid ballots in the election.  The most popular party was the PS which received 68 or 32.1% of the vote.  The next three most popular parties were; the PLRT (with 41 or 19.3%), the SSI (with 35 or 16.5%) and the PPD+GenGiova (with 34 or 16.0%).( Elezioni cantonali: Gran Consiglio, Consiglio di Stato  accessed 23 November 2010)      In the  Consiglio di Stato election,   The most popular party was the PS which received 76 or 35.3% of the vote.  The next three most popular parties were; the PLRT (with 42 or 19.5%), the PPD (with 35 or 16.3%) and the LEGA (with 34 or 15.8%).(Economy, Iragna had an unemployment rate of 3.77%.  , there were 20 people employed in the primary economic sector and about 5 businesses involved in this sector.  99 people were employed in the secondary sector and there were 13 businesses in this sector.  39 people were employed in the tertiary sector, with 14 businesses in this sector.(  There were 239 residents of the municipality who were employed in some capacity, of which females made up 35.6% of the workforce.   the total number of full-time equivalent jobs was 109.  The number of jobs in the primary sector was 10, all of which were in agriculture.  The number of jobs in the secondary sector was 62, of which 27 or (43.5%) were in manufacturing, 11 or (17.7%) were in mining and 24 (38.7%) were in construction.  The number of jobs in the tertiary sector was 37.  In the tertiary sector; 1 or 2.7% were in the sale or repair of motor vehicles, 9 or 24.3% were in the movement and storage of goods, 16 or 43.2% were in a hotel or restaurant, 2 or 5.4% were in the information industry, 1 or 2.7% were technical professionals or scientists, 4 or 10.8% were in education.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office STAT-TAB Betriebszhlung: Arbeitssttten nach Gemeinde und NOGA 2008 (Abschnitte), Sektoren 1-3  accessed 28 January 2011)  , there were 80 workers who commuted into the municipality and 179 workers who commuted away.  The municipality is a net exporter of workers, with about 2.2 workers leaving the municipality for every one entering.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office - Statweb  accessed 24 June 2010)  Of the working population, 3.3% used public transportation to get to work, and 70.7% used a private car.(ReligionFrom the , 418 or 85.1% were Catholic, while 3 or 0.6% belonged to the Reformed Church.  Of the rest of the population,, and there were 3 individuals (or about 0.61% of the population) who belonged to another Christian church.  There were 20 (or about 4.07% of the population) who were Islamic.  29 (or about 5.91% of the population) belonged to no church, are agnostic or atheist, and 18 individuals (or about 3.67% of the population) did not answer the question.(EducationIn Iragna about 177 or (36.0%) of the population have completed non-mandatory upper secondary education, and 28 or (5.7%) have completed additional higher education (either university or a Fachhochschule).  Of the 28 who completed tertiary schooling, 89.3% were Swiss men, 7.1% were Swiss women.(       In Iragna there were a total of 95 students ().  The Ticino education system provides up to three years of non-mandatory kindergarten and in Iragna there were 17 children in kindergarten.  The primary school program lasts for five years and includes both a standard school and a special school.  In the municipality, 27 students attended the standard primary schools and 1 student attended the special school.  In the lower secondary school system, students either attend a two year middle school followed by a two year pre-apprenticeship or they attend a four year program to prepare for higher education.  There were 25 students in the two year middle school, while 6 students were in the four year advanced program.      The upper secondary school includes several options, but at the end of the upper secondary program, a student will be prepared to enter a trade or to continue on to a university or college.  In Ticino, vocational students may either attend school while working on their internship or apprenticeship (which takes three or four years) or may attend school followed by an internship or apprenticeship (which takes one year as a full-time student or one and a half to two years as a part-time student).()  There were 4 vocational students who were attending school full-time and 14 who attend part-time.       The professional program lasts three years and prepares a student for a job in engineering, nursing, computer science, business, tourism and similar fields.  There was 1 student in the professional program.( Allievi e studenti, secondo il genere di scuola, anno scolastico 2009/2010  accessed 23 November 2010)  , there were 24 students from Iragna who attended schools outside the municipality.(Referencesca:Iragnade:Iragnaes:Iragnafr:Iragnait:Iragnalmo:Iragna(gemeente)pt:Iragnarm:Iragnasimple:Iragnavo:Iragnawar:Iragna
6930954
Lavizzara
Lavizzara is a municipality in the district of Vallemaggia in the canton of Ticino in Switzerland.The municipality was created in 2004 by a merger of Broglio, Brontallo, Fusio, Menzonio, Peccia and Prato-Sornico.(Amtliches Gemeindeverzeichnis der Schweiz published by the Swiss Federal Statistical Office  accessed 14 January 2010)HistoryBroglio is first mentioned in 1361 as Brono.()  Brontallo is first mentioned in 1574 as Bruntalo.()  Fusio is first mentioned in 1258 as Fuxio.()  Menzonio is first mentioned in 1364 as Menzone.()  Peccia is first mentioned in 1374 as Petia.()  Prato and Sornico were first mentioned in 1374.()BroglioThe existing village area has developed in several stages.  It was created in 1374, when the valley (comunit) Lavizzara broke up and divided its lands.  At the end of the 16th Century it grew again through a series of agreements between the neighboring communities.( The Church of S. Maria Lauretana was dedicated in 1487.  In the following centuries, it was repeatedly rebuilt and restored.  It belonged to the Sornico parish until 1616, when it became an independent parish.  The historically significant building, Casa Pometta, is from the 17th Century.(  The highest population in the village was during the 17th Century.  The slow population decline intensified in the late 19th Century with emigration to the cities and to other countries.  In 1990, agriculture and livestock, which for centuries were the main sources of income, employed about a third of the workforce.  In recent decades, the number of vacation homes has increased markedly.(BrontalloImage:Brontallo.jpg|thumb|left|Brontallo.Until the beginning of the 15th Century it formed a community with Menzonio and together with Bignasco and Cavergno it formed a Vicinanza.The church of S. Maria e S. Giorgio was first mentioned in the 15th Century.  In the 16th Century it was rebuilt, and then renovated several times thereafter.  Until 1513 it, along with Menzonio, was part of the parish of Cevio.  In 1513 Menzonio broke away from Cevio, but Brontallo remained part of the parish until 1655.The greatest population was during the 17th Century.  The population decline began in the 18th Century, but accelerated into the 20th Century.  The road running from the village into the Val Lavizzara was completed in 1955.  In 1990 less than a third of the workforce was employed in agriculture.  Many of the homes in the village are now vacation homes.(FusioThe population reached its peak in the 16th-17th Century (400-500 inhabitants), but towards the end of the 18th Century began a slow decline.  This slow decline accelerated dramatically after 1950 because of emigration to the cities.  Most of the remaining population is elderly.(  The church, consecrated in 1455 to the Beata Vergine Assunta, was a of ease of Sornico until the 16th Century.  It was later rebuilt several times, mainly in the 17th Century.(The local economy relied on livestock, pastures and forestry.  The village possessed vast pastures and alpine pastures, which explains the relatively small number of emigrants overseas.  Until the second half of the 19th Century there were two mines in the village that produced steatite (soapstone).  Through the construction of the dam in the Sambuco valley (195056) the amount of agricultural land has been reduced.  From the 1980s a number of houses and an inn were built.(The hamlet of Mogno was also part of the village.  In the 17th Century it possessed 50 taxable fireplaces.  By 1801, the population had dropped to just 40 inhabitants.  Today it is no longer inhabited all year round and serves only as a holiday village.  Before Mogno was incorporated in 1936 into Fusio it was part of Peccia, and the land around the settlement was shared between Fusio, Peccia, Prato and Sornica.(  The church of San Giovanni Battista Decollato was built in 1626 and was initially a chapel of ease of the parish of Peccia.  Towards the end of the 17th Century it became an independent church.  In 1940 it became part of the parish of Fusio.  The church was destroyed in 1986 by an avalanche.  The new building, by Botta, was built in 1997 after 10 years of planning and construction work.  The unique construction of the building has already become a point of interest and a source of critical debate.(MenzonioUntil the beginning of the 15th Century, Menzonio and Brontallo formed a single municipality, and together with Bignasco and Cavergno it formed a Vicinanza which was under the jurisdiction of the Lavizzara valley.  At the time of the Swiss Confederation rule over Ticino, Menzonio was one of seven villages in the valley.( The village church was part of the parish of Cevio until 1513 when it split away to form a parish with Brontallo.  In 1655, this parish was dissolved and Menzonio formed its own parish.  The Church of SS Giacomo e Filippo was first mentioned in the 15th Century.  The current building was built in 1585 and was rebuilt in 1644 and finally in 1905.In the 17th Century, the population reached its peak and then decreased gradually, initially because of emigration to Italy.  Later the residents emigrated to California and finally they moved away from the villages to the cities of Ticino and the rest of Switzerland.For centuries the local economy was dominated by grazing and agriculture.  In the 19th Century there was a soapstone quarry and four mills.  The road that connects Menzonio with the valley floor, was built in 1949. In 2000, three-quarters of the workforce were commuters.(PecciaPeccia, together with Broglio, Fusio, Prato and Sornico were part of the comunit or valley community of Lavizzara until 1374.  When the valley community broke up into separate villages, Peccia was the largest in the Lavizzara region.  It included the settlement of Mogno and the Valle di Peccia, which was independent until 1669.  The common, shared land of the four communities of Fusio, Peccia, Prato and Sornico (known as the comunella dei quattro comuni) remained shared until 1929.(  The village was part of the parish of Sornico until 1613, after which the church of S. Antonio Abate in Peccia was elevated to become a church.  The church was built in the 16th Century.  After the floods of 1834 and 1868, which destroyed some of the village, the church was totally rebuilt.  The valley church of S. Carlo was built in 1617, and was raised to be the parish church in 1669.(  At the beginning of the 20th Century most of the jobs in the village were in the extraction, processing (vessels and stone ovens) and trade in soapstone.  Since 1946, white marble is also mined, which is the only marble quarry in Switzerland.  In 1984, the presence of marble led to the creation of a sculpting school.  This marble was used when the church of Mogno (a hamlet of Fusio) was rebuilt by Mario Botta, after the old church was destroyed by an avalanche in 1986.(At the beginning of the 21st Century, manufacturing provides more than a third of the jobs in village.  In 1950-56 largest hydroelectric power plants in Switzerland was built in the Valle di Peccia.  It is fed by water from the catchment area of the Maggia river.  In the last decades of the 20th Century the village invested in its tourist infrastructure.(Prato-SornicoPrato and Sornico, along with Broglio, Fusio and Peccia, formed the valley community of Lavizzara.  In 1374, the community dissolved and the villages of Prato and Sornico became independent.   The common, shared land of the four communities of Fusio, Peccia, Prato and Sornico (known as the comunella dei quattro comuni) remained shared until 1929.  In the 15th Century, the hamlet was the seat of the General Council of the valley, then the seat of the Swiss Confederation governor between 1513 and 1798.  After 1803 it was the capital of the sub-district of Lavizzara.  Even today stately houses in the village testify of its political and religious importance of the village.  One of the houses in the village, which was built in the 15th Century, extended in the 16th Century and renovated in 1975-77, served as the seat of the bailiff and a prison.  Another house, in Prato, is Casa Berna which is from the 18th Century.  It contains the rich library of Giulio Giovanni Gerolamo Berna, the archpriest of Locarno.( The church of San Martino in Sornico is first mentioned in the 14th Century, but probably dates back to the 11th Century.  It was the church in the 16th Century of the Val Lavizzara and in 1747 was raised to a of the provosts church.  The church of SS Fabiano e Sebastiano in Prato was built in 1487, rebuilt in 1730 and re-consecrated in 1761 by the Bishop of Como.(In the 19th and 20th Century, the emigration overseas and into the cities led to a sharp population decline.  In this alpine village at the beginning of the 21st Century, one-third of the workforce still works in agriculture.  In the last decades of the 20th Century many vacation homes and tourist infrastructure were built in the village.(GeographyLavizzara has an area, , of .  Of this area,  or 1.0% is used for agricultural purposes, while  or 30.2% is forested.   Of the rest of the land,  or 0.7% is settled (buildings or roads),  or 2.3% is either rivers or lakes and  or 51.6% is unproductive land.  Of the built up area, housing and buildings made up 0.2% and transportation infrastructure made up 0.3%.  Out of the forested land, 20.5% of the total land area is heavily forested and 4.7% is covered with orchards or small clusters of trees.  Of the agricultural land, 0.7% is used for growing crops.  Of the water in the municipality, 1.2% is in lakes and 1.1% is in rivers and streams.  Of the unproductive areas, 22.6% is unproductive vegetation and 28.9% is too rocky for vegetation.(Altitudine, superficie, secondo il genere di utilizzazione, rilevazione 1992/1997, e densit della popolazione, nel 2000  accessed 25 October 2010)DemographicsLavizzara has a population (lcon) of , all Swiss citizens.  Over the last 10 years (19972007) the population has changed at a rate of 0%.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office accessed 14-February-2011), the gender distribution of the population was 50.4% male and 49.6% female.  The population was made up of 264 Swiss men (46.1% of the population), and 25 (4.4%) non-Swiss men.  There were 279 Swiss women (48.7%), and 5 (0.9%) non-Swiss women.(  In  there were 3 live births to Swiss citizens and 5 deaths of Swiss citizens.  Ignoring immigration and emigration, the population of Swiss citizens decreased by 2 while the foreign population remained the same.  There were 3 non-Swiss men and 1 non-Swiss woman who immigrated from another country to Switzerland.  The total Swiss population change in 2008 (from all sources, including moves across municipal borders) was a decrease of 11 and the non-Swiss population change was an increase of 5 people.  This represents a population growth rate of -1.0%.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office - Superweb database - Gemeinde Statistics 1981-2008  accessed 19 June 2010)  The age distribution, , in Lavizzara is; 52 children or 9.1% of the population are between 0 and 9 years old and 65 teenagers or 11.3% are between 10 and 19.  Of the adult population, 56 people or 9.8% of the population are between 20 and 29 years old.  58 people or 10.1% are between 30 and 39, 83 people or 14.5% are between 40 and 49, and 73 people or 12.7% are between 50 and 59.  The senior population distribution is 80 people or 14.0% of the population are between 60 and 69 years old, 55 people or 9.6% are between 70 and 79, there are 51 people or 8.9% who are over 80.(01.02.03 Popolazione residente permanente  accessed 23 November 2010)Historic PopulationThe historical population is given in the following chart:(((((((Federal Statistical Office STAT-TAB Bevlkerungsentwicklung nach Region, 1850-2000  accessed 29 January 2011)Colors  id:lightgrey value:gray(0.9)  id:darkgrey  value:gray(0.8)ImageSize   width:1100 height:500PlotArea    height:350 left:100 bottom:90 right:100Legend      columns:3 left:220 top:70 columnwidth:160AlignBars   justifyDateFormat  x.yPeriod      from:0 till:1200TimeAxis    orientation:verticalAlignBars   justifyScaleMajor  gridcolor:darkgrey increment:200 start:0ScaleMinor  gridcolor:lightgrey increment:40 start:0Colors id:BR     value:yellowgreen      legend:Broglio id:BO     value:green          legend:Brontallo id:FU    value:blue           legend:Fusio id:ME    value:red     legend:Menzonio id:PE     value:yellow      legend:Peccia id:PR     value:orange      legend:Prato-SornicoPlotData  color:yellowgreen width:30   mark:(line,white) align:center  bar:1850 from: 0 till:109 text:109 color:BR  bar:1860 from: 0 till:140 text:140 color:BR  bar:1870 from: 0 till:153 text:153 color:BR  bar:1880 from: 0 till:108 text:108 color:BR  bar:1890 from: 0 till:137 text:137 color:BR  bar:1900 from: 0 till:108 text:108 color:BR  bar:1910 from: 0 till:57 text:57 color:BR  bar:1920 from: 0 till:69 text:69 color:BR  bar:1930 from: 0 till:76 text:76 color:BR  bar:1940 from: 0 till:73 text:73 color:BR  bar:1950 from: 0 till:73 text:73 color:BR  bar:1960 from: 0 till:73 text:73 color:BR  bar:1970 from: 0 till:65 text:65 color:BR  bar:1980 from: 0 till:70 text:70 color:BR  bar:1990 from: 0 till:61 text:61 color:BR  bar:2000 from: 0 till:88 text:88 color:BR  bar:1850 from: 109 till:282 text:173 color:BO  bar:1860 from: 140 till:313 text:173 color:BO  bar:1870 from: 153 till:316 text:163 color:BO  bar:1880 from: 108 till:272 text:164 color:BO  bar:1890 from: 137 till:295 text:158 color:BO  bar:1900 from: 108 till:241 text:133 color:BO  bar:1910 from: 57 till:193 text:136 color:BO  bar:1920 from: 69 till:187 text:118 color:BO  bar:1930 from: 76 till:172 text:96 color:BO  bar:1940 from: 73 till:157 text:84 color:BO  bar:1950 from: 73 till:165 text:92 color:BO  bar:1960 from: 73 till:156 text:83 color:BO  bar:1970 from: 65 till:129 text:64 color:BO  bar:1980 from: 70 till:128 text:58 color:BO  bar:1990 from: 61 till:116 text:55 color:BO  bar:2000 from: 88 till:138 text:50 color:BO  bar:1850 from: 282 till:518 text:236 color:FU  bar:1860 from: 313 till:522 text:209 color:FU  bar:1870 from: 316 till:543 text:227 color:FU  bar:1880 from: 272 till:488 text:216 color:FU  bar:1890 from: 295 till:494 text:199 color:FU  bar:1900 from: 241 till:402 text:161 color:FU  bar:1910 from: 193 till:326 text:133 color:FU  bar:1920 from: 187 till:327 text:140 color:FU  bar:1930 from: 172 till:302 text:130 color:FU  bar:1940 from: 157 till:290 text:133 color:FU  bar:1950 from: 165 till:301 text:136 color:FU  bar:1960 from: 156 till:254 text:98 color:FU  bar:1970 from: 129 till:198 text:69 color:FU  bar:1980 from: 128 till:191 text:63 color:FU  bar:1990 from: 116 till:153 text:37 color:FU  bar:2000 from: 138 till:183 text:45 color:FU  bar:1850 from: 518 till:695 text:177 color:ME  bar:1860 from: 522 till:720 text:198 color:ME  bar:1870 from: 543 till:736 text:193 color:ME  bar:1880 from: 488 till:693 text:205 color:ME  bar:1890 from: 494 till:703 text:209 color:ME  bar:1900 from: 402 till:592 text:190 color:ME  bar:1910 from: 326 till:483 text:157 color:ME  bar:1920 from: 327 till:455 text:128 color:ME  bar:1930 from: 302 till:418 text:116 color:ME  bar:1940 from: 290 till:419 text:129 color:ME  bar:1950 from: 301 till:429 text:128 color:ME  bar:1960 from: 254 till:352 text:98 color:ME  bar:1970 from: 198 till:287 text:89 color:ME  bar:1980 from: 191 till:295 text:104 color:ME  bar:1990 from: 153 till:223 text:70 color:ME  bar:2000 from: 183 till:256 text:73 color:ME  bar:1850 from: 695 till:995 text:300 color:PE  bar:1860 from: 720 till:993 text:273 color:PE  bar:1870 from: 736 till:1005 text:269 color:PE  bar:1880 from: 693 till:967 text:274 color:PE  bar:1890 from: 703 till:952 text:249 color:PE  bar:1900 from: 592 till:821 text:229 color:PE  bar:1910 from: 483 till:714 text:231 color:PE  bar:1920 from: 455 till:664 text:209 color:PE  bar:1930 from: 418 till:628 text:210 color:PE  bar:1940 from: 419 till:621 text:202 color:PE  bar:1950 from: 429 till:641 text:212 color:PE  bar:1960 from: 352 till:596 text:244 color:PE  bar:1970 from: 287 till:562 text:275 color:PE  bar:1980 from: 295 till:498 text:203 color:PE  bar:1990 from: 223 till:395 text:172 color:PE  bar:2000 from: 256 till:427 text:171 color:PE  bar:1850 from: 995 till:1156 text:161 color:PR  bar:1860 from: 993 till:1150 text:157 color:PR  bar:1870 from: 1005 till:1180 text:175 color:PR  bar:1880 from: 967 till:1133 text:166 color:PR  bar:1890 from: 952 till:1102 text:150 color:PR  bar:1900 from: 821 till:945 text:124 color:PR  bar:1910 from: 714 till:828 text:114 color:PR  bar:1920 from: 664 till:762 text:98 color:PR  bar:1930 from: 628 till:746 text:118 color:PR  bar:1940 from: 621 till:720 text:99 color:PR  bar:1950 from: 641 till:745 text:104 color:PR  bar:1960 from: 596 till:704 text:108 color:PR  bar:1970 from: 562 till:673 text:111 color:PR  bar:1980 from: 498 till:601 text:103 color:PR  bar:1990 from: 395 till:487 text:92 color:PR  bar:2000 from: 427 till:531 text:104 color:PRHeritage sites of national significanceThe A Mott DOrei Settlement is listed as a Swiss heritage site of national significance.  The villages of Broglio, Brontallo, Fusio, Prato, Sornico and Cortignelli are all part of the of Swiss Heritage Sites.()PoliticsIn the 2007 federal election the most popular party was the CVP which received 40.28% of the vote.  The next three most popular parties were the FDP (25.62%), the League (14.17%) and the SP (11.88%).  In the federal election, a total of 212 votes were cast, and the turnout was 47.5%.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office, Nationalratswahlen 2007: Strke der Parteien und Wahlbeteiligung, nach Gemeinden/Bezirk/Canton  accessed 28 May 2010)      In the  Gran Consiglio election, there were a total of 454 registered voters in Lavizzara, of which 331 or 72.9% voted.  4 blank ballots were cast, leaving 327 valid ballots in the election.  The most popular party was the PPD+GenGiova which received 120 or 36.7% of the vote.  The next three most popular parties were; the SSI (with 67 or 20.5%), the PLRT (with 45 or 13.8%) and the LEGA (with 38 or 11.6%).( Elezioni cantonali: Gran Consiglio, Consiglio di Stato  accessed 23 November 2010)      In the  Consiglio di Stato election, 2 blank ballots and 1 null ballot were cast, leaving 328 valid ballots in the election.  The most popular party was the PPD which received 115 or 35.1% of the vote.  The next three most popular parties were; the LEGA (with 77 or 23.5%), the SSI (with 43 or 13.1%) and the PLRT (with 40 or 12.2%).(Economy the total number of full-time equivalent jobs was 161.  The number of jobs in the primary sector was 33, all of which  were in agriculture.  The number of jobs in the secondary sector was 62, of which 7 or (11.3%) were in manufacturing, 10 or (16.1%) were in mining and 35 (56.5%) were in construction.  The number of jobs in the tertiary sector was 66.  In the tertiary sector; 2 or 3.0% were in the sale or repair of motor vehicles, 28 or 42.4% were in the movement and storage of goods, 20 or 30.3% were in a hotel or restaurant, 1 or 1.5% were the insurance or financial industry, 2 or 3.0% were technical professionals or scientists, 6 or 9.1% were in education.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office STAT-TAB Betriebszhlung: Arbeitssttten nach Gemeinde und NOGA 2008 (Abschnitte), Sektoren 1-3  accessed 28 January 2011), there were 4 hotels in Lavizzara with a total of 19 rooms and 35 beds.( Settori alberghiero e paralberghiero  accessed 23 November 2010)EducationIn Lavizzara there were a total of 90 students ().  The Ticino education system provides up to three years of non-mandatory kindergarten and in Lavizzara there were 12 children in kindergarten.  The primary school program lasts for five years.  In the village, 23 students attended the standard primary schools.  In the lower secondary school system, students either attend a two year middle school followed by a two year pre-apprenticeship or they attend a four year program to prepare for higher education.  There were 25 students in the two year middle school, while 7 students were in the four year advanced program.      The upper secondary school includes several options, but at the end of the upper secondary program, a student will be prepared to enter a trade or to continue on to a university or college.  In Ticino, vocational students may either attend school while working on their internship or apprenticeship (which takes three or four years) or may attend school followed by an internship or apprenticeship (which takes one year as a full-time student or one and a half to two years as a part-time student).()  There were 6 vocational students who were attending school full-time and 16 who attend part-time.       The professional program lasts three years and prepares a student for a job in engineering, nursing, computer science, business, tourism and similar fields.  There was 1 student in the professional program.( Allievi e studenti, secondo il genere di scuola, anno scolastico 2009/2010  accessed 23 November 2010)ReferencesExternal links* Official website * ca:Lavizzarade:Lavizzaraes:Lavizzarafr:Lavizzarait:Lavizzaralmo:Lavizzaranl:Lavizzarapt:Lavizzararm:Lavizzarasimple:Lavizzaravo:Lavizzarawar:Lavizzara
6942838
One_Missed_Call_2
One Missed Call 2 (2 Chakushin Ari 2) is the sequel to the popular J-Horror film One Missed Call.PlotSet a year after the original, One Missed Call 2 introduces Kyoko and her friend Madoka. Both women are teaching assistants at a kindergarten in the middle of Tokyo. Madoka persuades Kyoko to visit a restaurant where her (Kyokos) boyfriend Naoto works part-time at.  Mei-Fueng is the daughter of the cook, and her cellphone rings with the ringtone of death.  However, she is out buying groceries and her father answers it.  The call was meant to be for Mei-Feung, but since her father answered it, he hears his own death instead.  Later, when the restaurant is closed, Mei-Feung gives Kyoko and Madoka her new phone number since she has gotten a new one (as well as a new cellphone).  Seconds after exchanging numbers, Madoka gets a call with the ringtone of death. Naoto is in the kitchen looking for the cook, and discovers him dead with half his face burned off. The police are then alerted.  Detective Motomiya comes to the scene first and question Naoto about the death.  However, Naoto doesnt mention anything that relates to Mimikos way of killing.  Naoto is then confronted by Detective Takako, who also questions him about the incident.  She finds out that the cook heard the ringtone of death before his death, and that Naoto heard it right before he found the body (coming from Madokas phone). Meanwhile, Kyoko and Madoka are video chatting with their phones.  Kyoko sees a strange figure behind Madoka, and asks if someone was over.  Madoka says that she is alone, but Kyoko sees the figure coming closer.  She keeps asking Madoka if she sees something behind her, but Madoka doesnt see anything. The figure reaches for Kyoko through the phone, and in a panic she throws it at the wall, disconnecting her and Madoka.  Kyoko rushes to Madokas apartment to save her, but finds Madoka mutilated in the shower.  Naoto and Takako come in soon after (discovering Madoka was about to die).  Naoto goes to embrace Kyoko after looking at Madokas body.  Then, Kyokos phone suddenly rings with the ringtone of death.  Takako investigate the original cellphone murders, searching for Mimikos grandparents. Together with Kyoko and Naoto she finds Mimikos grandmother, who is working at a restaurant. She tells them that Mimiko was born out of rape. Mimikos grandfather killed the man who raped his daughter. In jail he felt chased by a child (Mimiko) and after being released he decided to went back to Taiwan, where he was born.Takako visits Taiwan and finds Mimikos grandfather dead with his cellphone in his hand. She discovers from her ex-husband, Yuting, that similar mysterious deaths occurred here. Kyoko and Naoto decide to go to Taiwan as well to figure out how to save Kyoko. Takako finds out that the murders actually started from an old mining town, which is now a ghost town. The trio visit an old woman, who is the last person that lived in that town. The old woman tells them that the curse started with a girl named Li Li.  Li Li was a creepy child who was bullied by the other children of the town. One day, while she is getting bullied, Li Li finally snaps and curses everyone in the town.  The relatives of the dead became enraged by Li Lis curse, and takes her into the mine where they sew her mouth shut so she cant foretell any more deaths.  Li Li is then sealed alive in the mines.  Takako, Kyoko, and Naoto then go to the town to investigate the mine.When they get there, they find the mine locked. Then Takako goes to find another way into the mines, in which she does. However, her flashlight breaks, and she is then knocked out. Takako then dreams about her twin sister, and saves her from answering the call on the payphone. Takako asks for forgiveness and hugs her sister. When she opens her eyes, her sister has disappeared. Takako then wakes up in the mine. Kyoko is trapped by the vengeful spirit of Li Li, but Naoto is able to bring her to safety. They are pursued by the ghost, and Naoto sacrifices himself by answering Kyokos ringing cell-phone.Some time later, Kyoko recovers in a hospital bed. Takako checks her messages and discovers she has one missed call. Some officers from the Taipei Police show up in Kyokos room and reveal that two bodies were found in the abandoned mine. Confused, Takako goes to Yutings apartment and discovers his corpse, as well as a video camera which seems to show herself stabbing him. She opens her cellphone, and notices she has a missed call from herself, stamped with a time that passed hours ago (5:58pm is her death time but the current time is 8:05pm on that same day), she looks at her watch this time and notices it has stopped at nothing to become white, the time that she had fallen in the cave. She realizes that Mimiko had stabbed her, and that she had already died at the hands of Mimiko. Spitting out a red hard candy, she is seen smiling as the death ringtone is heard. The ending song is Ai no Inori by Aki.Cast* Mimura as Kyoko Okudera* Y Yoshizawa as Naoto Sakurai* Asaka Seto as Takako Nozoe* Peter Ho as Yuting Chen* Chisun as Madoka* Renji Ishibashi as Detective* Shadow Liu as Mei-Feng* Nana Koizumi as Li-Li* Karen Oshima as Mimiko MizunumaExternal links*Official site** Call 2Ari 2Missed Call 2Call 2zh:2
6950029
Silver_mines
#REDIRECT mining
6960063
Graja,_Maranho
thumb|right|250px|Location of GrajaGraja is a  city and municipality in the state of Maranho. Founded on 29 April 1811, its population in 2010 was of 61,903. It is one of the most important city in the south of the State. In Graja are located several industries of of Paris, as well as gypsum mining for other purposes (drywall, etc.). Due to its importance, the city is attempting to be named the Capital City of the new State of Maranho do Sul.  The city is the seat of the Catholic Diocese of Graja.The city has an airport authorized for general aviation operations.(Maranho)bpy:it:Graja(Maranho)no:Graja(Maranho)()vo:GrajaMaranho
6972684
List_of_Captain_Planet_episodes
The following is a list of episodes from the animated Captain Planet franchise. The series was the second longest running cartoon of the 1990s, producing 113 episodes. The final 13 episodes of the show were shown in Europe first, but were not shown in the States of America until Day, April 22, 2006, on the Boomerang network.Captain Planet and the PlaneteersSeason one (1990-1991)LeVar Burton does the opening narration.{| classwikitable stylewidth:98%;! width80| Episode !! Title !! width130 | Original airdate !! width140 | Production numberLineColorFF4500|}Season two (1991-1992)* 27. The Garbage Strikes (Aired September 21, 1991) - To make fast cash from a trash strike, Sly Sludge steals an untested microbe from Gis scientist idol, Dr. Helix. The microbe was supposed to be a fix for the problem of overflowing landfills, but it simply absorbs trash to become a city-devouring garbage monster.* 28. Domes of Doom (Aired September 28, 1991) - Its up to the Planeteers to stop Looten Plunder after he hoodwinks the world into signing over its forests to his care, then covers them with giant domes and sells the cooled, clean air from these conditioners of the planet at astronomical prices.* 29. Mind Pollution (Aired September 14, 1991) - Visiting her cousin Boris in D.C., Linka finds out he is under the influence of a designer drug known as Bliss, peddled by Verminous Skumm. Boris spiked Linkas food with Bliss, turning her into an addict, and the other Planeteers must try to help her break her addiction while also trying to stop drug-fueled riots from breaking out across the city. This is considered to be one of the darkest Captain Planet episodes, showing not only the heavy corruption of one of the series protagonists, but also the death of her cousin Boris.* 30. Send in the Clones (Aired October 5, 1991) - Kwame befriends Leela, a schoolgirl on the island of Mogahl whose parents keep having children, hoping for another son. They get their wish when Looten Plunder and Dr. Blight, looking for cheap labor, turn their cloning ray on Leelas brother Vico, who doubles in number each time he eats. Soon Vico numbers in the millions and, along with an accidentally cloned locust swarm, threaten the islands food supply.* 31. The Ark (Aired October 19, 1991) - The Planeteers find themselves whisked aboard an interstellar Ark, while trying to save endangered tigers from Hoggish Greedly and Dr. Blights forest-destroying Monster Golf Cart in India. The alien zookeeper named Collectore thinks humans are an species, whose habitat is about to be destroyed. Special Guest Star: Savage* 32. The Predator (Aired October 12, 1991) - In the Keys, Ma-Ti has a brush with what he thinks is a giant man eater, though Gi reveals that it is a harmless shark. But panic spreads through the resort town, which hires Argos Bleak to eradicate all the sharks in the bay. When stinging jellyfish, which the sharks used to feed on, swarm the beach, the townspeople learn that predators have an important role in the ecosystem.* 33. Isle of Solar Energy (Aired October 26, 1991) - The Planeteers stumble across the island of Dr. Apollo, an American scientist who has perfected incredible devices for storing and transmitting power. They discover that the laboratory assistant is actually Leadsuit, who is helping Duke Nukem subvert solar technology to produce a radioactive weapon. Special Guest Stars: Glover as Dr. Apollo and Summer as Karen* 34. The Coral Killer (Aired November 2, 1991) - Hoggish Greedly and Rigger teach Tacio, a struggling Filipino fisherman, how to go fishing, without telling him the irreversible damage it does to the fish population and to the reef. It is all a cover for Greedlys underwater Reef Ripper, which is harvesting the shattered coral. But Gi takes Tacios wife, Marcaria, underwater, and then to an impoverished, wave-battered island nearby, to show what can happen when a protective reef is gone.* 35. The Big Clam-Up (Aired November 9, 1991) - The people of Francisco are collapsing with symptoms that suggest a whole range of pollution poisoning. As the Planeteers follow clues to solve this mystery, Ma-Ti, who has been reading 1940s detective novels, keeps imagining himself as a private eye. Ma-Ti proves a poor sleuth at first, but eventually traces the source of the illness to Verminous Skumm, who is serving seafood tainted by storm drain runoff in his restaurant, The Sinking Ship.* 36. Off Road Hog (Aired November 30, 1991) - Pete, a bike enthusiast, loves off-road racing with Hoggish Greedly and Rigger, until Ma-Ti and desert guide Joshua Stone show him how alive this barren desert really is, and how much damage off-road vehicles do to it. Pete and the Planeteers swoop in on hang gliders to stop Greedlys ORV race, but Captain Planet is needed to save everyone from a flood. Special Guest Star: Weaver as Josh* 37. An Inside Job (Aired November 16, 1991) - Sly Sludge and four of the Planeteers learn first hand the terrible effects of untreated sewage when MAL and Dr. Blight shrink the EcoSub (and them) to microscopic size and put them into polluted water, which Kwame unwittingly drinks. The Planeteers must battle hideous water-borne parasites in Kwames body so that he can recover, and restore themselves to proper size.* 38. A Twist of Fate (Aired February 29, 1992) - During an earthquake, a blow to Wheelers head leaves him lost from the others and suffering from amnesia. He finds himself literally in the shoes of a homeless man, and learns that the only difference between himself and them is a simple twist of fate.  Wheeler regains his memory and returns to help the other Planeteers call Captain Planet to save the girl who saved his life.* 39. Trouble on the Half Shell (Aired December 7, 1991) - Hoggish Greedly and Verminous Skumm are shipwrecked on one of the Islands, where some of Skumms mutated rats start stealing eggs from an endangered tortoise nest. The eggs soon end contaminated by pollutants, and hatch a new breed of aggressive mutant tortoises, which threaten to wipe out the ecosystem. With the help of JASON, a robot remote-controlled by a kid at a New York museum, the Planeteers and Captain Planet must put an end to the destruction.* 40. The Fine Print (Aired November 23, 1991) - Looten Plunder and Argos Bleak exploit an agricultural workers hidden shame - illiteracy - by putting the man in charge of spraying pesticides. He cant read the written warnings, and as a result he uses too much pesticide, creating a lethal cloud that threatens a nearby town.* 41. Star Dust (Aired January 18, 1992) - Gi and Linka are livid when Wheeler belittles their favorite rock singer, Sky Runner, but it looks as though Wheeler may be right when they come upon a land-ravaging, surface mining operation run by Hoggish Greedly, but bankrolled by none other than their idol. Special Guest Star: Romero as Sky Runner* 42. The Blue Car Line (Aired January 25, 1991) - Gaia becomes suspicious when air pollution suddenly skyrockets in an Australian city with one of the best mass transit systems in the world. The Planeteers investigate and discover that Looten Plunder and Argos Bleak are behind the problem. They are making it appear that the transit line is haunted, allowing them to profit from a massive freeway system and auto-related businesses.* 43. Birds of a Feather (Aired February 1, 1992) - Linka and Ma-Ti visit a friend, Juan, in America. While there, Juans parrot, El Profesor, leads them to a secluded bird paradise when a giant, metallic bird appears. All the birds, including El Profesor, follow it, as do Linka and Ma-Ti, who soon find themselves locked in a giant aviary, courtesy of Hoggish Greedly, who is running an exotic bird smuggling venture.* 44. Radiant Amazon (Aired March 28, 1992) - Sly Sludge and Duke Nukem collaborate to dump waste in the rainforest, imperiling Ma-Tis village. Ma-Ti returns to see the Shaman and when the Planeteers arrive, they find the village in flames. Although they are able to extinguish the blaze, Ma-Ti is filled with anger. He slips away to capture the villains, but is captured himself, and it is up to the other Planeteers to save him.* 45. The Great Tree Heist (Aired March 7, 1992) - The Planeteers travel to the Northwest after hearing about an old growth forest which is literally disappearing into thin air. After Wheeler sets out to investigate, along with an attractive local teenage watcher, Linka spots a saucer but they then discover that Hoggish Greedly is the pilot. They discover Greedlys scam -Sucking up five-hundred-year-old trees to make pressed board furniture.* 46. Fare Thee Whale (Aired April 4, 1992) - The Planeteers are shocked to see a mother whale killed during a whaling expedition engineered by Dr. Blight and Looten Plunder, but they are even more shocked to learn that it is legal, due to a loophole in the international laws, allowing whaling for the purpose of research. They set out to prove that Blights research for a whale repellent is bogus, and are helped by a young Japanese teenager who is trying to dissuade his whaler father from working for Blight and Plunder.* 47. Summit to Save Earth Part One (Aired February 8, 1992) - At the Summit in Brazil, the Planeteers are impressed by the proposed ecology measures, until the world leaders suddenly reverse their positions - victims of Zarms treachery, who has united Hoggish Greedly, Looten Plunder, Sly Sludge, Duke Nukum, Verminous Skumm, and Dr. Blight under his leadership. He then tricks the Planeteers into giving up their rings and zaps Gaia into human form, aging her and destroying the planet simultaneously. The Planeteers only hope is to find Commander Clash.* 48. Summit to Save Earth Part Two (Aired February 15, 1992) - After discovering that it is ten years later outside Zarms ship, the Planeteers race to find Commander Clash before Gaia ages into dust. He returns with them and fights Zarm, but is defeated and opts to return to his island. The Planeteers refuse to give up and are recaptured and taunted by Zarm. He is just about to decimate Ma-Ti when Clash reappears and saves Gaia and the Planeteers.* 49. Losing Game (Aired February 22, 1992) - Kwame takes the Planeteers to Africa to meet an old friend from his tribe, Dr. Mabutu, who is experiencing trouble on his game ranch. The trouble is Dr. Blight, whose experiments turn ordinary cattle into raging bulls, which threaten to destroy the entire region. When they go on a rampage, it is up to Captain Planet to hit the trail and corral the bum steers.* 50. Scorched Earth (Aired March 14, 1992) - The Planeteers once again confront Zarm when he inhabits the body of a national dictator and implements a Earth policy to rid his country of interloping environmental activists eager to prevent development on the beach and forest areas. Zarm is revealed to have been behind every dictator in human history.* 51. Hate Canal (Aired March 21, 1992) - Verminous Skumm uses tainted cheese to infect Venetian canal rats with a deadly disease, which they then begin to spread throughout the city.* 52. Utopia (Aired April 11, 1992) - After being chided for watching futuristic thriller movies, Kwame suddenly finds himself and his fellow Planeteers fighting for survival in a surreal, gang-dominated world ruled by Skumm and Dr. Blight. When Dr. Blight turns the other Planeteers into punks, Kwames only ally is Darian, leader of Utopia, the last unpolluted refuge on the planet. Just when things look hopeless and even Captain Planet cant prevail, Kwame awakens to find it was just a nightmare... or was it?Season three (1992-1993)The opening dialog is changed to have Linka located in Eastern Europe, instead of the Soviet Union.* 53. Greenhouse Planet (Aired September 12, 1992) - When Dr. Blight convinces the of the United States to let her create a fuel for a spaceship trip to Venus, the Planeteers try to change his mind by showing him the accelerated greenhouse effects from fuels emissions. MAL however takes control of the rocket and sends Kwame, Ma-Ti and the President to crash land on Venus while a underpowered Captain Planet must save the rest of the Planeteers.* 54. A Creep from the Deep (Aired September 19, 1992) - The Planeteers must stop a rampaging giant squid from threatening a small fishing town after its food supply is killed off by Sly Sludges illegal waste dumping operation.* 55. The Deadly Glow (Aired September 26, 1992)  - The Planeteers are called into action to stop Duke Nukem from stealing radioactive minerals and using them for his own sinister purposes.* 56. A Perfect World (Aired October 3, 1992) - Dr. Blight takes on a scientist, who is in a wheelchair, but what Dr. Blight doesnt count on is the Planeteers calling Captain Planet, who infects Blights computer and gives MAL a computer virus.* 57. The Dream Machine (Aired October 10, 1992) - Carlos, a farm boy on a small island, becomes jealous of his cousins return from the big city. He is given the power to wish for anything he wants from Zarm, who calls himself the Dream Maker. To impress a girl that he likes and to get back at his cousin, Carlos wishes for things that will gain her interest. Soon the whole town discovers the Dream Maker, and they all want something big. Blinded by greed, the townspeople fail to realize that their natural resources are being drained in order to create the things they wish for. They soon learn the effects of this, but the Planeteers need Captain Planet to get rid of Zarm, and quell a near war between the townspeople and the villagers in the hills, who also want a piece of the Dream Maker. Special Guest Star: Lyons* 58. Bitter Waters (Aired October 17, 1992) - Sky Runner returns to ask the Planeteers for help after Looten Plunder tricks his people into selling their lands for urban development. Special Guest Star: Romero as Sky Runner.* 59. The Guinea Pigs (Aired October 24, 1992) - Dr. Blights minions have been capturing animals for her experiments and its up to the Planeteers to stop her. Special Guest Stars: Rawls as Dr. Rice and White as Laurie Saunders.* 60. OK at the Gunfight Corral (Aired October 31, 1992) - Hoggish Greedly, Rigger, and Sly Sludge travel back in time to create the biggest trash crisis in the Earths history, and the only one who can stop them is Captain Planet.* 61. Canned Hunt (Aired November 7, 1992) - Hoggish Greedly is behind a canned hunt, and captures Captain Planet and the Planeteers.* 62. Hog Tide (Aired November 14, 1992) - Gaia tells the Planeteers about Captain Planets first adventure in the 1940s, when he and the Planeteers before them stopped Hoggish Greedlys grandfather, Don Porkaloin from building developments too close to the ocean. To prepare for a hurricane, Porkaloins lounge singer/scientist Betty Blight (Dr. Blights grandmother) uses her moon manipulator to bring the hurricane to his shores. When the Planeteers of that time are formed, Captain Planet is summoned to save the day. Special Guest Star: Begley, Jr. as Zoning Commissioner* 63. A Formula for Hate (Aired November 21, 1992) - When a high school basketball player named Todd Andrews finds out he has HIV-AIDS, Verminous Skumm starts rumors about the disease that turn Todds schoolmates against him, hoping to spread the disease further. This was one of the first times that an American animated cartoon show dealt with the issue of AIDS education. Special Guest Stars: Patrick Harris as Todd Andrews, McKellar as Lisa, and Taylor as Todd Andrews Mother.* 64. If Its Doomsday, This Must Be Belfast (Aired November 28, 1992) - The Planeteers go on separate missions across the world to prevent the detonation of three separate bombs in three three major conflict zones between warring religious factions. Verminous Skumm is behind the plot of inciting hatred to get people into nuking each other. The main story sees Wheeler arrive in Ireland where the conflict is between the Protestants and the Catholics. Kwame and Linka travel to Africa where the blacks and whites are raging battles. Gi and Ma-Ti travel to Israel where tensions are high between Palestinians and Jews. The episodes portions set in Belfast have become a popular viral meme; its wildly inaccurate accents and depictions of the Troubles have been met with large degrees of mirth from Northern Ireland inhabitants, when originally released in the US it was viewed by the Northern Ireland government and banned from release in the third season run in Northern Ireland. Special Guest Star: Mars as Moisha Lowkowitz.* 65. The Night of the Wolf (Aired December 5, 1992) - When Looten Plunder introduces the Robo-Wolf, can the real wolves put a stop to it?The New Adventures of Captain PlanetSeason four (1993-1994)David Coburn does the opening narration, instead of LeVar Burton.* 66. A Mine Is a Terrible Thing to Waste Part One (Aired September 11, 1993) - While the Planeteers argue about their priorities concerning different ecological problems, Sly Sludge dumps waste in a salt mine. Pausing their dispute Gaia assigns the Planeteers to intervene. Shortly after another ecological disaster takes place close to Commander Clashs island. Not being able to handle both at the same time, the Planeteers decide to summon Captain Planet for managing the latter, while themselves chasing after Sludge. However they do not notice, that the islands contamination revived Captain Pollution, who instantly starts a fight against Captain Planet. To make things worse, the Planeteers fall into Sly Sludges trap, who immures them in the mine... This episode reveals some of Ma-Tis past and thereby some of his motives for environmentalism.* 67. A Mine Is a Terrible Thing to Waste Part Two (Aired September 18, 1993) - Captain Planet destroys Captain Pollution for good by throwing him in a natural lava vat. In addition, Gi, Wheeler, and Linka each reveal some of their own past.* 68. I Just Want to Be Your Teddy Bear (Aired September 25, 1993) - Hoggish Greedly is behind a mystery involving Louisiana black bears. The Planeteers call Captain Planet who puts an end to Greedlys evil plots.* 69. Missing Linka (Aired October 2, 1993) - Linkas Grandmother suffers from sickness. Therefore, Linka decides to leave the Planeteers and return to her home town. Because half the town is affected, she investigates the reason of the problem. Wheeler, unable to abandon her, secretly stays in town - and helps Linka, as soon as the situation gets dangerous to her. Meanwhile the other Planeteers worry about getting her back. The Planeteers combine their powers to call Captain Planet to save Linkas town.* 70. The Unbearable Blightness of Being (Aired October 9, 1993) - Dr. Blight succeeds in constructing a machine, which switches the minds of two affected bodies. Using this machine, she gets into the body of Gaia (as well as Gaia gets into hers), in this way gaining Gaias powers of nature and also befooling the Planeteers. Imprisoned in Blights body, Gaia has to find and convince the Planeteers, if she wants her own body back.* 71. Wheelers Ark (Aired October 16, 1993) - Captain Planet and the Planeteers stop Dr. Blight, Hoggish Greedly, and Looten Plunder from getting rid of the animals.* 72. Sea No Evil (Aired October 23, 1993) - Hoggish Greedly is behind a number of dolphins getting hurt, and the Planeteers call Captain Planet, who puts Greedly under glass. Special Guest Stars: Warwick and Begley, Jr.* 73. Talkin Trash (Aired November 13, 1993) - In this story about street gangs, Wheeler gets a letter from his hometown in New York with some bad news his farther who he never had a close relationship is ill so Wheeler heads back to his hometown where he bumps into his old friends including Trish who now goes by the nickname of trash who has turned to crime and her boss is none other than Verminous Scum. Special Guest Stars: Hearn as Wheelers Dad, McCoo as Trish, and Wallace as Wheelers Mom* 74. Future Shock (Aired October 30, 1993) - Zarm travels to the future and rounds up the great great great grandchildren of 3 eco-villains from the future to take on Captain Planet and the Planeteers. They are no match for the villains from the future. They call Captain Planet, who gets trapped and melted into a toxic acid bubble. Gaia produces the Planeteers from the future, who call the future Captain Planet. The future Planet defeats the future villains, but Ma-Ti also does the right thing and defeats them as well.* 75. Gorillas Will Be Missed (Aired February 5, 1994) - Goki, a boy from the future where gorillas are extinct, is given a virtual reality goggle by a mysterious woman that sends him into the past around the time when Looten Plunders tries to get rid of some gorillas. With Gokis help, the Planeteers call Captain Planet to stop him.  At the end, Goki receives the power of Earth as a Planeteer, and the woman is revealed to be Gaia. Special Guest Star: Hardison as Goki.* 76. Ive Lost My Mayan (Aired November 6, 1993) - Transported to ancient Maya, Ma-Ti is captured and mistaken for the son of environmentally minded rebels. Special Guest Star: Elizondo as Shanoub.* 77. The Energy Vampire (Aired November 20, 1993) - Duke Nukem and Dr. Blight wreak havoc in Canada. Only Captain Planet can stop Nukem before he destroys the Earth.:*This episode parodies many classic horror films: Blights hair makes her look like the of Frankenstein, where Duke Nukem has bolts like monster on his neck, Ledsuit walks around like Igor after an injury, and Duke even acts like Kong at the end.* 78. Bottom Line Green (Aired November 27, 1993) - The Planeteers go undercover to investigate a series of mysterious explosions at a plant. It looks like the owners son is behind them, but Hoggish Greedly is behind the explosions, and the Planeteers call Captain Planet, who puts an end to the mystery, and captures Greedly.* 79. You Bet Your Planet (Aired February 26, 1994) - This episode featured a game show, You Bet Your Planet, in which the Planeteers competed against the Eco Villains. The game show was hosted on an alien planet, with aliens for the audience and the host Lexo Starvak, and a big mouth for the announcer. The prize was the fate of Captain Planet. Special Guest Stars: Kasem as Lexel Starvack and Wood as Game Show Announcer.* 80. Bug Off (Aired February 19, 1994) - Vermenous Skumm plans to terrorize the earth with his wicked wevels. But Captain Planet stops him. Special Guest Star: Guillaume* 81. Orangu-Tangle (Aired April 30, 1994) - The Slaughters, a poaching mother/son team, plan to kill all the orangutans. When the police cant stop the Slaughters, the Planeteers call Captain Planet to stop the Slaughters.* 82. Jail House Flock (Aired March 26, 1994) - The Planeteers are shocked when Hoggish Greedley got a permit from an Army Corp of Engineers official to build houses by wetlands. When they tried to stop them, Greedley has them and Captain Planet arrested & thrown in jail. Greedley tricks the hick Sheriff (voiced by Booke) that the Planeteers escaped from jail. So the Planeteers get some evidence to expose Greedley and free Captain Planet from jail.* 83. Planeteers Under Glass (Aired April 23, 1994) - A scientist constructed a simulation of a condensed version of Earth, featuring different biodomes. It was an experiment to demonstrate the consequences of pollution and how it will destroy the world, simulating a few centuries in ninety minutes. The Planeteers are visiting the land with the scientist and plan to leave after 30 minutes, but Dr. Blight locks them in. The Planeteers cannot use their rings individually because the simulated world has an effect on them, but they can combine them to summon Captain Planet. However Captain Planet cannot survive long in the world due to the intense pollution. The Planeteers and the scientist must find a way out, before it is too late.* 84. High Steaks (Aired April 2, 1994) - Looten Plunder is behind a plan to turn the Planeteers into cow patties. The Planeteers call Captain Planet, who defeats Plunder and Plunder is hauled off to jail-again. Special Guest Stars: Axton as Big Ed Bakar and Weaver as Dusty.* 85. Going Bats, Man (Aired March 5, 1994) - The Planeteers investigate a movie producer named Robin Plunder (who turns out to be the nephew of Looten Plunder) when the bats are being framed for terroizing people. Captain Planet stops Robin in his tracks and expose his bat-discrediting plot.* 86. Teers in the Hood (Aired May 14, 1994) - This episode dealt with gang violence, guns, and the peace messages of Luther King, Jr., F. Kennedy, and Gandhi, as well as their assassinations. An old friend of Gis, a teacher, is caught up in a gang war and nearly killed, so the Planeteers infiltrate the two feuding gangs and try to put a stop to the cycle of violence, which may prove easier said than done.:*A cameo of Dinkley and Rogers from the series Scooby-Doo can be seen attending the school * 87. No Horsing Around (Aired May 7, 1994) - Hoggish Greedly is behind an attempt to get rid of the horses, but is stopped by Captain Planet.Season five (1994-1995)Season six (1995-1996)It is notable that in season six, the opening dialog was replaced by a new rap theme. Also, the Planeteers clothes were updated to look more modern and the animation improved considerably. Linkas eye colour changed from blue to green and Gis hair is longer. This season also was not aired in the States until many years after the shows cancellation. Most of the episodes finally made their U.S. debut on Boomerang in 2006 as part of an Earth Day marathon.External links* Captain Planet Episode Listing* Captain Planet and the Planeteers  at TV.com
6981673
Sessa,_Switzerland
Sessa is a municipality in the district of Lugano in the canton of Ticino in Switzerland.HistorySessa is first mentioned in 1335 as Sexa.(In the Middle Ages, members of the Langobard military family, the de Sessa formed a noble corporation with lands centered in the current municipality.  The noble corporation remained in power around the village until the reign of the Swiss Confederation.  The Capitani of de Sessa were Imperial vassals.  In 1240, Emperor Frederick II took control of Sessa Castle, which was probably in the village.  Due to the tradition of immediacy in the Malcantone region (including Sessa, Astano and Monteggio), the Bishop of Como lacked the landlord rights that he held in neighboring villages.  The population of these villages also tried to separate themselves spiritually from the bishop.  By the 16th Century, and perhaps even before then, they founded an independent parish which also included Monteggio, Castelrotto and Cremenaga.  Cremenaga, which was in Italian territory, only separated from the parish in 1842.  The church of San Martino was first mentioned in 1288 and its present form dates back to 1630.  In addition to San Marion, the city has a number of other chapels and churches, including S. Orsola (established 1601).  At the time of the Swiss Confederation rule, the capitano reggente of Lugano was the bailiff in Sessa.  He heard cases in the court building, which was known as the casa dei Landvogti.( Agriculture and emigration marked the traditional economy.  In the 19th Century local companies exploited the peat layer at Prati Vergani and gold mines at Monte Sceree (between Sessa and Astano).  The mining activity was resumed in the 20th Century by the company Mines de Costano SA, which was active from 1935 until the early 1950s.(de Sessa familyThe de Sessas were originally from the Langobard minor nobility.  They were vassals of the of Hohenstaufen at the time that they lived in Sessa Castle, which controlled the passage over the Tresa river.  This ended in 1240 when Emperor Frederick II took over the castle.  The numerous representatives of family formed a noble corporation, which along with the Vicin family retained power until the reign of the Confederates.  Around the 13th Century a de Sessa was mentioned who bore the Capitanei title in Locarno.  As members of the Capitanei of Locarno in the 14th Century, they possessed the patronage rights to the chapel of S. Orsola in the church of S. Martino in Sessa.  The family spread throughout Lombardy, where presumably the Sala (Varese) branch split off.  This line is first mentioned in the 1277 list of the Milanese aristocracy.  By the beginning of 16th Century the direct line of the family had died out.() Anyway, other minor lines have survived and the family, still flourishing, is present on the dOro della Nobilta Italiana with the title of Noble.GeographySessa has an area, , of .  Of this area,  or 27.2% is used for agricultural purposes, while  or 65.9% is forested.   Of the rest of the land,  or 11.5% is settled (buildings or roads) and  or 1.0% is unproductive land.  Of the built up area, housing and buildings made up 6.6% and transportation infrastructure made up 2.8%. while parks, green belts and sports fields made up 1.4%.  Out of the forested land, 57.8% of the total land area is heavily forested and 8.0% is covered with orchards or small clusters of trees.  Of the agricultural land, 17.4% is used for growing crops, while 3.1% is used for orchards or vine crops and 6.6% is used for alpine pastures.(Altitudine, superficie, secondo il genere di utilizzazione, rilevazione 1992/1997, e densit della popolazione, nel 2000  accessed 25 October 2010)The municipality is located in the Lugano district, in the mid-Malcantone.  It consists of the village core of Sessa and the surrounding settlements of Beredino, Bonzaglio, Costa, Lanera and Suino.Coat of armsThe blazon of the municipal of arms is Gules a castle with two towers argent ensigned with a swan of the same.(Flags of the World.com accessed 25-January-2011)DemographicsSessa has a population (lcon) of .  , 18.8% of the population are resident foreign nationals.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office - Superweb database - Gemeinde Statistics 1981-2008  accessed 19 June 2010)  Over the last 10 years (19972007) the population has changed at a rate of 10.4%.  Most of the population () speaks Italian (74.7%), with German being second most common (17.7%) and French being third (2.8%).(Swiss Federal Statistical Office accessed 25-January-2011)  Of the Swiss national languages (), 107 speak German, 17 people speak French, 451 people speak Italian, and 1 person speaks Romansh.  The remainder (28 people) speak another language.(Popolazione residente, secondo la lingua principale e la religione, nel 2000  accessed 23 November 2010), the gender distribution of the population was 47.9% male and 52.1% female.  The population was made up of 251 Swiss men (37.4% of the population), and 71 (10.6%) non-Swiss men.  There were 295 Swiss women (43.9%), and 55 (8.2%) non-Swiss women.(  In  there were 5 live births to Swiss citizens and were 4 deaths of Swiss citizens and 2 non-Swiss citizen deaths.  Ignoring immigration and emigration, the population of Swiss citizens increased by 1 while the foreign population decreased by 2.  There were 2 Swiss men and 1 Swiss woman who immigrated back to Switzerland.  At the same time, there were 2 non-Swiss men and 3 non-Swiss women who immigrated from another country to Switzerland.  The total Swiss population change in 2008 (from all sources, including moves across municipal borders) was a decrease of 4 and the non-Swiss population change was a decrease of 2 people.  This represents a population growth rate of -0.9%.(  The age distribution, , in Sessa is; 60 children or 8.9% of the population are between 0 and 9 years old and 72 teenagers or 10.7% are between 10 and 19.  Of the adult population, 63 people or 9.4% of the population are between 20 and 29 years old.  78 people or 11.6% are between 30 and 39, 92 people or 13.7% are between 40 and 49, and 117 people or 17.4% are between 50 and 59.  The senior population distribution is 87 people or 12.9% of the population are between 60 and 69 years old, 59 people or 8.8% are between 70 and 79, there are 44 people or 6.5% who are over 80.(01.02.03 Popolazione residente permanente  accessed 23 November 2010) the average number of residents per living room was 0.54 which is less people per room than the cantonal average of 0.6 per room.  In this case, a room is defined as space of a housing unit of at least  as normal bedrooms, dining rooms, living rooms, kitchens and habitable cellars and attics.()  About 60.2% of the total households were owner occupied, or in other words did not pay rent (though they may have a mortgage or a rent-to-own agreement).(Urban Audit Glossary pg 17)  , there were 265 private households in the municipality, and an average of 2.3 persons per household.(   there were 218 single family homes (or 72.9% of the total) out of a total of 299 inhabited buildings.  There were 48 two family buildings (16.1%) and 15 multi-family buildings (5.0%).  There were also 18 buildings in the municipality that were multipurpose buildings (used for both housing and commercial or another purpose).( 09.02.01 Edifici  accessed 23 November 2010)  The vacancy rate for the municipality, , was 0.48%.   there were 389 apartments in the municipality.  The most common apartment size was the 5 room apartment of which there were 128.  There were 6 single room apartments and 128 apartments with five or more rooms.(  09.02.02 Abitazioni  accessed 23 November 2010)  Of these apartments, a total of 261 apartments (67.1% of the total) were permanently occupied, while 127 apartments (32.6%) were seasonally occupied and 1 apartments (0.3%) were empty.(  , the construction rate of new housing units was 2.9 new units per 1000 residents.(The historical population is given in the following chart:()(Popolazione residente, dal 1850  accessed 23 November 2010)Colors  id:lightgrey value:gray(0.9)  id:darkgrey  value:gray(0.8)ImageSize   width:1020 height:210PlotArea    height:150 left:100 bottom:50 right:100AlignBars   justifyDateFormat  x.yPeriod      from:0 till:690TimeAxis    orientation:verticalAlignBars   justifyScaleMajor  gridcolor:darkgrey increment:100 start:0ScaleMinor  gridcolor:lightgrey increment:20 start:0PlotData  color:yellowgreen width:40   mark:(line,white) align:center  bar:1801 from:start till:687 text:687  bar:1850 from:start till:621 text:621  bar:1860 from:start till:608 text:608  bar:1870 from:start till:653 text:653  bar:1880 from:start till:618 text:618  bar:1890 from:start till:636 text:636  bar:1900 from:start till:625 text:625  bar:1910 from:start till:626 text:626  bar:1920 from:start till:567 text:567  bar:1930 from:start till:547 text:547  bar:1941 from:start till:461 text:461  bar:1950 from:start till:452 text:452  bar:1960 from:start till:404 text:404  bar:1970 from:start till:402 text:402  bar:1980 from:start till:442 text:442  bar:1990 from:start till:554 text:554  bar:2000 from:start till:604 text:604SightsThe entire village of Sessa is designated as part of the of Swiss Heritage Sites()PoliticsIn the 2007 federal election the most popular party was the FDP which received 29.41% of the vote.  The next three most popular parties were the CVP (27.8%), the Green Party (13.57%) and the League (10.86%).  In the federal election, a total of 254 votes were cast, and the turnout was 54.4%.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office, Nationalratswahlen 2007: Strke der Parteien und Wahlbeteiligung, nach Gemeinden/Bezirk/Canton  accessed 28 May 2010)      In the  Gran Consiglio election, there were a total of 475 registered voters in Sessa, of which 300 or 63.2% voted.  2 blank ballots and 1 null ballot were cast, leaving 297 valid ballots in the election.  The most popular party was the PLRT which received 68 or 22.9% of the vote.  The next three most popular parties were; the PLRT (with 68 or 22.9%), the SSI (with 51 or 17.2%) and the LEGA (with 34 or 11.4%).( Elezioni cantonali: Gran Consiglio, Consiglio di Stato  accessed 23 November 2010)      In the  Consiglio di Stato election, 1 blank ballot was cast, leaving 299 valid ballots in the election.  The most popular party was the PPD which received 74 or 24.7% of the vote.  The next three most popular parties were; the PLRT (with 58 or 19.4%), the LEGA (with 51 or 17.1%) and the PS (with 47 or 15.7%).(Economy, Sessa had an unemployment rate of 4.67%.  , there were 17 people employed in the primary economic sector and about 8 businesses involved in this sector.  21 people were employed in the secondary sector and there were 3 businesses in this sector.  50 people were employed in the tertiary sector, with 17 businesses in this sector.(  There were 248 residents of the municipality who were employed in some capacity, of which females made up 37.5% of the workforce.  , there were 94 workers who commuted into the municipality and 171 workers who commuted away.  The municipality is a net exporter of workers, with about 1.8 workers leaving the municipality for every one entering.  About 31.9% of the workforce coming into Sessa are coming from outside Switzerland.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office - Statweb  accessed 24 June 2010)  Of the working population, 11.3% used public transportation to get to work, and 62.9% used a private car.(  , there were 2 hotels in Sessa.( Settori alberghiero e paralberghiero  accessed 23 November 2010)ReligionFrom the , 447 or 74.0% were Catholic, while 62 or 10.3% belonged to the Reformed Church.  There are 86 individuals (or about 14.24% of the population) who belong to another church (not listed on the census), and 9 individuals (or about 1.49% of the population) did not answer the question.(EducationIn Sessa about 74.8% of the population (between age 25-64) have completed either non-mandatory upper secondary education or additional higher education (either university or a Fachhochschule).(       In Sessa there were a total of 113 students ().  The Ticino education system provides up to three years of non-mandatory kindergarten and in Sessa there were 18 children in kindergarten.  The primary school program lasts for five years and includes both a standard school and a special school.  In the municipality, 28 students attended the standard primary schools and 3 students attended the special school.  In the lower secondary school system, students either attend a two year middle school followed by a two year pre-apprenticeship or they attend a four year program to prepare for higher education.  There were 35 students in the two year middle school and 1 in their pre-apprenticeship, while 11 students were in the four year advanced program.      The upper secondary school includes several options, but at the end of the upper secondary program, a student will be prepared to enter a trade or to continue on to a university or college.  In Ticino, vocational students may either attend school while working on their internship or apprenticeship (which takes three or four years) or may attend school followed by an internship or apprenticeship (which takes one year as a full-time student or one and a half to two years as a part-time student).()  There were 5 vocational students who were attending school full-time and 11 who attend part-time.       The professional program lasts three years and prepares a student for a job in engineering, nursing, computer science, business, tourism and similar fields.  There was 1 student in the professional program.( Allievi e studenti, secondo il genere di scuola, anno scolastico 2009/2010  accessed 23 November 2010)  , there were 3 students in Sessa who came from another municipality, while 62 residents attended schools outside the municipality.(ReferencesExternal links* Official website *TIes:Sessafr:Sessa(Svizzera)lmo:Sessa(gemeente)pt:Sessarm:Sessasimple:Sessavo:SessaSwiza
6993753
Southsea,_Wrexham
Southsea () is a small formerly industrial village on the Gwenfro river in Broughton community, the county borough of Wrexham, Wales.The village came into being at the site of the Broughton Hall Brickworks and Plas Power Colliery. Its language placename (meaning the bank of the river, glan yr afon) derives from that of a farm. Its exotic-sounding English name, however, comes from the South Sea Inn which used to stand over the road from the brickworks, and in a room of which the brickworks pay was distributed.The Wrexham historian Neobard Palmer noted that the name Southsea first appeared on the rate books as early as 1786, though also commenting that this was an absurd name which should never have been adopted, especially as there was an appropriate name ready to hand.(Southsea, All Saints, GENUKI. See Palmer, History of the Thirteen Country Townships of Wrexham, 1903)Southseas church, All Saints, was formerly its church hall. The previous church, built in 1921 after the original building became unsafe due to mining subsidence, itself became unsafe and was demolished in 1984.(Southsea, All Saints, Clwyd FHS) References External links *www.geograph.co.uk: photographs of Southsea and surrounding areaWrecsam
7004698
Anchorage,_Alaska
 website              www.muni.orgAnchorage (officially called the Municipality of Anchorage) is a consolidated city-borough in the southcentral part of the state of Alaska. It is the northernmost city in the States. With 291,826 municipal residents in 2010 (374,553 residents within the Metropolitan Statistical Area),() it is Alaskas largest city and constitutes more than 40 percent of the states total population; only York has a higher percentage of residents who live in the states largest city. Anchorage has been named All-America City four times, in 1956, 1965, 1984/85, and 2002, by the Civic League.() It has also been named by Kiplinger as the most tax friendly city in the United States.()HistoryRussian presence in south central Alaska was well established in the 19th century. In 1867, U. S. Secretary of State William H. Seward brokered a deal to purchase Alaska from a debt-ridden Imperial Russia for $7.2 million (about two cents an acre). The deal was lampooned by political rivals as folly, Sewards icebox and Walrussia. By 1888, gold was discovered along Turnagain Arm. In 1912, Alaska became a United States territory.  Anchorage, unlike every other large town in Alaska south of the Brooks Range, was neither a fishing nor mining camp. The area within tens of miles of Anchorage is barren of significant economic metal minerals; there is no fishing fleet operating out of Anchorage.  While a number of Denaina settlements existed along Knik Arm for years, only two white men, Bud Whitney and Jack Brown, were reported to have lived in the Creek valley in the 1910s prior to the large influx of settlers.The city grew from its happenstance choice as the site, in 1914, of a railroad construction port for the Alaska Engineering Commission.  Construction of the railroad, to be known as the Railroad, continued until its completion in 1923.  The area near the mouth of Ship Creek, where the railroad headquarters was located, quickly became a city.  A townsite was platted on higher ground to the south of the tent city, greatly noted in the years since for its order and rigidity compared with other Alaskan townsites.  Anchorage was incorporated on November 23, 1920.() The citys economy in the 1920s and 1930s centered on the railroad.  Col. Otto F. Ohlson, the Swedish-born general manager of the railroad for nearly two decades, became a symbol of residents contempt for the firm control he maintained over the railroads affairs, which by extension became control over economic and other aspects of life in Alaska.Between the 1930s and the 1950s, the city experienced massive growth as transportation and the military became increasingly important.  Aviation operations in Anchorage commenced along the firebreak south of town (todays Park Strip), which was also used by residents as a course.  An increase in air traffic led to clearing of a site directly east of townsite boundaries starting in 1929, which became Field.  Merrill Field served as Anchorages primary airport during the 1930s and 1940s, when it was replaced by International Airport upon its opening in 1951.  Merrill Field still serves a significant amount of aviation traffic to this day.Elmendorf Air Force Base and Fort Richardson were constructed in the 1940s, and served as the citys primary economic engine until the 1968 Prudhoe Bay discovery shifted the thrust of the economy towards the oil industry.  The 2005 Base Realignment and Closure process led to the combining of the two bases (along with Air National Guard Base) to form Base Elmendorf-Richardson.Alaska Earthquake Fourth Ave Anchorage.jpg|left|thumb|The Good Friday or Great Alaska Earthquake on March 27, 1964. View of Fourth AvenueOn March 27, 1964, Anchorage was hit by the magnitude 9.2 Good Friday Earthquake, which killed 115 Alaskans and caused $311 million ($1.8 billion in 2007 U.S. dollars) in damage.()() The earth-shaking event lasted nearly five minutes; most structures that failed remained intact the first few minutes, then failed with repeated flexing.(( It was the second largest earthquake in the recorded history of the world.(( Rebuilding dominated the remainder of the 1960s.In 1968, oil was discovered in Prudhoe Bay, and the resulting oil boom spurred further growth in Anchorage. In 1975, the City of Anchorage and the Greater Anchorage Area Borough (which includes Eagle River, Girdwood, Glen Alps, and several other communities) merged into the geographically larger of Anchorage.( The city continued to grow in the 1980s, and capital projects and an aggressive beautification campaign took place.GeographyAnchorage is located in Central Alaska. At 61 degrees North, it lies slightly farther north than Oslo, Stockholm, Helsinki and St. Petersburg, but not as far north as Reykjavik or Murmansk. It is northeast of the Peninsula, Island, and Inlet, due north of the Peninsula, northwest of William Sound and Panhandle, and nearly due south of McKinley/Denali. The city is on a strip of coastal lowland and extends up the lower alpine slopes of the Chugach Mountains. To the south is Arm, a fjord that has some of the worlds highest tides. Arm, another tidal inlet, lies to the west and north. The Mountains on the east form a boundary to development, but not to the city limits, which encompass part of the wild alpine territory of State Park. The citys seacoast consists mostly of treacherous mudflats. Newcomers and tourists are warned not to walk in this area because of extreme tidal changes and the very fine glacial silt. Unwary victims have walked onto the solid seeming silt revealed when the tide is out and have become stuck in the mud. The two recorded instances of this occurred in 1961 and 1988.(Danger Stalks the Land: Alaskan Tales of Death and Survival By Larry Kaniut  St. Martins Press 1999  Page 2-6 and 287291)According to the States Census Bureau, the municipality has a total area of 1,961.1 square miles (5,079.2 km); 1,697.2 square miles (4,395.8 km) of which is land and 263.9 square miles (683.4 km) of it is water. The total area is 13.46% water.Boroughs and census areas adjacent to the Municipality of Anchorage are Matanuska-Susitna Borough to the north, Kenai Peninsula Borough to the south and Valdez-Cordova Census Area to the east. The National Forest, a national area, extends into the southern part of the municipality.ClimateAnchorage has a climate (the climate classification is Dfc) but with strong maritime influences that moderate temperatures. Average daytime summer temperatures range from approximately ; average daytime winter temperatures are about . Anchorage has a frost-free growing season that averages slightly over 101 days.Average January low and high temperatures at Stevens Anchorage International Airport (PANC) are  with an average winter snowfall of .() The 19541955 winter had , which made it the snowiest winter on record.() The coldest temperature ever recorded at the original weather station located at Field on the East end of 5th Avenue was  on February 3, 1947.()Summers are typically mild (although cool compared to the US and even Alaska), and it can rain frequently. Average July low and high temperatures are  and the hottest reading ever recorded was  on June 25, 1953.( The average annual precipitation at the airport is .() Anchorages latitude causes summer days to be very long and winter daylight hours to be very short. The city is often cloudy during the winter, which decreases the amount of sunlight experienced by residents.(For November, December, and January, average monthly percent possible sunshine (the hours of direct sunlight experienced, divided by the possible hours of sunlight for the location) is below 35%. See http://climate.umn.edu/cawap/mpr/jargon.htm for an explanation of the concept percent possible sunlight. Data from Data Through 2005 Average Percent Possible Sunshine. Climatic Data Center. Retrieved November 20, 2006.)Owing to its proximity to active volcanoes, ash hazards are a significant, though infrequent, occurrence. The most recent notable volcanic activiy centered on the multiple eruptions of Mt. Redoubt during MarchApril 2009, resulting in a  high ash cloud as well as ash accumulation throughout the Cook Inlet region. Previously, the most active recent event was an August 1992 eruption of Spurr, which is located  west of the city.() The eruption deposited about  of volcanic ash on the city. The clean-up of ash resulted in excessive demands for water and caused major problems for the Anchorage Water and Wastewater Utility.Wildlifethumb|A moose in a yard.A diverse wildlife population exists in urban Anchorage and the surrounding area. Approximately 250 black bears and 60 bears live in the area. Bears are regularly sighted within the city. Moose are a common sight. In the Anchorage Bowl, there is a summer population of approximately 250 moose, increasing to as many as 1000 during the winter. They are a hazard to drivers, with over 100 moose killed by cars each year. Two people have been stomped to death by moose in recent years in Anchorage. Cross-country skiers and dog mushers using city trails have been charged by moose on numerous occasions; the Alaska Dept of Fish and Game has to kill some individual aggressive moose in the city every year. goats can be commonly sighted along the Seward Highway between Anchorage and Girdwood, and sheep are often viewed quite close to the road at Windy Point.() Approximately 30 wolves live in the Anchorage area, in 2007 several dogs were killed by wolves while on walks with their owners.()() There are also beaver dams in local creeks, and it is common to see foxes and kits in parking lots close to wooded areas in the spring. Along the Seward Highway headed toward Kenai, there are common sightings of whales in the Turnagain Arm. Lynx are occasionally sighted in Anchorage as well.DemographicsAs of the 20052007 Community Survey conducted by the U.S. Census Bureau, Americans made up 69.8% of Anchorages population; of which 66.4% were non-Hispanic whites. Blacks or African Americans made up 6.3% of Anchorages population; of which 6.1% were non-Hispanic blacks. American Indians and Natives made up 5.5% of the citys population; of which 5.3% were non-Hispanic.()()Americans made up 6.1% of the citys population; of which 6.0% were non-Hispanic. Islander Americans made up 1.0% of the citys population. Individuals from some other race made up 2.7% of the citys population; of which 0.1% were non-Hispanic. Individuals from two or more races made up 8.5% of the citys population; of which 7.4% were non-Hispanic. In addition, Hispanics and Latinos made up 7.7% of Anchorages population.((As of the 2000 census, there were 260,283 people, 94,822 households and 64,099 families residing in the municipality. The population density was 153.4 per square mile (59.2/km). There were 100,368 housing units at an average density of 59.1 per square miles (22.8/km). The racial makeup of the municipality was 72.2% White, 5.8% American, 7.3% Native American (a category that includes both Natives and American Indians not of Alaskan origin), 5.6% Asian, 0.9% Pacific Islander, 2.2% from other races, and 6.0% from two or more races. 5.7% were Hispanics or Latinos of any race. 4.0% reported speaking Spanish at home, while 1.5% speak Tagalog and 1.4% Korean.()There were 94,822 households out of which 38.9% had children under the age of 18 living with them, 51.1% were couples living together, 11.5% had a female householder with no husband present, and 32.4% were non-families. 23.4% of all households were made up of individuals and 3.8% had someone living alone who was 65 years of age or older. The average household size was 2.67 and the average family size was 3.19.The age distribution was 29.1% under 18, 9.6% from 18 to 24, 33.9% from 25 to 44, 21.9% from 45 to 64, and 5.5% who were 65 or older. The median age was 32 years. For every 100 females there were 101.6 males. For every 100 females age 18 and over, there were 102.4 males.The median income for a household in the municipality was $55,546, and the median income for a family was $63,682. Males had a median income of $41,267 versus $31,747 for females. The capita income for the municipality was $25,287. About 5.1% of families and 7.3% of the population were below the line, including 8.8% of those under the age of 18 and 6.4% of those 65 and older.As of September 7, 2006, 94 languages were spoken by students in the Anchorage School District.()Economycountry7United Kingdom  Anchorages largest economic sectors include transportation, military, municipal, state and federal government, tourism, corporate headquarters (including regional headquarters for corporations) and resource extraction. Large portions of the local economy depend on Anchorages geographical location and surrounding natural resources. Anchorages economy traditionally has seen steady growth, though not quite as rapid as many places in the lower 48 states.  With the notable exception of a real estate-related crash in the mid to late 1980s, which saw the failure of numerous financial institutions, it does not experience as much pain during economic downturns.The Stevens Anchorage International Airport (TSAIA) is the worlds third busiest airport for cargo traffic, surpassed only by Memphis and Hong Kong. This traffic is strongly linked to Anchorages location along circle routes between Asia and the lower 48. In addition, the airport has an abundant supply of jet fuel from in-state refineries located in North Pole and Kenai.  This jet fuel is transported to the of Anchorage, then by rail or pipeline to the airport.The Port of Anchorage receives 95 percent of all goods destined for Alaska.  Ships from Totem Ocean Trailer Express and Horizon Lines arrive twice weekly from the of Tacoma in Washington. Along with handling these activities, the port is a storage facility for jet fuel from Alaskan refineries, which is utilized at both TSAIA and Base Elmendorf-Richardson (JBER).The United States military used to have two large installations, Elmendorf Air Force Base and Fort Richardson, which originally stemmed from the branching off of the Air Force from the Army following World War II.  In a cost cutting effort initiated by the 2005 BRAC proceedings, the bases were combined.  JBER was created, which also incorporated Air National Guard Base near TSAIA.  The combination of these three bases employ approximately 8,500 civilian and military personnel.  These individuals along with their families comprise approximately ten percent of the local population.  During the War, Elmendorf became an important base due to its proximity to the Union, particularly as a command center for numerous forward air stations established throughout the western reaches of Alaska (most of which have since closed).While Juneau is the official state capital of Alaska, there are actually more state employees who reside in the Anchorage area.  Approximately 6,800 state employees work in Anchorage compared to about 3,800 in Juneau.  The State of Alaska purchased the of America Center (which it renamed the B. Atwood Building) to house most of its offices, after several decades of leasing space in the McKay Building (currently the McKinley Tower) and later the Frontier Building.Tourists are drawn to Alaska every year and Anchorage is commonly the first initial stop for most travelers.  From Anchorage people can easily head south to popular fishing locations on the Peninsula or north to locations such as National Park and Fairbanks.The resource sector, mainly petroleum, is arguably Anchorages most visible industry, with many high rises bearing the logos of large multinationals such as BP and ConocoPhillips. While field operations are centered on the North Slope and south of Anchorage around Inlet, the majority of offices and administration are found in Anchorage.  The headquarters building of Alaska, a subsidiary of ConocoPhillips, is located in downtown Anchorage.(North Slope National Petroleum Reserva Alaska 2008/2009 Exploration Drilling Program. Alaska. November 2008. Page 1 (1/8). Retrieved on February 14, 2010.)  It is also the tallest building in Alaska.  Many companies who provide oilfield support services are likewise headquartered outside of Anchorage but maintain a substantial presence in the city, most notably Slope Regional Corporation and HILL.Four small airlines, Central Express,(Contact Us. Alaska Central Express. Retrieved on January 24, 2010.) Aviation,(Contact Us. Aviation. Retrieved on July 16, 2009.) Aviation Services,(Contact Us. Aviation Services. Retrieved on November 3, 2009.) and PenAir, are headquartered in Anchorage.(Contact Us. PenAir. Retrieved on July 16, 2009.)  Airlines, at one point headquartered in Anchorage, has major offices and facilities at TSAIA, including the offices of the Alaska Airlines Foundation.(The Alaska Airlines Foundation. Airlines. Retrieved on February 27, 2010.)  Prior to their respective dissolutions, airlines MarkAir and Aleutian Airways were also headquartered in Anchorage.(World Airline Directory. International. March 2228, 1995. 761.)(World Airline Directory. Flight International. March 30, 1985. 111. Retrieved on July 23, 2009.)(About Us. Reeve Aleutian Airways. August 27, 1998. Retrieved on July 23, 2009.)  The Reeve Building, at the corner of West Sixth Avenue and D Street, was spared the wrecking ball when the city block it sits on was cleared to make way for the Avenue Mall, and was incorporated into the malls structure.Anchorage does not levy a sales tax.  It does, however, charge a 12% bed tax and an 8% tax on car rentals.()ArtsFile:Whale Wall Anchorage.JPG|thumb|Whaling Wall by Wyland in downtown AnchorageLocated next to Town Square Park in downtown Anchorage, the Center for the Performing Arts is a three-part complex, hosting numerous arts events each year. The facility can accommodate more than 3,000 patrons. In 2000, nearly 245,000 people visited 678 public performances. It is home to eight resident performing arts companies and has featured mega-musical performed by visiting companies. The center also hosts the International Ice Carving Competition as part of the Rendezvous festival in February.The Anchorage Concert Association brings 15 to 20 events to the community each winter, including Broadway shows like Disneys The Lion King and Mamma Mia! The Sitka Summer Music Festival presents an Autumn Classics festival of chamber music for two weeks each September on the campus of Alaska Pacific University.Annually in January, the Anchorage Folk Festival takes place at the University of Alaska, Anchorage, featuring concerts, dances, and workshops with featured guest artists and over 130 performances by volunteer singers, dancers, musicians, and storytellers. *Native Heritage Center(Alaska Native Heritage Center)*Alaska Museum of Natural History(Alaska Museum of Natural History)*Aviation Heritage Museum*Museum at Rasmuson Center(The Anchorage Museum at Rasmuson Center)*Imaginarium: Science Discovery Center(The Imaginarium!)*Anderson House Museum(anchoragehistoric.org)*Wells Fargo Alaska Heritage Library & Museum()The city of Anchorage currently provides three municipal facilities large enough to hold major events such as concerts, trade shows and conventions. Downtown facilities include the Center for the Performing Arts, A. Egan Civic & Convention Center and the recently completed Civic and Convention Center, which will be connected via skybridge to form the Anchorage Civic & Convention District. The Arena hosts sporting events as well concerts and annual trade shows. The Football Stadium and Stadium are also noteworthy sports venuesSportsFile:Grizzlies on offense at Fairbanks at Alaska 2008-03-06.jpg|thumb|right|220px|Wild, indoor football teamNational attention is focused on Anchorage on the first Saturday of each March, when the Trail Sled Dog Race kicks off with its ceremonial start downtown on Fourth Avenue. Better known as simply The Iditarod, the event is the longest sled dog race in the world. Anchorage is also home to the Fur Rendezvous Open World Championship Sled Dog Races, a three-day dogsled sprint event consisting of 3 timed races of  each. Held each February, the event is part of the annual Fur Rendezvous, a winter sports carnival.Anchorage is the home of two teams in the Baseball League. The Bucs and Glacier Pilots both play at Stadium.Anchorage currently has two professional sports teams: the Alaska Aces of hockeys ECHL; and the Wild, a member of the Football League.The University of Alaska-Anchorage Seawolves are a member of the Collegiate Athletic Association. UAA has Division I teams in gymnastics and hockey, as well as several other Division II teams. There are four rugby clubs, including the Bird Creek Barbarians RFC, Anchorage Thunderbirds,(Home) Mat Valley Maulers RFC, and Spenard Green Dragons.(Alaska Rugby  Bird Creek Barbarians RFC) The season runs from April through September.The Northern Knights gained national attention when they joined the eight-team Eastern Basketball Association in 1977, a league whose nearest competitor was  from Anchorage. The Knights captured the 197980 league championship, and featured several players who would play in the NBA, most notably Brad Davis, a future player and broadcaster for the Mavericks. They competed in the renamed Continental Basketball Association for five seasons until the economic recession ended their run in 1982.UAA sponsors the annual Alaska Shootout, an annual NCAA Division I basketball tournament featuring colleges and universities from across the States along with the UAA team. Anchorage is the finish line for the Ultra Challenge wheelchair race, and holds the ceremonial start of the Trail Sled Dog Race. The city was the U.S. candidate for hosting the 1992 and 1994 Olympics, but lost to Albertville, France and Lillehammer, Norway respectively. Anchorage is a premier cross-country skiing city, in terms of density of groomed trails within the urban core. There are  of maintained ski trails in the city, some of which reach downtown. The same trail system also provides access to Chugach State Park, a  high alpine park.() The Tour of Anchorage is an annual 50-kilometer ski race within the city.(Tour of Anchorage) and is the Host for the 2009 and 2010 US Senior National Cross Country Ski Championship.()Anchorage is also home to Alaskas first WFTDA flat track womans roller derby league, the City Rollergirls.()Parks and recreationpeak.jpg|thumb|right|220px|Ptarmigan peakFile:Turnagain Arm, Cook Inlet, Alaska.jpg|thumb|right|240ps|Panorama of Inlets Turnigan Arm, a few miles south of Anchorage, Alaska. The tides outParks and gardens*Native Heritage Center(www.alaskanative.net  Home)*The Botanical Garden contains over 900 species of hardy perennials and 150 native plant species(Alaska Botanical Garden)*Zoo(Alaska Zoo Home Page)*Wildlife Conservation Center(Alaska Wildlife Conservation Center)*Park Strip*Park*Woronzof Park*Earthquake Park*Russian Jack Park*Flat Top Mountain Recreation Area*Westchester Lagoon/Margaret Sullivan Park*Valley of the Moon Park*Lyn Ary Park*Pop Carr Park*Minnesota Park*Fairview Lions Park*Roosevelt Park*Hanna Cove Park*University Lake Park*Goose Lake Park*Conifer Park*Muldoon Park*McPhee Park*Williwaw Park*Connors Lake Park*Jewel Lake Park*Ocean View Park*Cutty Sark Park*Taku Lake Park*Bancroft Park*Campbell Park*Meadow Park*Stork Park*Forsythe Park*Charles Smith Park*Al Miller Memorial Park*Lloyd Steel & Balto Seppla Park*Tikishla Park*Nunaka Valley Park*Sitka Park*Centennial Park*Sand Lake Park*Dela Vega Park*Southport Park*Ocean Bluff Park*Ruth Arcand Park*Meadow Park*Abbott Loop ParkRecreational facilities*Alpenglow Ski Area(Ski Hotline 907-428-1208 | Alpenglow Ski Hotline 907-428-1208)*Resort(Alaska Ski Vacation Resorts  Alyeska gets top ratings!)*Ski Area(Hilltop Ski Area  Home Page)*Park(ParkDistrictSW)*Tony Knowles trailGovernment and politicsAnchorage is governed by an elected mayor and 11 member assembly, with the assistance of a manager. These positions are non-partisan, and thus no candidates officially run under any party banner. All eleven members are elected from districts known as sections. Five of the sections elect two member while one section elects one. The mayor is elected in a citywide vote. In practice, however, the party affiliation and political ideology of major candidates are usually well known. The citys current mayor is Dan Sullivan, a registered Republican. Along with 7 sister cities in the SCI program, Anchorage has a cultural exchange program with the former Yugoslavia nation of Montenegro.Anchorage generally leans toward Republican candidates in both state and presidential elections. However, since the establishment of the municipality in 1975, there have been two Democratic mayors (Tony Knowles and Begich) who have been elected to two consecutive terms. Downtown, Girdwood, and much of both the west and east parts of town trend Democratic. However, areas closest to the military bases  including River  and south Anchorage are the most Republican areas of the Municipality. Midtown is relatively moderate by comparison.Anchorage-Eagle River sends 16 representatives (currently six Republicans and 10 Democrats) to the 40-member House of Representatives and eight senators (currently four Republicans and four Democrats) to the 20-member Senate. When seats from the neighboring Mat-Su Borough are added, more than half of the Alaska state legislature comes from the Anchorage metropolitan area. This is often used as an argument in favor of moving the state capital from Juneau to a location in the Anchorage area.Voting trends show that Downtown Anchorage votes Democratic in large margins, while Spenard, Turnagain/Inlet View, and University/Airport Heights are relatively moderate and swing in elections. The remaining Anchorage area votes Republican.(2008 Presidential Election Results by House District in Alaska. USA Election Atlas http://uselectionatlas.org/FORUM/index.php?topic88046.0. Retrieved 05 July 2010.)Public safetyWith a reported strength of 383 sworn officers, the Anchorage Police Department is the largest police department in the state, serving an area of 159 square miles  with a population of over a quarter million people.(Federal Bureau of Investigation. (2008). Table 78 (Alaska). Full-Time Law Enforcement Employees by State by City, 2008. Retrieved on 2009-12-11.) The Fire & EMS Operations Division of the Anchorage Fire Department (AFD) includes thirteen fire stations with over 300 personnel covering three rotating 24-hour shifts. Additionally, there are volunteer fire departments in Girdwood and Chugiak and fire departments on Air Force Base and Richardson, as well as the Airport Police and Fire Department.(Anchorage Fire Department official website. Retrieved on 2007-04-02.)In 2005, the latest year for which data is available, Anchorage reported 735.6 violent crimes per 100,000 population and 4,116.1 property crimes per 100,000 population (see table). Anchorages crime rate, both for violent and property crimes, is higher than for Alaska as a whole or for the U.S. as a whole. When compared with U.S. cities of similar size, Anchorage has a comparable rate of violent crime and a lower rate of property crime. Anchorage, and Alaska in general, have very high rates of sexual assault in comparison with the rest of the country, with Anchorages annual rate of forcible rapes over twice as high as for the U.S. as a whole. Natives are victimized at a much higher rate than their representation in the population.(Rosay, Andr. (Winter 2004). Forcible Rapes and Sexual Assaults in Anchorage. Alaska Justice Forum 20(4): 1, 911. Retrieved on 2007-04-02.)The Anchorage Community Survey, a public survey conducted in 20042005 by the Justice Center at of Alaska Anchorage, found that overall, Anchorage residents are fairly satisfied with the performance of the Anchorage Police Department.(Myrstol, Brad A. (Summer 2005). Making the Grade? Public Evaluation of Police Performance in Anchorage. Alaska Justice Forum 22(2): 510.) Most survey respondents perceived the justice system to be somewhat effective or very effective at apprehending and prosecuting criminal suspects, bringing about just outcomes, and reducing crime.(Justice Center, University of Alaska Anchorage. (Fall 2005). Anchorage Attitudes Toward Justice System. Alaska Justice Forum 22(3): 8.)Federal representationThe States Postal Service operates the Anchorage Main Post Office on the grounds of Stevens International Airport.(Post Office Location - Anchorage Main Office. States Postal Service. Retrieved on May 15, 2010.) In addition the service operates other post offices in Anchorage.The Transportation Safety Board operates the Anchorage Field Office in Anchorage; it is the regional headquarters of the NTSB Aviation Alaska Region.(Regional Offices: Aviation. Transportation Safety Board. Retrieved on May 15, 2010.)EducationPublic education in Anchorage, Eagle River, Chugiak, Richardson and Air Force Base is managed by the School District, the 87th largest district in the United States, with nearly 50,000 students attending 98 schools.() There are also a number of choices in education, including both religious and non-denominational schools.Anchorage has four higher-education facilities that offer bachelors or masters degrees: the of Alaska Anchorage,(University of Alaska Anchorage) Pacific University, College,(Charter College Virtual Library) and the Anchorage campus of Texas-based Baptist University. Other continuing education facilities in Anchorage include the Grainger Leadership Institute, Nine Star Enterprises, CLE International, Nana Worksafe, and PackBear DBA Barr & Co.Ninety percent of Anchorages adults have high-school diplomas, 65 percent have attended one to three years of college, and 17 percent hold advanced degrees.TransportationImage:Anchorage Alaska aerial view.jpg|thumb|right|Aerial view of the of Anchorage on Cook Inlet.Image:LakesHoodAndSpenard.jpg|thumb|right|Float planes resting at Hood Seaplane Base.There is one numbered highway in Anchorage; Route 1. In Anchorage and southward it is known as the Highway, it connects Anchorage to the Peninsula. Northerly from Anchorage it is known as the Highway. There is no other road access to Anchorage. A portion of the Seward Highway, approximately 10 miles (20 km) long (known as the New Seward Highway), is built to freeway standards. The Glenn Highway carries commuter traffic to and from Eagle River, Chugiak, and the Matanuska Valley towns of Palmer and Wasilla. The highway reduces from six lanes to four lanes north from Eagle River to the junction with the two-lane Highway (Route 3), approximately midway between Wasilla and Palmer, where the Glenn reduces to a two-lane highway. Part of Alaska Route 1, as well as parts of other Alaska State Highways, are eligible for funding under the Highway System. Since the 1970s, the Alaska Department of Transportation, in coordination with the Federal Highway Administration and the Municipality of Anchorage, have been exploring the concept of connecting the two points between the Seward and Glenn highways. The project is called Highway to Highway, and the most recent concept for this project is that of a trenched freeway through the heart of Anchorage. Highway to Highway is included in the 2005 Long Range Transportation Plan, and would cost at least $575 million dollars (2005 dollars)  by far the largest urban infrastructure project in Alaskas history. The project is currently undergoing development of the Environmental Impact Statement as required by NEPA for all federal highway projects. This scoping process will cost around $18 million and will take approximately 3 years; expected to be completed by 2011.Anchorage has a bus system called People Mover,(Muni.org) with a central hub in downtown Anchorage and satellite hubs at Center and Muldoon Mall. The People Mover provides carpool organization services. The public paratransit service known as AnchorRides provides point-to-point accessible transportation services to seniors and those who experience disabilities.The Railroad offers year-round freight service along the length of its rail system between Seward (the southern terminus of the system), Fairbanks (the northern terminus of the system), and Whittier (a deep water, ice-free port). Daily passenger service is available during summer (May 15  September 15), but is reduced to one round-trip per week between Anchorage and Fairbanks during the winter.(The Alaska Railroad  Route Map)(The Alaska Railroad  Freight Services)(The Alaska Railroad  Fares/Schedules) Passenger terminals exist at Talkeetna, Denali National Park, Fairbanks, and other places. These communities are also served by bus line from Anchorage. The Ship Creek Shuttle connects downtown with the Ship Creek area, including stops at the Alaska Railroad Depot.The Stevens Anchorage International Airport, six miles (10 km) South from downtown Anchorage, is the airline hub for the state, served by many national and international airlines, including Seattle-based Airlines as well as a many intrastate airlines and charter air services. The airport is the primary international air freight gateway in the nation, by weight. Twenty-six percent of the tonnage of U.S. international air freight moves through Anchorage.(BTS | Ted Stevens Anchorage International Airport, AlaskaAir Freight Gateway) Next to Ted Stevens Anchorage International Airport is Hood Seaplane Base, the largest Seaplane Base in the world. Merrill Field, a general aviation airport on the edge of downtown, was the 86th-busiest airport in the nation in 2006.(Merrill Field Airport) There are also ten smaller private (mostly Department Of Transportation) general aviation airports within the city limits.(Airports in Anchorage Alaska)Anchorage also is currently doing a feasibility study on a rail and rail system.(Clean Alaska Transportation Project)(Anchorage Daily News Report, June 14, 2008) For the commuter rail system, Anchorage would use existing Alaska Railroad tracks to provide service to Whittier, Palmer, Seward, Wasilla, and Eagle River.*of airports in the Municipality of AnchorageHealth and utilitiesAlaska Medical Center on Providence Drive in Anchorage is the largest hospital in Alaska and is part of Health & Services in Alaska, Washington, Oregon and California. It features the states most comprehensive range of services. Providence Health System has a history of serving Alaska, beginning when the Sisters of Providence first brought health care to Nome in 1902. As the territory grew during the following decades, so did efforts to provide care. Hospitals were opened in Fairbanks in 1910 and Anchorage in 1937.Alaska Regional Hospital on DeBarr Road in Anchorage opened in 1958 as Anchorage Presbyterian Hospital, located at 8th and L Street downtown. This predecessor to Alaska Regional was a joint venture between local physicians and the Presbyterian Church. In 1976 the hospital moved to its present location on DeBarr Road, and is now a 254-bed licensed and accredited facility. Alaska Regional has expanded services and in 1994, Alaska Regional joined with HCA, one of the nations largest healthcare providers.Alaska Native Medical Center located on Tudor Road, provides medical care and therapeutic health care to natives  229 tribes  at the Anchorage site and at 15 satellite facilities throughout the state. ANMC specialists also travel to clinics in the Bush to provide care. The 150-bed hospital is also a teaching center for the of Washingtons regional medical education program. ANMC houses an office of the for Disease Control and Prevention. The Native Tribal Health Consortium and Southcentral Foundation jointly own and manage ANMC.The Municipal Light & Power (ML&P) and Chugach Electric Association provide electricity to the city. A municipally owned utility since 1932, ML&P supplies electric power to more than 30,000 residential and commercial customers in the Anchorage area. Chugach Electric Association is a not-for-profit, member-owned cooperative that was formed in 1948.Most homes have gas-fueled heat. ENSTAR Natural Gas Company is the sole provider for Anchorage, servicing some 90-percent of the citys population.The Municipality of Anchorage owns and operates the Anchorage Water and Wastewater Utility, serving some 55,000 customer accounts with water from the glacier-influenced Eklutna Lake. Anchorage Municipal Solid Waste Services and Anchorage Refuse conduct trash removal in the city depending on location.MediaAnchorages leading newspaper is the Daily News,() a statewide daily newspaper. Other newspapers include the Star,() serving primarily Chugiak and Eagle River, the Press,() a free weekly covering mainly cultural topics, and The Northern Light,() the student newspaper of the of Alaska Anchorage. Anchorages major network television affiliates are KTUU 2 (NBC), KTBY 4 (Fox), KYES 5 (MyNetworkTV), KAKM 7 (PBS), KTVA 11 (CBS), KYUR 13 (ABC/CW), and KDMD 33 (Ion/Telemundo). The citys only cable television provider is Communication, Inc. (GCI). However, Network and DirecTV offer satellite television service in Anchorage and the surrounding area.There are many radio stations in Anchorage; see of radio stations in Alaska for more information.See also*(song) by singer Shocked.* of aerospace museums* Register of Historic Places listings in Anchorage, AlaskaNotes and referencesFurther reading* Preston Jones. City For Empire: An Anchorage History, 1914-1941 (University of Alaska Press, 2010) 214 pagesExternal links* The Municipality of Anchorage* Borough map: Alaska Department of Labor* The Anchorage Convention and Visitors Bureau* * af:Anchoragean:Anchorageast:Anchoragezh-min-nan:Anchoragebg:ca:Anchoragecs:Anchorageda:Anchoragede:Anchorageet:Anchoragees:Anchorageeo:Anchorageeu:Anchoragefa:fr:Anchoragega:AnchorageAlascako:AljaskaAlaska, AlaskaAlaskaos:it:Anchoragehe:ka:Alaska(Alaska)(Alasca)lv:Ankoridalt:Ankoridaslmo:Anchoragehu:Anchoragemr:(Alaska)ja:no:Anchoragemrj:pap:Anchoragepms:Anchoragends:Anchoragepl:Anchorage(Alasca)Alaskaru:AlaskaAlaskask:Anchoragesr:fi:Anchoragesv:AnchorageAlaskata:Alaska()Alaska(Alaska)Alaska(Alaska)zh:
7013288
Chenard-Walcker
Chenard-Walcker, also known as Chenard & Walcker and Chenard et Walcker was a French automobile manufacturer, from 1900 to 1946. The factory was at first in Asnires-sur-Seine moving to Gennevilliers in 1906.()HistoryErnest Chenard (1861-1922)( was a railway engineer and maker of bicycles with a factory in Asnires-sur-Seine. He joined with mining engineer Henri Walcker (18771912)( in 1898 to make motor tricycles. They formally founded Chenard, Walkcer et Compagnie in 1900 with Chenard in charge of design and Walcker sales and finance. In the same year made their first four wheel car. This had a two cylinder, 1160 cc engine of their own design which drove the rear wheels through a four speed gearbox and an unusual transmission system. From the gearbox there were two drive shafts, one to each rear hub, with the hubs driven by gear teeth cut on the inside. The car was shown at the 1901 Paris Salon.In March 1906 the company went public and became the Socit Anonyme des Anciens tabissements Chenard et Walcker and moved to a new factory at Gennevilliers in 1908.( The new name has caused confusion over the years as to whether the cars should be called Chenard-Walcker or Chenard et Walcker, both names seem to have been used. Annual production steadily increased with a major market being the supply of taxis especially in Paris. In 1910 they made over 1500 cars making them the 9th largest maker in France. A six cylinder car of 4.5 litre joined the line up in 1913 and at the outbreak of war in 1914 the model range consisted of the six cylinder and fours of 2.0, 2.6 and 3 litre capacities.During World War I Hispano-Suiza aircraft engines were made as well as military versions of the Type U car.(The Rise and Fall of Chenard-Walkcer, The Automobile. November 1996)With peace, only production of the six cylinder, now called the Model UU, was resumed but in 1920 a brand new 2648 cc four, the 12CV, was added. FAR commercial vehicles were also made. Following the death of Ernest Chenard in 1922, his son Lucien Chenard (18961971) took over.(The 3-litre car of 1922, designed by Henri Toute (18841943) who had been with the company since 1906, with overhead camshaft engine was the winner of the very first Le Mans 24 Hours Race, in 1923 driven by Lonard and Lagache, both engineers employed by Chenard et Walcker. A 2 litre version, the 10/12 was subsequently sold to the public.In 1925 Chenard et Walkcer was the fourth largest car maker in France.( They went into partnership with Delahaye in 1927 sharing designs and components, an arrangement that lasted until 1931. Unic were also offered a place in the new consortium but declined the offer.(Front independent suspension was introduced on some 1934 models and also front wheel drive using Grgoire designs on the Super Aigle models but this was not a great success as it was launched at the same time as the Traction Avant but was considerably more expensive. In the same year the Aigle 8 with V-8 engine was launched.DeclineThe company had never had sufficient capital to modernise and the cars remained largely hand built leaving them unable to compete on price. As a result they went bankrupt in 1936 and were taken over by body maker Chausson and the 1938 models shared bodies with Matford, distinguishable only by the radiator grilles and were powered by Citron or Ford V-8 engines. There were plans to rejuvenate (again) the appearance of the big Chenard & Walcker Aigle 22CV model for 1939, giving it a raked grille, but this came to nothing and car production finally ceased in 1939 or 1940.()   In April 1940 an advertisement for the companys Matford based passenger cars appeared in the French language version of a leading Swiss based motor magazine, but by this time the company appears to have been finishing up existing stocks of new cars rather than building more.(The war yearsIn September 1939 France declared war on Germany and in June 1940 the army rapidly invaded and occupied Northern France.   The war years were characterised by a desperate shortage of raw materials for civilian industry and of petrol.   In 1940 Chenard & Walcker presented the prototype for a light van based ambulance intended for the army, and this vehicle turned out to be the first in a long line of forward control light vans.(   By 1941 the van was listed for civilian use, powered by a compact 720cc two stroke water-cooled engine which occupied a central position between the drivers right leg and the left leg of his passenger.   Power output was in the region of 20 hp which seems to have been barely compatible with the stated 1,500 Kg of carrying capacity.(   By 1942 fuel for civilian use had become virtually unobtainable and an electric-powered version of the little van was offered by a company called Sovel.(   Although the success of the little van was not sufficient to ensure the manufacturer a long-term future in vehicle production, the van itself endured, and shortly after Chausson (the company which by now had acquired Chenard & Walcker) itself fell into the hands of Peugeot, the van acquired the engine from the 202.  A few years later, in 1950, it was rebranded as the Peugeot D3 van.(  The last ones to carry the Chenard name were made in 1950.Major modelsU (1913), 4 cylinders, 3014 cc, 15 hp*14/16 1905*Type M 1907*Type N 1907*Type P 1910*Type U 15CV 1913*Type UU 1919*Type U 12CV 1920*Type TT 1922*3 litre 1922*10/15CV 1924*12/25CV 1924*22CV Straight 8 1924*14CV 1929*Y6 1929*8CV 1931*Super Aigle 4 1934*Aiglon 1934*Aigle 4S 1934*Aigle 8 1934*Aigle 20 1938*Aigle 22 1938References& Walckeret Walcker& Walcker& Walcker
7025655
Almy,_Wyoming
Almy was a coal mining camp in County, Wyoming, near the town of Evanston.  In 1881 an explosion killed 38 miners in the Central Pacific Mine, marking the first mine explosion west of the River. Another explosion killed 13 in 1886, and a third explosion in Red Canyon in 1895 killed 61 miners, the third worse mining disaster in Wyoming history.  Following the second explosion, the Wyoming territorial legislature established the office of the state mining inspector, which subsequently shut down the Almy mines in 1900 after it was deemed too dangerous to mine there. 1881 explosion On March 4, 1881, gases in the Central Pacific Mine number 3 exploded, killing 38 miners.  On March 10, the Cheyenne Weekly Leader reported the disaster(Historical Summary of Mine Disasters in the United States Volume 1 Coal Mines - 1810-1958, Mine Safety and Health Administration, 1998):A terrific explosion occurred last night between 9and 10 oclock in the Central Pacific mine, killing 35Chinamen and 3 white men. The mine was opened in1869 and is nearly worked out. It is mine No. 3,Nos. 1 and 2 having-been worked out. About 200men worked in the mine by day and 8S many as 75at night. Nearly the whole force was Chinamen. Afire had been raging in the mine for 5 years, but ithad been hemmed in by stone walls. The suppositionis that gas accumulated and in some way communicatedwith the fire . The explosion burned the surfaceworks, and the mine slope was set on fire . Fifteenmen were rescued alive from the fourth level. and1 was badly injured from the north air course. 1886 explosion On the night of January 12, 1886, gas ignited at the Almy Number 4 mine claiming 11 men and 2 boys. The Evening News in Salt Lake City described the disaster(:The night of January 12 about 25 minutes to 12, the people of the vicinity were startled by a loud report as of thunder, and for a few seconds the sky was illuminated for miles like a bright-yellow sunset. The noise and light, proceeding from the No. 4 mine, was caused by an explosion of gas, the force of which was so terrific as to blow all of the buildings above-ground into kindling wood, sending great timbers and rocks three-quarters of a mile. Miners houses were struck and pierced, but the people in them were not seriously injured. Two miners riding down the slope  in a trip of empty cars had got down to the 3d level when the explosion broke the cars into fragments and shot them out as from a cannon. The two bodies were blown to pieces and were found a considerable distance from the portal.  Eleven men and two boys were said to have been in the mine, and all were killed. (Rescue crews forced their way into the mine and placed temporary brattices to permit recovery of the bodies. The last was brought, out January 15. The explosion was thought to have originated in the 13th level on the south side of the mine, when gas was ignited by a miners open light. Although the mine had been troubled with gas the fireboss had reported it clear at 6 a. m. on the day of the explosion. 1895 explosion On March 20, 1895, an explosion at the Red Canyon mine near Almy killed 61 miners.  It is the third worse disaster in Wyoming history, exceeded only by disasters in Kemmerer and Hanna. References  External links * Almy Historical Marker on Highway 89 near Evanston* Disaster in a Western Mine, New York Times, March 5, 1881* The Quest for Mine Safety in Wyomings Coal Industry, Phil Roberts, Department of History, University of Wyoming
7030336
Acolman
footnotes               Acolman de Nezahualcoyotl is a town and municipality located in the northern part of State, part of the Mexico City area, just north of the city proper. According to myth, the first man was placed here after being taken out of Texcoco. In the community of Tepexpan, the fossilized bones more than 12,000 years old of a man were found in the 20th century. The settlement was founded in the 8th century and was an important commerce center at the time of the conquest of the Aztec Empire.( )  After the Conquest, Acolman became the site of an important Augustinian monastery in the 16th century which still contains important art and architecture from that time period.() HistoryAccording to an ancient myth, when the gods created the first man, they took him from the waters of Lake Texoco and placed him alone in Acolman. The arm of this man, ringed by drops of water from the lake is the Aztec glyph for the site. The glyph can also be seen on the monastery which dominates the landscape here.() Acolman is derived from a Nahuatl phrase which has been interpreted in various ways. It may mean man with hand or arm or where man is made. Acolman is the modern name but the settlement has been referred to as Oculma, Axuruman and Aculma in colonial era documents.(The municipality is home of the Tepexpan Man, named after the community in which he was found. The Tepexpan Man is a human fossilized skeleton between 12,000 and 14,000 years old, which was found in the mid-20th century.(The founding of the settlement of Acolman is attributed to the Acolhuas, a Chichimeca tribe, around the 8th century. The settlement started out independent but was first conquered by the Huexotzincas and remained subject to one dominion or another since. By the time of King Nezahualcoyotl, Acolman was an important town in the Texcoco dominion, after it was conquered by the Aztecs in 1396. The town was important because it was the only place in Mesoamerica that specialized in the breeding and raising of dogs (today known as the breed called xoloitzcuintli).(At the time of the Spanish conquest, Acolman was governed by II. After, Acolman became the encomienda of Pedro de Solis de los Monteros and his son Francisco. The Franciscans arrived first, but the Augustinians were in charge of evangelization efforts after 1539, with twenty four friars in residence by 1580. This order built one of the most important early colonial era monasteries in New Spain here.((The 17th and 18th century is marked by severe floodings issues, which caused widespread damage and population shifts. These floods eventually caused the disappearance of towns near Acolman such as Tlacuilocan, Tzapotla and Tescazonco.(  During one of the attempts to control the rivers in the area, a dam was constructed which cause havoc for the area. During one of the floods, the monastery was sumerged in over six feet of water, covering the church floor with silt and nearly destroyed the cloisters.( In the 17th and 18th centuries, epidemics such as smallpox decimated the native population.(After the War of Independence, Acolman became the seat of the municipality of the same name. In 1876, due to political instability, the seat was temporarily moved to a town called Xomotla. In 1877, it returned to Acolman and the appendage de Nezahualcoyotl as added.(Another flood affected the municipality in 1925 and affected the monastery, but also spurred the beginning of restoration efforts that would last until the end of the 20th century. The monastery was declared a national monument in 1933.((The torch of the Summer Olympics passed through here on its way to Mexico City.(The town and its monasteryThe townThe most important feature of the town by far is the former monastery of San Agustin, located next to the main plaza. However, there are some other attractions as well. The Central Library and Casa de la Cultura contain paintings and sculptures by a native of Acolman named Parmeno. At the municipal market, foods such as mixiote, barbacoa, consume and turkey in mole can be found as well as pulque.( Main festivals include the Feast of Saint Nicholas on 10 September, of the Michael on 29 September and the of Guadalupe on 12 December. These are celebrated with traditional dances such as Concheros, Arrieros, Contradance, Pastores, Inditos and Teomates as well as fireworks, amusement rides and music.() The most distinguishing festival for the town is the Feria de la Posada y la Piata (Piata and Posadas Fair), which has been held here every December since 1985.() Acolman claims to be the origin of the Las Posadas tradition in Mexico as well as the cradle of piatas, as they have been a tradition here for over 420 years. Both kinds of piatas, those made with clay pots and those made entirely of paper are created here.( Participants gather from various communities in the area and the main event is a piata contest. There are also horse races, bullfighting, nativity scenes, pastorelas a type of play based on the Christmas season, regional dance, and popular music shows.( Horse racing is a tradition that dates back to the Revolution.(The monasteryDeclared a national monument in 1933,() the monastery of San Agustn was built between 1539 and 1580 with most of the work being done after 1550. The walls are of rubble-stone construction and covered in plaster, topped by battlements, and the overall appearance is that of fortress.((() The crown of battlements, the single bell tower, the open chapel and the Plateresque facade identify the complex as a classic 16th century religious construction. The fortress appearance of complexes of this time were not literally for protection but rather served to dominate the landscape much as mediaeval castles in Europe did. In areas where there are carefully fitted stones, these stones have been carved.( The construction of the monastery is attributed to de Olmos.( Restoration work has been done in this complex since the 1920s, which has revealed all of the churchs facade and the atrium is terraced down to its original level of construction. This has exposed the flood damage from the colonial period. Most of the murals and frescos had been buried under years of plaster and paints before being restored.( The complex is fronted by a large square atrium, and a courtyard before that, the two of which are today separated by a road(( The most important feature of this atrium area is the  high stone cross, which is considered to be an important expression of tequitqui or Christian art executed by Indian craftsmen from the very early colonial period. The cross was mostly likely erected between the time that the Franciscans occupied the site and before the architectural sculptures of the current complex.( The cross is decorated with plants, flowers and flames at the top (which allude to the of Christ) all sculpted into the stone.( There is also a melancholy, mask-like face of Christ, with crown of thorns which projects from the center of the cross.( At the foot of the stone cross is a Madonna figures who has been identified as the Virgin of Sorrows and even associated with the goddess Coatlicue.(( At the feet of this Virgin is a weathered stone skull and a serpent, an in her breast is imbedded a dark stone disk. This follows the Aztec tradition of placing jades or other precious stones in their statues to symbolize the soul.(To the back of the atrium area is the main church, with its rose/tan Plateresque facade reminiscent of the Colegiata de Santa Mara in Calatayud, Spain. The facade has Classical composite columns with Plateresque sections below the ribbon garniture, Paul under a deep, Gothic-like canopy with a Renaissance angel below. The portal has double Renaisaance doors under archivaults decorated with fruit. Above the doors are seahorses on the main frieze and Moorish paneling on the doors themselves.( This facade was mostly likely created by Spanish craftsmen and had significant influence on other Augustinian church fronts in New Spain, especial at Yuriria and Cuitzeo in Michaocn and at Metztitln in Hidalgo.( The church building is  long,  wide and  high,( with the interior walls particularly high(( The interior vault was modified and the interior pilasters and exterior buttresses were added in 1735. The main altarpiece dates from 1690 and was put here in the 20th century to replace the original. The side altarpieces date from the 18th century.( These Baroque altarpieces are all sculpted in wood and gilded, decorated with plants, flower, celetial figures and angels.( The presbetry has a late medieval ribbed vault and important frescos in black, white and orange, with images of saints on thrones, priests and Augustine popes.((The small open chapel, or chapel of the Indians is located on the upper part of the wall between the church and the main portal to the cloister area. This chapel contains two murals from the 16th century by unknown authors depicting the Judgement and of Alexandria.((The monastery consists of two cloisters. The Claustro Chico or small cloister is of simple architecture, constructed in stone with a cross in the center which has an anagram of Jesus name. The Claustro Grande or large cloister (also called the Naranjo or Orange Tree cloister) has a more elaborate Plateresque design with Isabelino type columns.(( The small cloister may date from the Franciscan period or might be part of the early Augustinian church. Flatted arches on piers with a barrel-vaulted corridor on the ground level and a wood-roofed second level suggest the simple construction of the very early colonial period. Primitive frescos decorate the walls. The stone cross here is very similar to the Franciscan cross at one of the earliest monasteries in Cuernavaca. The crucifixion fresco on the second level is inspired by various European sources of the 15th and 16th centuries such as German prints, Italian and German ornamental panels. Starkly done in black and white, it reflects the continuing importance of the graphic arts. It also has sun and moon designs, common during the early colonial period, which reflect both old European astrological symbols as well as the importance of these in native art.( In the larger, more ornate, cloister, there are medallions with images such as the coat of arms of the Augustine order, a symbol for death, and a symbol representing the union of two worlds. The lower floor has a series of stone etchings with scenes related to the Passion of Christ.(Museo VirrenalMuch of the cloister area is occupied by the Museo Virrenal (Colonial Era) founded in 1925 in what were the portico, the kitchen the refectory and the hallway to the refectory. It has three main halls which give a detailed explanation of the construction of the site, the lives of the monks and the collection of paintings and religious objects that are on display. The museum contains more than 120 pieces. Many of the religious artwork and objects are in the third hall and include furniture, cloaks, and other religious garb (some embroidered in gold thread), sculptures in stone, wood and corn stalk paste, and oils from the 16th to the 19th centuries.((A website has been created by INAH to allow for the virtual visitation of the museum. The tour is a series of 360 degree panoramic views of each of the rooms and the pre-Hispanic base over which the monastery was built. Some of the restored rooms that are visible this way include the kitchen and the dispensary. The church is also accessible in this manner.(virtual) The site is at http://www.inah.gob.mx y http://culturainah.org/panorama360/acolman/(The municipalityAs municipal seat, the town of Acolman is the governing authority for over sixty other named communities,(inegi) which cover a total area of 86.88 km2.( At the 2010 census, the total population of the municipality was 136,558, but only about four percent of this population lives in the town proper.(inegi) The municipality borders the municipalities of Tecmac, Juan Teotihuacn, Salvador Atenco, Tezoyuca, Chiautla, Tepetlaoxtoc and Ecatepec.(Towns and villagesThe municipal seat, Acolman de Nezahualcyotl, has a population of 5,571 inhabitants, while the largest city (locality) in the municipality, Tepexpan, has a population of 102,667, more than 18 times as big. This is the largest relative difference between any municipal seat and its largest locality of any municipality in Mexico. The largest localities (cities, towns, and villages) are:(2010 census tables: INEGI)The municipality is located on a plain in the northern portion of the of Mexico called the Valley of Teotihuacan. It has only three significant elevations. The eastern border is marked by the de Patlachique and the west is marked by a mountain called Chiconautla.  Chiconautla and Tlahuilco are forested and are protected areas. From the mountains that surround this plain flow a number of streams such as the San Jos and the San Antonio, which are commonly called the Rio Grande and the Rio Chico. The municipality lacks fresh water springs, with most potable water coming from deep wells. The climate is temperate and semi-arid with rains in the summer. Temperatures can range from 36 C in the summer to -4 C in the winter. Forested areas of the municipality contain trees such as ahuehuete, mesquite, eucalyptus and Peruvian pepper. In the lower, flatter regions, the flora consists of shrubs, grasses, cactus and other plants adapted to dry areas. Wildlife consists mostly of small mammals such as rabbits and skunks, small reptiles such as the chameleon and insects.(Most of the municipalitys territory is dedicated to agriculture. Major crops include barley, corn, sorghum, wheat, maguey, and various vegetables. Orchards also exist here producing capulins, peaches, pears, figs, plums, sapote, tejocotes and apricots. Livestock includes cattle, pigs, goats and domestic fowl. The second most important economic activity is industry producing process foods, drinks, tobacco products and leather goods. Mining is limited to gravel, sand and other construction materials. There are small deposits of gold, silver, copper, quartz and mercury, but they have not been exploited. Most mines are located near the communities of San Pedro Tepetitlan and Xometla. Commerce is mostly limited to serving local needs.(The municipality has a narrow economic base, based on manufacturing and agriculture, with much of the farmland still in ejido status. Acolman is a bedroom community with many of its workers commuting to places such as Mexico City proper and other cities in the State of Mexico.()  Of those working in the municipality, less than ten percent of the population is employed in agriculture with the rest evenly split between industry and commerce.( Population growth has been significantly slower than in other parts of the Mexico City area.(In 2008, Moodys assigned a classification of A3.mx (Mexico scale) and Ba3 (Global scale) to the municipality of Acolman. The reasons behind the grades are that while the municipality has a moderate amount of debt and adequate financial development, there have been some management issues in recent years. It also reflects the limited economic base of the area and the need for infrastructure. The municipality needs between 12.5 and 25 million pesos worth of roadwork, which it cannot finance and needs help from the State of Mexico. Unlike other municipalities in the Greater Mexico City area, water supply is based on a system of nineteen water suppliers, with only three owned by the municipality.(The main tourist attractions are the archeological zone of Tepexpan, where the fossilized bones of the man were found and the former monastery of San Agustin de Acolman.( The Tepexpan Museum is located in the community of the same name, famous due to the discovery of the Tepexpan Man, a human skeleton which is more than 12,000 years old. It was found in 1945 by Dr. Helmut de Terra and Alberto R. Arellano. The museum exhibits mammoth remains as well as flint and obsidian tools.( Other attractions in the municipality include the former haciendas of San Antonio, Tepexpan and Nextlalpan.( The San Antonio Hacienda is one of the few colonial-era haciendas what has managed to preserve its original architecture. Today it operates as a recreational center.( The Castillo Dam was constructed in the 18th century. Other attractions include the Cueva de los Gatos cave,( and the Cuevas de la Amistad (Friendship Caves) has areas dedicated to medicinal herbs in addition to the caves. The Sierra de Patlachique is an eco-tourism park with facilities for picnicking, swimming, football, cycling and camping.(One important community outside the seat is called Cuanaln, which is a Nahua community. Fewer than 500 people can still speak an indigenous language, but a number of traditions survive. The community of Cuanaln is noted for its musicians, especially those dedicated to wind instruments. The better known groups include Los Vasquez, Los Jurez and Los Chicanos.(ReferencesExternal links*http://www.mexicanarchitecture.org/glossary/index.php?building45 Mexican Architecture site on the monasteryca:Acolmanes:Acolmaneo:Acolmanit:Acolmannah:colmnno:Acolmanpt:Acolman
7034862
Granite,_Montana
thumb|Remnant of Miners Union Hall, Granite, MontanaGranite is a town in County, Montana, States, east of the town of Philipsburg.  Granite thrived as a silver mining town in the 1890s, but is now completely deserted.Historythumb|The city of Granite, taken in about 1895In 1872, Eli Holland found a small quantity of high quality ruby silver in the area. A shallow shaft was dug, but later abandoned until 1877, when Charles McLure discovered some silver ore in the shaft. He later traveled to St. Louis, to obtain the capital necessary to begin development of the mine.http://philipsburgmt.com/index.php?pageghost_towns#GRANITEGranite eventually grew to a town with more than 3,000 inhabitants. For the time period, there were many modern amenities, such as the large Miners Union Hall, a library, 18 saloons, brothels, a hospital, school, as well as churches.The Silver Purchase Act was repealed in 1893, drastically lowering the price of silver, and many residents left Granite, leaving only 140 residents a year later. Granite is currently entirely uninhabited.()Notes
7047304
Company_scrip
Image:Coal scrip.jpg|left|thumb|Scrip minted by Olga Coal Company, WVCompany scrip is currency issued in certain industries to pay workers. Such scrip can only be exchanged by wage-earners in company stores owned by their employers and often charging inflated prices. In the UK, such systems have been formally outlawed under Acts.In the States, mining and logging camps were typically created, owned and operated by a single company. These remote locations were cash poor and workers had very little choice but to purchase goods at a company store. With this economic monopoly, the employer could place enormous markups on goods, making workers completely dependent on the company, thus enforcing employee loyalty. The practice continues today. On September 4, 2008, the Supreme Court of Justice ruled that Wal-Mart de Mexico, the Mexican subsidiary of Wal-Mart, must cease paying its employees in vouchers redeemable only at Wal-Mart stores.()  See also* systemReferences
7055323
Lower_Bucca,_New_South_Wales
Lower Bucca is a tiny hamlet in Northern New South Wales, Australia. It is located North of Harbour on Bucca Road, off the Pacific Highway.HistoryLower Bucca was the site of significant prospecting in the 1800s and remnants of old gold mining shafts exist in the forests around the old school.DeclineLower Bucca Primary School closed in 1977 and was probably the last remaining landmark that defined the area. The school has since been converted to a community hall. An earlier and larger community hall (located at the intersection of McClellands Road and Bucca Road a few hundred metres east of the old primary school) fell into disuse around the same time that the school closed and was later demolished. In the late 1970s and early 1980s the old hall was the venue for community Christmas parties and dance nights.External links* http://www.coffsharbour.nsw.gov.au/www/html/1185-lower-bucca-community-hall.asp* http://www.abc.net.au/rural/telegraph/viewpoint/stories/s1409855.htm
7078040
Fredrik_Idestam
Knut Fredrik Idestam (October 28, 1838, Tyrvnt, Finland, Russia  April 8, 1916, Helsinki, Finland, Russia) was a Finnish mining engineer and businessman, best known as a founder of Nokia.In May 1865, Idestam obtained a permit to construct a groundwood mill at Tampere, Finland.  The mill began operations in 1866.  In 1871, Idestam and Mechelin founded Nokia Ltd. and moved the companys operations to the city of Finland.*Tapio Helen, Fredrik Idestam (18381916), National Biography of Finland, Finnish Historical SocietydestamIdestamFredrik IdestamIdestamIdestamIdestamIdestamzh:
7088729
Boucher_Trail
The Boucher Trail is a hiking trail in Canyon National Park, located in the state of Arizona.AccessThe trail officially begins at a low point on the Springs Trail, in the southwest part of Hermit Canyon.  Access to the Boucher Trail requires a hike of about 2 miles along the Trail and Dripping Springs Trail.  Cairns exist in key places and can be spotted with some careful looking.DescriptionThe trail heads to the north and has little elevation change after leaving the Trail.  There are a few short, sharp descents and climbs around minor rockfalls and washbeds.  After about  the trail contours around Yuma Point and heads southwestward until a sharp descent at the head of Travertine Canyon through the Supai Group.  This descent steepens above 25% at places, which requires care to descend.  Hikers descending in this area may need to exercise care as some points require steps down of three to five feet.  After the descent, the trail heads up the east side of Travertine Canyon to Whites Butte .thumb|left|175px|Boucher CreekAfter the Whites Butte saddle, the trail descends through a natural break in the Redwall Limestone onto the Tonto Platform to a junction with the Trail.  This section is not as steep as the Travertine Canyon section, but can still exceed a 20% grade.  The junction is marked by a noticeable cairn.  At the junction, the Tonto Trail heads east towards Hermit Canyon or west into the Boucher Creek drainage.To the west, the Boucher Trail and Tonto Trail descend through the Tapeats Sandstone for  of a mile to Boucher Creek.  At the confluence of Boucher Creek and Topaz Creek, the Tonto Trail splits off and continues northwest, while the Boucher Trail follows the creek northeast as it continues to flow to the River, which marks the end of the trail.  Boucher Creeks flow disappears and reappears numerous times on this section of the trail.ConditionCanyon National Park categorizes the Boucher Trail as a primitive trail.  With this designation it receives only low-key maintenance as conditions warrant, or to prevent resource damage.  There are few patrols by park rangers along primitive trails, depending on daily usage.(Backcountry Management Plan, Grand Canyon National Park, Appendix G, Section C, p.39)The Boucher Trail is less travelled than the Hermit Trail on the other side of Hermit Canyon and is not as well defined.  Because of this, the trail can be hard to pick out in places and is overgrown in a few places by canyon flora.  The section descending the Supai Group in Travertine Canyon is marked by rockfalls and is exceedingly steep, requiring care when descending.Water availabilityThe only water sources along the trail are in the last mile at Boucher Creek and at the Colorado River.  An additional water source can be found at Dripping Springs, on the Springs Trail about a mile northwest of its junction with the Boucher Trail.  All natural water sources need to be treated, filtered, or boiled prior to consumption.CampingCamping is allowed at-large along the Boucher Trail, except within  mile of the junction with the Dripping Springs Trail.  The park requires selecting campsites that have been previously used.  Due to the proximity to water, there are many suitable camping locations around Boucher Creek.HazardsHazards hikers can encounter along the Boucher Trail include dehydration, sudden rainstorms, flash flooding, loose footing, rockfall, encounters with wildlife, and extreme heat.  At the Colorado River, additional hazards include hypothermia (due to the rivers consistently cold temperatures), trauma (due to collisions with boulders in rapids), and drowning. Hikers are more likely to find solitude and isolation in addition to other hazards related to desert hiking.(Grand Canyon Explorer / Boucher Trail Description)HistoryThe trail is named for Grand Canyon prospector and guide Louis Boucher, who lived in a cabin he built alongside Boucher Creek while mining in the area.  He lived alone while in the canyon, making supply runs to the south rim from time to time.  Because of his solitude, he was often labeled as a hermit, and is often credited as being the hermit referenced by canyon features of the same name, including the Trail.See also*of trails in Grand Canyon National ParkReferences(External links* Grand Canyon National Park, Official site
7097573
Leukerbad
Leukerbad (, German: Leiggerbad) is a municipality in the district of Leuk in the canton of Valais in Switzerland. History The story of Leukerbad dates back to the 4th century B.C. Graves and ceramics attest the presence of habitation in Leukerbad. From the 5th century, the pass of the Gemmi, unique link between the cantons of Valais and Bern can be got over.Image:Leukerbad3.JPG|left|thumb|A view of Leukerbad from the PassIn 1229, Leukerbad is mentioned for the first time and called Boez.( French is the locally spoken language at that time.In 1315, the commune becomes independent and the oldest known document about Leukerbad already mentions the baths.In 1501, the Bishop and Cardinal Schiner acquires the rights for the baths and speaks highly of the health resort during his visits; the thermal tourism develops and from that time, German is spoken locally.Between the 16th and 18th century, several major avalanches hit the village but the inhabitants rebuild it every time.In 1779 a famous guest stays in Leukerbad: Wolfgang von Goethe. Other famous guests will stay in Leukerbad, like Guy de Maupassant or Mark Twain.In 1908, the Company Chemin de Fer Electric Leukerbad was founded but the road quickly dominated the access to the village and the trains stopped in 1967.The cable-car to the top of Gemmi Pass was built in 1957 and the one to Torrent Alp in 1970-72.In 1980, the communitys thermal centre, The Burgerbad, is open.The sport centre is open in 1990 and the thermal centre Alpentherme in 1993.In 1998, Leukerbad offers for the first time a fixed-rope climbing (Via ferrata/Klettersteig) route of the Daubenhorn, which is currently the longest in Switzerland. Geography Leukerbad has an area, , of .  Of this area,  or 14.2% is used for agricultural purposes, while  or 8.9% is forested.   Of the rest of the land,  or 1.4% is settled (buildings or roads),  or 2.0% is either rivers or lakes and  or 73.6% is unproductive land.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office-Land Use Statistics 2009 data  accessed 25 March 2010)  Of the built up area, housing and buildings made up 0.8% and transportation infrastructure made up 0.3%.  Out of the forested land, 6.2% of the total land area is heavily forested and 1.7% is covered with orchards or small clusters of trees.  Of the agricultural land, 0.0% is used for growing crops and 2.6% is pastures and 11.6% is used for alpine pastures.  Of the water in the municipality, 1.1% is in lakes and 0.9% is in rivers and streams.  Of the unproductive areas, 9.0% is unproductive vegetation, 53.8% is too rocky for vegetation and 10.8% of the land is covered by glaciers.(Leukerbad is situated in the canton of Valais in the south of Switzerland at  above sea level. The location is very impressive because of the cliffs which surround Leukerbad:To the east, the Daubenhorn at  above sea level; to the north the  Gemmi Pass () and the Balmhorn (); to the west the Torrenthorn ().The road which leads to Leukerbad comes into the secluded valley from the south and the town of Leuk in the Rhone valley. Gemmi The Gemmi Pass is famous in the history of the Valais because it had for a long time been a very busy route between Valais and Bern.The Gemmi is accessible with the cable-car which connects Leukerbad to the highest point on the pass ()From the pass, there is a magnificent view of the Alps. The region is well-known in summer for its hiking trails to Kandersteg, Adelboden or the Wildstrubel. It is appreciated by the families too because of the small beautiful lake called Daubensee which is surrounded by easy walks and provides a beautiful place for picnics.In winter, this same lake is ideal for the cross-country skiers but you can also go there for a snow-shoe trail, a run downhill with a sledge or just a walk on prepared, signposted hikes. Torrent The cable-car to Torrent Alp brings to the Rinderhtte at  above sea level. In winter it is the paradise of skiers who then have  of runs at their disposal.In summer it offers a huge network of hiking and mountain bike trails.The panoramic views from the Rinderhtte of the  peaks of the Valais, French and Italian Alps is breath taking. Thermal baths The history of the springs of Leukerbad dates back to the Roman times. People, even then,were already aware of the therapeutic effect of the thermal water.Today,  of thermal water - up to  - flow from the springs and feed 22 thermal pools. Several baths are at the disposal of the guests in private hotels, in the Rehabilitation centre and in the Volksheilbad , but the biggest public baths are the Burgerbad and the Lindner AlpenthermeCoat of armsThe blazon of the municipal of arms is Gules, standing on Coupeaux Vert a Griffin rampant coward Argent and Or holding in dexter a Chalice of the last pouring water of the third in chief crowned of the fourth.(Flags of the World.com accessed 09-September-2011)Demographicsthumb|Street in LeukerbadLeukerbad has a population (lcon) of .  , 39.5% of the population are resident foreign nationals.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office - Superweb database - Gemeinde Statistics 1981-2008  accessed 19 June 2010)  Over the last 10 years (19992009 ) the population has changed at a rate of 0.9%.  It has changed at a rate of -7.1% due to migration and at a rate of 6.3% due to births and deaths.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office accessed 09-September-2011)  Most of the population () speaks German (1,185 or 82.8%) as their first language, French is the second most common (67 or 4.7%) and Portuguese is the third (53 or 3.7%).  There are 33 people who speak Italian and 2 people who speak Romansh.(, the gender distribution of the population was 51.1% male and 48.9% female.  The population was made up of 471 Swiss men (29.5% of the population) and 344 (21.6%) non-Swiss men.  There were 506 Swiss women (31.7%) and 275 (17.2%) non-Swiss women.(Stndige Wohnbevolkerung nach Geschlecht und Heimat am 31.12.2009.xls   accessed 24 August 2011)  Of the population in the municipality 567 or about 39.6% were born in Leukerbad and lived there in 2000.  There were 267 or 18.7% who were born in the same canton, while 268 or 18.7% were born somewhere else in Switzerland, and 287 or 20.1% were born outside of Switzerland.(  The age distribution of the population () is children and teenagers (019 years old) make up 24% of the population, while adults (2064 years old) make up 66.7% and seniors (over 64 years old) make up 9.4%.(  , there were 618 people who were single and never married in the municipality.  There were 705 married individuals, 63 widows or widowers and 45 individuals who are divorced.(STAT-TAB Datenwrfel fr Thema 40.3 - 2000   accessed 2 February 2011) the average number of residents per living room was 0.7 which is more people per room than the cantonal average of 0.63 per room.(  In this case, a room is defined as space of a housing unit of at least 4 m (43 sq ft) as normal bedrooms, dining rooms, living rooms, kitchens and habitable cellars and attics.()  About 61.3% of the total households were owner occupied, or in other words did not pay rent (though they may have a mortgage or a rent-to-own agreement).(Urban Audit Glossary pg 17)  , there were 568 private households in the municipality, and an average of 2.3 persons per household.(  There were 199 households that consist of only one person and 27 households with five or more people.  Out of a total of 627 households that answered this question, 31.7% were households made up of just one person and there were 3 adults who lived with their parents.  Of the rest of the households, there are 139 married couples without children, 189 married couples with children  There were 32 single parents with a child or children.  There were 6 households that were made up of unrelated people and 59 households that were made up of some sort of institution or another collective housing.(   there were 151 single family homes (or 29.4% of the total) out of a total of 513 inhabited buildings.  There were 230 multi-family buildings (44.8%), along with 52 multi-purpose buildings that were mostly used for housing (10.1%) and 80 other use buildings (commercial or industrial) that also had some housing (15.6%).(Swiss Federal Statistical Office STAT-TAB - Datenwrfel fr Thema 09.2 - Gebude und Wohnungen  accessed 28 January 2011)  , a total of 527 apartments (18.1% of the total) were permanently occupied, while 2,108 apartments (72.5%) were seasonally occupied and 274 apartments (9.4%) were empty.(  , the construction rate of new housing units was 1.3 new units per 1000 residents.(The historical population is given in the following chart:()(Swiss Federal Statistical Office STAT-TAB Bevlkerungsentwicklung nach Region, 1850-2000  accessed 29 January 2011)Colors  id:lightgrey value:gray(0.9)  id:darkgrey  value:gray(0.8)ImageSize   width:960 height:210PlotArea    height:150 left:100 bottom:50 right:100AlignBars   justifyDateFormat  x.yPeriod      from:0 till:1500TimeAxis    orientation:verticalAlignBars   justifyScaleMajor  gridcolor:darkgrey increment:300 start:0ScaleMinor  gridcolor:lightgrey increment:60 start:0PlotData  color:yellowgreen width:40   mark:(line,white) align:center  bar:1850 from:start till:557 text:557  bar:1860 from:start till:545 text:545  bar:1870 from:start till:593 text:593  bar:1880 from:start till:655 text:655  bar:1888 from:start till:647 text:647  bar:1900 from:start till:613 text:613  bar:1910 from:start till:619 text:619  bar:1920 from:start till:562 text:562  bar:1930 from:start till:545 text:545  bar:1941 from:start till:514 text:514  bar:1950 from:start till:505 text:505  bar:1960 from:start till:619 text:619  bar:1970 from:start till:1056 text:1,056  bar:1980 from:start till:1070 text:1,070  bar:1990 from:start till:1442 text:1,442  bar:2000 from:start till:1431 text:1,431Heritage sites of national significanceThe Gemmi Daubenwand is listed as a Swiss heritage site of national significance.()Twin TownLeukerbad is twinned with the town of Dombovar, Hungary.(Conseil des Communes et Regions dEurope  accessed 27 April 2011)PoliticsIn the 2007 federal election the most popular party was the CVP which received 57.46% of the vote.  The next three most popular parties were the SVP (23.56%), the SP (12.75%) and the FDP (3.94%).  In the federal election, a total of 449 votes were cast, and the turnout was 53.3%.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office, Nationalratswahlen 2007: Strke der Parteien und Wahlbeteiligung, nach Gemeinden/Bezirk/Canton  accessed 28 May 2010)  In the 2009 Conseil dEtat/Staatsrat election a total of 415 votes were cast, of which 21 or about 5.1% were invalid.  The voter participation was 51.8%, which is similar to the cantonal average of 54.67%.(Staatsratswahlen vom 1. Mrz 2009  accessed 24 August 2011)  In the 2007 Swiss Council of States election election a total of 432 votes were cast, of which 14 or about 3.2% were invalid.  The voter participation was 51.3%, which is much less than the cantonal average of 59.88%.(Stnderatswahl 2007  accessed 24 August 2011)Economy, Leukerbad had an unemployment rate of 3.1%.  , there were 25 people employed in the primary economic sector and about 14 businesses involved in this sector.  56 people were employed in the secondary sector and there were 15 businesses in this sector.  1,170 people were employed in the tertiary sector, with 124 businesses in this sector.(  There were 865 residents of the municipality who were employed in some capacity, of which females made up 50.1% of the workforce.   the total number of equivalent jobs was 1,102.  The number of jobs in the primary sector was 13, all of which were in agriculture.  The number of jobs in the secondary sector was 54 of which 11 or (20.4%) were in manufacturing, 1 was in mining and 42 (77.8%) were in construction.  The number of jobs in the tertiary sector was 1,035.  In the tertiary sector; 104 or 10.0% were in the sale or repair of motor vehicles, 32 or 3.1% were in the movement and storage of goods, 511 or 49.4% were in a hotel or restaurant, 10 or 1.0% were the insurance or financial industry, 2 or 0.2% were technical professionals or scientists, 31 or 3.0% were in education and 182 or 17.6% were in health care.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office STAT-TAB Betriebszhlung: Arbeitssttten nach Gemeinde und NOGA 2008 (Abschnitte), Sektoren 1-3  accessed 28 January 2011)  , there were 328 workers who commuted into the municipality and 69 workers who commuted away.  The municipality is a net importer of workers, with about 4.8 workers entering the municipality for every one leaving.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office - Statweb  accessed 24 June 2010)  Of the working population, 5.1% used public transportation to get to work, and 18% used a private car.(ReligionFrom the , 1,107 or 77.4% were Catholic, while 138 or 9.6% belonged to the Reformed Church.  Of the rest of the population, there were 63 members of an Orthodox church (or about 4.40% of the population), there was 1 individual who belongs to the Christian Catholic Church, and there were 9 individuals (or about 0.63% of the population) who belonged to another Christian church.  There were 12 (or about 0.84% of the population) who were Islamic.  There were 2 individuals who were Buddhist.  40 (or about 2.80% of the population) belonged to no church, are agnostic or atheist, and 62 individuals (or about 4.33% of the population) did not answer the question.(WeatherLeukerbad has an average of 121.9 days of rain or snow per year and on average receives  of precipitation.  The wettest month is December during which time Leukerbad receives an average of  of rain or snow.  During this month there is precipitation for an average of 10.2 days.  The month with the most days of precipitation is August, with an average of 11.4, but with only  of rain or snow.  The driest month of the year is April with an average of  of precipitation over 9.9 days.(, the LeukerBad weather station elevation is 1390 meters above sea level.)EducationIn Leukerbad about 553 or (38.6%) of the population have completed non-mandatory upper secondary education, and 133 or (9.3%) have completed additional higher education (either university or a Fachhochschule).  Of the 133 who completed tertiary schooling, 46.6% were Swiss men, 29.3% were Swiss women, 12.8% were non-Swiss men and 11.3% were non-Swiss women.(  During the 2010-2011 school year there were a total of 169 students in the Leukerbad school system.  The education system in the Canton of Valais allows young children to attend one year of non-obligatory Kindergarten.()  During that school year, there 2 kindergarten classes (KG1 or KG2) and 25 kindergarten students.  The cantons school system requires students to attend six years of school.  In Leukerbad there were a total of 7 classes and 123 students in the primary school.  The school program consists of three lower, obligatory years of schooling (orientation classes), followed by three to five years of optional, advanced schools.  There were 46 lower secondary students who attended school in Leukerbad.(Obligatorische Schulzeit  accessed 24 August 2011)  All the upper secondary students attended school in another municipality.  , there were 36 students in Leukerbad who came from another municipality, while 21 residents attended schools outside the municipality.(Famous residents*American writer James Baldwin lived here for three months with his lover Lucien Happersberger,(30-09-1932 / 21-08-2010 Switzerland) in Winter 1951.()ReferencesExternal links* Leukerbad Tourism* Official website * More information to Leukerbads historyde:Leukerbades:Leukerbadeo:Leukerbadfr:Loche-les-Bainsit:Leukerbadhe:lmo:Leukerbadnl:Leukerbadpms:Leukerbadpl:Leukerbadpt:Leukerbadrm:Leukerbadru:fi:Leukerbadvi:Leukerbadvo:Leukerbadwar:Leukerbad
7113035
Leytron
Leytron is a municipality in the district of Martigny in the canton of Valais in Switzerland.HistoryLeytron is first mentioned in 1219 as Leitrun.(GeographyLeytron has an area, , of .  Of this area,  or 27.1% is used for agricultural purposes, while  or 30.1% is forested.   Of the rest of the land,  or 6.3% is settled (buildings or roads),  or 0.6% is either rivers or lakes and  or 36.2% is unproductive land.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office-Land Use Statistics 2009 data  accessed 25 March 2010)  Of the built up area, housing and buildings made up 3.6% and transportation infrastructure made up 1.9%.  Out of the forested land, 25.0% of the total land area is heavily forested and 3.8% is covered with orchards or small clusters of trees.  Of the agricultural land, 0.4% is used for growing crops and 1.8% is pastures, while 11.0% is used for orchards or vine crops and 13.9% is used for alpine pastures.  All the water in the municipality is flowing water.  Of the unproductive areas, 12.0% is unproductive vegetation and 24.2% is too rocky for vegetation.(The municipality is located in the Martigny district.  It consists of the hamlets of Leytron-Plan, Produit, Montagnon, Les Places, Dugny and Le Fou, which are at elevations of  and the settlement of Ovronnaz at .Coat of armsThe blazon of the municipal of arms is Vert between two Mullets of Five Or in chief on a Pale Or four Chevronnels Sable.(Flags of the World.com accessed 15-September-2011)DemographicsLeytron has a population (lcon) of .  , 16.3% of the population are resident foreign nationals.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office - Superweb database - Gemeinde Statistics 1981-2008  accessed 19 June 2010)  Over the last 10 years (20002010 ) the population has changed at a rate of 24.3%.  It has changed at a rate of 23.2% due to migration and at a rate of -1.4% due to births and deaths.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office accessed 15-September-2011)  Most of the population () speaks French (1,979 or 93.0%) as their first language, Portuguese is the second most common (72 or 3.4%) and German is the third (28 or 1.3%).  There are 17 people who speak Italian.(, the gender distribution of the population was 47.7% male and 52.3% female.  The population was made up of 1,027 Swiss men (38.9% of the population) and 230 (8.7%) non-Swiss men.  There were 1,151 Swiss women (43.6%) and 229 (8.7%) non-Swiss women.(Stndige Wohnbevolkerung nach Geschlecht und Heimat am 31.12.2009.xls   accessed 24 August 2011)  Of the population in the municipality 1,283 or about 60.3% were born in Leytron and lived there in 2000.  There were 420 or 19.7% who were born in the same canton, while 178 or 8.4% were born somewhere else in Switzerland, and 244 or 11.5% were born outside of Switzerland.(  The age distribution of the population () is children and teenagers (019 years old) make up 21% of the population, while adults (2064 years old) make up 61% and seniors (over 64 years old) make up 18%.(  , there were 811 people who were single and never married in the municipality.  There were 1,079 married individuals, 158 widows or widowers and 80 individuals who are divorced.(STAT-TAB Datenwrfel fr Thema 40.3 - 2000   accessed 2 February 2011), there were 887 private households in the municipality, and an average of 2.3 persons per household.(  There were 273 households that consist of only one person and 54 households with five or more people.  , a total of 868 apartments (45.7% of the total) were permanently occupied, while 902 apartments (47.4%) were seasonally occupied and 131 apartments (6.9%) were empty.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office STAT-TAB - Datenwrfel fr Thema 09.2 - Gebude und Wohnungen  accessed 28 January 2011)  , the construction rate of new housing units was 21.6 new units per 1000 residents.(  The vacancy rate for the municipality, , was 1.7%.(The historical population is given in the following chart:()(Swiss Federal Statistical Office STAT-TAB Bevlkerungsentwicklung nach Region, 1850-2000  accessed 29 January 2011)Colors  id:lightgrey value:gray(0.9)  id:darkgrey  value:gray(0.8)ImageSize   width:1020 height:210PlotArea    height:150 left:100 bottom:50 right:100AlignBars   justifyDateFormat  x.yPeriod      from:0 till:2200TimeAxis    orientation:verticalAlignBars   justifyScaleMajor  gridcolor:darkgrey increment:400 start:0ScaleMinor  gridcolor:lightgrey increment:80 start:0PlotData  color:yellowgreen width:40   mark:(line,white) align:center  bar:1798 from:start till:421 text:421  bar:1850 from:start till:615 text:615  bar:1860 from:start till:713 text:713  bar:1870 from:start till:774 text:774  bar:1880 from:start till:842 text:842  bar:1888 from:start till:981 text:981  bar:1900 from:start till:1073 text:1,073  bar:1910 from:start till:1180 text:1,180  bar:1920 from:start till:1344 text:1,344  bar:1930 from:start till:1491 text:1,491  bar:1941 from:start till:1619 text:1,619  bar:1950 from:start till:1697 text:1,697  bar:1960 from:start till:1732 text:1,732  bar:1970 from:start till:1672 text:1,672  bar:1980 from:start till:1793 text:1,793  bar:1990 from:start till:1904 text:1,904  bar:2000 from:start till:2128 text:2,128PoliticsIn the 2007 federal election the most popular party was the CVP which received 42.45% of the vote.  The next three most popular parties were the FDP (29.2%), the SVP (17.07%) and the SP (5.72%).  In the federal election, a total of 1,149 votes were cast, and the turnout was 65.2%.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office, Nationalratswahlen 2007: Strke der Parteien und Wahlbeteiligung, nach Gemeinden/Bezirk/Canton  accessed 28 May 2010)  In the 2009 Conseil dEtat/Staatsrat election a total of 1,168 votes were cast, of which 63 or about 5.4% were invalid.  The voter participation was 65.8%, which is much more than the cantonal average of 54.67%.(Staatsratswahlen vom 1. Mrz 2009  accessed 24 August 2011)  In the 2007 Swiss Council of States election election a total of 1,147 votes were cast, of which 64 or about 5.6% were invalid.  The voter participation was 65.7%, which is much more than the cantonal average of 59.88%.(Stnderatswahl 2007  accessed 24 August 2011)Economy, Leytron had an unemployment rate of 4.5%.  , there were 334 people employed in the primary economic sector and about 106 businesses involved in this sector.  207 people were employed in the secondary sector and there were 24 businesses in this sector.  779 people were employed in the tertiary sector, with 85 businesses in this sector.(  There were 1,086 residents of the municipality who were employed in some capacity, of which females made up 44.0% of the workforce.   the total number of equivalent jobs was 913.  The number of jobs in the primary sector was 160, of which 152 were in agriculture and 8 were in forestry or lumber production.  The number of jobs in the secondary sector was 196 of which 81 or (41.3%) were in manufacturing, 2 or (1.0%) were in mining and 113 (57.7%) were in construction.  The number of jobs in the tertiary sector was 557.  In the tertiary sector; 97 or 17.4% were in the sale or repair of motor vehicles, 25 or 4.5% were in the movement and storage of goods, 250 or 44.9% were in a hotel or restaurant, 11 or 2.0% were the insurance or financial industry, 17 or 3.1% were technical professionals or scientists, 40 or 7.2% were in education and 3 or 0.5% were in health care.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office STAT-TAB Betriebszhlung: Arbeitssttten nach Gemeinde und NOGA 2008 (Abschnitte), Sektoren 1-3  accessed 28 January 2011)  , there were 322 workers who commuted into the municipality and 487 workers who commuted away.  The municipality is a net exporter of workers, with about 1.5 workers leaving the municipality for every one entering.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office - Statweb  accessed 24 June 2010)  Of the working population, 7.7% used public transportation to get to work, and 65.1% used a private car.(ReligionFrom the , 1,958 or 92.0% were Catholic, while 83 or 3.9% belonged to the Reformed Church.  Of the rest of the population, there were 4 members of an Orthodox church (or about 0.19% of the population), and there were 12 individuals (or about 0.56% of the population) who belonged to another Christian church.  There were 20 (or about 0.94% of the population) who were Islamic.  There were 1 individual who belonged to another church.  48 (or about 2.26% of the population) belonged to no church, are agnostic or atheist, and 6 individuals (or about 0.28% of the population) did not answer the question.(EducationIn Leytron about 725 or (34.1%) of the population have completed non-mandatory upper secondary education, and 192 or (9.0%) have completed additional higher education (either university or a Fachhochschule).  Of the 192 who completed tertiary schooling, 54.7% were Swiss men, 29.7% were Swiss women, 7.3% were non-Swiss men and 8.3% were non-Swiss women.(  , there were 166 students in Leytron who came from another municipality, while 72 residents attended schools outside the municipality.(  Leytron is home to the Bibliothque communale library.  The library has () 7,800 books or other media, and loaned out 12,533 items in the same year.  It was open a total of 121 days with average of 9 hours per week during that year.(Swiss Federal Statistical Office, list of libraries  accessed 14 May 2010)ReferencesExternal links* Official website ca:Leytronde:Leytrones:Leytronfr:Leytronit:Leytronlmo:Leytronnl:Leytronrm:Leytronvo:Leytronwar:Leytron
7119987
Index_of_robotics_articles
Robotics is the branch of technology that deals with the design, construction, operation, structural disposition, manufacture and application of robots.() Robotics is related to the sciences of electronics,  engineering, mechanics, and software.()  The word robot was introduced to the public by Czech writer apek in his play (Rossums Universal Robots), published in 1920. The term robotics was coined by Asimov in his 1941 science fiction short-story Liar!(According to the English Dictionary, the term robotics was first used in the short story Liar! published in the May, 1941 issue of Astounding Science Fiction.)Articles related to robotics include: 0-9 not included- 20Q- kinematic structure- Pose Estimation- 5DX- (robot)- Man- Pinocchio A A.P.E.X.- Doral- Group- Warriors- Robocon- engineering- Project- description language- selection- Robotics- Actuator- (robot)- Link- robotics- control- Adelbrecht- heuristic- Robotics League- of Sonic the Hedgehog- Aerobot- Aerospace- computing- Systems Reference Model- AgentSheets- robot- AI-complete- box- winter- AIBO- Kapur- Hubo- One- Broggi- AI Software- Raymond- probability- Jadbabaie- mobile robot- 3- Resurrection- Alienator- (film)- (robot)- Human: Making Robots Think- 5- Amazo- robotics- robot- tree- Guignard- Martin (The Bicentennial Man)- Ng- (film)- (robot)- science- (robot)- the Messenger Robot (Many Other Functions)- F- Animatronics- robotics- Daniels- Anthrobotics- (artificial intelligence)- path planning- Anybots- algorithm- IX- Applegeeks- of artificial intelligence- science- Arbormon- Humanoid Robot- Arduino- State University- Slave- solution- Combat Engineer Robot- Gideon- C. Clarke- Saint-Leon- robot- Ants- Architecture- brain- consciousness- Imagination- intelligence- Intelligence- intelligence and law- intelligence marketing- Intelligence System- intelligence systems integration- intelligence, situated approach- Life- neural network- psychology- Arts- IRB- (Alien)- Tewari- ASIMO- ASR-complete- for the Advancement of Artificial Intelligence- ASTAR- Boy- Boy (character)- Boy (film)- Astrochicken- Asuran- (robot)- architecture- Robo- calculus- Audiotrope- Villiers de lIsle-Adam- (satellite)- Autognostics- guided vehicle- Mathematician- planning and scheduling- reasoning- restaurant- painting (robotic)- waste container- Automatika- Automation- Automatix- Automaton- engineering- Auton- Computing- Networking- agent- logistics- research robot- robot- Underwater Vehicle- vehicle- weapon- Howard B B&R- (G.I. Joe)- chaining- Ballbot- robot- Technology- Wars- robot- Syed- (comics)- droid- network- robotics- Beautie- Launching Fridge- algorithm- robotics- science- model- Burtt- (Futurama)- Lower Extremity Exoskeleton- Nebel- grip- Man (film)- Trak- BigDog- & Teds Bogus Journey- Corbett- computing- BioHazard- Biology- Biomechanics- Biomimetic- robotics- Bionics- Biorobotics- Biped- Bipropagation- (Alien)- Knight (Unmanned Combat Vehicle)- Knight (vehicle)- system- planning system- Bontems- Blendo- Blobotics- May (actor)- Boe-Bot- (robot)- (tank)- Dynamics- design- cell decomposition- Leg- Communications System- (Transformers)- Makanec- Raideen- Spiner- Helm- Brynocki- automation- BURN-E- robot C C-3PO- CALO- Cambot- (Terminator)- in Multidisciplinary Perception and Intelligence of Albacete 2006- Party- Canadarm2- Robot FRIEND- Toolkit- Bays- coordinate robot- coordinates- track- Model Articulation Controller- CETpD- X-ray Observatory- Challenge- criterion- Chee- engineering- as mental training- (Chobits)- Chibi-Robo!- MacMurtrie- room- Machine Voltes V- Robo Combattler V- Mall- Choromet- Metalder- G. Atkeson- replicator- of 1999 II: The Substitute- Mitchell- Claytronics- Cleanroom- (BEAM)- CMUcam- Smulders- (clustering)- (robot)- (project)- Info-Communications (CogInfoCom)- robotics- science- tutor- Angle- intelligence- method- Comettor- normal (robotics)- reasoning- of domestic robots- and prizes in artificial intelligence- creativity- humor- intelligence- Intelligence (journal)- linguistics- neuroscience- enhanced craft item- design- manufacturing- proof- surgery- Audition- cluster- Engineering- game bot Turing Test- science- Science- software- vision- dependency theory- MetateM- expert system- Robotics- Conditional Models- design methodology- Net Protocol- engineering- systems- Copplia- E. Lathan- CoroWare- de France de robotique- intersection- Thomas- and Burn (film)- (BEAM)- Crevasse- T. Robot- Robotics- missile- (robot)- CSHALS- Cubix- Inc. (Japanese company)- Cyberflora- Cybernetics- Cyborg- Anthropology- She- in fiction- (Battlestar Galactica)- (reimagining)- Breazeal- Czechs D D*- D.A.V.E.-  Invasion Earth: 2150 A.D.- Danknick- Paluska- L. Rus- Koller- Floreano- Washu- machine- (Star Trek)- mining- pack- B. Samadi- Hanson (robotics designer)- Ross (actor)- X. Cohen- Comics- Deadblow- (Starriors)- Friend- Machine- list- of freedom (mechanics)- Courtney- robot- Parameters- logic- robotics- Girl from Mars- Industries- Dextre- (artificial intelligence)- (comics)- Tufeld- Fox- wheeled robot- Duck- control- image processing- reduction- manipulation interface- robot- system- architecture for mobile navigation (DAMN)- artificial intelligence- Robotnik (Archie character)- DOK-ING- Cuco El Guapo- Venabili- Naylor- Adams- Goldfoot and the Girl Bombs- Who and the Daleks- Runner- car- (robot)- Man (Timely Comics)- time warping- window approach- (physics) E mobile robot- T. A. Hoffmann- (novel)- Binder- ED-209- H. North- S. Ellis- SLAM- engineering- Engineering- Electroadhesion- engineering- Stability Control- Electronics- Elektro- trunk- Tigh- agent- cognition- cognitive science- behavior- behaviour- EMIEW- 2- (film)- Autonomous Tactical Robot- Technologies- Engineering- cybernetics- (robot)- averaging- axiom- Enthiran- Entomopter- (motion)- Robots Inc.- robotics- modal logic- Robots- King- Paulos- Lenard Hall- Morgado- Dickmanns- ESTAR- Ethics- of artificial intelligence- Robotic Arm- Robot Programming Language- EveR-1- Robotics- algorithms- computation- developmental robotics- robotics- (film)- classification function- intelligent system- system- problem- Kalman filter- optimization F ride- Inada- FANUC- Robotics America Corporation- to the Master- of International Robot-soccer Association- control- Growing- FemiSapien- Festo- Fiction- Film- FIRST- (robot)- Gordon- (BEAM)- of the Navigator- simulator- Clan- Planet- of stars- chaining- kinematic animation- kinematics- Foster-Miller- Foton-M- problem- Mondada- Dellaert- complex- Darro- Chatterbot- M. Wilcox- II- Robotics- Lang- Funnybot- Friends- Futurama- of robotics- agent- logic G separation theorem- Gakutensoku- Galaxina- Tyrol- theory- Fox- Chalk (actor)- Gastrobot- Robot- Roddenberry- (robot)- A. Bekey- Devol- Lucas- Hirzinger- Robo- Robot Project- Weinberg- (comic book)- Gizumon- Tactical Unmanned Ground Vehicle- of robotics- Nagai- Gobots- machine- Against Mechagodzilla- vs. King Ghidorah- vs. Mechagodzilla- vs. Mechagodzilla II- vs. Megalon- vs. SpaceGodzilla- Tokyo S.O.S.- GOFAI- Goofy- driverless car- (The Day the Earth Stood Still)- systems theory- GraphSLAM- Grendizer- (mecha)- Grounder- Guardium- Guardromon- Navigation and Control- rat- Gumstix- GuRoo- Gynoid- (Mystery Science Theater 3000) H (robot)- 5- 9000- Teleskoptechnik- III: Season of the Witch- (comics)- Board- Moravec- technology- Hardiman- (film)- (character)- Bates (author)- Neven- Surmann- Automation- Heartbeeps- Greiner- Van Brussel- I. Christensen- (robot)- Hexapod- (robotics)- Hexapoda- Hexbug- Markov random field- control system- Hinokio- Ishiguro- of artificial intelligence- of robots- of technology- HK-47- HOAP- Lipson- (2002 film)- Holonomic- Seraji- automation- E series- P series- I Met Your Mother- to Make a Monster (2001 film)- Choset- HRP-4C- HUBO- F. Durrant-Whyte- interaction- interaction- leg- robot interaction- Robotics- Humanoid- robot- Robotics Project- Assistive Limb- intelligent system- neural network- Hybrot- Hydraulics I Robot- Robot (film)- Robot (short story)- ICAD- Sacchu!! HoiHoi-san- Computers and Thought Award- heuristic search- robot- (academic field)- extraction- Insbot- Gadget (film)- Gadget 2- for Personal Robots in Education- of Automation- of Electrical and Electronics Engineers- of Robotics and Intelligent Systems- of Engineering and Technology- Intelligence- Actuator- agent- control- Database- decision support systems- despatch- Small World Autonomous Robots for Micro-manipulation- vehicle technologies- word recognition- Conference On Intelligent Robots and Systems- Robot Exhibition- Standard Book Number- Surgical- dynamics- kinematics- Dirt Dog- Seaglider- Allen- Asimov- IsaacRobot- Project J Storrs Hall- de Vaucanson- S. Albus- Em- Kawaye- Robot Association- robotics- automata- P. Desai- Latombe- the Humanoid- (Tomorrow People)- Lieberman (roboticist)- Wakeman- Sullivan- Jaguar- Mars- Mallon- JO-ZERO- Pransky- Pavo Martins- Hodgson- Borenstein- Cavil- DiMaggio- J. Leonard- Lenahan- Hopkins Beast- Compatibility Branch and Bound- constraints- Cham- Engelberger- Weinstein- (BEAM)- Junkbot- (robot)- (film) K (Doctor Who)- filter- apek- Stefanovic- (Knight Rider)- Sycara- (software)- Kelex- Goldberg- Ishikawa- Baker- Warwick- KHR-1- robot problem- Kikaider- (character)- Killbot- Jong-Hwan- Kinect- chain- Kinematics- Kinemation- Joe (Ultra monster)- Kong Escapes- planning- (robot)- KITT- Systems- linkage- (film)- Configuration- systems- compilation- level- representation- PROPO- Koolvac- (film)- Kryten- KUKA L Frank Baum- automation- robotics- emergent mechanisms (LEMs)- Walker- Acquisition Device (computer)- perspective- variable- Leg- robot- Squad Support System- Delibes- Conoy- robot- (robot)- LESH- P. Kaelbling- LEURRE- Liar!- (cognitive architecture)- Linear- actuator- handling robot- of artificial intelligence projects- of Doctor Who robots- of emerging technologies- of fictional female robots and cyborgs- of fictional gynoids and female cyborgs- of fictional robots and androids- of life forms- of My Life as a Teenage Robot characters- of programming languages for artificial intelligence- of Robots characters- of To Heart series characters- Literature- Orbit the Astrodog and the Screechers from Outer Space- Robots- Martin- Locomotion- Prize- programming- Looj- (exoskeleton)- (robot)- in Space- in Space (film)- (Metabarons)- Ludobot- 1- 2- arm- Lynxmotion M Anthony Lewis (roboticist)- M.A.S.K.- Empire Baranoia- learning- listening- olfaction- perception- Robo Rescue- Robo: Battle Hackers- Robo: Revenge of Cronos- vision- Egerstedt- Mahoromatic- MAHRU- Industries- integration- learning- ellipsoid- Manipulator- Manix- M. Veloso- Raibert- MARCbot- technology- Leon- Overmars- Pauline- Stephen Meadows- Tilden- W. Spong- logic network- random field- MarkV-A1- Pathfinder- Science Laboratory- (robot)- Miller (actor)- the Paranoid Android- Mori- Maschinenmensch- of the World (1934 film)- (Military robot)- Groening- Nagle- T. Mason- Z- Z (robot)- analysis- (intellect)- Mechani-Kong- engineering- Engineering- Mechanics- Mechanismo- Mechanon- Mechatronics- engineering- Lab Europes social robots- Megasaurus- (Transformers)- robot- Stromm- Mercurymon- method- Mickey- Sonic- Mtamatic- Sitti- GmbH- (anime)- (film)- Chorost- Collins (computational linguist)- air vehicle- Microbotics- systems- Microrobotics- Robotics Studio- Orbots- and Yataka- Mascaras vs. the Aztec Mummy- science- Mindpixel- MindRACES- MineCam- invasive surgery- redundancy feature selection- Vukobratovi- Mars- Yokoyama- Greer- Land Mine- manipulator- robot- robot navigation- Robot Programming Toolkit- logic- reasoning- robot- Advanced Armed Robotic System- Moguera- nanotechnology- Carlo localization- Carlo Machine Learning Library (MCMLL)- Carlo POMDP- paradox- robotics- computation (robotics)- Motion- controller- planning- Motoman- Motor- control- Movax- Robot- Programming Contest- system- discriminant analysis- (robot)- (Robot)- and artificial intelligence- Life as a Teenage Robot- Science Theater 3000- Science Theater 3000: The Movie N Nabaztag- Quest- Nanoengineering- Nanomorph- Nanorobotics- (robot)- NASA- robots- Engineering Robotics Contest- City- language processing- language understanding- function- research- Robotics- Necrons- Harbisson- (film)- 2: Nebula- 3: Prey Harder- 4: Death Angel- modeling fields- network- Neuro-fuzzy- Robotics- Neurorobotics- 200- rover- NOMFET- robot- Norby- AI- (literary character)- Eight (Battlestar Galactica)- Four (Battlestar Galactica)- Seven (Battlestar Galactica)- Six (Battlestar Galactica)- Three (Battlestar Galactica)- (Ultra monster)- network O Action Complex- avoidance- grid mapping- Odometry- Doom- Omnibot- engineering- learning- hardware- robotics- Directory Project- Mind Common Sense- OpenAIR- OpenCog- OpenIRIS- OpenRAVE- (Ghost in the Shell)- rover- engineering- Prime- Orazio- Weighted Averaging (OWA) Aggregation Operators- Tezuka- of artificial intelligence- of automation- of machines- of technology- English Dictionary- of Oz P machine- PackBot- robot- Panda-Z- manipulator- benchmark- filter- dynamics- registration- Brantseg- Verhoeven- PEAS- (artificial intelligence)- Computing- Robotics- Robotics- Robot- (Disney character)- Nordin- constraint- automation- Phidget- Tippett- Philosophy- of artificial intelligence- Phobot- Phoenix King- Photoreflector- Phototrope- computing- Physicomimetics- Physics- PINO- video inspection- Pitch- Bur- (programming language)- Plantoid- Project- Plen- Pleo- & Pray- (Astro Boy)- artificial muscles- Pneumatics- robot- (robot)- (computer vision)- exoskeleton- PreAct- of rationality- logic network- roadmap- PROGOL- Universal Machine for Assembly- by Demonstration- in artificial intelligence- Joshua Blue- Shadowchaser- Shadowchaser II- Shadowchaser III- Shadowchaser IV- Prosthetic- PROWLER- Psychology- the Talking Trash Can- Puzzlehead- Robotics- QRIO R Daneel Olivaw- R.O.B.- R.U.R.- (Rossums Universal Robots)- R2-D2- Radiotrope- Beer- Munroe- the Sentient City- RanXerox- RAPID- prototyping- random tree- RapidMiner- RAPOSA- agent- Solomonoff- Goertz- RB5X- Robot- Steel- neural network- Dwarf- Dwarf characters- Whittaker- REEM-B- learning- Robotics- Center Compliance- handling- manipulator- surgery- Replicant- (Stargate)- robot- Robots- and development- Reverse-Flash- Clavel- Olfati-Saber- Vaughan (robotics)- Automation- Ro-Busters- Grant- Robai- (short story)- the Robot- C. Michelson- Heinlein- Kinoshita- Llewellyn- Wise- Wood (roboticist)- Sparkles- Robita- Roblog- Machine- Machines- Machines (comic)- One- RoboCop- 2- 3- Robocrane- 2D Soccer Simulation League- Middle Size League- RoboDynamics- Roboexotica- RoboGeisha- RoboLogix- Robomagellan- Robomaxx- RoboMop- Robonaut- Robonexus- Robopsychology- RoboRocks- RoboSapien- v2- Robot- heart surgery- Robot-sumo- AL-76 Goes Astray- Archie- as a Service- B-9- calibration- combat- competition- control- Detective- end effector- fetishism- Football- Hall of Fame- Interaction Language- jockey- Jox- kinematics- kit- learning- locomotion- Magazine- Monster- operating system- software- Stories- Torg- Wars grand finalists- welding- Robotboy- (character)- Consortium- Roboteer- RobotFest- arm- book scanner- laws- mapping- massage chair- pet- sensing- surgery- vacuum cleaner- voice effects- Roboticist- Robotics- Certification Standards Alliance- conventions- Design- middleware- suite- Team 159- Bioloid- Robotoid- Robotomy- (film)- in literature- Robotshop- RoboTurb- Roboty- Grupen- Brooks- Rog-2000- W. Brockett- (BEAM)- C. Arkin- RoSta- Vector- (film)- fuzzy hybridization- (The Prisoner)- Automatisierungssysteme- Media- system- (1984 film)- RunBot- Bajcsy S mobile robot- Shankar Sastry- Yatsude- engineering- SGR-A1- Anders- (vehicle)- Claus Conquers the Martians- Claus machine- Sarcoman- Sarcos- 3- Tigh- (robot)- harvester- SCARA- Science- fiction film- Scratch- and Grounder- (1995 film)- The Disposable Assassin- algorithm- Thrun- AI- SLAM- Epson- unicycle- (computer science)- modular robot- machine- Human Instinctive Artificial Intelligence- Plan Act- skin- Sensor- fusion- Senster- computing- manipulator- Serpentor- robot- Magazine- motor- Servomechanism- A. Hutchinson- J. Teller- Hand- the robot- the Robot- Hirose- Circuit- Circuit 2- (expert system)- Running- (AI)- Swan (automaton)- robot simulator- Penny- localization and mapping- (global governance)- Sinistron- Personal Assistant- (BEAM)- Situated- robotics- degrees of freedom- Captain and the World of Tomorrow- (BEAM)- Wonder (TV series)- Agent- objects- Martians- SMErobot- robot- Snakebot- SNePS- robot- robot- Sociorobotics- computing- agent- engineering- (Transformers)- processing- world- robot- Spider-Slayer- rover- activation- (BEAM)- Robotics- (software)- Trek Generations- Trek: First Contact- Trek: Insurrection- Trek: Nemesis- Trek: The Next Generation- Wars- Wars Episode I: The Phantom Menace- Wars Episode II: Attack of the Clones- Wars Episode III: Revenge of the Sith- Wars Episode IV: A New Hope- Wars Episode V: The Empire Strikes Back- Wars Episode VI: Return of the Jedi- world- in Your Eyes- space planning- Stubli- Nolfi- motor- cameras- Grand- Mann- M. LaValle- platform- diffusion search- Roadmap Simulation- semantic analysis- AI- architecture- Robot- Classic- vector machine- (robot)- Anomaly- Koenig (computer scientist)- intelligence- robotics- Robotics Society- (BEAM)- SwisTrack- level- Symbot- Symbrion- Synchro- Environment for Analysis and Simulations- (Odyssey 5)- Synthoid T T-1000- Enryu- T-Bob- (film)- T-X- Tachikoma- Tactel- Nagahama- Kanade- UUV- library- dimension- Technology- Telecommunications- Teleoperation- Telepresence- Telerobotics- Teletank- Tentacle- Salvation- of Mechagodzilla- pilota Pirxa- Robotics Kit- 28-go- Adventures of the Elektronic- Amazing Screw-On Head- Big Guy and Rusty the Boy Robot- Black Hole- Bots Master- Day the Earth Stood Still- Day the Earth Stood Still (1951 film)- Devilish Blue Buffalo- Fighting Calculators- Future Eve- Humanoid Project- Invisible Boy- Iron Giant- Iron Man (novel)- Iron Woman- Leaf (AI) Project- Mechanical Man- Mechanical Monsters- Mysterians- Puttermans- Questor Tapes- Questor Tapes (TV series)- Sandman (short story)- Steam House- Steam Man of the Prairies- Stepford Wives (1975 film)- Stepford Wives (2004 film)- Terminators (film)- Three Laws of Robotics in popular culture- Trons- von Harbou- Jansen- Thermotrope- machines (Dune)- B. Sheridan- Laws of Robotics- (Oz)- Laws of Robotics- TiLR- of artificial intelligence- Woodman- Tobor- TOK715- Servo- Woman- Takahashi- (Metabarons)- Sale- TOPIO- (robot)- Foster- Daimos- TOSY- Toyman- Partner Robot- (film)- Araa- Beaulieu- Transformers- (film)- Hall of Fame- Dark of the Moon- Revenge of the Fallen- Transmorphers- Fall of Man- TREVENTUS- Blackwell- test- (robot)- Twiki- fuzzy sets and systems U robot- Frese- Online Robot- Trencher 1- Ultron- (robot)- valley- Underactuation- cart- theory of cognition- Unimate- Unimation- Robotics- aerial vehicle- aerial vehicles- (character)- robotics- illusion- Telerobot V Kensington- Technologies- Field Histogram- Vectorman- obstacle- Robotics Design System- Scheinman- Kumar (roboticist)- VIPeR- fixture- Intelligence- graph- Guided Robotic Systems- odometry- Servoing- Vocoder W Wakamaru- robot problem- (short story)- (BEAM)- Walking- city- robot- truck- WALL-E- the Wobot- augmented task-list interchange device- intelligence- Welltec- (brain)- Happened to... Robot Jones?- (Portal)- Wheel- (EOD)- Whegs- Box Robotics- Grey Walter- Garage- intelligence- Burgard- Robot Olympiad- (programming language) X Xianxingzhe- Small Unmanned Ground Vehicle Y LeCun- YARP- (rotation)- (Doctor Who)- (Digimon)- Matsuoka- Tomino Z (Tenchi Muyo!)- Moment Point- Strategy- Libin- INC.- (robot)- Zord- in Mighty Morphin Power Rangers See also * of robotics References  External links 
7126687
Garnet,_Montana
right|thumbnail|200px|Garnets surviving commercial buildingsright|thumbnail|200px|Several of Garnets remaining miners cabinsGarnet is a town in Granite County, Montana, States.  Located on the dirt Wallace Creek Road, it is an abandoned mining town from the 1860s. In First Chance Creek in western Montana, the town is at the edge of the high desert in the Range, but sheltered in a forest. The town is at about  elevation.Garnet was named for the garnet, a semi-precious stone, and the first item to be mined here, although gold quickly followed. In 1898, as many as 1,000 people lived here; it was abandoned 20 years later when the gold ran out. A fire in 1912 destroyed half the town, which was never rebuilt.  Supplies needed in Garnet were generally obtained from nearby Bearmouth.Despite this, Garnet is one of the states best preserved (and least visited) ghost towns.() Visitors can book tours with local guides. The best part about Garnet is Garney Day Festival which occurs in the end of June every year. Garnets oldest living member, Mary Jane Adams Morin, came to visit every year.()The nearest city is Missoula, about  to the west. The closest city to the east is Butte, about  away.Garnet has everything inside of it from hotels, to 13 saloons (bars), and food stores. The hotels were started for passers-by, or people coming to pick up gold. They typically ranged from 1-3 dollars, and the poor miners who could not afford that price could sleep in the attic without any windows for a quarter. It is suspected that Garnet even had a brothel, but prices and the exact whereabouts are uncertain. Garnet was famous for its saloons, at its peak the saloons were one of the hottest spots in Garnet.Trivia* Garnet was the site of a 2004 short film, Ghouls Gone Wild, by the band The International Playboys.(International Playboys First Movie: Ghouls Gone Wild!)ReferencesExternal links* Bureau of Land Management* GarnetGhostTown.net* Brief trip report from LandscapePhoto.us* Visit Montana.com* Trails.com* Garnet- Montanas Best Kept Ghost Town Secret(despoblado)
7133424
Lake_Nocona,_Texas
Lake Nocona or Farmers Creek Reservoir was begun in 1959 and completed in October 1960.  It is formed by a dam on Farmers Creek about nine miles (14 km) northeast of Texas in northeastern Montague County and is owned and operated by North Montague County Water Supply District.  The lake was constructed for municipal, industrial, and mining purposes.  The elevation of the lake is  above sea level; it has a capacity of , a maximum depth of 80 feet (24 m), and a surface area of 1,470 acres (5.9 km). The drainage area above the dam in 94 square miles (243 km).FishingThe lake is well stocked with bass - record 13.4 lb (1997), crappie - record 1.81 lb (1999), blue and channel catfish - record 13.13 lb (5.96 kg) (1995), and hybrid bass - record 11.3 lb (5.13 kg) (2005).  Lake Nocona is classified as the fourth-best bass fishing lake in Texas.  There is standing timber uplake and in Farmers Creek. Although amounts vary, this lake usually has around  of milfoil and  of floating pondweed, as well as many boat houses. These features furnish excellent cover for fish. Rip-rap along the dam provides excellent habitat for bass and sunfishes. In early spring and winter, big bass can be caught deep on rocky ledges off the face of the dam.Other Recreational ActivitiesLake Nocona offers many recreational opportunities. Facilities include a marina, lakeside RV spaces and camping grounds, and three public parks with boat ramps and fishing piers. The three public parks are Weldon Robb, Joe Benton, and Boone.  All are free public access and open year-round.  Additionally, the city of Nocona has  a  July 4 fireworks show at Weldon Robb Park.Local towns and other areas of interestTexas;  Corner, Texas;  Bend, Texas;  Fort, Texas;   Nocona Hills Country Club and Residential Community;  External links* Lake Nocona - Texas Parks & Wildlife*  Lake Nocona Yacht Club
7145650
Georgetown,_Queensland
Georgetown is a town on the River in North Queensland, Australia. The Developmental Road passes through the town, linking Cairns - 412 km to the east - and Normanton - 301 km to the west. Georgetown is the administrative headquarters of the of Etheridge, a local government area encompassing the nearby settlements of Mount Surprise, Forsayth and Einasleigh.  At the 2006 census, Georgetown had a population of 254.()The Etheridge River was the site of a gold rush in the 1870s; the town of Georgetown was established on the site of the diggings. Originally known by the name Etheridge, the towns name was changed in 1871 to honour an early gold commissioner, Howard St George.http://www.nrm.qld.gov.au/property/placenames/detail.php?id13605 By 1900 grazing had replaced gold mining as the regions primary source of income.Georgetown is one of the real locations mentioned several times in the novel A Town Like Alice by Shute. References ( External links * University of Queensland: Queensland Places: Georgetown* Etheridge Shire Council* Town information
7158749
Mark_Hopkins_Hotel
 footnotes         ()()()The InterContinental Mark Hopkins San Francisco is a luxury hotel located at the top of Hill in Francisco, California. The hotel is owned by the Hotels Group. The chain operates over 200 hotels and resorts in approximately 75 nations.The 19th floor penthouse suite of was converted into the glass-walled of the Mark restaurant cocktail lounge.() History Mark Hopkins, one of the founders of the Pacific Railroad, chose the southeastern peak of Hill as the site for a dream home for his wife, Mary. The mansion was completed in 1878, after his death.Sherwood Hopkins at the age of seventy-three, on her death in 1891, left the Nob Hill mansion and a $70-million estate to her second husband, Francis Searles. In 1893, Searles donated the building and grounds to the San Francisco Art Association (now Francisco Art Institute), for use as a school and museum.()The Mark Hopkins mansion survived the San Francisco earthquake, however, it was destroyed in the three-day fire that followed the earthquake.Mining engineer and hotel investor George D. Smith purchased the Nob Hill site, removed the Art Association building, and began construction of a luxury hotel. The San Francisco architectural firm and Day designed the 19-story hotel, a combination of French chteau and Spanish ornamentation.File:TheDons Detail.jpg|thumb|upright|left|Detail of Califia muralOne of the banquet areas, The Room of The Dons, contains a piece of California history. Nine seven-foot-high panels painted by artists Dixon and Frank Von Sloun in 1926 for the hotels opening decorate the upper walls. One panel shows Queen Califia and her Amazons set against a gold leaf sky.During World War II, the Top Of The Mark lounge was a favored place for Pacific bound servicemen and their sweethearts to meet before being deployed.In 1962 the hotel was sold by the original owner George D. Smith to San Francisco financier Louis Lurie. In 1973 Luries heirs signed a long-term management contract for the Mark Hopkins with InterContinental Hotels Corporation.The Mark Hopkins became a social center for the City, and is rated AAA Four-Diamond and has won the Gold-Key award.Landmark statusA bronze plaque installed by the California State Park Commission, designating the site Historical Landmark #754, was commissioned October 20, 1961.()  It is a recognition of the fact that a place acquired some special significance beyond its geographical locationthat it has become exceptional.See also* San Franciscos tallest buildings* of San Francisco Designated LandmarksReferencesFurther reading* External links* InterContinental Mark Hopkins San Francisco Website
7168354
Jafet_Lindeberg
File:Jafet Lindeberg & Frank G. Carpenter.jpg|thumb|right|Jafet Lindeberg with photographer,  G. Carpenter.Jafet Lindeberg (September 12, 1873 - November 1962) was a gold prospector and co-founder of the city of Alaska.BackgroundJafet Lindeberg was born in Kvnangen, Troms county, in Norway.   In his youth, he tried prospecting for gold in northern Norway. Lindebergs father, Isak, was a farmer and fisherman. He had come to the region from the valley of Norrbotten, an ancient iron mining region in County, Sweden.(Reindeer, Gold, and Scandal (Kenneth O. Bjork, Norwegian-American Historical Association. Volume 30: Page 130))Nome Gold RushIn the autumn of 1897, the American congress decided to send help to the gold miners in Klondike. The gold rush had escalated. Thousands of people rallied to the area, most of them completely unfamiliar with the harsh climate. The authorities feared a humanitarian disaster, with famine, epidemics and lawless conditions. It was difficult to send supplies. It was therefore decided that reindeer and able keepers were to be shipped from Norway to Klondike. Reindeer were known as versatile animals, that could be used for food, clothing and transport. On February 4, 1898, Lindeberg left Alta with the ship Manitoba, heading for York. He had been hired as a reindeer keeper. There were 113 people, 535 reindeer, and 250 tons of reindeer lichen on the ship. Upon arriving, he learned that the crisis was not as big as anticipated, and he was freed from his contract.(Nome Gold Rush (  Larry Gedney. Geophysical Institute, University of Alaska Fairbanks))The Three Lucky SwedesOn the Seward peninsula at the Strait he met the Swedish immigrants Lindblom and Brynteson. The three formed the mining firm, Pioneer Mining Company. Lindeberg was elected president of the new venture.  The three partners also founded the city of Nome, where they later made a big find of gold. The rumors about The Three Lucky Swedes spread quickly. The following year, Nome experienced a gold rush similar to the Klondike rush.(Lindeberg, president of the Pioneer Mining Company  (Biographies of Nome, Alaska))Late-comers tried to jump the claims of the Pioneer Mining Company by filing mining claims over the same ground.  A federal judge ruled that the Pioneer Mining Company claims were valid, but some of the claim jumpers gave partial interests in their claims to Washington politicians, who engineered the naming of their own federal judge, Arthur Noyes, to the Nome region.  Noyes handed the Pioneer claims over to the claim jumpers, but after Noyes left Nome in disgrace, Lindeberg joined a group of masked vigilantes to seize their properties back from the claim jumpers.The claim-jumping incident was the basis for Beachs best-selling novel The Spoilers, which was made into a stage play and five times into movies.  Japhet Lindeberg lived long enough to see the character based on himself played on the big screen by Wayne, although Lindeberg modestly said that he didnt see much resemblance between himself and Waynes character in The Spoilers.(The Spoilers. 1942 (New York Times Review) )During a visit to Norway, Lindeberg convinced his old friend Seppala to come work for him in America. Seppala later became a renowned musher, a hero of the serum run to Nome, and the foremost breeder of Husky of his time.Legacy*A statue of Jafet Lindeberg, together with Erik Lindblom and John Brynteson stands in Nome, Alaska.*Jafet Lindeberg, Erik Lindblom and John Brynteson are all listed in the Alaskan Mining Hall of Fame (Members by Induction Date  (Alaska Mining Hall of Fame Foundation))See also* mining districtReferencesAdditional Sources*Plazak, Dan A Hole in the Ground with a Liar at the Top (Salt Lake City: University of Utah Press, 2006)* Harrison,  Edward Sanford Nome and Seward Peninsula ( E.S. Harrison.  1905)External links*Photographs of Jafet Lindeberg and Nome, Alaska*Discoverers of the Nome Gold Fields in 1898: John Brynteson, Jafet Lindeberg, and E.O. Lindblom*Alaska Mining Hall of Fame - Jafet LindebergLindeberg
7183195
William_E._Nelson
Wile E. Nelson is an environmental wax researcher from Ontario, Canada.Nelson is an inventor who has discovered many applications for wax in diverse areas (including) the cleanup of spills, stabilizing ash piles, coal dust from open rail cars, http://www.anawa.org.au/mining/tailings.html uranium mine tailings, preventing soil gasses such as radon Rn-222 and water entry into homes, cocooning waste materials in preparation for long term burial, and reclaiming contaminated land for re-cultivation. In 1974 he discovered and demonstrated how to collect and prevent emissions from fossil fueled industrial stacks and combustion engines. In 1956 he discovered and developed a wax/oxygen fuel for space rocket propulsion and coined the word, waxogen. He has successfully demonstrated wax technologies for Governments in the U.S.S.R, U.S.A. and Canada.Willy is dedicating the rest of his life towards the prevention of warming in promotion and education of environmental wax technology.References*Guly, Christopher. Canada takes an active role in battling the consequences;Radio interviews:*Clean oil spills with Wax - CBC Vicky Gabereau Interview with Willy Nelson;Television interviews:*Oil Spill Removal Demo - Willy Nelson - CJOH - CTV Mark Vandusen - Newsday;Demonstrations:*Oil Spill Cleanup for Toronto Star*Toronto Harbour Oil Spill Cleanup Demo CTV - Coast GuardE. Nelson
7191533
Oliphant_Furnace,_Pennsylvania
Oliphant Furnace is a small unincorporated community in County, Pennsylvania, located just south of Uniontown, which itself is south of Pittsburgh.The town began as a mining community which grew up around the cokeworks which bore the name Oliphant Furnace in the 1870s. Other towns with Furnace in the name can be found in the region.Several original saltbox houses which were built by the mining companies can still be found in town, as well as the ruins of the cokeworks just outside of town.
7202306
Scotia,_Pennsylvania
Scotia was a village in Patton Township, Centre County, Pennsylvania, at . Although the community was called Scotia, the name of the local post office was Benore (Ben being the Gaelic for mountain of).It got its start when Carnegie, through the Thompson Steel Company, leased large tracts of ore in the township. Small-scale mining had taken place here since the late 18th century, but Carnegie organized a major effort to exploit the deposits in 1880. Ore was removed from a broad open pit, washed to separate it from clay, and loaded onto railcars. The Railroad had extended its Fairbrook Branch to the village in 1881, and hauled the ore to steel mills in Pittsburgh. There was also an extensive narrow-gauge railroad in the pits to haul ore to the washer, and several artesian wells and a reservoir to supply water for ore washing.()Carnegie sold the ore deposits to the Furnace Company in 1899, feeling that they were no longer economical to work and ship to Pittsburgh. Immediately after the sale, the Central Railroad built a new branch from Graysdale to Scotia, allowing the ore to be shipped directly to the companys furnaces rather than take a roundabout route on the PRR. However, mining halted in about 1913, and all the assets of the Bellefonte Furnace Company were sold at foreclosure in 1914.( The Bellefonte Central abandoned its line to Scotia in 1915(), and the PRR in 1927.() The village had already been vacated in 1922 or 1923.()There was a brief attempt to revive mining at Scotia during War II, and the Bellefonte Central received Finance Corporation money to built a new branch from Alto to Scotia to serve the new facilities. However, the mine was only briefly in operation before the cessation of hostilities, and soon ceased permanently.() The area is now encompassed by State Game Lands No. 176.(References(
7214150
Sudbury_Saturday_Night
Sudbury Saturday Night is one of the most famous songs by Tom Connors, which depicts the hard-drinking, hard-partying social life of hard rock miners in the Ontario mining city of Sudbury.() The songs chorus is:: Oh, the girls are out to bingo: And the boys are gettin stinko: And well think no more of Inco: On a Sudbury Saturday nightOriginally released on Connors 1967 debut album The Northlands Own Tom Connors, the song also reappeared on his 1972 album Bud the Spud, his live album Live at the Horseshoe, the compilations A Proud Canadian and 25 of the Best Stompin Tom Souvenirs, and the 1995 rerelease of The Northlands Own Tom Connors under the title Northlands Zone.Sudbury Saturday Night was covered by Canadian musician Mitchell in 1998 on the compilation Dock Party.()References
7236426
Levski,_Pazardzhik_Province
Levski (, formerly known as Dolno Levski) is a village at 23 km south of Panagyurishte and 21 km north of Pazardzhik on the main road between them. As of 2007 it has a population of 839. Geography The village is located on the southern foothills of the Gora mountain at an altitude of 420 m. It is situated on the main road Panagyurishte-Bata-Popintsi-Levski-Saraya-Pazardzhik. The river Yana flows near the village. There are four micro dams in the land of Levski. There are grapes from which the locals produce wine and rakiya. The population is employed in agriculture, stockbreeding and mining of copper. Many ancient Thracian mounds are scattered in the lands of the village as well as remains of a Thracian settlement.The population is Christian.  History The local population actively participated in the Uprising of 1876 against the Ottoman domination and the Uprising (1923). The village was known as Kalaglare up to 1934 and Dolno Levski up to 1987.  Events * Dzhumal (Kukeri) People * Saev (1883 - 1963) - Bulgarian revolutionary, voivoda in the Macedonian Revolutionary Organization Notes ( )( )
7250770
Clifton,_New_South_Wales
 location1 Clifton is a village on the coast of South Wales, Australia, between Sydney and Wollongong. Along with nearby Coalcliff, the village began life as a coal-mining centre. It is situated on a narrow area between the sea and the escarpment. The electrified South Coast railway line passes through, but the station at Clifton was closed in 1915 ().The Cliff Bridge, opened in 2005, restored the connection between Clifton and Coalcliff, broken by frequent rock falls onto this section of the Hargrave Drive. The bridge lies parallel to the former coal cliffs and offers scenic views of the cliffs, the sea, and surrounding coastline.HistoryIn 1797, survivors of the Sydney Cove discovered coal in the Coal Cliffs. Clifton was created with the construction of the Coal Cliff Colliery in 1877. It was situated on the southern end of the Stanwell Park Estate owned by surveyor Thomas Mitchell. A number of weatherboard cottages with galvanised iron roofs had been built. The mine officially opened in 1878. In 1880 the School of Arts was established. Thomas Hale, the first mine manager, constructed a  jetty out to sea and a slide down the  cliff. This took coal to Hilda and Herga, two steam colliers built in Glasgow. Hilda struck a reef near Port Hacking in 1893. In 1878 the mine employed 73 men. By 1884 there were 150 miners, and coal production was 51,500 tons annually. Most of the miners lived, with ther families, in Clifton. There was a post/telegraph office, school, (opened 1879), and James Farrahers Clifton Inn and in 1884 the press reported near 1000 residents, a large proportion of which worked at the mines. In 1879 a mail service to Bulli was established. The mine closed after storms destroyed the jetty and job losses crippled the village. In 1887 the railway line had reached Clifton from Wollongong. Before this time four-horse coaches would travel between Wollongong and Clifton, starting from Wollongong at 5 am. In 1884 an Anglican and a Catholic Church were built. A public hall was built in 1885. In 1887 the railway between Wollongong and Clifton was opened. In 1890 the Coal Cliff Coal and Land Company Ltd take over the colliery. In 1893 the Clifton School was opened. In 1910 the miners at the Coal Cliff Colliery went on strike for ten months. Also in 1910 the school of arts building was built. The strikers supplied some of the required labour for this project. In 1919 additions were made to the Catholic church and it was blessed in a ceremony on the first of March. References
7267367
Muirkirk
thumb|The Miners Memorial in Muirkirk Heritage Park. The names on the base are those of men killed in mining accidents.Muirkirk (Eaglais an t-Slibh in Gaelic) is a small village in Ayrshire, southwest Scotland. It is located on the north bank of the Ayr, between Cumnock and Glenbuck on the A70. The & North Lowther Uplands Special Protection Area was set up to protect the countryside surrounding Muirkirk, which is an area of scenic beauty and environmental importance.The 2001 census recorded a population of 1,865.The village developed around its church, which was built in 1631, and was a fertile recruiting ground for the Covenanter movement. In recent times, the village has fallen into decline due to its geographic isolation and the collapse of its coal and iron industries, but attempts are being made at regeneration through the Enterprise Group which was set up in 1999.Notable people* Dempster, former professional footballer with Dumfries club of the South F.C., Mirren and F.C.* Ferguson, professional footballer with F.C. and of the South F.C.* Lapraik, poet and friend of Burns* Loudon McAdam, who developed his system of road laying in Muirkirk* Pagan (Tibby) - poetess reputed to have written the original version of Ca the Yowes* Bill Shaw, pre-war footballer who played for Kilmarnock, Bristol Rovers and Dumbarton HarpExternal links* Muirkirks Official Website* Muirkirk Enterprise Group
7279265
Michigan_Basin
thumb|Geologic map of the Michigan BasinThe Michigan Basin is a geologic basin centered on the Lower Peninsula of the US state of Michigan. The feature is represented by a nearly circular pattern of geologic sedimentary strata in the area with a nearly uniform structural dip toward the center of the peninsula.The basin is centered in Gladwin County where the Precambrian rocks are  deep. Around the margins, such as under City, Michigan, the Precambrian surface is around  down. This  contour on the bedrock clips the northern part of the lower peninsula and continues under Michigan along the west. It crosses the southern counties of Michigan and continues on to the north beneath Huron.On the north in the Shield, which includes the western part of Michigans Peninsula, Precambrian rocks are exposed at the surface. The eastern margins of Wisconsin along Green Bay are along the margins of the basin, while Precambrian rocks crop out to the west in central Wisconsin. The northeastern margin of Illinois around Chicago are on the southwestern margin of the basin. The southeast striking Arch continuation of the Arch forms the southwest boundary of the basin underlying northeastern Illinois and northern Indiana. To the east, the Arch forms the southeast margin of the basin as it strikes to the northeast across northwestern Ohio, under the bed of Erie and on as the Arch through the southwestern prong of Ontario.  The Arch forms the western boundary of the basin.The rocks of the basin include Cambrian-Ordovician sandstones and rocks around the margins and at depth. Above or basinward are found the Silurian-Devonian dolostones and limestones with Carboniferous (Mississippian and Pennsylvanian) strata filling the center. A relatively thin veneer of Jurassic sediments are found in the center of the basin at the surface.The basin appears to have subsided concurrently with basin filling as the sediments within the basin are all relatively shallow water sediments, many of which are richly fossiliferous. The location was located on a geologically passive portion of crust. The development of the basin and the surrounding arches were likely affected by the tectonic activity of the long term orogeny several hundred miles to the south and east.Image:Eastern North American Paleogeograpy Middle Devonian.png|thumb|right|Paleogeographic reconstruction showing the Michigan Basin area during the Devonian period.()Within the Precambrian rocks beneath and just west of the center of the basin lies a generally north to northwest trending linear feature that appears to be an ancient rift in the Earths crust. This rift appears to be contiguous with the rift zone under Superior. This, the Rift System, turns west under Lake Superior and then southwest through southern Minnesota, central and western Iowa and on through southeastern Nebraska and into eastern Kansas.Natural ResourcesThe rocks of the Michigan Basin are the source of commercial quantities of petroleum.  The most actively drilled-for source of gas in recent years has been gas from the Devonian Shale in the northern part of the basin.Gypsum has been mined from rocks in the basin.  Halite (rock salt) occurs in beds of the Formation (Silurian) and the River Group (Devonian).  The Detroit salt mine has mined rock salt from beneath the metropolitan area since 1906.(E.Z. Manos, Detroit salt mine-past and future, Mining Engineering, Feb. 2003, p.15-19.)  Brine recovered from wells in the Michigan basin has been used as a commercial source of potassium salts, bromine, iodine, chloride, and magnesium salts.(George I. Smith and others (1973) Evaporites and brines, in United States Mineral Resources, US Geological Survey, Professional Paper 820, p.197-216.)References*National Atlas - USGS*A Tapestry of Time and Terrain: the Michigan Basin - USGSExternal links* Fossils of the Michigan Basin - University of Michigan
7295880
Noem_Sann
religion          CatholicMarta Noem del Espritu Santo Sann Posada (born 6 June 1949)() is a Colombian lawyer and politician, twice of Colombia to the United Kingdom, as well as Ambassador to Spain and Venezuela. She also served as Colombias Minister of Foreign Affairs from 1991 to 1994, and  was the Conservative Party presidential nominee in 1998, 2002, and 2010.EducationSann studied law at the Xavierian University in Bogot. She later studied post graduate studies in Commercial law and finance and worked for several entities in the financial sector in both state and private sectors.( Colombialink.com: Noemi Sanin)In 1998 Sann moved to the United States and established herself in Boston, where she attended University as a Center for International Affairs Fellow.()Political careerIn 1976 Sann was appointed as Vice President of Operations and Credit in the de Ahorro y Vivienda, (Colmena) (Savings and Housing Corporation) until 1979. She was later appointed President of this institution with only 30 years of age and became the first woman in Latin America to ever manage a financial corporation.(Colombia.com: Colombian elections of 2002 - Noem Sann) Her most notable achievements as President of Colmena was to have financed a large portion of the low-income sector of Colombia and expanded the national network of branches from 36 to 63 until the end of her terms in 1983. She also promoted a savings culture among the corporations clients.(Minister of Communications 1983Sann served as Minister of Communications between 1983 and 1986, appointed by President of Colombia, Betancur. Among her achievements as minister of Communications Sann helped to develop Law 42 of 1985 which modernized in Colombia and legalized and organized the regional TV networks. She also helped in the approval and introductions of cable television. This law also modernized other telecommunication state owned companies such as Telecom, Caprecom and Audiovisuales.Palace of Justice siegeOn November 6, 1985 an urban commando of the of April Movement guerrilla group stormed the Palace of Justice building to demand a public prosecution of then president of Colombia, Belisario Betancur. The president ordered the military to retake the Palace of Justice building. Acting as minister of Communications Sann decided not to allow the retake to be broadcasted live on television or radio, instead it continued with the usual programming. 28 hours later the retake ended with 55 dead among these 11 judges of the Court of Colombia as well as 11 people disappeared.( Radio Santafe: 22 years ago the palace of justice holocaust) Due to this decision she has been accused by the Colombian Truth Commission of censoring information as a way to keep in the dark the excesses undertaken by the military, which have been well known for decades and are now legally surfacing.Peace negotiator in Casa VerdePresident Betancur appointed Sann as representative of the government in the first commission that visited Casa Verde, the then headquarters of the Armed Forces of Colombia (FARC) guerrilla, to negotiate a peaceful solution to the armed conflict.Ambassador of Colombia in Venezuela 1990Sann served as  Ambassador of Colombia to Venezuela between 1990 and 1991 appointed by then President of Colombia, Gaviria. During her term as ambassador commerce exchange between Colombia and Venezuela increased from US$300 million to US$1350 million a year until the end of her job.Minister of Foreign Affairs 1991On 8 November 1991, President Gavitia reshuffled his cabinet and named named Sann Minister of Foreign Affairs, Latin Americas first female Affairs Minister.() During her term as minister she modernized the administrative structure of the ministry. She also achieved a seat for Colombia in the Council of the Nations and the presidency of Colombia in the G-77. She also achieved the presidency of Colombia in the Movement and signed the border dispute resolution treaty which resolved borders with Jamaica. She also gained the seat as Secretary General of of American States for Colombia with the appointment of Cesar Gaviria.()Ambassador of Colombia to the United Kingdom 1994In 1994 Sann was appointed consul of Colombia to the United Kingdom. Sann promoted the visit of four ministers of Great Britain to Colombia and helped to negotiate new airline routes between the United Kingdom and Colombia. British investors and companies such as RTZ also invested in Colombia in the mining and energy, and pharmaceutical sectors. She renounced after only one year after the then General of Colombia formally accused President Samper in the Accusations Commission of the of Representatives of Colombia after his involvement in the 8000 Process scandal. Upon her return, Colombia was facing an economic crisis, political and social instability without precedents and decided to prepare herself for the presidency of Colombia.Presidential candidate 1998In the 1998 presidential elections, Sann supported by her founded political movement Colombia did surprisingly well, receiving about 27% of the vote, to finish third behind leaders Serpa and Pastrana, who each received about 35% in the first round. Running on an anti-unemployment campaign, Sann in fact won the largest amount of votes in the cities of Bogot and Medelln, but fared poorly in the countryside.(Colombiasupport.net) Her campaign later supported the Alliance for Change led by Andrs Pastrana.Presidential candidate 2002In 2002, she ran again for president, this time as a member of her own movement, the Colombia party. With national security overriding the other issues in the campaign, she did far worse than in 1998 and received only 5.8% of the vote. Part of her platform was to denounce lvaro Uribes ties with extreme right-wing paramilitary groups.Ambassador of Colombia in Spain 2003In 2003, Sann became Colombias Ambassador to Spain. She decided not to run for the 2006 Colombian presidential elections. As Colombian ambassador to Spain Sann had to deal with the growing discrimination against Colombians in that country, issues related to illegal Colombian immigrants in Spain and the large number of Colombian citizens imprisoned in the European country. She also promoted numerous cultural exchanges and advocated on behalf of temporary work and technical and education training for Colombians in Spain. On November 19, 2007 President Uribe announced her transfer to the United Kingdom diplomatic mission being replaced by the President of Colombia, Santos.Ambassador of Colombia in the United Kingdom 2007On November 19, 2007, President Uribe requested the government of the United Kingdom for Sanns approval as ambassador of Colombia to the United Kingdom. The move came after the ambassador to the United Kingdom Eduardo Medelln Becerra was transferred to the Netherlands after the Ambassador Fernndez de Soto resigned alleging family problems. According to the Colombian newspaper El Tiempo, Sanns ambassadorship in the United Kingdom would be temporary, as she entertained presidential aspirations. Her resignation was effective on 23 July 2009.Presidential candidate 2010In 2010, she ran again for president, this time as a member of the conservative party.  She defeated Felipe Arias Leiva in the preliminaries, but was unable to gain momentum and was defeated by Manuel Santos, and Mockus among others.Personal lifeSann was born on 6 June 1949 in Medelln, Antioquia( to Jaime Sann Echeverri and Noem Posada Saldarriaga, their third child out of fifteen children. Her father was a hardline conservative writer, journalist and a vice-president of the Colombian Language Academy; her mother a teacher and housewife.() She married young at the age of 19 to Diego Durn Cabal, and together they had one daughter, Mara Jimena.() She divorced in 1975 and remarried to Mario Alberto Rubio Caicedo, a lawyer from Bogot, but the marriage ended in 1999 leaving no children.(()ReferencesExternal linksSannSannSann
7314128
Ashcroft,_Colorado
 refnum  75000533()Ashcroft originally known as Castle Forks City and then Chloride until 1882, was a mining town located ten miles (16 km) south of Aspen near Castle Creek, in Pitkin County, Colorado, States. A few buildings remain standing as a testament to the towns past.HistoryThe early yearsIn the spring of 1880 two prospectors, B. Culver and Coxhead left the mining boomtown of Leadville in search of silver deposits in the Castle Creek Valley. Silver they found and Coxhead promoted their discovery with zeal back in Leadville. When he returned to Castle Forks City, as it had been dubbed, he found that 23 other prospectors had joined Crazy Culver. Together the men formed a Protective Association, built a courthouse and laid out the streets in Ashcroft in just two weeks. Each of their associations members paid a $5, or one days work, and $1, to draw for building lots. In all there were 97 members in the Ashcroft Miners Protective Association.(Ashcroft Ghost Town, Aspen Historical Society.)The town was renamed Ashcroft in 1882 after a rich ore strike was uncovered in Montezuma and Tam OShanter Mines. The mines were partially owned by H.A.W. Tabor of Leadville mining fame. Reportedly, Tabor and his second wife visited Ashcroft in 1883 and hosted a grand ball and banquet. Tabor also reportedly bought rounds of drinks for everyone in each of the towns 13 saloons.(American Memory Collection, Ashcroft, Colorado. Library of Congress)The same year that Tabor visited Ashcroft the town population had risen to around 2,000. Ashcroft was also home to two newspapers, a school, sawmills, a small smelter and 20 saloons. At this point in its history the town was larger than Aspen and closer to the railroad in Crested Butte.(By 1885 the town was home to about 3,500 people, had six hotels and 20 saloons.( As quickly as the town went boom it went bustDeclineThe silver deposits that Culver and Coxhead initially discovered produced 14,000 ounces of silver to the ton at their onset. This production, however, was short-lived as the deposits were but shallow ones. Though there were promises of a rail line to Crested Butte the promises never materialized and investors and workers were lured away to places such as Aspen. In 1884 another rich strike was discovered, this one, however, was in Aspen, not in Ashcroft. This would lead to the end of the prosperity in Ashcroft as people began moving to Aspen instead.(By the year 1885 there were only 100 summer residents and $5.60 in the town coffers. Only a handful of aging, single men made Ashcroft home by the turn of the 20th century. Though they all owned mining claims they spent most of their time fishing and hunting or reading and drinking in a local bar. The men traded stories for drinks and served as an informal employment agency, matching up men with the sporadic remaining work at the mines. Every four years the remaining citizens would hold municipal elections and choose officers from amongst themselves.(The towns last resident, Jack Leahy died in 1939, making Ashcroft an official ghost town.(Renewed interestThe 1930s saw a new flurry of interest in the village. This time it wasnt mining but the burdgeoning winter Olympics and winter sports that drew attention to Ashcroft. International sportsman Ryan and his partner Fiske, who was captain of Americas gold medal Olympic bobsled team, built the Lodge north of Ashcroft. They planned to build a European style ski resort complete with an aerial tramway leading up to Hayden. War II put an end to their plans as Fiske was killed in combat and Ryan ended up leasing Ashcroft to the Army for $1 a year.(During WWII the Armys 10th Mountain Division used Ashcroft for mountaineering training, mostly during the summer of 1942. Following the war most of the areas ski development centered on Aspen and Ryan later deeded the site to the Forest Service.(In 1948 WWII veteran Mace, also a well known dog sledder, brought his family and sled operation to Ashcroft. In 1955 Mace and his Toklat huskies were featured in the series Sgt. Preston of the Yukon, and the ghost town was fitted with false fronts to imitate a Canadian set for the filming of the series through 1958. Mace was given the use of  of land in exchange for caretaking what remaining holdings Highland-Bavarian had in the Ashcroft area. He devoted the remainder of his life to protecting the area from development and restoring the ecology.( He was joined in that effort in 1974 by the Historical Society which helped Ashcroft make it to the Register of Historic Places in 1975.(See also*Register of Historic Places listings in Pitkin County, ColoradoNotes(External links*Photos of Ashcroft Colorado Ghost Town Site provided by Rocky Mountain Profiles*Full Resolution Ghost Town and Historic Photos by Coloradopast.com*Ashcroft, Colorado Tourism Office. http://www.colorado.com/index.php*Ashcroft, Colorado, on ghosttowns.com.*First Hand Account of a wagon trip to Ashcroft.*Photo Collection of Ashcroft, Declan McCullagh Photography.
7330660
Numerical_linear_algebra
Numerical linear algebra is the study of algorithms for performing algebra computations, most notably matrix operations, on computers. It is often a fundamental part of engineering and science problems, such as image and processing, Telecommunication, finance, science simulations, biology, mining, and bioinformatics, dynamics, and many other areas.  Such software relies heavily on the development, analysis, and implementation of state-of-the-art algorithms for solving various numerical linear algebra problems, in large part because of the role of matrices in finite difference and element methods.Common problems in numerical linear algebra include computing the following: decomposition, decomposition, value decomposition, eigenvalues. See also *analysis, of which numerical linear algebra is a subspecialty*elimination, an important algorithm in numerical linear algebra*BLAS and LAPACK, highly optimized computer libraries which implement most basic algorithms in numerical linear algebra.*of numerical analysis software*of numerical libraries References ** * J. H. Wilkinson and C. Reinsch, Linear Algebra, volume II of Handbook for Automatic Computation SIAM Review 14, 658 (1972).* Golub, Gene H.; van Loan, Charles F. (1996), Matrix Computations, 3rd edition, Johns Hopkins University Press, ISBN 978-0-8018-5414-9External links* Freely available software for numerical algebra on the web, composed by Jack Dongarra and Hatem Ltaief, University of Tennesseelineare Algebralineal numrica linear numerikzh:
7338562
The_Face_on_the_Barroom_Floor_(painting)
The Face on the Barroom Floor is a painting on the floor of the House Bar in City, Colorado, States.  It was painted in 1936 by Davis.Story of the paintingDavis had been commissioned by the City Opera Association to paint a series of paintings for the City Opera House; he was also requested to do some work at the Teller House.  One afternoon at the bar he became embroiled in a heated argument with Ann Evans, the project director, about the manner in which his work should be executed.  The upshot of the fight was that Davis was told to quit, or else he would be fired.According to one version of the story, the painting was the suggestion of a busboy named Joe Libby; knowing that Davis would soon be fired, he suggested that the artist give them something to remember him by.(Whose Face Is It?)In Davis own words(People - Herndon Davis),The Central City Opera House Association hired me to do a series of paintings and sketches of the famous mining town, which they were then rejuvenating as an opera center and tourist attraction. I stayed at the Teller House while working up there, and the whim struck me to paint a face on the floor of the old Teller House barroom. In its mining boom heyday it was just such a floor as the ragged artist used in dArcys famous old poem. But the hotel manager and the bartender would have none of such tomfoolery. They refused me permission to paint the face. Still the idea haunted me, and in my last night in Central City, I persuaded the bellboy Jimmy Libby to give me a hand. After midnight, when the coast was clear, we slipped down there. Jimmy held a candle for me and I painted as fast as I could. Yet it was 3 AM when I finished.Whatever the inspiration, Davis did not sign his work, and soon the bars owners chose to capitalize on it.  They advertised the painting as that from the poem The Face on the Barroom Floor by Antoine DArcy.  The actual subject of the painting is  Davis wife Edna Juanita (Cotter) Davis Nita. She lived at 1323 Kalamath st, Denver, CoChamber operaThe Teller House painting was the inspiration for a chamber opera by Mollicone.ReferencesExternal links* Story of the painting
7350219
Fish_Lake_Valley,_Nevada
Fish Lake Valley is a town located in County, Nevada and County, California.  It is just east of the Mountains (California), the highest range entirely within the Basin at . There is sufficient rain and snow at high elevations to feed permanent streams from the mountains, providing irrigation for alfalfa and other crops, although the valleys elevation, in excess of , is a serious constraint.HistoryFish Lake Valley was originally settled in 1866, when the Palmetto Mining District in Esmeralda County was formed, and settlement in Fish Lake Valley began. During the 1870s two companies, Griffing & Nymans and Pacific Borax Works were located here extracting borax at Fish Lake. The Carson and Columbus Stage Line ran north from Fish Lake Valley to Aurora and City, also connecting with Nevada in the Sylvania Mining District as well as Lida in the Mountains. Local ranches supplied food to the freight industry and mining communities such as Fish Lake Valley. A post office opened in Fish Lake Valley in 1881. Today a historical marker near the site commemorates the life of W.O. Harrell, known as Harrell, the Irrepressible, Citizen Extraordinaire, of Fish Lake Valley in the 1870s.(Fish Lake Valley, Nevada Historic Preservation Office.)ReferencesLake Valley (Nevada)
7354673
Afdera
: This article is about the political division. For the mountain, see (volcano). For the moth genus, see (moth).Afdera (Afar Afxeera) is one of the 29 woredas in the Region of Ethiopia. It is named after the saline Afdera, located in the southern part of the Depression. Part of the Administrative Zone 2, Afdera is bordered on the southwest by the Administrative Zone 4, on the west by Erebti and Abala, on the north by Berhale, on the northeast by Eritrea, and on the southeast by Administrative Zone 1. The largest towns of this woreda is Afdera. Overview The highest peak in Afdera is Mount Mallahle (1875 meters); other mountains in this woreda include Ale and Borawli. Mining is the principal industry in this woreda. The best known resource extracted is salt; according to the Afar Regional Mining and Energy Office, there are 300 active land grants around Lake Afdera, which the Office reports creates 1,800 permanent and over 40,000 part-time jobs.(Afar State calls on investors to exploit rich mineral potential (Information Center)) An all-weather road constructed in the 1990s connects this woreda to the main Awash - Asseb highway.(Situation report on Region 2 (Afar National Regional State) UNDP Emergencies Unit for Ethiopia report, dated January 1996 (accessed 13 January 2009)) About 90 kilometers of this gravel road, connecting Afdera to Sardo, was completed in late January 2009 at a cost of 387 million Birr. A spokesman for the Roads Authority stated that since it links with the port in City, the upgraded road would have great significance for tourism and import-export trade exchange.(Serdo-Afidera road opens for traffic , News Agency, 27 January 2009 (accessed 28 May 2009))At the Tio waterhole, near the southeastern border with Administrative Zone 4, L.M. Nesbitt located the 1884 massacre of the Italian expedition led by Bianchi and Maria Giulietti. Nesbitt was prevented from erecting a cairn to mark the site by the Afars, who believed this was part of a feud.(Nesbitt, Hell-Hole of Creation: The Exploration of Abyssinian Danakil (New York: Alfred A. Knopf, 1935), pp. 300-326. Nesbitt provided the latitude and longitude of the Tio waterhole in the maps accompanying his article, Danakil Traversed from South to North in 1928 (Continued), Geographical Journal, 76 (1930), pp. 391-414) Demographics Based on the 2007 Census conducted by the Central Statistical Agency of Ethiopia (CSA), this woreda has a total population of 32,225, of whom 18,191 are men and 14,034 women; with an area of 7,435.45 square kilometers, Afdera has a population density of 4.33. While 3,578 or 11.10% are urban inhabitants, a further 4,402 or 13.66% are pastoralists. A total of 4,803 households were counted in this woreda, which results in an average of 6.7 persons to a household, and 4,887 housing units.(Census 2007 Tables: Afar Region, Tables 2.1, 2.4, 2.5, 3.1, 3.2 and 3.4.) Notes fr:Afderahr:Afderash:Afdera
7370006
Alamata_(woreda)
Alamata is one of the 36 woredas in the Region of Ethiopia. Part of the Zone, Alamata is bordered on the south and west by the Region, on the northwest by Ofla, and on the northeast by Azebo. The administrative center is Alamata; other towns in Alamata include Waja. Overview Distinguished by small, undulating mountains with low vegetation cover, Alamata has an altitude which ranges between 1178 to 3148 meters above sea level, which drain into the Alamata Valley. Eight of the peasant associations are located in the Valley, while two are located in the intermediate highlands which have elevations ranging between 1500 and 3148 meters.(Alamata Pilot Learning Site Diagnosis and Program Design IPMS Information Resources Portal - Ethiopia (23 June 2005), pp. 6-19 (accessed 3 March 2009)) One micro-finance institution operates in Alamata, the Credit and Saving Institution SC (DSCI), with three sub-branches: one at the administrative center, another at Waja, and the third at Merewa kebele. DSCI has about 10,000 customers here. There are 11 multipurpose cooperatives in this woreda, one for each kebele and the last located in Alamata; all but one have been organized and registered in accordance with the new cooperatives law, with about 3,541 members. In addition to these cooperatives, there are 4 saving and credit cooperatives, all of which are based in rural areas, and 2 construction cooperatives which are based in the urban areas.(This woreda was one of the about fifteen most important cotton production areas in Ethiopia in the 1950s, excluding Eritrea. A joint Ministry of Agriculture-ICA project to improve cotton production in the Alamata district happened in 1954-55.(Local History in Ethiopia The Nordic Africa Institute website (accessed 6 September 2007)) The zonal water, mining and energy department announced 15 August 2009 that 84 of the 100 wells planned in Alamata and Raya Azebo woredas have been completed at a cost of 40 million Birr. These wells would assist in irrigating over 3,000 hectares of land and benefit over 13,000 farmers.(Water facilities in S.Tigray go operational, News Agency 15 August 2009 (accessed 2 November 2009)) Demographics Based on the 2007 national census conducted by the Central Statistical Agency of Ethiopia (CSA), this woreda has a total population of 85,403, an increase of 26.56% over the 1994 census, of whom 42,483 are men and 42,920 women; 4,563 or 5.34% are urban inhabitants. With an area of 1,952.14 square kilometers, Alamata has a population density of 43.75, which is less than the Zone average of 53.91 persons per square kilometer. A total of 20,532 households were counted in this woreda, resulting in an average of 4.16 persons to a household, and 20,107 housing units.(Census 2007 Tables: Tigray Region, Tables 2.1, 2.4, 2.5, 3.1, 3.2 and 3.4.)The 1994 national census reported a total population for this woreda of 93,659 of whom 45,521 were men and 48,138 were women; 32,229 or 34.41% of its population were urban dwellers. The three largest ethnic groups reported in Alamata were the Tigrayan (62.19%), the Amhara (33.91%), and the Oromo (2.24%); all other ethnic groups made up 1.66% of the population. Tigrinya was spoken as a first language by 61.36%, 36.48% Amharic, and 1.36% spoke Oromo; the remaining 0.8% spoke all other primary languages reported. 78.35% of the population practiced Orthodox Christianity, and 21.45% were Muslim. Concerning education, 14.76% of the population were considered literate, which is less than the Zone average of 15.71%; 20.65% of children aged 7-12 were in primary school; 3.09% of the children aged 13-14 were in junior secondary school; 3.38% of the inhabitants aged 15-18 were in senior secondary school. Concerning sanitary conditions, about 91% of the urban houses and 43% of all houses had access to safe drinking water at the time of the census; about 31% of the urban and 12% of the total had toilet facilities.(1994 Population and Housing Census of Ethiopia: Results for Southern Nations, Nationalities and Peoples Region, Vol. 1, part 1, Tables 2.1, 2.12, 2.19, 3.5, 3.7, 6.3, 6.11, 6.13 (accessed 30 December 2008)) Agriculture A sample enumeration performed by the CSA in 2001 interviewed 18,422 farmers in this woreda, who held an average of 0.84 hectares of land. Of the 15,533 hectares of private land surveyed, 98.16% was in cultivation, 0.03% pasture, 0.5% fallow, 0.27% woodland, and 1.04% was devoted to other uses. For the land under cultivation in this woreda, 91.67% was planted in cereals like teff and sorghum -- although barley is the dominant crop in hgiher elevations -- 5.54% was in pulses, 31 hectares in oilseeds, and 33 planted in vegetables. The area planted in fruit trees was 43 hectares, while none were planted in gesho. 61.26% of the farmers both raised crops and livestock, while 23.92% only grew crops and 14.82% only raised livestock. Land tenure in this woreda is distributed amongst 72.66% owning their land, and 27.25% renting; the number held in other forms of tenure is missing.(Central Statistical Authority of Ethiopia. Agricultural Sample Survey (AgSE2001). Report on Area and Production - Tigray Region. Version 1.1 - December 2007 (accessed 26 January 2009)) hysterophorus (or Congress weed) is reported to be an increasing threat to cereal production in Alamata, as well as in the adjacent woreda of Kobo in Amhara Region. Cash crops include field peas, beans, lentils, teff and peppers.( Notes (woreda)
7386775
Harshin_(woreda)
Harshin () is one of the 47 woredas in the Region of Ethiopia. The easternmost woreda of the Zone, Harshin is bordered on the south by the Zone, on the west by Kebri Beyah, and on the east by Somalia. The major town in Harshin is Harshin.The Ethiopian De-mining Office reported in November 2008 that it had cleared mines planted in Harshin as part of the four million square meters of land the office had cleared in the Somali Region.(Landmines Cleared From 4 Million Square Meters Of Land, News Agency, 20 November 2008 (accessed 17 June 2009)) Demographics Based on figures published by the Central Statistical Agency in 2005, this woreda has an estimated total population of 82,884, of whom 39,821 were men and 43,063 were women; 9,558 or 11.53% of its population are urban dwellers, which is less than the Zone average of 22.5%. Information is not available on the area of Harshin, so its density cannot be calculated.(CSA 2005 National Statistics, Tables B.3 and B.4. Rural population numbers are believed to be underreported for this Region.) This woreda is primarily inhabited by the Arap and Awal, sub-clans of the Somali Isaaq clan.(Changing Pastoralism in the Ethiopian Somali National Regional State (Region 5), UNDP Emergencies Unit for Ethiopia report, dated 30 May 1998 (accessed 22 December 20080)The 1994 national census reported a total population for this woreda of 66,488, of whom 35,145 were men and 31,343 were women; 6,409 or 9.64% were urban inhabitants. The largest ethnic group reported in Harshin was the people (99.89%).(1994 Population and Housing Census of Ethiopia: Results for Somali Region, Vol. 1, Tables 2.1, 2.7, 2.12, ) Notes (woreda)
7400553
Udston_mining_disaster
rightThe  Udston mining disaster occurred in Hamilton, Scotland on Saturday, 28 May 1887 when 73 miners died in a firedamp explosion at Udston Colliery. Caused, it is thought, by unauthorised shot firing(The Flag in the Wind - Features - Notable Dates in History, Scots Independent) the explosion is said to be Scotlands second worst mining  disaster.(Bolton, Wilma S. Black Faces and Tackety Boots: True Stories from the Coal Mines of Lanarkshire ISBN 9780955299803)Hardie, then Secretary of the Scottish Miners Federation, denounced the deaths as murder a few days later.(Udston Pit Disaster, The Gazetteer for Scotland)LocationThe Udston Colliery, owned by the Udston Coal Company, was situated at the top of Hillhouse, Hamilton behind where Townhill Road now runs. Opened in 1875, it was a small pit employing approximately 200 men and boys working in three coal seams at depths of up to  underground. The workings of the colliery extended for  and were bordered on three sides by the Blantyre, Earnock, and Greenfield Collieries. The last remaining colliery buildings and the pit waste were removed in 2002 and today the site of the colliery is now a housing estate and part of Hamiltons western expansion programme.The disasterAt 9am, having been hard at work for almost three hours, many of the day shift downed tools for their breakfast. During this break, at approximately 9:07am, an explosion ripped through the Splint Seam destroying everything in its path.The explosion manifested itself in a volume of flame and dust at the number two or downcast shaft, followed seconds later by a volume of flame from the upcast or number one shaft which set fire to the wooden sheds or headings above it. The sound of the explosion was heard in neighbouring Colliery through a  barrier of solid coal. In the Blantyre Colliery (where an estimated 216 men had lost their lives 10 years earlier) miners working that morning were temporarily blinded with the dust thrown up by the vibration of the explosion. The 73 men who died at the Udston disaster were paid on average 3/3d (16p) per day or 17/6 (86p) per week (equivalent to 69.72 per week today in 2007) http://www.measuringworth.com/index.html. Memorials In December 2001 Lanarkshire Council acknowledged the disaster by placing a plaque on the miners statue standing outside Brandon Gate council offices in Hamiltons Brandon Street. Accepting the plaque on behalf of the victims was Hamiltons oldest surviving retired miner, 96 year old Jimmy Glen who, in 1917 at the age of 13 years, started work at the screening tables in the Colliery.In 2002, a memorial plaque dedicated to the six Kilbride miners, who died in the disaster, was unveiled in the memorial garden at Priestknowe roundabout in East Kilbride.References(* Udston 28th May 1887, Scottish Mining Villages* Udston Colliery Disaster 28th May 1887, Hamilton Advertiser, June 4 1887* Moore, Ralph Report to the Right Honourable the Secretary of State for the Home Department . On the Circumstances Attending an Explosion at Udston Colliery, Hamilton, on the 28th May 1887, London, Houses of Parliament, 1888
7409683
La_Guajira_Department
 footnotes                La Guajira () is a department of Colombia. It occupies most of its namesake peninsula, the Peninsula in the northeast region of the country, facing the Sea and Venezuela in the northern most part of America. The department capital city is Riohacha.Various indigenous tribes populated the vast arid plains, such as the Wayuu, Guajiros, Macuiros, Anates, Wayunaiki, Cuanaos and Eneales among others prior to the Spanish arrival to the Americas. In 1498 Alonso de Ojeda navigated around the peninsula of La Guajira, but the one who disembarked in what today is La Guajira was de la Cosa. During the colonial era the territory was disputed by the governors of Santa Marta and Venezuela due to deposits of pearls. English pirates, French, Germans also disputed the territory. Martin Fernandez de Enciso found the city of Nuestra Seora Santa Maria de los Remedios del Cabo de la Vela, first village in the territory but due to constant attacks, in 1535 Don Nicolas de Federman had to refounded as the village of Riohacha and in 1544 was moved present-day Riohacha. In 1871 the region is separated from the Department of Magdalena and is created La Guajira as part of the national territories. In 1898 was created the Intendance of La Guajira.(Colombian Air Force: Guajira)In 1911 the Colombian government created the Commissary of la Guajira, followed by a wave of Middle Eastern immigrants (Christians and Maronites) from Lebanon, Syria, Palestine and Jordan, countries under the Ottoman Empire arrived to La Guajira in  the c. 1930s and establishing mostly in Maicao. In 1954 was once again created the Intendance of la Guajira and Riohacha was declared a municipality. Finally in 1964 the Department of La Guajira was created.(The economy of  the department is mostly based on royalties from the coal mining at Cerrejn, which produced 24.9 million tons of export coal in 2004, gas exploitation and salt mine. A popular tourist destination is de la Vela, a small fishing village located on the tip of the peninsula in the Guajira desert.EtymologyThe name of Guajira comes from the languages. According to Picon (1996: p. 313) the word Guajiros was first used in the year 1600 to designate some 200 indigenous families that inhabited in the region of Riohacha, which were known for having large herds of goats. The term expanded to define all the indigenous in the peninsula who seemed to be goat herders. According to Oliver (1990: p. 84) the term Guajiro did not appeared on Spanish records until the year 1626 in a document by a Friar  named Pedro Simn.( Government of La Guajira: Guajira Development Plan - Etymology)Geographythumb|left|200px|The Guajira peninsulaThe northern part of the department is arid plains, the xeric scrub, in the rain shadow of the Nevada de Santa Marta which rise to 5,775 meters in the south. The Valley dry forests lie in between. In the far south are the headwaters of the River which turns south towards the River.(The River also born in the Sierra Nevada de Santa Marta crosses the Peninsula from south to north and flows through the Valley of Upar and into the sea. The del Perija and the de Oca lay on the southeastern part of the department and bordering Venezuela.(The department was subdivided into three subregions based on geographical characteristics; Upper Guajira, Middle Guajira and Southern Guajira. The Upper Guajira covers the northern most area of the peninsula, mostly semi-desertic and scarce vegetation, only presenting an isolated low altitude mountain range, the de Macuira (865 m over sea level). The Middle Guajira region is mostly flat and wavy in some areas, presenting also an arid environment and the Southern Guajira covers the region of the de Oca and the del Perija mountain ranges on the border with Venezuela and the valley formed with the Nevada de Santa Marta mountain range. Southern Guajira has more wetlands and more rivers.(EcoregionsThe Department of La Guajira is within the Colombian Caribbean region, one of the five natural regions in Colombia.( Government of La Guajira: Development Plan - subregions)Serrana de Macuirathumb|right|200px|La Teta hill, located in the municipality of Uribia, northern GuajiraThe de Macuira mountain range is located to the northwest of the Peninsula occupying an are of 35,000 ha, 25,000 of which pertain to the Macuira National Park. The mountain range is an isolated ecosystem in the middle of the Guajira Desert, near the sea between the villages of Nazareth, Ichipa and Tawara. The mountain range works as a barrier to the winds which hit from the northeast charged with humidity.(Sierra Nevada de Santa MartaThe Nevada de Santa Marta mountain range is located by the Caribbean sea and is also shared with the of Magdalena and the of Cesar. Most of the hydrographic reserves in the Department of La Guajira are born in this mountain range, including the River which crosses from south to north most of the department.( The Sierra Nevada de Santa Marta was declared by UNESCO as a Biosphere Reserve.( UNESCO: Buritaca 200 - Ciudad Perdida - Sierra Nevada de Santa Marta)Cerro PintaoThe Cerro Pintao (Painted Hill) which also covers the municipalities of San Juan del Cesar, El Molino, Villanueva and Urumita and in the Department of Cesar the municipalities of Manaure, La Paz, San Diego and Codazzi covering an area of 25,000 ha and with an altitude ranging from 1600 to 3,688 m (Paramo) giving birth to some 13 rivers in Colombia.( Government of La Guajira: Guajira Development Plan - Cerro Pintao)Flamingos Fauna and Flora SanctuaryThe Santuario de Flora y Fauna los Flamencos (Fauna and Flora Sanctuary) is located on the coastline of the municipality of Riohacha, between the village of Camarones and the River, covering 7,000 ha. The area has four lagoons (Manzanillo, Navo Quebrado, Tocoromanes and Laguna Grande) and numerous streams which serve as habitat to the Flamingos and numerous other endemic species.( Government of La Guajira: Guajira Development Plan - Flamingos Fauna and Flora Sanctuary)  Flamingos Protection AreaLocated in the village of Musichi, the Flamingos Protection Area is within the municipality of Manaure and presents numerous lagoons which are also used by locals for the artisan exploitation of salt.( Government of La Guajira: Guajira Development Plan - Flamingos Protection Area)ClimatedateAugust 2010HistoryPre-ColombianImage:CABO DE LA VELA.JPG|thumb|200px|right|The de la Vela was one of the first sites that Spanish explorers first sighted upon their arrival to the continental Americas.The area of present-day La Guajira was inhabited predominantly during the Colombian era by indigenous tribes pertaining mostly to the Wayuu (Guajiros, Macuiros, Anates, Caquetios, Wayunaiki, Cuanaos, Onotos and Eneales) and Cocinas in the northern lower and drier areas; in the south, Koguis, Arhuacos, Guanebucanes and Chimilas ethnic groups, among others.( Government of La Guajira: Guajira Development Plan - History) Archaeological findings have shown the presence of fishing communities with pottery on the central eastern side of the Guajira Peninsula dating to 10 BC, which also determined that these practiced pottery for the exploitation of marine resources.( Luis Angel Arango Library: LOS APAALANCHI UNA VISIN DEL MAR ENTRE LOS WAYUU)These groups coexisted on the Guajira Peninsula. The upper indigenous peoples were nomads, traveling across the peninsula hunting, fishing, and collecting fruits. The indigenous groups in the south were semi-sedentary, practicing agricultural techniques and exploiting coastal resources.(Spanish conquest and colonizationImage:AlonsoDeOjeda.jpg|thumb|left|150px|de Ojeda.The Peninsula was first seen by Spanish explorers led by de Ojeda upon reaching the coasts of the Peninsula in 1498, but without disembarking.( Dibuya: History) The first Spanish expedition to disembark went in 1502 led by de la Cosa at de la Vela.( Government of Riohacha: History) La Guajira was one of the territories in Colombia that endured a periods of isolation during the colonization of the Americas due to the resistance of the indigenous peoples, predominantly the Wayuu. It was until the 18th century that the monarchy ordered capitulations to conquest and pacify the indigenous in the region. This did not improve after the independence and the conflict between colonizers and indigenous prevailed throughout the 19th century.( La guerra de los Crdenas y los Valdeblnquez (1970-1989) Estudio de un conflicto mestizo en La Guajira by Simn Uribe Martnez and Nicols Crdenas Angel)In 1524 Bastidas had created the Government of Santa Marta which covered an area from de la Vela to the mouth of the River.( Juan Friede, La conquista del territorio y el poblamiento, Manual de Historia deColombia, 3 Vols., Vol. 1, Bogot, Instituto Colombiano de Cultura, 1982, pp.116-222, p.131.)The foundation of the first settlements in the area was made by Fernndez de Enciso who founded a village near the de la Vela with the name Nuestra Seora Santa Mara de los Remedios del Cabo de la Vela in 1535, the first settlement in La Guajira. Due to constant attacks from the indigenous and other Spanish conquerors from neighboring Captaincy of Venezuela due to large deposits of pearls, the village was moved to present-day Riohacha in 1544 and refounded by Federmann.(Luis Angel Arango Library: History of La Guajira)( LABLAA - La Guajira: History)Between 1609 and 1640, the Spanish colonizers imported some 800 or more African slaves. Most of these later escaped and formed Palenques. In 1679 the Government of Santa Marta offered these palenques their freedom in exchange of protecting the territory from English pirates and the Government of Venezuela who pretended the Guajira Peninsula due to large reserves of pearls in the area.( The Guajira rebellionthumb|left|250px|Map of La Guajira in 1769.The Wayuu had never been subjugated by the Spanish. The two groups were in a more or less permanent state of war. There had been rebellions in 1701 (when they destroyed a Capuchin mission), 1727 (when more than 2,000 Indians attacked the Spanish), 1741, 1757, 1761 and 1768. In 1718 Governor Soto de Herrera called them barbarians, horse thieves, worthy of death, without God, without law and without a king. Of all the Indians in the territory of Colombia, they were unique in having learned the use of firearms and horses.( Luis Angel Arango Library: The Guajira rebellion)Image:Pedro Messa de la Cerda2.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Messa de la Cerda, Viceroy of the of New Granada.In 1769 the Spanish took 22 Wayuus captive, in order to put them to work building the fortifications of Cartagena. The reaction of the Indians was unexpected. On May 2, 1769 at El Rincn, near Ro de la Hacha, they set their village afire, burning the church and two Spaniards who had taken refuge in it. They also captured the priest. The Spanish immediately dispatched an expedition from El Rincn to capture the Indians. At the head of this force was Jos Antonio de Sierra, a mestizo who had also headed the party that had taken the 22 Guajiro captives. The Guajiros recognized him and forced his party to take refuge in the house of the curate, which they then set afire. Sierra and eight of his men were killed.(This success was soon known in other Guajiro areas, and more men joined the revolt. According to Messa, at the peak there were 20,000 Indians under arms. Many had firearms acquired from English and Dutch smugglers, sometimes even from the Spanish. These enabled the rebels to take nearly all the settlements of the region, which they burned. According to the authorities, more than 100 Spaniards were killed and many others taken prisoner. Many cattle were also taken by the rebels. The Spaniards who could took refuse in Ro de la Hacha and sent urgent messages to Maracaibo, Valle de Upar, Santa Marta and Cartagena. Cartagena send 100 troops. The rebels themselves were not unified. Sierras relatives among the Indians took up arms against the rebels to avenge his death. A battle between the two groups of Indians was fought at La Soledad. That and the arrival of the Spanish reinforcements caused the rebellion to fade away, but not before the Guajiro had regained much territory.(Republican eraIn 1846 the new government of the of New Granada created then the Guajiro territory segregated from the State of Magdalena. The indigenous practiced contraband at a large scale and the problems with authority continued and the territory was once again put under the Government of Santa Marta.(In 1871 once again the territory of La Guajira was segregated and became a national territory to become an intendencia in 1898 and commissary in 1911. In 1954 is demoted back to intendencia until 1964 when the Department of La Guajira was created.(The Evangelization of the Indigenous Peoplesthumb|left|200px|Wayuu riding on horses. 1928.The process of evangelizing the Wayuu people restarted in 1887 with the return of the friars under reverend friar Jos Mara de Valdeviejas. In 1905, Pius X created the Vicariate of La Guajira and as first Vicar, friar Atanasio Vicente Soler y Royo attempted to civilize the Wayuu people.( Luis Angel Arango Library: The Capuchins Mission and the Wayuu Culture)Image:Wayuus in La Guajira 1928.png|thumb|right|200px|Wayuus carrying a rifle and traditional bow and arrow. 1928.The Capuchin Friars began building orphanages for Wayuu children in 1903, beginning with La Sierrita orphanage built in the Sierra Nevada de Santa Marta mountains. The San Antonio orphanage, located by the River, was built in 1910 and the Nazareth orphanage in the Serrania de Macuira mountains in 1913. The orphanages created a direct influence over the Rancheras of Guarrachal, El Pjaro, Caraza, Guaraguao, Murumana, Garra Patamana and Karraipa. The Nazareth Orphanage had some control over the rancheras of Taroa, Maguaipa, Guaseip, and Alpanapause. The friars frequently visited the settlements, inviting the people to attend mass. Wayuu children in the orphanages were educated with traditional European customs. Conflicts between the Wayuu people and the Colombian government have decreased since then. In 1942 Uribia celebrated Christmas and Years Eve for the first time .(Thousand days civil warDuring the Days War (18991902) the region was affected by the struggle between liberals and conservatives. The indigenous in La Guajira sided with members of either side depending on parental affiliation or economic advantage rather than on political views. A cacique named Jose Dolores came to an agreement with Liberal radical Uribe Uribe, but later sided with the conservatives after having a parental affiliation to General Iguarn, one of the conservative commanders.( raicespaisas.org: The Thousand Days War; the indigenous)Colombian armed conflictThe Department of La Guajira was influenced by the armed conflict since the 1970s initially by the two main guerrilla groups; the Armed Forces of Colombia (FARC) and the National Liberation Army (ELN) mostly in the southern Guajira between the mountain of the Sierra Nevada de Santa Marta and the Serrania del Perija bordering Venezuela. The influence in the northern Guajira was disputed with the indigenous Wayuu who since the 1970s controlled contraband in the area; mainly narcotics. In the southern Guajira the FARC operates its Caribbean Blocs 59th Front and influences from the 19th and 41st fronts. The ELN structure in the area is called the Palmesano Front.( Government of Colombia - Human Rights office: Department of La Guajira diagnostic)  During the 1990s paramilitary groups set in La Guajira, mainly the Self-Defense Forces of Colombia (AUC) and the Resistance Front led by the Bloc of the AUC and its commander alias 40. The paramilitaries led a cleansing campaign in the early 2000s against rival communist guerrillas and rival drug trafficking groups, preventing the guerrillas from acquiring provisions, ammunitions, weapons and the cut on the illegal drug trade.( In 2004 rivalries aroused between paramilitary factions between Jorge 40 and another paramilitary commander known as Chema Balas for the control of the port of Portete. In April 2004 paramilitaries executed a number of people in that village, the incident became known as the Portete massacre in which some 30 members of the Wayuu were executed, 60 disappeared and some 250 forcedly displaced into Venezuela.( elmundo.es: ACNUR denuncia que cientos de indgenas colombianos se ven desplazados por los paramilitares) Paramilitaries pertaining to the AUC demobilized in 2006, but new drug trafficking organizations arose, such as the Negras. Between 2000 and 2005 the FARC and the AUC perpetrated two massacres each while the ELN perpetrated one.(PoliticsThe Department of La Guajira is governed by the three regional representatives branches of power in Colombia. The Executive branch representative is the of the Department of La Guajira elected every four years by popular vote in regional elections along with the Legislative branch by the Assembly of La Guajira; and the judicial branch by the regional courts under the Tribunal of Riohacha whose members are appointed by the Court of Colombia. Control institutions also have their regional representatives. These institutions also have control over the 15 municipalities which are governed locally by a mayor, a town council and by the regional courts and control institutions.Administrative divisionsThe Department of La Guajira is formed by 15 municipalities, each administered by a popularly elected mayor and a city council, as well as municipal level courts. 12 of the municipalities are part of a government program called Special Units for Frontier and Department Frontier Zone; San Juan del Cesar, La Jagua del Pilar, Barrancas, El Molino, Fonseca, Hatonuevo, Maicao, Uribia, Urumita, Villanueva, Manaure and Riohacha. The municipalities of Dibulla, Albania, and Distraccin are excluded from that classification. The Department of La Guajira is also composed by 126 corregimientos, 49 inspecciones de polica (police inspections) and 10caseros, all distributed within the municipalities.( Observatorio del Caribe Colombiano: Grupo Regional de investigacin en economa y competitividad en el Caribe colombiano by Weildler Guerra, Paola Quintero, Jorge Quintero and Ana Mara Maldonado - Administrative divisions)Municipalitiesthumb|right|300px|Municipalities of La Guajira Department. Municipality and city of Riohacha highlighted in dark gray and red respectively.# 22px Albania# 22px Barrancas# 22px Dibulla# 22px Distraccin# 22px El Molino# 22px Fonseca# 22px Hatonuevo# border|22px Jagua del Pilar# 22px Maicao# border|22px Manaure# 22px Riohacha# 22px Juan del Cesar# 22px Uribia# 22px Urumita# 22px VillanuevaDefenseThe National Police has a regional command post in the Department of La Guajira, usually under the command of a colonel and based in the capital of the department, Riohacha.( Colombian National Police: Police Department of La Guajira) The National Army has two major units in the department, part of the 1st Division; the Mechanized Cavalry Battalion (based in Distraccin) and the Mechanized Battalion (Based in Riohacha).( 1st Division of the Colombian National Army: Second Brigade and Tenth Brigade) The Air Force division Comando Areo de Combate No. 3 (CACOM-3), in Barranquilla, Atlantico, covers the Department of La Guajira using as airstrip the Almirante Padilla Airport.(Colombian Air Force: CACOM 3 History)DemographicsImage:Mision robinson wayuu by Franklin Reyes.png|thumb|left|200px|Members of the Wayuu ethnic group in Venezuela. Wayuus are nomads and travel between Colombia and Venezuela from time to time, usually during rain seasons.According to the DANE (Colombian statistics bureau) 2005 Census, the Department of La Guajira; 44.9% of the population was indigenous pertaining to the Arhuaco, Koguis, Wiwa and Wayuu primarily; 7.5% of Afro-Colombian descent, while the remaining 47,6% of the population did not consider itself part of a particular ethnic group, except for the Middle Eastern descendants who have migrated throughout the 20th century.( Observatorio del Caribe Colombiano: Grupo Regional de investigacin en economa y competitividad en el Caribe colombiano by Weildler Guerra, Paola Quintero, Jorge Quintero and Ana Mara Maldonado - Composicion etnica)The Department of La Guajira contains the largest population of peoples in Colombia with 20.2% of the total and followed by the departments of Cauca and Narino with 18% and 11,2% of the total indigenous population of Colombia. The municipalities with the largest indigenous populations are those in which the Wayuu people are present Uribia (95.9%), Manaure (88.2%), and Maicao (40.1%).(The population of 623,250 constituted 1.5% of the total population of Colombia (42,090,502) and 7% of the Region of Colombia (8,910,195). The Department of La Guajira had a population density of 29.9 inhabitants per square kilometer. From those 623,250 total inhabitants 50.6% were females and 49.4% were males.( Observatorio del Caribe Colombiano: Grupo Regional de investigacin en economa y competitividad en el Caribe colombiano by Weildler Guerra, Paola Quintero, Jorge Quintero and Ana Mara Maldonado - demographics)thumb|right|250px|Map of La Guajira by populationthumb|right|250px|Geography of La Guajira showing the main roads and concentration of urban areas.EducationEconomyImage:Cerrejonmine1.png|thumb|left|200px|Trucks loaded with coal at the Cerrejon coal mine.of Manaure, La Guajira - Colombia.png|thumb|right|200px|Manaure salt mine. Manaure provides approximately 80% of the Colombian market with salt.The Economy of the Department of La Guajira is mainly based on the exploitation of mineral resources, such as coal in the Cerrejon mines, natural gas, salt mines in Manaure constituting 53.48% of the total revenues in 2005.( Government of La Guajira: Internal Agenda for Productivity and Competitiveness) The service industry follows including electricity, gas, potable water, transport and communications, accounting for 11.06% of the total revenue. Education, health, community service and domestic services account for 9.60% of the total.(Agriculture, silviculture and fishing accounts for 7.99% of the total followed by commerce, hotel industry and restaurant industry which together account for 6.65% of the total revenues in the Department of La Guajira. In a lower scale public administration accounts for 5.47%, Construction for 3.01%, Real State with 2.21% and Industrial sector 0.52%.(AgricultureThe Department of La Guajira in 2005 produced mainly tobacco, coffee, yuca, plantain, coconuts, ame, arracacha, palm, cane, and perico. 1,211 plantations were transitory while 59,830 plantations were of permanent production.(CultureCultural aspects in the Department of La Guajira have been mostly influenced by the traditions of the Wayuu culture, European culture, mainly through Roman Catholic traditions, Afro-Colombian and since the mid-20th Century from the Eastern culture, including Islamic traditions.( Colombian Caribbean Observatory - Sistema educativo y realidad en La Guajira: ideas para la armonizacin intercultural) There is also a great influence from Venezuela, as the Wayuu traditional territory is shared by the two nations.LanguageThere are three main languages in La Guajira, the most spoken in terms of population is the language followed by the language. The growing population of Middle Eastern immigrants has contributed with the language in the region. Koguis and Wiwas are more associated with the languages speaking also in their own variation.( Colombian Caribbean Observatory: Language in the Department of La Guajira (Sistema educativo y realidad en La Guajira: ideas para la armonizacin intercultural)) Spanish in La Guajira has developed also its own dialect by taking words from mostly the Wayuu language. The Wayuus and other indigenous grooups are also being introduced to bilingual education from their native language to Spanish. Numerous software companies such as Microsoft(The return to the Indian and the search for cultural responsiveness and responsibility in Latin American education by Luis Enrique Lpez) and Ubuntu(Ubuntu: Ubuntu in Wayuunaiki) have developed products in Wayuu language.( Colombian Caribbean Observatory: Language in the Department of La Guajira (Sistema educativo y realidad en La Guajira:  ideas para la armonizacin intercultural)) Image:Hammockguajira.png|thumb|right|200px|Typical Wayuu rectangular day house with hammocks by the Caribbean Sea. The Chinchorros hammocks are one of the most traditional items in the culture of La Guajirathumb|right|200px|Wayuu handcrafted mochilas woolen bags have also transcended through cultures and fashion in Colombia. LiteratureLiterature in La Guajira has been both written in Spanish and Wayuunaiki, most of it describing the myths, the sacred, the tragic, the epics, the legends, heroism, the magic, the comedy and romanticism autochthonous to the region and directly influenced by the Costumbrismo, including physiology and sexuality.( Indymedia.org: Wayuu literature or the Myths adventures by Manuel Guillermo Ortega Sunday, Sep. 23, 2007 at 4:05 PM)Wayuu tribes feature prominently in Papillon by Charriere, about an escaped convict who takes refuge with one such tribe. La Guajira has been subject to numerous writings describing the culture.MusicMusic is the Department of La Guajira has been directly associated to the indigenous peoples, as well as the influence from the Afro-Colombians and the European cultural influences. Such is the case of the vallenato music, which was allegedly originated in the region formed between Riohacha and Valledupar, some considering it larger and reaching from Riohacha to the central region of the Department of Cesar. Accordions and guitar first used for vallenato music were allegedly acquired in La Guajira as contraband arriving from the nearby island of Aruba, in the Caribbean sea.(Taliraai: Music, Gender and Kinship in the Wayuu Culture - Jacqueline Vilchez Faria)The Wayuu has contributed with their own traditional music and instrument. Their culture directly associates economy and social life with music; such as in the case of raising cattle, in which the indigenous sang to their animals. They also used music for meetings and celebrations, as well as mourning in funerals. The Yonna is the traditional dance of the Wayuu and is used to honor guests.(The Wayuus created many rustic musical instruments called Kashi, Sawawa (type of flute), maasi, totoy and the taliraai (tubular flute), wootoroyoi (type of clarinet), among others. The Majayura or ritual of the young wayuu virgin in which the female dances towards the male for marriage, while other males perform rhythms with their traditional instruments until the male tumbles onto the ground.(GastronomyGastronomy in the Department of La Guajira is directly associated to the traditional gastronomy of the indigenous Wayuu, based on local fauna and flora, as well as some influence from the cuisine. The most representative of the Guajira cuisine is the Friche; a fried or stewed goat seasoned with salt and its own blood and guts. Arroz con camarones (Rice with shrimp); rice is cooked with a previously boiled shrimp and put to dry on the sun. The Iguana stew with coconuts. The Iguaraya; fruit from the cactus, Wayuus use this for drinking juice or wine. Turtles; cooked in a variety of ways usually with rice, in soup or stewed,( viajes-exoticos.info Gastronomy of La Guajira) cooked in a similar way; deers and Capybaras.( Colombiaaprende.edu.co: Gastronomy of the Caribbean Region of Colombia)( LABLAA: Listos Ojos, Paladar y Corazon)ReferencesExternal links* Government of La Guajira official website* Violence in La Guajira* Colombian ministry of Education: Education in La Guajira* Bank of the Republic - Colombia: Education in the Caribbean region of Colombia* Bank of the Republic - La Guajira y el mito de las regalas redentoras by Adolfo Meisel Roca No. 86 Febrero, 2007* UNESCO: indigenous peoples in la Guajira* Info about La Guajira - Off 2 Colombia -  ()GuajiraGuajiraGuajiraGuajiraGuajiraGuajiraGuajira (Roinn)Guajira (departman)Guajiradi La GuajiradepartamentasGuajiraGuajiraGuajiraGuajira(departamento)()GuajiraGuajiraGuajira (departamento)Guajira Departmentzh:
7421780
SGX_(disambiguation)
SGX may refer to:* Exchange, the securities and derivatives exchange of Singapore.* Gold, an Australian mining company, listed on the Stock Exchange under the symbol SGX.* PowerVR SGX, one of the PowerVR chipsets.* SuperGrafx, a video game console.de:SGXit:SGX
7422279
Kambaldaite
Kambaldaite, NaNi4(CO3)3(OH)33H2O, is an extremely rare hydrated sodium nickel mineral described from gossanous material associated with type komatiitic nickel ore deposits at Western Australia, and Widgie Townsite nickel gossan, Widgiemooltha, Australia.Kambaldaite crystallises in the hexagonal system, is light green to blue and forms drusy to mammillated encrustations on the matrix. Kambaldaite was first described in 1985 from the gossan of the Otter Shoot nickel orebody, Kambalda, during mining of the gossanous material. Kambaldaite, though in lesser and rarer amount, is also found in the Widgiemooltha nickel gossans, probably discovered there in the early to mid 1990s.  Paragenesis Kambaldaite is formed in the regolith as a supergene alteration mineral of nickel sulfide minerals, in arid or semi-arid environments which produce conditions amenable to concentration of calcareous or carbonate minerals in the weathering profile.Kambaldaite from Kambalda and Widgiemooltha is associated with komatiite-associated nickel sulfide gossans and is probably formed by substitution of nickel into carbonates such as magnesite which are formed by oxidation of the lithology, and oxidation of primary and supergene nickel sulfide minerals.Kambaldaite is formed from a similar process to the weathering of other sulfide minerals to form carbonate minerals. The sulfide minerals which are weathered to produce kambaldaite are pentlandite, violarite, millerite and rarely nickeline. Occurrence Kambaldaite is associated with goethite, malachite, annabergite, gaspeite and magnesite in the nickel sulfide gossans of Kambalda and Widgiemooltha. It is not known from other nickel sulfide gossans within the Yilgarn Craton, potentially due to many of these existing within areas of laterite cover, deeper regolith development or less favorable rainfall conditions.Kambaldaite is not reported from the Tasmanian or South Wales nickel carbonate occurrences because it is a supergene carbonate mineral and not a hydrothermal mineral.Kambaldaite is also reported from the Inn Valley, North Tyrol, Austria, and from Linopolis, Gerais, Brazil. See also * Gaspeite* Hellyerite* Gossan References * * Thornber, M. R. (1972) Pyrrhotite-the matrix of nickel sulphide mineralization. Newcastle Conference, Australasian Institute of Mining and Metallurgy, May-June, 1972, 51-58.* Thornber, M. R. (1975a) Supergene alteration of sulphides, I. A chemical model based on massive nickel sulphide deposits at Kambalda, Western Australia. Chemical Geology, 15, 1-14.* Thornber, M. R. (1975b) Supergene alteration of sulphides, II. A chemical study of the Kambalda nickel deposits. Chemical Geology, 151 117-144.* * Kambaldaite on Mindat.orgit:Kambaldaite
7427073
Fell_Exhibition_Slate_Mine
thumb|Slate mine FellThe Fell Exhibition Slate Mine is a former slate mine in Germany located about 20 km east from  Trier (Germany) and about 60 km east from (city) (Luxembourg) next to the villages Fell and Thomm. The exhibition mine can be visited every day from April to October. The Exhibition Mine consists of two typical roof slate mines from the turn of the century, situated one above the other, a slate mining trail and a small mining museum. Special Attractions  Mine underground The Barbara-Hoffnung Exhibition Mine in the Nossern Valley, between Fell and Thomm, consists of two typical roof slate mines from the turn of the century, situated one above the other. The upper gallery Hoffnung (Hope), was first mentioned in documents dating from 1850, and the lower gallery Barbara, in documents dating from 1908. Both mines are connected by 100m of stairwell.The guided underground tour takes an hour. During the winter months, slate miners saw no sunlight for months on end. Seventy metres below ground visitors witness the sun rise in a breathtaking chamber.Since 1994, the Fell community, aided by public support (including grants by the Community), has restored two former roofing slate mines in Fell and converted them into an exhibition mine. In the course of these developments, two especially interesting mines, the Barbara Mine, which is situated approximately 25m higher than the second, Hoffnung (Hope), were connected by a sloping tunnel. The driving was initiated from the Barbara stopping level and leads to the fourth chamber of the Hope Mine. The exhibition mine was opened to the public in 1997. Since opening the exhibition mine, visitors can finally tour the extensive subterranean tunnels, drifts, imposing chambers, chutes and mighty pack walls and get an idea of the hard and dangerous work of a slate miner. Figures on display in the mine, realistically illustrate the hard work of miners in a slate mine.Image:bergwerk-fell-arbeit.jpg|Slate mine FellImage:bergwerk-fell-hoffnung.jpg|Slate mine Fell - Pit HoffnungImage:Bergwerk-fell-steinbruch.jpg|Quarry VogelsbergImage:Besucherbw-fell.jpg|Slate mine Fell (upper left) and the formerly concrete block work (down) The slate mining trail thumb|Slate mine trail.The trail leads through the scenic Nossern Valley, past the relics of historic slate mining: imposing, terraced dumps, old mine cars, trails formerly used to transport the slate and now nearly completely overgrown, singular and quaint entry tunnels, all of which are a witness to the mining industry and past effigies of Saint Barbara, patron saint and helper in times of need for the miners.The layout of the Slate Mining Trail was conceived in such a manner, that everyone, depending on their level of fitness and interest, can plan their own individual route. In front of the entry tunnels to the mines, ten slate roofed information boards are to be found. The slate roofing was donated and completed by the Rathscheck Schieferbergbau company, Mayen and lovingly designed in different roofing styles.With the mine map on the information board, visitors can gain insight into the size and complexity of each mine system. There is also information on the history of each mine, the periods of operation and the number of galleries etc.  Museum mine and wine Adjacent to the exhibition mine, visitors find a small documentation centre, Mine and Wine, which exhibits curious and rare slate mining and wine making tools. A non-stop video presentation illustrates the modern state-of-the-art slate mining in Europe (length approx. 12 minutes) taking place in the Rathscheck mine near Mayen. The small museum also has an impressive statue of Saint Barbara from 1897 on display.  Traditions The most important bearer of the mining tradition in the former mining towns of Fell and Thomm are the Miners Orchestra Fell  and the Miners Orchestra Glck-Auf Thomm 1927 e.V., both established in 1955, but with a traceable history going back to 1871.The Fell Buglers have maintained the tradition of bugling for the hunt for years. If the weather and their time are permitting, the buglers practice Sunday mornings at the Fell Exhibition Mine and signal for the hunt. Anyone interested in listening to the Hubertus March, the Jger aus Kurpfalz (Hunter from Palatinate) or the Parforce March is welcome to join the morning pint Sundays at the Fell Exhibition Mine. The traditional airs Sau tot! (lit. Boar Dead!), Hirsch tot! (lit. Stag Dead!), Hase tot! (lit. Hare Dead!), Begrug (lit. Welcome), Sammeln der Jger (lit. Gathering the Hunters), Jagd vorbei (lit End of the Hunt) and other melodies from the hunt are part of the Fell Buglers repertoire.Every year on the second Sunday in Advent (the Sunday following the Saints Day of Saint Barbara on the 4th of December) a traditional parade of the Fell Miners Orchestra called the Bergparade takes place.  Every two years in the time leading up to Christmas the Friends of the Exhibition Mine organise a matins in the mine for their members. Solely by the light of candles and pit lamps the participants descend into the mine. At individual points in the mine, former miners describe their hard work while contemporary witnesses talk about their wartime experiences. They relate to a time, when the mines were bunker and home for the citizens of Fell and Thomm. Musical contributions, prayers and poems are presented in honour of Barbara. External links * Fell Exhibition Slate Mine websiteFell
7438696
Lock,_South_Australia
 also known as the most amazing town in AustraliaLock is a small wheatbelt town located in the centre of the Peninsula of Australia. It is central Eyre Peninsulas main grain storage hub, as it is surrounded by a predominantly farming community, with emphasis on crop production.  The town has a hotel, park, motel, supermarket, office, station, sporting complex, golf and bowling clubs and area school. At the 2006 census, Lock had a population of 290.() History Although many nearby coastal towns were settled much earlier, Lock was not colonised until the 1860s due to the low rainfall and marginal conditions.  Early settlers grazed sheep on vast tracts of natural vegetation for very low costs.  Land settlement occurred in 1861, with settlements continuing further north over the next decades. A major change occurred in the area with the arrival of the Lincoln railway line in 1913.  The area was serviced by a siding known simply as Terre Siding after one of the local properties.  This was altered when the town was gazetted in February 1918, and named Lock after Corporal Albert Lock, a member of the South Australian Survey Department who had been killed in Belgium during War I, in 1917.()The potential for wheat cropping was realised with the establishment of the railway, but the low rainfall kept any developments from happening until the pipeline from the Tod Reservoir was connected.  Two years later, a huge underground water reservoir was discovered under the town, capable of supplying all of the towns water needs.()The Lock Heritage Museum displays a number of old wartime, farming and household items used in the area many years ago.()GeographyThe town is located in the centre of the Peninsula, surrounded by mostly flat farming land, with patches of remnant vegetation. It is also located close to the Hambridge Conservation Park to the north and the Hincks Conservation Park to the south, where the areas original ecosystem is somewhat preserved.CommunityIn the 2006 Bureau of Statistics Census of Population and Housing, the population of the Lock town census area was 290. Some 95.2% of the population was born in Australia, with immigrants coming from Zealand, States of America and England.(EconomyAgriculture, predominantly cropping and to a lesser extent sheep grazing, is still the areas main economic input, with a minor input from tourism during school holidays.Mining potential in the area is promising, with ore having been discovered in banded iron formations, only 20 km away from Lock to the southeast at Wilgerup, by Centrex Metals Limited.()ReferencesExternal links*Tourism Eyre Peninsula - Lock*Sydney Morning Herald Travel pagenl:Lock
7454630
Nanarchy
Nanarchy is the eighth, and final, episode of fiction sitcom Dwarf Series VII and the 44th in the series run. It was first broadcast on the British television channel BBC2 on 7 March 1997.() Written by Paul Alexander, James Hendrie & Naylor and directed by Bye. The episode deals with the discovery of their missing mining ship Red Dwarf and its computer Holly. Plot Lister (Charles) is finding it very difficult to get used to life with only one arm, but seems to enjoy Kryten (Llewellyn) nursing him, and Kryten is absolutely loving it. Kochanski (Annett) is fed up seeing Kryten doing things for him that he could easily do with one arm, so with Krytens help they come up with a solution - nanobots from Krytens self-repair system could rebuild an arm for Lister. However, Kryten hasnt seen the nanobots since their attack by the Despair Squid two years ago - before they lost Red Dwarf. They decide to go into deep sleep and have Starbug retrace their steps back to that ocean planet.They emerge from deep sleep and discover a planet which the Navicomp identifies as Red Dwarf. They find the original Holly who explains that the nanobots had deconstructed Red Dwarf, created their own miniature version of the ship and turned the rest into a planet for safekeeping. The crew now realise that it was the nano version of Red Dwarf that they were chasing and the nanobots evaded them by coming aboard Starbug and travelling around their own galaxy inside Listers clothes hamper.After much persuasion, Kryten convinces the nanobots to recreate Listers arm and Red Dwarf. The nanobots follow Krytens orders but reconstruct Listers body into a muscle bound hero figure. As Starbug flies into the reconstructed Red Dwarf landing bay, something feels odd. It seems awfully big and Starbug flies in like a buzzing fly against the massive ship. Production The series finale proved to be one of the most problematic scripts. James Hendrie was not available to do any rewrites to the script, so Alexander was asked to do one of his own, before Naylor did a final polish. It was the only episode to date with three credited writers.() This is the first time since Parallel Universe that Norman Lovett has appeared as Holly, the ships computer. In between, his character - played by Hattie Hayridge - was last seen in Series Vs finale Back to Reality. Viewing figures had reached over 8 million viewers, and the series also gained a Sunday night repeat. These were the highest ratings garnered so far.() References  External links * * * Episode Guide - Series 7 at RedDwarf.co.uk
7467700
Melbourne_City_Centre
South YarraMelbourne City Centre (sometimes referred to as Central City,() and colloquially known as simply The City) is an area of Melbourne in Victoria, Australia. It is not to be confused with the larger government area of the of Melbourne. It is the area in which Melbourne was established in 1835,() and its boundaries are defined by the Government of Victorias Melbourne Planning Scheme.() Today, it comprises the two oldest areas of Melbourne; the Grid and Victoria Market, as well as sections of the redeveloped areas of Southbank and South Wharf.() It is the core of the central activities district (CAD) of Melbournes suburbs, and encompasses a number of places of significance, which include: Crown Casino, Square, Street Station, Aquarium, Convention and Exhibition Centre, Town Hall, Gallery of Victoria, State Arts Centre of Victoria, Library of Victoria, State Parliament of Victoria, Court of Victoria and the Centre for the Moving Image. Bordering its north-east perimeter is the World Heritage-listed Exhibition Building and Carlton Gardens as well as the Museum. It is also the main terminus for the Melbourne metropolitan and Victorian regional passenger rail networks - being Flinders Street and Southern Cross stations respectively, as well as the most dense section of the Melbourne tram network.It is the major business district (CBD) of Greater Melbournes area, and a major centre in Australia and the Asia-Pacific region.( Friedman, John (1997), Cities Unbound: The Intercity Network in the Asia-Pacific Region, Management of Social Transformations, UNESCO, retrieved: 5 August 2011) The City is home to the corporate headquarters of the Worlds two largest mining companies: Billiton and Tinto Group; as well as two of Australias big four banks: ANZ and NAB, two largest gaming companies: Crown and Tabcorp, largest telecommunications company Telstra, two largest transport management companies: Toll and Transurban as well as the iconic brewing company Group. It also serves as the main centre for the of Melbourne and the of Victoria  the latter with the suburb of East Melbourne. Two universities have major campuses in the area: Royal Melbourne Institute of Technology (City campus) and of Melbourne (College of the Arts).It has hosted a number of events of significance, which include: the 1901 inauguration of the of Australia, 1956 Summer Olympic Games, 1981 Commonwealth Heads of Government Meeting, 1995 World Police and Fire Games, 2000 World Economic Forum, Commonwealth Games and G20 Ministerial Meeting. It is also recognised for the substantial number of cultural and sports events and festivals it holds annually  many being the largest in Australia and the World. The Grid is home to Melbournes famed alleyways and arcades and is renowned for its distinct blend of contemporary and architecture as well as expansive parks and gardens which adjoin it edges.(Diamonstein, Barbaralee (9 August 1987), Victorian Scenes on a Melbourne Walk, York Times, New York Times Company, retrieved: 5 August 2011) It is also the literary centre of Australia, and has more bookshops and publishing companies per capita than any other city in Australia, and includes the headquarters of the Worlds largest travel guidebook publisher Planet. In 2008, it was designated a City of Literature by UNESCO in its Cities Network.(Melbourne, Australia: City of Literature, Cities Network, UNESCO, retrieved: 10 August 2011)HistoryMelbournes central grid patterned layout, known as the grid, was first laid out in 1837. From the 1870s to 1920s, the central part of Melbourne was home to mostly medical professionals who had established practices along Collins Street and Spring Street(Collins Street from the City of Melbourne) and before the 1960s, only a handful of permanent residents lived in the Spring Street area and Kilda Road.  The area was largely unpopular for residents and council policies did not permit development of apartment style housing in the area. St Kilda Road was annexed in the 1960s and given the postcode of Melbourne 3004 to stimulate office development along the strip and reduce pressure on overdevelopment of the Hoddle Grid.  The result was the demolition of many of the streets grand mansions.Things changed somewhat due to the Kennett governments 3000 planning policy in the 1990s, which provided incentives for living in the central area.Although the city centre now includes St Kilda Road, it competes for office space with Southbank, Docklands and the major outer suburban centres such as Box Hill, Glen Waverley, Ringwood, Belgrave, Ferntree Gully and increasingly South Yarra.Boundaries and geographythumb|left|An aerial view of part of the St Kilda Road office district and the Botanic Gardens area.Officially, the city centre is bordered by Spencer Street to the west and extends north as far as Grattan Street which borders Carlton.  The border extends along La Trobe Street, William Street, Peel Street, Grattan Street, taking in the Victoria Market, Berkeley Street, Victoria Street. To the east it is bordered by Spring Street, however the area extends east to take in parts of Wellington Parade, Brunton Avenue, Punt Road and the Yarra River. It borders South Yarra to the south east at Anderson Street, Domain Road, Domain Street, Arnold Street, Fawkner Park, Commercial Road, High Street. It also  borders both St Kilda along St Kilda Road and Albert Park along Queens Road, Lakeside Drive and South Melbourne along Albert Road, Kings Way, Palmerston Crescent, Wells Place and finally Southbank along St Kilda Road and the south side of Flinders Street (Northbank) which includes Street Station and the Aquarium.Although these are the borders on official maps, there are several adjoining areas that function as part of the Central Activities District.  This includes Docklands (with Stadium), Southbank, Victoria and Melbourne/Jolimont (with the Cricket Ground).Although the area is described as the centre, it is neither the geographic or demographic centre of Melbourne, due to an sprawl to the south east; the geographic centre is currently located at Bourne St, Glen Iris.(Glen Iris still the heart of citys sprawl, Age, 5 August 2002)DemographicsCentral Melbourne has one of the fastest growing residential populations in Australia.  Residents of the city centre are of mixed social status.(City of Melbourne - Research - Who lives in the city?) On one hand, living in the centre of the city offers proximity to work and the best access to transport. On the other hand, there are many titled apartments that have no carparks and limited space. As a result there is a mix of students and young urban professionals living in the locality of Melbourne.EconomyAirways has its head office in the suburb.()(Terms of use. Jetstar. Retrieved on 25 December 2010. Licensed Address: 473 Bourke St, MELBOURNE, VIC, 3000)Culture and sportImage:MCG, Melbourne.jpg|thumb|left|200px|3 major buildings of Park: 1. Cricket Ground (MCG) 2. Laver Arena (Australian tennis stadium) 3. Arena (sports & entertainment venue)Most professional sporting clubs represent Greater Melbourne (e.g. Victory, Storm). An exception is the Cricket Club and Football Club (its offshoot) both based at the Cricket Ground which was built in Jolimont, adjacent to the city but a locality of the suburb of East Melbourne. Both were the first clubs of their respective sports and established in a time when the citys population was still very small and limited to a handful of inner suburbs. As a result, the Melbourne Cricket Club has a fairly exclusive membership, whilst the Melbourne Football Club, although bearing the name Melbourne, is associated by the supporters of other suburban clubs as representing the central suburb and perceive its supporters to represent the locality and not the entire city.(Melbourne Demons - The rust bucket of Australia from ConvictCreations.com) As a result, despite its rich tradition and early success, it is one of the least supported clubs in the VFL/AFL.  The lack of identity resulted in a push for the Hawks, which was stopped by intervention from Gutnick and the majority of the Football Club members.  It has had intense rivalries with younger clubs from the adjacent inner suburbs such as the Football Club and early inter-town rival Football Club.  The Melbourne Football Club has recently made efforts to shed its suburban tag and be embraced by the whole metropolitan area.(A new base for Demons? from the Age)  In line with this, the club recently employed strategies such as establishing Team Melbourne, (a group of sporting teams which bear the name Melbourne), and a strategy for promoting the brand as representing the city in China through club supporter and former Lord Mayor So.Golf is played at the course of the Albert Park Golf Club on Queens Road.()Transportthumb|Flinders Street StationThe Melbourne City Centre is the transport hub of the city.Despite a wide range of public transport options, the automobile still remains the primary method of getting around in the Melbourne City Centre.  The main arterial is King Street. There are major taxi termini in the CBD.The city is serviced by five railway stations as part of the Melbourne Underground Rail Loop: Flinders Street (the busiest), Cross Station (the hub of the regional network in Spencer Street at Melbourne Docklands) also an interstate terminal and three underground stations - Parliament, Melbourne Central and Flagstaff (not open on weekends) stations. Street Station is also the hub for Melbournes suburban train network.Trams run down the main streets Flinders, Collins, Bourke and Latrobe as well as Spencer Street, Market Street, Elizabeth Street, Swanston Street, Spring Street, Swan Street and St Kilda Road.  There are several large accessibility tram superstops located in Flinders Street, Collins Street, Swanston Street and Bourke Street mall.The city is also well connected by bus services, with majority of buses running down Lonsdale street. Major bus stops include Melbourne Central and QV. Most bus routes service suburbs north and east of the city given the lack of train lines to these areas.Major bicycle trails lead to the CBD and a main bicycle path down Swanston Street.Ferries dock along the northbank of the Yarra at Wharf and the turning basin at the Centre.  There is also a water taxi service to Melbourne and Olympic Parks.ReferencesNotes:Texts:*  (PDF version), retrieved: 5 August 2011*  (PDF version), retrieved: 5 August 2011External links*Local history of Melbourne CBDzh:
7479264
Yamada_Koun
, or Koun Yamada, was the former leader of the Kyodan lineage of Buddhism, the heir of his teacher Hakuun Ryoko. Yamada was appointed the leader of the Sanbo Kyodan in 1967, 1970 or 1973 and continued to differentiate the lineage from other Japanese Zen traditions by deemphasizing the separation between laypeople and the ordainedjust as his teacher Yasutani had done. Yamada was also instrumental in bringing Christians to the practice of Zen that by the end of Yamadas teaching career approximately one quarter of the participants at his sesshins were Christians.(Spuler, 9-10)BiographyYamada Koun was born in Nihonmatsu in prefecture of Japan in 1907. He attended school with Nakagawa at Dai-Ichi High School located in Japan, and also went to university with him.(Koun, 296) In 1941 Yamada began working for the Manchurian Mining Company as a labor supervisora company known for poor working conditions and exploiting its labor forces composed of Chinese peasants, POWs and criminals. By 1945 he had become deputy director of the General Affairs Department for the company.(Victoria, 96-97) While working as supervisor for the company his old friend Nakagawa came to Manchuria on behalf of his master, Yamamoto, in an effort to encourage workers to double their output for Japans efforts.( According to the foreword in the book The Gateless Gate: The Classic Book of Zen Koans, In Manchuria at age thirty-eight Yamada began Zen training. Three years later he returned to Japan and settled in Kamakura with his wife and three children. Once set on his course in Zen, Yamada pursued his goal relentlessly. Although he was a managing director of a large Tokyo firm, he went twice a day to dokusan with Asahina Sgen Roshi. After his first kensho was approved, he engaged in koan study for three years and then continued his studies with Hanamoto Kanzui.( In 1953 Yamada invited Yasutani to Kamakura and founded the Kamakura Haku-un-kai.( Then, according to Stephen Batchelor, On 26 November 1953, Koun Yamada, a Japanese business executive in Kamakura, was returning home with his wife on a suburban train. He came across a passage in a Zen text in which the author declared: I came to realise clearly that Mind is no other than mountains and rivers and the great wide earth, the sun and the moon and the stars. He broke into tears with the realization that after eight years of zazen he had finally grasped what this statement meant.(Batchelor, 209-211) Later that night he awoke abruptly from sleep and saw the same passage flash in his mind, which was followed by a kensho experience. The next day Yasutani confirmed that what Yamada had experienced was a kensho.(Yamada continued to study under Yasutani for seven years following this experience, and in 1961 he became the successor to Yasutanione year after completing some six hundred koans under him.(( There is some confusion over the date on which Yamada became the leader of the Kyodan. According to Daizen Victoria in Zen War Stories, In 1967 Yamada succeeded to the leadership of the Sanb-Kydan (Three Treasures Association), an independent, lay-oriented Zen sect that Yasutani had created in Kamakura in 1953.( According to the book The Sound of Liberating Truth, In 1970 Yamada Kun became the successor of Yasutani Roshi as head (kanch) of the Sanbkydan.(King, 17) Finally, according to Michelle Spuler in the book Developments in Australian Buddhism, Yasutanis successor, Yamada Koun Zenshin (1907-1989), was appointed as the leader of the Sanbo Kyodan in 1973.( The date is most likely 1973, however, as Charles S. Prebish writes in his book Luminous Passage: The Practice and Study of Buddhism in America, With the blessing of both Nakagawa Sen Rshi and Yasutani Rshi, Koun Yamada Rshi was invited to lead the Sangha, and he moved to Hawaii in 1971.(Prebish, 20) It is likely the date is not 1967 or 1970 because Yamada would not need anyones blessing to go to Hawaii were he already the head of the school, not to mention 1973 was the year of Yasutanis death.What is clear is that Yamada made Baker Aitken either a sensei or roshi in 1974. Even this date comes with some confusion, as author Richard Seager says he received transmission in 1974.(Seager, 94) However, the author David W. Chappell states in the book Buddhist Peacework: Creating Cultures of Peace, ...in 1974 Aitken was appointed sensei (teacher) by Kamakura-based Zen master Yamada Koun Roshi. In 1985, Yamada Roshi gave Aitken transmission as an independent roshi.(Chappell, 93) In 1988 L.F. Habito, a former Jesuit priest who had also studied under Yasutani, received Dharma transmission from Yamada.http://www.mkzc.org/barthashius.htm additionally, Yamada left behind many other Dharma heirs which are listed in the next section of this article.Dharma heirs*Yukiyoshi Zuiun-ken Adachi*Reiko Houn-an Adachi*Chotan Gyoun Aitken*Osamu Shoun-ken Ashida*Fr. Niklaus Goun-ken Brantschen, SJ*DOrtschy*Uta Ryuun-an Dreisbach*Sr. Ludwigis Koun-an Fabian, OSB*Lourdes Mila Gyokuun-an Golez*Keiun-ken Habito*Bruce Soun-ken Harris*Kodo Nyoun-ken Hasegawa*Tetsuo Taiun-ken Hiyama*Fr. Willigis Koun-ken Jaeger, OSB*Akira Jiun-ken Kubota*Heidi Heki-un an Kern*Johannes Houn-ken Kopp*Victor Yuun-ken Loew*Peter Choun-ken Lengsfeld*Tetsuun-ken Loy*Sr. Elaine Koun-an MacInnes*Gundula Zuiun-an Meyer*Carmen Baika-an Monske*Teizo Kakuun-ken Nakamura*Tsuneo Goun-ken Oda*Akira Soun-ken Onda*Silvia Rinun-an Ostertag*Sonia Shuni-an Punzalan*Kathleen Seiun-an Reiley*Joan Jo-un Rieck*Ama Genun-ken Samy*Ana Maria Kiun-an Schlter Rodes*Shitetsu Shoun-ken Sendo*Paul Choun-ken Shepherd*Roselyn Seiun-an Stone*Toshio Hekiun-ken Tonoike*Shue Reiunken Usami*Ryoun-ken Yamada (son of Yamada Koun and current leader of the Kyodan)Bibliography*See also*in Japan*in the United States*of Zen Buddhism in the United StatesNotesReferences********External links*Short history page of the Sanb Kydan*Mountain Moon Sangha of Roselyn Stone, Seiun An Roshi
7499986
Mount_Lyell_Remediation_and_Research_and_Demonstration_Program
The Mount Lyell Remediation and Research and Demonstration Program was a joint program between the Supervising Scientist Australia and the  Department of Environment and Land Management, Tasmania to clean up the King River, River and Harbour following 100 years of mine waste and town waste from Queenstown  being emptied into the rivers.It was conducted after the closing of the Lyell Mining and Railway Company in 1994, and most reports were produced by 1996. At the time of the final report it was claimed that the program wasone of Australias most comprehensive response to large scale environmental damage ( Koehnken, Lois (1997)  Final Report p. iii )The review of the effluent and environment of the Mount Lyell mining lease resulted into reports that were published, and the new owner of the Mount Lyell lease - Mines of Tasmania (first company) - complying with requirements of the findings and the creation of tailings dams and the conclusion of any effluent disposal into the Queen River and King River.See also* King RiverNotesReferencesDavies P, Mitchell N and Barmuta L (1996)  The impact of historical mining operations at Mount Lyell on the water quality and biological health of the King and Queen River catchments, western Tasmania.  Mount Lyell Remediation Research and Demonstration Program. Supervising Scientist Report 118, Supervising Scientist, Canberra.  ISBN 0-642-24317-4Publications*Koehnken, Lois (1997) Final Report Mount Lyell Remediation Research and Demonstration Program. Supervising Scientist Report 126, Supervising Scientist, Canberra.  ISBN 0-642-24326-3
7516854
James_Smith_(architect)
Low Parks Museum in Hamilton, originally designed by James Smith as the home of David Crawford, secretary to the Duke of Hamilton.James Smith (c. 1645  1731) was a Scottish architect, who pioneered the Palladian style in Scotland. He was described by Campbell, in his Vitruvius Britannicus (1715-1725), as the most experienced architect of that kingdom.(Campbell, Colen (1715-1725). Vitruvius Britannicus. ii, 3, quoted in Gifford, p.62)BiographyBorn in Tarbat, Ross, Smith was the son of James Smith (d. 1684-5), a mason, who became a burgess of Forres, Moray, in 1659.(Colvin, pp.755-758) Smith initially trained as a priest, and went to Italy as a young man, possibly to enter the Catholic priesthood. A James Smith of Morayshire attended the College, Rome from 1671-75, although it is not known if this is the same person.( He had certainly travelled abroad, however, and was well-educated, with a knowledge of Latin.((Gifford, pp.62-67)By December 1677, Smith was in touch with Sir William Bruce, the most prominent architect of the time in Scotland, and the designer of the rebuilt Palace, Edinburgh. Here, Smith served as a mason, under the direction of the master mason Robert Mylne. By December 1679 he was married to Mylnes daughter Janet, when he was made a burgess of Edinburgh in right of his father-in-law.( He was admitted to the Incorporation of St Marys Chapel, the guild of masons and wrights in Edinburgh, in 1680.In 1683 he was appointed, at the recommendation of the Duke of Queensberry, to the post of Surveyor and Overseer of the Royal Works, a post previously held by Bruce, with a salary of 100 a year. He was responsible for maintenance of Holyrood Palace, and refurbished the former Abbey as a royal for King James VII. From 1685-86 he sat in the of Scotland as member for Forres.His Royal appointment was renewed after the Union of England and Scotland in 1707, but he never received further pay.( He surveyed some of the forts built in the Highlands after 1714, for the of Ordnance, but this employment ended in 1719 with the appointment of Jelfe as architect to the Board. He complained in a letter to John Clerk of Penicuik that he had been disgracefully turned out of His Majestys service in the 73rd year of his age.( In 1715 he unsuccessfully stood as a candidate for of Parliament for Edinburgh.(In 1686 he purchased the estate of Whitehill, near Musselburgh. However, an unsuccessful coal-mining venture forced him to sell part of the estate in 1706, and he assigned the rest to his son-in-law Gilbert Smith in 1726.( Smith fathered 18 children by his first wife, Janet Mylne, who died in 1699, aged 37. He remarried, and fathered another 14 children by his second wife.(thumb|left|Kirk of the Canongate, on Edinburghs Royal MileArchitectural worksFile:Balduchin or Ciborium at the Queensberry aisle, Durisdeer.JPG|thumb|160px|Balduchin by James Smith at Durisdeer in Scotland.Smiths architectural training is not known. Architectural historian Colvin has speculated that he was associated with Campbell (16761729), the Scots architect who introduced Palladian architecture to England. On the basis of a number of Smiths drawings that were in Campbells possession, Colvin even suggests that Campbell may have been Smiths pupil, and it was Smith who brought Italian ideas back from his travels, inspiring the British Palladianism of the 18th century.(With his father-in-law, Robert Mylne, Smith worked on Park in Edinburgh (1685), and Castle (1680s). His Canongate Kirk (1688-1690) is a basilica-plan, with a baroque facade. In 1691 Smith designed the mausoleum of Sir George Mackenzie of Rosehaugh, in Kirkyard. This circular structure is modelled on the Tempietto di San Pietro, designed by Bramante (1444-1514), and illustreted in Palladios Quattro Libri.( Smiths country houses follow the pattern established by William Bruce, with hipped roofs and pedimented fronts, in a plain but handsome Palladian style.( Palace (1695) was fronted by giant corinthian columns, and a pedimented entrance, although was otherwise restrained.( He also designed the nearby estate office, now the Low Parks Museum. Palace (1702-1710) was modelled after William of Oranges palace at Loo in the Netherlands.( Other houses included House (1701-1715), works at Tower for the Earl of Mar, as well as his own home, built around 1690 on his estate at Whitehill. From 1700 he worked largely in association with the mason and architect Alexander McGill, and after 1710, ceased architectural work almost entirely.EngineeringSmith also undertook engineering work. For instance, he was employed as an arbitrator over a dispute concerning the construction of Cockenzie harbour. In 1701 he acquired the rights to manufacture the steam engine invented by Savery, and in the 1720s he was involved, with William Adam and Alexander McGill, in an early proposal for a and Clyde Canal, linking Scotlands east and west coasts.(List of architectural worksArchitectural works by, or attributed to, James Smith.(Listed by Colvin, pp.757-758, unless otherwise noted)*Castle, Dumfriesshire (1680-1690), for the Duke of Queensberry, possibly designed with Robert Mylne*of the Canongate, Edinburgh (1688-1690)*Chapel Royal at Palace, Edinburgh (1688), destroyed by an anti-Catholic mob the same year*Whitehill, Musselburgh (c. 1690), Smiths own home, enlarged in the 18th century and now known as Newhailes*Mausoleum of George Mackenzie of Rosehaugh (1691), Greyfriars Kirkyard, Edinburgh (*Abbey, Midlothian (1693), advised the Earl of Lothian on alterations*Palace, Lanarkshire (1693-1701), for the Duchess of Hamilton. Extended in the 18th century and rebuilt in the 19th, the Palace was demolished in 1921.*Raith House, Raith Estate, Kirkcaldy, Fife (1692-1694) *House, Borders (1695-1699), alterations*Durisdeer Church, and Queensberry Aisle, Dumfriesshire ()*Monument to Douglas, Duke of Hamilton (1634&ndash;1694), in Bothwell Church, Lanarkshire (1695)*Old Surgeons Hall, Edinburgh (1696-1697)*House, Fife (1697-1700), for the Earl of Melville*House, East Lothian (1701-1715), with Alexander McGill for the Marquess of Tweeddale, altered in the 18th century*Dalkeith House, Midlothian (1702-1710), major rebuilding for Anne, Duchess of Buccleuch*Yester Parish Church, Gifford, East Lothian (1710), attributed to Smith and McGill*Castle, Perthshire (1720-1725), for the of Kinnoull, destroyed by fire in 1827*Smiths Land, High Street, Edinburgh (unknown date), later known as Paisleys CloseGallery of architectural workFile:Drumlanrig Castle 01.jpg|Drumlanrig CastleFile:Drumlanrig elevation.jpg|Drumlanrig Castle, elevationFile:Drumlanrig plan.jpg|Drumlanrig Castle, planFile:Dalkeith Palace.jpg|Dalkeith PalaceFile:7Dalkeith Palace Front.jpg|Dalkeith PalaceFile:Newhailes - geograph.org.uk - 224437.jpg|Entrance front, NewhailesFile:Newhailes - geograph.org.uk - 28583.jpg|Garden front, NewhailesFile:Melville House - geograph.org.uk - 121786.jpg|Melville HouseReferences*Colvin, Howard (1978) A Biographical Dictionary of British Architects, 1600-1840, John Murray*Gifford, John (1989) William Adam 16891748, Mainstream Publishing / RIAS
7533118
Tomahawk,_Kentucky
Tomahawk is an unincorporated community that stretches along Route 40 in County, Kentucky, United States, in the eastern part of the state near the Virginia border. It is located on Rockhouse Fork of Rockcastle Creek, about six miles (9.6 km) west of Inez, the county seat.EstablishmentThe post office was established as Wells on August 20, 1886, and named for its first postmaster, Richard M. Wells, according to Kentucky Place Names by Richard M. Rennick. It was closed in 1894, but reopened on November 4, 1898 as Tomahawk for The Tomahawk News, a newspaper then being published in Inez. It now has an estimated population of 1,000, based on voter registration in the Tomahawk precinct. The post office (41262) survived in 1975 when the Postal Service closed nearby offices in Milo and Davisport.FacilitiesThe community still contains a fire department, a grocery, a store, a mining supply company, an antique/musical instrument store, a car wash, a used car lot, a Jabez Ministries outlet, three churches, a Columbia Gas Co. pumping station and a large furniture store located in the old stone WPA-era Tomahawk Grade School, which was closed and sold in 2002 after the school was consolidated with Grassy Grade School into Eden Elementary School at Inez, Kentucky. Tomahawk has produced several locally prominent educators, journalists and business leaders, the best-known of whom was Williamson, a banker, educator and high school basketball coach. Williamson was president of the Inez Deposit Bank, president of the Kentucky High School Athletic Association, the acknowledged first graduate of State University and the principal and basketball coach at Inez High School, which won two state championships during his tenure.NotorietyTomahawk became briefly notorious on February 8, 1933 after a local family ritually murdered their mother after a church revival under the mistaken belief they could bring her back to life in three days. Law enforcement officers found the oldest son, kneeling in bed on his mothers breasts, with her head turned face-down into a pillow. Two daughters were dancing on a nearby table while another son stood at the foot of the bed, reading the Bible. Accounts of this incident and subsequent trial were published nationally and internationally, Associated Press articles show.notes()References
7549486
Bennerley_Viaduct
long           thumbnail|left|300px|Bennerley Viaduct photographed from Nottingham Canal Towpath in 2006Bennerley Viaduct is a disused railway viaduct spanning the Valley between Awsworth in Nottinghamshire and Ilkeston in Derbyshire. Origins thumb|left|The Structure of the Viaduct as seen from under the DeckThis iron lattice work viaduct is 1452 feet long with the rails 60 feet 10 inches above the Erewash River. Most railway viaducts at the time were brick built but the foundations of the Bennerley Viaduct were subject to a great deal of coal mining subsidence therefore, the lighter wrought iron design was chosen. The viaduct was built between May 1876 and November 1877 and forms part of the Great Northern Railway Derbyshire Extension which was built in part to exploit the coalfields in Derbyshire and Nottinghamshire. The contract was given by the Great Northern Railway (GNR) to Benton & Woodiwiss with the line laid out by, and the viaduct designed by Richard Johnson (Chief Civil Engineer of the GNR); Samuel Abbott was the resident engineer. The viaduct consists of 16 lattice work deck spans, each 76 feet 7 inches long supported on wrought iron columns with stone capped blue brick foundations. There were three additional iron skew spans at the Ilkeston end of the viaduct which carried the railway line over the Canal and the Railways Valley Line.() A skew span crosses its abutments and or piers at an angle other than a right angle. At the Awsworth end of the viaduct there was a section of embankment (including bridges of more conventional brick construction) which has been demolished. The Canal passed under this section. The viaduct was built for the railway line between Awsworth Junction and Derby on the Derbyshire and Staffordshire Line and opened in January 1878.() Bennerley Ironworks was originally due north of the viaduct served by sidings connected to both the Great Northern line and the Midland Railway Erewash Valley line. After the demolition of the ironworks a Coal distribution depot served by sidings from the Midland Railway occupied the same site. This has now also been demolished.()Airship bombing raidthumb|right|Zeppelin Airship LZ59 - L.20On the 31st January 1916, nine Zeppelin airships of the German Airship Naval Division conducted a bombing raid over the British Midlands known as the Great Midlands Raid. One of these airships, the L.20 (LZ 59) based at Tnder in Denmark and commanded by KapitanLeutnant Stabbert conducted a bombing raid in the area around the Bennerley viaduct. Seven high explosive bombs were dropped in the vicinity, one of which dropped just to the north of the viaduct on the Midland Railway line at Bennerley Junction. Bennerley Junction served the Bennerley Ironworks sidings adjacent to the viaduct. Damage was caused to the Midland line but the viaduct emerged unscathed.() Later during the same raid the L.20 dropped fifteen bombs onto the nearby Stanton Ironworks one of which damaged a railway bridge crossing the Canal.( On May 4, 1916 after a second air raid over England the L.20 ran out of fuel and crashlanded near Stavanger in Norway.() Giltbrook Viaduct At Awsworth Junction the railway branched, one line passed over the Bennerley Viaduct as described, the other turned North towards Pinxton crossing the Viaduct (or Kimberley Viaduct but known locally as Forty Bridges). This viaduct was also designed by Richard Johnson and built of red bricks used to create 43 arched spans with a total length of 1716 feet and a height of 60 feet.( Other wrought iron viaducts thumb|Meldon Viaduct, Devonthumb|West Meon Viaduct* The only similar viaduct in the United Kingdom was the Joint Railways Dell (Hunnington or Frankley) Viaduct demolished in 1964.()   Other apparently similar structures were usually Warren Trusses, or (as in the case of Railway Bridge), supported on cast iron cylindrical columns rather than wrought iron piers.* The first Rail Bridge used a similar latticework design. It collapsed during a storm in 1879 with the loss of 75 lives.* One other wrought iron railway viaduct still stands in Britain. This is the Meldon Viaduct consisting of six,  long Warren truss spans with a total length of ,  above the valley floor built for the and South Western Railway in 1874.()* The dismantled Crumlin Viaduct finished in 1857 consisted of ten,  long Warren Truss Spans  above the valley floor built for the Taff Vale Railway extension. This was the tallest viaduct in Great Britain until its demolition in 1965.() This viaduct was used as a film location during its demolition whilst filming Arabesque.()* The dismantled Belah Viaduct finished in 1861 consisted of 16 spans with a total length of ,  above the valley floor, built for the Durham and Lancashire Union Railway. This was the tallest viaduct in England. It was closed in 1962.()* A wrought iron viaduct was built at Meon on the Valley Railway, opened in 1903. This 4-span viaduct stood  high. Built to carry double track, the viaduct only ever carried a single line. The viaduct was demolished in 1955, and only the concrete pedestals and foundations remain.* The Staithes Viaduct built for the Redcar and Middlesbrough Union Railway in 1875 and opened in 1883 was of wrought iron construction. It was dismantled in 1960.() After closure thumb|right|Looking up through the centre of a pierBennerley viaducts wrought iron construction saved it from demolition. The demolition contractors who tendered for the contract to demolish the viaduct put forward amounts which were considered too high. The reason given for the high cost was that iron structures could not be cut up with an torch and would have to be taken apart rivet by rivet.() The viaduct survived to become a grade II* listed structure.The Meldon Viaduct was refurbished in 1996 and is now part of the Granite Way cycle and footpath in Devon.(Bennerley Viaduct is managed by Sustrans and may yet be used in the future as part of the national foot and cyclepath network in a similar way to the Meldon Viaduct.() It is on the at Risk Register. See alsoraid References External links* * * * * * * * * * Bennerley Viaduct on WikiMapia* Fifteen photographs of Bennerley Viaduct* * * *  Further reading ******
7567080
Martin_Luther
signature  Martin Luther Signature.svgMartin Luther (10 November 1483  18 February 1546) was a German priest and professor of theology who initiated the Reformation.(Plass, Ewald M. Monasticism, in What Luther Says: An Anthology. St. Louis: Concordia Publishing House, 1959, 2:964.) He strongly disputed the claim that freedom from Gods punishment of sin could be purchased with money. He confronted indulgence salesman Tetzel with his Ninety-Five Theses in 1517. His refusal to retract all of his writings at the demand of Leo X in 1520 and the Holy Roman Emperor Charles V at the of Worms in 1521 resulted in his excommunication by the pope and condemnation as an outlaw by the Emperor.Luther taught that salvation is not earned by good deeds but received only as a free gift of Gods grace through faith in Jesus Christ as redeemer from sin. His theology challenged the authority of the Pope of the Roman Catholic Church by teaching that the Bible is the only source of divinely revealed knowledge(Ewald M. Plass, What Luther Says, 3 vols., (St. Louis: CPH, 1959), 88, no. 269; M. Reu, Luther and the Scriptures, Columbus, Ohio: Wartburg Press, 1944), 23.) and opposed sacerdotalism by considering all baptized Christians to be a holy priesthood.(Luther, Martin. Concerning the Ministry (1523), tr. Conrad Bergendoff, in Bergendoff, Conrad (ed.) Luthers Works. Philadelphia: Fortress Press, 1958, 40:18 ff.) Those who identify with Luthers teachings are called Lutherans.His translation of the Bible into the language of the people (instead of Latin) made it more accessible, causing a tremendous impact on the church and on German culture. It fostered the development of a standard version of the German language, added several principles to the art of translation,(Fahlbusch, Erwin and Bromiley, Geoffrey William. The Encyclopedia of Christianity. Grand Rapids, MI: Leiden, Netherlands: Wm. B. Eerdmans; Brill, 19992003, 1:244.) and influenced the translation into English of the King James Bible.(Tyndales New Testament, trans. from the Greek by William Tyndale in 1534 in a modern-spelling edition and with an introduction by David Daniell. New Haven, CT: University Press, 1989, ixx.) His hymns influenced the development of singing in churches.(Bainton, Roland. Here I Stand: a Life of Martin Luther. New York: Penguin, 1995, 269.) His marriage to von Bora set a model for the practice of marriage, allowing Protestant priests to marry.(Bainton, Roland. Here I Stand: a Life of Martin Luther. New York: Penguin, 1995, p. 223.)In his later years, while suffering from several illnesses and deteriorating health, Luther became increasingly antisemitic, writing that Jewish homes should be destroyed, their synagogues burned, money confiscated and liberty curtailed. These statements have contributed to his controversial status.(Hendrix, Scott H. The Controversial Luther, Word & World 3/4 (1983), Luther Seminary, St. Paul, MN, p. 393: And, finally, after the Holocaust and the use of his anti-Jewish statements by National Socialists, Luthers anti-semitic outbursts are now unmentionable, though they were already repulsive in the sixteenth century. As a result, Luther has become as controversial in the twentieth century as he was in the sixteenth. Also see Hillerbrand, Hans. The legacy of Martin Luther, in Hillerbrand, Hans & McKim, Donald K. (eds.) The Cambridge Companion to Luther. Cambridge University Press, 2003.)Early lifeBirth and educationFile:Hans and Margarethe Luther, by Lucas Cranach the Elder.jpg|thumb|Portraits of Hans and Margarethe Luther by Cranach the Elder, 1527Martin Luther was born to Hans Luder (or Ludher, later Luther)(Marty, Martin. Martin Luther. Viking Penguin, 2004, p. 1.) and his wife Margarethe (ne Lindemann) on 10 November 1483 in Eisleben, Germany, then part of the Roman Empire. He was baptized as a Catholic the next morning on the feast day of St. Martin of Tours. His family moved to Mansfeld in 1484, where his father was a leaseholder of copper mines and smelters(Brecht, Martin. Martin Luther. tr. James L. Schaaf, Philadelphia: Fortress Press, 198593, 1:35.) and served as one of four citizen representatives on the local council.( The religious scholar Martin Marty describes Luthers mother as a hard-working woman of trading-class stock and middling means and notes that Luthers enemies would later wrongly describe her as a whore and bath attendant.( He had several brothers and sisters, and is known to have been close to one of them, Jacob.(Marty, Martin. Martin Luther. Viking Penguin, 2004, p. 3.)Hans Luther was ambitious for himself and his family, and he was determined to see Martin, his eldest son, become a lawyer. He sent Martin to Latin schools in Mansfeld, then Magdeburg in 1497, where he attended a school operated by a lay group called the of the Common Life, and Eisenach in 1498.(Rupp, Ernst Gordon. Martin Luther, Encyclopdia Britannica, accessed 2006.) The three schools focused on the so-called trivium: grammar, rhetoric, and logic. Luther later compared his education there to purgatory and hell.(Marty, Martin. Martin Luther. Viking Penguin, 2004, pp. 23.)In 1501, at the age of nineteen, he entered the of Erfurt  which he later described as a beerhouse and whorehouse.(Marty, Martin. Martin Luther. Viking Penguin, 2004, p. 4.) The schedule called for waking at four every morning for what has been described as a day of rote learning and often wearying spiritual exercises.( He received his masters degree in 1505.(Marty, Martin. Martin Luther. Viking Penguin, 2004, p. 5.)In accordance with his fathers wishes, Luther enrolled in law school at the same university that year but dropped out almost immediately, believing that law represented uncertainty.( Luther sought assurances about life and was drawn to theology and philosophy, expressing particular interest in Aristotle, of Ockham, and Biel.( He was deeply influenced by two tutors, Arnoldi von Usingen and Jodocus Trutfetter, who taught him to be suspicious of even the greatest thinkers( and to test everything himself by experience.(Marty, Martin. Martin Luther. Viking Penguin, 2004, p. 6.) Philosophy proved to be unsatisfying, offering assurance about the use of reason but none about loving God, which to Luther was more important. Reason could not lead men to God, he felt, and he thereafter developed a love-hate relationship with Aristotle over the latters emphasis on reason.( For Luther, reason could be used to question men and institutions, but not God. Human beings could learn about God only through divine revelation, he believed, and Scripture therefore became increasingly important to him.(He later attributed his decision to an event: on 2 July 1505, he was on horseback during a thunderstorm and a lightning bolt struck near him as he was returning to university after a trip home. Later telling his father he was terrified of death and divine judgment, he cried out, Help! Anna, I will become a monk!(Brecht, Martin. Martin Luther. tr. James L. Schaaf, Philadelphia: Fortress Press, 198593, 1:48.) He came to view his cry for help as a vow he could never break. He left law school, sold his books, and entered a closed Augustinian friary in Erfurt on 17 July 1505.(Schwiebert, E.G. Luther and His Times. St. Louis: Concordia Publishing House, 1950, 136.) One friend blamed the decision on Luthers sadness over the deaths of two friends. Luther himself seemed saddened by the move. Those who attended a farewell supper walked him to the door of the Black Cloister. This day you see me, and then, not ever again, he said.( His father was furious over what he saw as a waste of Luthers education.(Marty, Martin. Martin Luther. Viking Penguin, 2004, p. 7.)Monastic and academic lifeof Martin Luther as an Augustinian Monk.jpg|thumb|left|upright|Luther as an Augustinian monkLuther dedicated himself to monastic life, devoting himself to fasting, long hours in prayer, pilgrimage, and frequent confession.(Bainton, Roland. Here I Stand: a Life of Martin Luther. New York: Penguin, 1995, 4042.) He would later remark, If anyone could have gained heaven as a monk, then I would indeed have been among them.(Kittelson, James. Luther The Reformer. Minneapolis: Augsburg Fortress Publishing House, 1986), 53.) Luther described this period of his life as one of deep spiritual despair. He said, I lost touch with Christ the Savior and Comforter, and made of him the jailor and hangman of my poor soul.(Kittelson, James. Luther The Reformer. Minneapolis: Augsburg Fortress Publishing House, 1986, 79.)von Staupitz, his superior, concluded that Luther needed more work to distract him from excessive introspection and ordered him to pursue an academic career. In 1507, he was ordained to the priesthood, and in 1508 began teaching theology at the of Wittenberg.(Bainton, Roland. Here I Stand: a Life of Martin Luther. New York: Penguin, 1995, 4445.) He received a Bachelors degree in Biblical studies on 9 March 1508, and another Bachelors degree in the Sentences by Lombard in 1509.(Brecht, Martin. Martin Luther. tr. James L. Schaaf, Philadelphia: Fortress Press, 198593, 1:93.) On 19 October 1512, he was awarded his of Theology and, on 21 October 1512, was received into the senate of the theological faculty of the University of Wittenberg, having been called to the position of Doctor in Bible.(Brecht, Martin. Martin Luther. tr. James L. Schaaf, Philadelphia: Fortress Press, 198593, 1:1227.) He spent the rest of his career in this position at the University of Wittenberg.The start of the ReformationFile:Wittenberg Thesentuer Schlosskirche.JPG|thumb|right|upright|Door of All Saints Church in Wittenberg to which, by one account, Luther nailed his Theses on 31 October 1517, sparking the Reformation.In 151617, Tetzel, a friar and papal commissioner for indulgences, was sent to Germany by the Roman Catholic Church to sell indulgences to raise money to rebuild Peters Basilica in Rome.(Tetzel, Encyclopaedia Britanica, 2007: Tetzels experiences as a preacher of indulgences, especially between 1503 and 1510, led to his appointment as general commissioner by Albert, archbishop of Mainz, who, deeply in debt to pay for a large accumulation of benefices, had to contribute a considerable sum toward the rebuilding of St. Peters Basilica in Rome. Albrecht obtained permission from Leo X to conduct the sale of a special plenary indulgence (i.e., remission of the temporal punishment of sin), half of the proceeds of which Albrecht was to claim to pay the fees of his benefices. In effect, Tetzel became a salesman whose product was to cause a scandal in Germany that evolved into the greatest crisis (the Reformation) in the history of the Western church.) Roman Catholic theology stated that faith alone, whether fiduciary or dogmatic, cannot justify man;((Trent, l. c., can. xii: Si quis dixerit, fidem justificantem nihil aliud esse quam fiduciam divinae misericordiae, peccata remittentis propter Christum, vel eam fiduciam solam esse, qua justificamur, a.s.)) and that only such faith as is active in charity and good works (fides caritate formata) can justify man.((cf. Trent, Sess. VI, cap. iv, xiv)) The benefits of good works could be obtained by donating money to the church.On 31 October 1517, Luther wrote to his bishop, of Mainz, protesting the sale of indulgences. He enclosed in his letter a copy of his Disputation of Martin Luther on the Power and Efficacy of Indulgences, which came to be known as Ninety-Five Theses. Hans Hillerbrand writes that Luther had no intention of confronting the church, but saw his disputation as a scholarly objection to church practices, and the tone of the writing is accordingly searching, rather than doctrinaire.(Hillerbrand, Hans J. Martin Luther: Indulgences and salvation, Encyclopaedia Britannica, 2007.) Hillerbrand writes that there is nevertheless an undercurrent of challenge in several of the theses, particularly in Thesis 86, which asks: Why does the pope, whose wealth today is greater than the wealth of the richest Crassus, build the basilica of St. Peter with the money of poor believers rather than with his own money?(Luther objected to a saying attributed to Johann Tetzel that As soon as the coin in the coffer rings, the soul from purgatory attested as into heaven springs.(Thesis 55 of Tetzels One Hundred and Six Theses. These Anti-theses were a reply to Luthers Theses and were drawn up by Tetzels friend and former Professor, Wimpina. Theses 55 & 56 (responding to Luthers 27th Theses) read: For a soul to fly out, is for it to obtain the vision of God, which can be hindered by no interruption, therefore he errs who says that the soul cannot fly out before the coin can jingle in the bottom of the chest. In, The reformation in Germany, Clay Vedder, 1914, Macmillon Company, p. 405. http://books.google.com/books?idJQ4QAAAAIAAJ&pgPA405&dq%22For+a+soul+to+fly+out,+is+for+it+to+obtain+the+vision+of+God%22&hlen&ei1nAnTeHnNcOblgfCmPHeAQ&saX&oibook_result&ctresult&resnum1&ved0CCMQ6AEwAA#vonepage&q%22For%20a%20soul%20to%20fly%20out%2C%20is%20for%20it%20to%20obtain%20the%20vision%20of%20God%22&ffalse Animam purgatam evolare, est eam visione dei potiri, quod nulla potest intercapedine impediri. Quisquis ergo dicit, non citius posse animam volare, quam in fundo cistae denarius possit tinnire, errat. In: D. Martini Lutheri, Opera Latina: Varii Argumenti, 1865, Henricus Schmidt, ed., Heyder and Zimmer, Frankfurt am Main & Erlangen, vol. 1, p. 300. (on demand edition: Press, 2010, ISBN 1-142-40551-6 ISBN 978-1-142-40551-9). http://books.google.com/books?ids633jfx_uEUC&pgPA300&dq%22Quisquis+ergo+dicit,+non+citius+posse%22&hlen&eiDx4kTfLZKcH58AaOx8TTAQ&saX&oibook_result&ctresult&resnum4&ved0CDoQ6AEwAw#vonepage&q%22Quisquis%20ergo%20dicit%2C%20non%20citius%20posse%22&ffalse See also: )He insisted that, since forgiveness was Gods alone to grant, those who claimed that indulgences absolved buyers from all punishments and granted them salvation were in error. Christians, he said, must not slacken in following Christ on account of such false assurances.However, this oft-quoted saying of Tetzel was by no means representative of the official Catholic teaching on indulgences, but rather, more a reflection of his capacity to exaggerate. Yet if Tetzel overstated the matter in regard to indulgences for the dead, his teaching on indulgences for the living was pure.(See von Pastor, The History of the Popes, from the Close of the Middle Ages, Ralph Francis Kerr, ed., 1908, B. Herder, St. Louis, Volume 7, pp. 348349.http://books.google.com/books?idBqnLIpBkOk8C&pgPA348&lpgPA348&dq%22As+regards+indulgences+for+the+living,+Tetzel+always+taught+pure+doctrine%22&sourcebl&otsThLkFKwSU6&sigPGpPIQd4Vtq1QBmJ-vH7YNmaRms&hlen&eiOKE0TemuOonPgAessZTLCw&saX&oibook_result&ctresult&resnum2&ved0CB4Q6AEwAQ#vonepage&q%22As%20regards%20indulgences%20for%20the%20living%2C%20Tetzel%20always%20taught%20pure%20doctrine%22&ffalse)File:Jeorg Breu Elder A Question to a Mintmaker c1500.png|thumb|The sale of indulgences shown in A Question to a Mintmaker, woodcut by Breu the Elder of Augsburg, circa 1530.According to scholars Walter Krmer, Gtz Trenkler, Gerhard Ritter and Gerhard Prause, the story of the posting on the door, even though it has settled as one of the pillars of history, has little foundation in truth.(Krmer, Walter and Trenkler, Gtz. Luther, in Lexicon van Hardnekkige Misverstanden. Uitgeverij Bert Bakker, 1997, 214:216.)(Ritter, Gerhard. Luther, Frankfurt 1985.)(Gerhard Prause Luthers Thesanschlag ist eine Legende,in Niemand hat Kolumbus ausgelacht. Dsseldorf, 1986.) In his preface to the posthumous second pressing of Luthers compiled work, humanist and reformist Melanchthon writes reportedly, Luther, burning with passion and just devoutness, posted the Ninety-Five Theses at the Church in Wittenberg, Germany at All Saints Eve, October 31 (Old calendar). At the time he wrote the preface, Melanchthon lived in Tbingen, far from Wittenberg. In the preface, Melanchthon presents more untrue assertions: that indulgence salesman Tetzel publicly burned Luthers Ninety-Five Theses, that Luther held colleges on nature and physics, and that Luther had visited Rome in 1511. For a professor of the Wittenberg University to post theses on doors is unparalleled in history. Even further, Luther was strongly law abiding and it would have been against his character to publish his thoughts and direction in this manner. Moreover, Luther never mentioned anything in this direction in his writings, and the only contemporary account of the publishing of the theses is the Latin account by his servant Agricola, who states that Luther presents certain theses in the year of 1517 according to the customs of University of Wittenberg as part of a scientific discussion. The presentation of the theses was done in a modest and respectful way, preventing to mock or insult anybody.  He makes no mention of nailing the theses to a door, nor does any other source report this. In actuality, Luther presented a hand-written copy, accompanied with honorable comments to the archbishop Albrecht of Mainz and Magdeburg, responsible for the practice of the indulgence sales, and to the bishop of Brandenburg, Luthers superior.It wasnt until January 1518 that friends of Luther translated the 95 Theses from Latin into German, printed, and widely copied, making the controversy one of the first in history to be aided by the press.(Brecht, Martin. Martin Luther. tr. James L. Schaaf, Philadelphia: Fortress Press, 198593, 1:204205.) Within two weeks, copies of the theses had spread throughout Germany; within two months throughout Europe.Luthers writings circulated widely, reaching France, England, and Italy as early as 1519. Students thronged to Wittenberg to hear Luther speak. He published a short commentary on Galatians and his Work on the Psalms. This early part of Luthers career was one of his most creative and productive.(Spitz, Lewis W. The Renaissance and Reformation Movements, St. Louis: Concordia Publishing House, 1987, 338.) Three of his best-known works were published in 1520: the Christian Nobility of the German Nation, the Babylonian Captivity of the Church, and the Freedom of a Christian.Justification by faithFrom 1510 to 1520, Luther lectured on the Psalms, the books of Hebrews, Romans, and Galatians. As he studied these portions of the Bible, he came to view the use of terms such as penance and righteousness by the Catholic Church in new ways. He became convinced that the church was corrupt in its ways and had lost sight of what he saw as several of the central truths of Christianity. The most important for Luther was the doctrine of justification  Gods act of declaring a sinner righteous  by faith alone through Gods grace. He began to teach that salvation or redemption is a gift of Gods grace, attainable only through faith in Jesus as the Messiah.(Wriedt, Markus. Luthers Theology, in The Cambridge Companion to Luther. New York: Cambridge University Press, 2003, 8894.) This one and firm rock, which we call the doctrine of justification, he wrote, is the chief article of the whole Christian doctrine, which comprehends the understanding of all godliness.(Bouman, Herbert J. A. The Doctrine of Justification in the Lutheran Confessions, Concordia Theological Monthly, 26 November 1955, No. 11:801.)Luther came to understand justification as entirely the work of God. This teaching by Luther was clearly expressed in his 1525 publication the Bondage of the Will, which was written in response to On Free Will by Erasmus (1524). Luther based his position on Predestination on St. Pauls epistle to the . Against the teaching of his day that the righteous acts of believers are performed in cooperation with God, Luther wrote that Christians receive such righteousness entirely from outside themselves; that righteousness not only comes from Christ but actually is the righteousness of Christ, imputed to Christians (rather than infused into them) through faith.(Dorman, Ted M., Justification as Healing: The Little-Known Luther, Quodlibet Journal: Volume 2 Number 3, Summer 2000. Retrieved 13 July 2007.) That is why faith alone makes someone just and fulfills the law, he wrote. Faith is that which brings the Spirit through the merits of Christ.() Faith, for Luther, was a gift from God; the experience of being justified by faith was as though I had been born again. His entry into Paradise, no less, was a discovery about the righteousness of God  a discovery that the just person of whom the Bible speaks (as in Romans 1:17) lives by faith.()  He explained his concept of justification in the Articles:The first and chief article is this: Jesus Christ, our God and Lord, died for our sins and was raised again for our justification (Romans 3:2425). He alone is the Lamb of God who takes away the sins of the world (John 1:29), and God has laid on Him the iniquity of us all (Isaiah 53:6). All have sinned and are justified freely, without their own works and merits, by His grace, through the redemption that is in Christ Jesus, in His blood (Romans 3:2325). This is necessary to believe. This cannot be otherwise acquired or grasped by any work, law or merit. Therefore, it is clear and certain that this faith alone justifies us ... Nothing of this article can be yielded or surrendered, even though heaven and earth and everything else falls (Mark 13:31).(Luther, Martin. The Smalcald Articles, in Concordia: The Lutheran Confessions. Saint Louis: Concordia Publishing House, 2005, 289, Part two, Article 1.)Breach with the papacyFile:Pope-leo10.jpg|thumb|upright|Leo X by RaphaelArchbishop Albrecht of Mainz and Magdeburg did not reply to Luthers letter containing the 95 Theses. He had the theses checked for heresy and in December 1517 forwarded them to Rome.(Michael A. Mullett, Martin Luther, London: Routledge, 2004, ISBN 978-0-415-26168-5, 78; Oberman, Heiko, Luther: Man Between God and the Devil, New Haven: Yale University Press, 2006, ISBN 0-300-10313-1, 19293.) He needed the revenue from the indulgences to pay off a papal dispensation for his tenure of more than one bishopric. As Luther later noted, the pope had a finger in the pie as well, because one half was to go to the building of St Peters Church in Rome.(Mullett, 6869; Oberman, 189.)Pope Leo X was used to reformers and heretics,(Richard Marius, Luther, London: Quartet, 1975, ISBN 0-7043-3192-6, 85.) and he responded slowly, with great care as is proper.(Papal Bull Domine, 15 June 1520.) Over the next three years he deployed a series of papal theologians and envoys against Luther, which only served to harden the reformers anti-papal theology. First, the Dominican theologian Mazzolini drafted a heresy case against Luther, whom Leo then summoned to Rome. The Elector Frederick persuaded the pope to have Luther examined at Augsburg, where the Imperial Diet was held.(Mullett, 8182.) There, in October 1518, Luther informed the legate Cardinal Cajetan that he did not consider the papacy part of the biblical Church, and the hearings degenerated into a shouting match. More than his writing the 95 Theses, Luthers confrontation of the church cast him as an enemy of the pope.(Mullett, 82.) Cajetans original instructions had been to arrest Luther if he failed to recant, but he lacked the means in Augsburg, where the Elector guaranteed Luthers security.(Mullett, 83.) Luther slipped out of the city at night, without leave from Cajetan.(Oberman, 197.)In January 1519, at Altenburg in Saxony, the papal nuncio von Miltitz adopted a more conciliatory approach. Luther made certain concessions to the Saxon, who was a relative of the Elector, and promised to remain silent if his opponents did.(Mullett, 9295; Roland H. Bainton, Here I Stand: A Life of Martin Luther, New York: Mentor, 1955, OCLC 220064892, 81.) The theologian Johann Maier von Eck, however, was determined to expose Luthers doctrine in a public forum. In June and July 1519, he staged a disputation with Luthers colleague Karlstadt at Leipzig and invited Luther to speak.(Marius, 8789; Bainton, Mentor edition, 82.) Luthers boldest assertion in the debate was that Matthew 16:18 does not confer on popes the exclusive right to interpret scripture, and that therefore neither popes nor church councils were infallible.(Marius, 93; Bainton, Mentor edition, 90.) For this, Eck branded Luther a new Hus, referring to the Czech reformer and heretic burned at the stake in 1415. From that moment, he devoted himself to Luthers defeat.(G. R. Elton, Reformation Europe: 15171559, London: Collins, 1963, OCLC 222872115, 177.)ExcommunicationOn 15 June 1520, the Pope warned Luther with the bull (edict) Domine that he risked excommunication unless he recanted 41 sentences drawn from his writings, including the 95 Theses, within 60 days. That autumn, Eck proclaimed the bull in Meissen and other towns. von Miltitz, a papal nuncio, attempted to broker a solution, but Luther, who had sent the Pope a copy of On the Freedom of a Christian in October, publicly set fire to the bull and decretals at Wittenberg on 10 December 1520,(Brecht, Martin. (tr. Wolfgang Katenz) Luther, Martin, in Hillerbrand, Hans J. (ed.) Oxford Encyclopedia of the Reformation. New York: Oxford University Press, 1996, 2:463.) an act he defended in Why the Pope and his Recent Book are Burned and Assertions Concerning All Articles. As a consequence, Luther was excommunicated by Pope Leo X on 3 January 1521, in the bull Romanum Pontificem.Diet of WormsFile:Diet of Worms.jpg|thumb|Luther Before the Diet of Worms. Photogravure based on the painting by von Werner (18431915)The enforcement of the ban on the 95 Theses fell to the secular authorities. On 18 April 1521, Luther appeared as ordered before the of Worms. This was a general assembly of the estates of the Holy Roman Empire that took place in Worms, a town on the Rhine. It was conducted from 28 January to 25 May 1521, with Emperor Charles V presiding. Prince III, Elector of Saxony, obtained a conduct for Luther to and from the meeting.Johann Eck, speaking on behalf of the Empire as assistant of the Archbishop of Trier, presented Luther with copies of his writings laid out on a table and asked him if the books were his, and whether he stood by their contents. Luther confirmed he was their author, but requested time to think about the answer to the second question. He prayed, consulted friends, and gave his response the next day:Unless I am convinced by the testimony of the Scriptures or by clear reason (for I do not trust either in the pope or in councils alone, since it is well known that they have often erred and contradicted themselves), I am bound by the Scriptures I have quoted and my conscience is captive to the Word of God. I cannot and will not recant anything, since it is neither safe nor right to go against conscience. May God help me. Amen.(Brecht, 1:460.)Luther is sometimes also quoted as saying: Here I stand. I can do no other. Recent scholars consider the evidence for these words to be unreliable, since they were inserted before May God help me only in later versions of the speech and not recorded in witness accounts of the proceedings.(Wilson, 153, 170; Marius, 155.)Over the next five days, private conferences were held to determine Luthers fate. The Emperor presented the final draft of the of Worms on 25 May 1521, declaring Luther an outlaw, banning his literature, and requiring his arrest: We want him to be apprehended and punished as a notorious heretic.(Bratcher, Dennis. The Diet of Worms (1521), in The Voice: Biblical and Theological Resources for Growing Christians. Retrieved 13 July 2007.) It also made it a crime for anyone in Germany to give Luther food or shelter. It permitted anyone to kill Luther without legal consequence.At Wartburg CastleFile:Wartburg Eisenach DSCN3512.jpg|thumb|Wartburg Castle, Eisenach.Luthers disappearance during his return trip was planned. III, Elector of Saxony had him intercepted on his way home by masked horsemen and escorted to the security of the Castle at Eisenach.(Reformation Europe: 15171559, London: Fontana, 1963, 53; MacCulloch, Reformation: Europes House Divided, 14901700, London: Allen Lane, 2003, 132.) During his stay at Wartburg, which he referred to as my Patmos,(Luther, Martin. Letter 82, in Luthers Works. Jaroslav Jan Pelikan, Hilton C. Oswald and Helmut T. Lehmann (eds), Vol. 48: Letters I, Philadelphia: Fortress Press, 1999, c1963, 48:246; Mullett, 133. John, author of Revelation, had been exiled on the island of Patmos.) Luther translated the Testament from Greek into German and poured out doctrinal and polemical writings. These included a renewed attack on Archbishop Albrecht of Mainz, whom he shamed into halting the sale of indulgences in his episcopates,(Brecht, 2:1214.) and a Refutation of the Argument of Latomus, in which he expounded the principle of justification to Latomus, an orthodox theologian from Louvain.(Mullett, 132, 134; Wilson, 182.)In this work, one of his most emphatic statements on faith, he argued that every good work designed to attract Gods favor is a sin.(Brecht, 2:79; Marius, 16162; Marty, 7779.) All humans are sinners by nature, he explained, and Gods grace, which cannot be earned, alone can make them just. On 1 August 1521, Luther wrote to Melanchthon on the same theme: Be a sinner, and let your sins be strong, but let your trust in Christ be stronger, and rejoice in Christ who is the victor over sin, death, and the world. We will commit sins while we are here, for this life is not a place where justice resides.(Martin Luther, Let Your Sins Be Strong, a Letter From Luther to Melanchthon, August 1521, Project Wittenberg, retrieved 1 October 2006.)File:WartburgLutherstube1900.jpg|thumb|The room in Wartburg where Luther translated the Testament into German. An original first edition of the translation is kept under the case on the desk.In the summer of 1521, Luther widened his target from individual pieties like indulgences and pilgrimages to doctrines at the heart of Church practices. In On the Abrogation of the Private Mass, he condemned as idolatry the idea that the mass is a sacrifice, asserting instead that it is a gift, to be received with thanksgiving by the whole congregation.(Brecht, 2:2729; Mullett, 133.) His essay On Confession, Whether the Pope has the Power to Require It rejected compulsory confession and encouraged private confession and absolution, since every Christian is a confessor.(Brecht, 2:1821.) In November, Luther wrote The Judgement of Martin Luther on Monastic Vows. He assured monks and nuns that they could break their vows without sin, because vows were an illegitimate and vain attempt to win salvation.(Marius, 16364.)Luther made his pronouncements from Wartburg in the context of rapid developments at Wittenberg, of which he was kept fully informed. Karlstadt, supported by the ex-Augustinian Zwilling, embarked on a radical programme of reform there in June 1521, exceeding anything envisaged by Luther. The reforms provoked disturbances, including a revolt by the Augustinian monks against their prior, the smashing of statues and images in churches, and denunciations of the magistracy. After secretly visiting Wittenberg in early December 1521, Luther wrote A Sincere Admonition by Martin Luther to All Christians to Guard Against Insurrection and Rebellion.(Mullett, 13536.) Wittenberg became even more volatile after Christmas when a band of visionary zealots, the so-called prophets, arrived, preaching revolutionary doctrines such as the equality of man, adult baptism, and Christs imminent return.(Wilson, 192202; Brecht, 2:3438.) When the town council asked Luther to return, he decided it was his duty to act.(Bainton, Mentor edition, 16465.)Return to WittenbergLuther secretly returned to Wittenberg on 6 March 1522. During my absence, he wrote to the Elector, Satan has entered my sheepfold, and committed ravages which I cannot repair by writing, but only by my personal presence and living word.(Letter of 7 March 1522. Schaff, Philip, History of the Christian Church, Vol VII, Ch IV; Brecht, 2:57.) For eight days in Lent, beginning on Invocavit Sunday, 9 March, Luther preached eight sermons, which became known as the Invocavit Sermons. In these sermons, he hammered home the primacy of core values such as love, patience, charity, and freedom, and reminded the citizens to trust Gods word rather than violence to bring about necessary change.(Brecht, 2:60; Bainton, Mentor edition, 165; Marius, 16869.)Do you know what the Devil thinks when he sees men use violence to propagate the gospel? He sits with folded arms behind the fire of hell, and says with malignant looks and frightful grin: Ah, how wise these madmen are to play my game! Let them go on; I shall reap the benefit. I delight in it. But when he sees the Word running and contending alone on the battle-field, then he shudders and shakes for fear.(Schaff, Philip, History of the Christian Church, Vol VII, Ch IV.)The effect of Luthers intervention was immediate. After the sixth sermon, the Wittenberg jurist Jerome Schurf wrote to the elector: Oh, what joy has Dr. Martins return spread among us! His words, through divine mercy, are bringing back every day misguided people into the way of the truth.(Luther next set about reversing or modifying the new church practices. By working alongside the authorities to restore public order, he signalled his reinvention as a conservative force within the Reformation.(Marius, 169.) After banishing the Zwickau prophets, he now faced a battle not only against the established Church but against radical reformers who threatened the new order by fomenting social unrest and violence.(Mullett, 14143.)Peasants WarDespite his victory in Wittenberg, Luther was unable to stifle radicalism further afield. Preachers such as Zwickau prophet Storch and Mntzer helped instigate the Peasants War of 152425, during which many atrocities were committed, often in Luthers name. There had been revolts by the peasantry on a smaller scale since the 15th century.(Michael Hughes, Early Modern Germany: 14771806, London: Macmillan, 1992, ISBN 0-333-53774-2, 45.) Luthers pamphlets against the Church and the hierarchy, often worded with liberal phraseology, now led many peasants to believe he would support an attack on the upper classes in general.(A. G. Dickens, The German Nation and Martin Luther, London: Edward Arnold, 1974, ISBN 0-7131-5700-3, 13233. Dickens cites as an example of Luthers liberal phraseology: Therefore I declare that neither pope nor bishop nor any other person has the right to impose a syllable of law upon a Christian man without his own consent.) Revolts broke out in Franconia, Swabia, and Thuringia in 1524, even drawing support from disaffected nobles, many of whom were in debt. Gaining momentum under the leadership of radicals such as Mntzer in Thuringia and Michael Gaismair in Tyrol, the revolts turned into war.(Hughes, 4547.)Luther sympathised with some of the peasants grievances, as he showed in his response to the Articles in May 1525, but he reminded the aggrieved to obey the temporal authorities.(Hughes, 50.) During a tour of Thuringia, he became enraged at the widespread burning of convents, monasteries, bishops palaces, and libraries. In the Murderous, Thieving Hordes of Peasants, written on his return to Wittenberg, he explained the Gospel teaching on wealth, condemned the violence as the devils work, and called for the nobles to put down the rebels like mad dogs:Therefore let everyone who can, smite, slay, and stab, secretly or openly, remembering that nothing can be more poisonous, hurtful, or devilish than a rebel ... For baptism does not make men free in body and property, but in soul; and the gospel does not make goods common, except in the case of those who, of their own will, do what the apostles and disciples did in Acts 4 :3237. They did not demand, as do our insane peasants in their raging, that the goods of othersof Pilate and Herodshould be common, but only their own goods. Our peasants, however, want to make the goods of other men common, and keep their own for themselves. Fine Christians they are! I think there is not a devil left in hell; they have all gone into the peasants. Their raving has gone beyond all measure.(Jaroslav J. Pelikan, Hilton C. Oswald, Luthers Works, 55 vols. (St. Louis and Philadelphia: Concordia Pub. House and Fortress Press, 19551986), 46: 5051.)Luther justified his opposition to the rebels on three grounds. First, in choosing violence over lawful submission to the secular government, they were ignoring Christs counsel to Render unto Caesar the things that are Caesars; St. Paul had written in his epistle to the  that all authorities are appointed by God and therefore should not be resisted. This reference from the Bible forms the foundation for the doctrine known as the Right of Kings, or, in the German case, the divine right of the princes. Second, the violent actions of rebelling, robbing, and plundering placed the peasants outside the law of God and Empire, so they deserved death in body and soul, if only as highwaymen and murderers. Lastly, Luther charged the rebels with blasphemy for calling themselves Christian brethren and committing their sinful acts under the banner of the Gospel.(Mullett, 166.)Without Luthers backing for the uprising, many rebels laid down their weapons; others felt betrayed. Their defeat by the League at the of Frankenhausen on 15 May 1525, followed by Mntzers execution, brought the revolutionary stage of the Reformation to a close.(Hughes, 51.) Thereafter, radicalism found a refuge in the anabaptist movement and other sects, while Luthers Reformation flourished under the wing of the secular powers.(Andrew Pettegree, Europe in the Sixteenth Century, Oxford: Blackwell, ISBN 0-631-20704-X, 102103.)MarriageFile:Katharina-v-Bora-1526.jpg|thumb|left|upright|von Bora, Luthers wife, by Cranach the Elder, 1526Martin Luther married von Bora, one of 12 nuns he had helped escape from the Nimbschen convent in April 1523, when he arranged for them to be smuggled out in herring barrels.(Wilson, 232.) Suddenly, and while I was occupied with far different thoughts, he wrote to Wenceslaus Link, the Lord has plunged me into marriage.(Schaff, Philip, History of the Christian Church, Vol VII, Ch V, rpt. Christian Classics Ethereal Library. Retrieved 17 May 2009; Bainton, Mentor edition, 226.) Katherina was 26 years old, Luther was 41 years old.On 13 June 1525, the couple was engaged with Bugenhagen, Jonas, Apel, Melanchthon and Cranach the Elder and his wife as witnesses.() On the evening of the same day, the couple was married by Bugenhagen.( The ceremonial walk to the church and the wedding banquet were left out, and were made up two weeks later on 27 June.(Some priests and former monks had already married, including Karlstadt and Jonas, but Luthers wedding set the seal of approval on clerical marriage.(Lohse, Bernhard, Martin Luther: An Introduction to his Life and Work,, translated by Robert C. Schultz, Edinburgh: T & T Clark, 1987, ISBN 0-567-09357-3, 32; Brecht, 2:19697.) He had long condemned vows of celibacy on Biblical grounds, but his decision to marry surprised many, not least Melanchthon, who called it reckless.(Brecht, 2:199; Wilson, 234; Lohse, 32.) Luther had written to Spalatin on 30 November 1524, I shall never take a wife, as I feel at present. Not that I am insensible to my flesh or sex (for I am neither wood nor stone); but my mind is averse to wedlock because I daily expect the death of a heretic.(Schaff, Philip. Luthers Marriage. 1525., History of the Christian Church, Volume VII, Modern Christianity, The German Reformation.  77, rpt. Christian Classics Ethereal Library. Retrieved 17 May 2009; Mullett, 18081.)Before marrying, Luther had been living on the plainest food, and, as he admitted himself, his mildewed bed was not properly made for months at a time.(Marty, 109; Bainton, Mentor edition, 226.)Luther and his wife moved into a former monastery, The Black Cloister, a wedding present from the new elector John the Steadfast (152532). They embarked on what appeared to have been a happy and successful marriage, though money was often short.(Brecht, 2: 202; Mullett, 182.) Between bearing six children, Hans  June 1526, Elizabeth  10 December 1527 died within a few months, Magdalene  1529 died in Luthers arms in 1542, Martin  1531, Paul  January 1533, and Margaret  1534, Katharina helped earn the couple a living by farming the land and taking in boarders.(Oberman, 27880; Wilson, 237; Marty, 110.) Luther confided to Michael Stiefel on 11 August 1526: My Katie is in all things so obliging and pleasing to me that I would not exchange my poverty for the riches of Croesus.(Bainton, Mentor edition, 228; Schaff, Luthers Marriage. 1525.; Brecht, 2: 204.)Organising the churchBy 1526, Luther found himself increasingly occupied in organising a new church. His Biblical ideal of congregations choosing their own ministers had proved unworkable.(MacCulloch, 164.) According to Bainton: Luthers dilemma was that he wanted both a confessional church based on personal faith and experience and a territorial church including all in a given locality. If he were forced to choose, he would take his stand with the masses, and this was the direction in which he moved.(Bainton, Mentor edition, 243.) From 1525 to 1529, he established a supervisory church body, laid down a new form of worship service, and wrote a clear summary of the new faith in the form of two catechisms.To avoid confusing or upsetting the people, Luther avoided extreme change. He also did not wish to replace one controlling system with another. He concentrated on the church in the of Saxony, acting only as an adviser to churches in new territories, many of which followed his Saxon model. He worked closely with the new elector, John the Steadfast, to whom he turned for secular leadership and funds on behalf of a church largely shorn of its assets and income after the break with Rome.(Brecht, 2:26063, 67; Mullett, 18486.) For Luthers biographer Martin Brecht, this partnership was the beginning of a questionable and originally unintended development towards a church government under the temporal sovereign.(Brecht, 2:267; Bainton, Mentor edition, 244.) The elector authorised a visitation of the church, a power formerly exercised by bishops.(Brecht, 2:267; MacCulloch, 165. On one occasion, Luther referred to the elector as an emergency bishop (Notbischof).) At times, Luthers practical reforms fell short of his earlier radical pronouncements. For example, the Instructions for the Visitors of Parish Pastors in Electoral Saxony (1528), drafted by Melanchthon with Luthers approval, stressed the role of repentance in the forgiveness of sins, despite Luthers position that faith alone ensures justification.(Mullett, 18687; Brecht, 2:26465, 267.) The Eisleben reformer Agricola challenged this compromise, and Luther condemned him for teaching that faith is separate from works.(Brecht, 2:26465.) The Instruction is a problematic document for those seeking a consistent evolution in Luthers thought and practice.(Brecht, 2:268.)In response to demands for a German liturgy, Luther wrote a German Mass, which he published in early 1526.(Brecht, 2:25154; Bainton, Mentor edition, 266.) He did not intend it as a replacement for his 1523 adaptation of the Latin Mass but as an alternative for the simple people, a public stimulation for people to believe and become Christians.(Brecht, 2:255.) Luther based his order on the Catholic service but omitted everything that smacks of sacrifice; and the Mass became a celebration where everyone received the wine as well as the bread.(Mullett, 183; Eric W. Gritsch, A History of Lutheranism, Minneapolis: Fortress Press, 2002, ISBN 0-8006-3472-1, 37.) He retained the elevation of the host and chalice, while trappings such as the Mass vestments, altar, and candles were made optional, allowing freedom of ceremony.(Brecht, 2:256; Mullett, 183.) Some reformers, including followers of Zwingli, considered Luthers service too papistic; and modern scholars note the conservatism of his alternative to the Catholic mass.(Brecht, 2:256; Bainton, Mentor edition, 26566.) Luthers service, however, included congregational singing of hymns and psalms in German, as well as of parts of the liturgy, including Luthers unison setting of the Creed.(Brecht, 2:256; Bainton, Mentor edition, 26970.) To reach the simple people and the young, Luther incorporated religious instruction into the weekday services in the form of the catechism.(Brecht, 2:25657.) He also provided simplified versions of the baptism and marriage services.(Brecht, 2:258.)Luther and his colleagues introduced the new order of worship during their visitation of Electoral Saxony, which began in 1527.(Brecht, 2:263.) They also assessed the standard of pastoral care and Christian education in the territory. Merciful God, what misery I have seen, Luther wrote, the common people knowing nothing at all of Christian doctrine ... and unfortunately many pastors are well-nigh unskilled and incapable of teaching.(Mullett, 186. Quoted from Luthers preface to the Small Catechism, 1529; MacCulloch, 165.)CatechismsFile:MartinLutherWindow.jpg|thumb|150px|left|A stained glass portrayal of Martin Luther as a scholar. The Window was installed in Matthews German Evangelical Lutheran Church, Charleston, South Carolina by the Quaker City Glass Company in 1912.Luther devised the catechism as a method of imparting the basics of Christianity to the congregations. In 1529, he wrote the Large Catechism, a manual for pastors and teachers, as well as a synopsis, the Small Catechism, to be memorised by the people themselves.(Marty, 123.) The catechisms provided easy-to-understand instructional and devotional material on the Commandments, the Creed, the Prayer, baptism, and the Lords Supper.(Brecht, 2:273; Bainton, Mentor edition, 263.) Luther incorporated questions and answers in the catechism so that the basics of Christian faith would not just be learned by rote, the way monkeys do it, but understood.(Marty, 123; Wilson, 278.)The catechism is one of Luthers most personal works. Regarding the plan to collect my writings in volumes, he wrote, I am quite cool and not at all eager about it because, roused by a Saturnian hunger, I would rather see them all devoured. For I acknowledge none of them to be really a book of mine, except perhaps the Bondage of the Will and the Catechism.(Luther, Martin. Luthers Works. Philadelphia: Fortress Press, 1971, 50:17273; Bainton, Mentor edition, 263.) The Small Catechism has earned a reputation as a model of clear religious teaching.(Brecht, 2:277, 280.) It remains in use today, along with Luthers hymns and his translation of the Bible.Luthers Small Catechism proved especially effective in helping parents teach their children; likewise the Larger Catechism was effective for pastors.(See texts at English translation) Using the German vernacular they expressed the Apostles Creed in simpler, more personal, Trinitarian language. He rewrote each article of the Creed to express the character of the Father, the Son, or the Holy Spirit. Luthers goal was to enable the catechumens to see themselves as a personal object of the work of the three persons of the Trinity, each of which works in the catechumens life. That is, Luther depicted the Trinity not as a doctrine to be learned, but as persons to be known. The Father creates, the Son redeems, and the Spirit sanctifies, a divine unity with separate personalities. Salvation originates with the Father and draws the believer to the Father. Luthers treatment of the Apostles Creed must be understood in the context of the Decalogue (the Commandments) and the Prayer, which are also part of the Lutheran catechical teaching.(Charles P. Arand, Luther on the Creed. Lutheran Quarterly 2006 20(1): 125. Issn: 0024-7499; James Arne Nestingen, Luthers Catechisms The Oxford Encyclopedia of the Reformation. Ed. Hans J. Hillerbrand. (1996))Translation of the BibleLuther had published his German translation of the New Testament in 1522, and he and his collaborators completed the translation of the Old Testament in 1534, when the whole Bible was published. He continued to work on refining the translation until the end of his life.(Mullett, 145; Lohse, 119.)Others had translated the Bible into German, but Luther tailored his translation to his own doctrine.(Mullett, 14850.) When he was criticised for inserting the word alone after faith in Romans 3:28,(Mullett, 148; Wilson, 185; Bainton, Mentor edition, 261. Luther inserted the word alone (allein) after the word faith in his translation of St Pauls Epistle to the Romans, 3:28. The clause is rendered in the English Authorised Version as Therefore we conclude that a man is justified by faith without the deeds of the law.) he replied in part: The text itself and the meaning of St. Paul urgently require and demand it. For in that very passage he is dealing with the main point of Christian doctrine, namely, that we are justified by faith in Christ without any works of the Law . . . But when works are so completely cut away  and that must mean that faith alone justifies  whoever would speak plainly and clearly about this cutting away of works will have to say, Faith alone justifies us, and not works.(Lindberg, Carter. The European Reformations: Sourcebook. Blackwell Publishing Ltd., 2000. pg. 49. Original sourcebook excerpt taken from Luthers Works. St. Louis: Concordia/Philadelphia: Fortress Press, 195586. ed. Jaroslav Pelikan and Helmut T. Lehmann, vol. 35. pgs. 182, 187189, 195.)Luthers translation used the variant of German spoken at the Saxon chancellery, intelligible to both northern and southern Germans.(Wilson, 183; Brecht, 2:4849.) He intended his vigorous, direct language to make the Bible accessible to everyday Germans, for we are removing impediments and difficulties so that other people may read it without hindrance.(Mullett, 149; Wilson, 302.)Published at a time of rising demand for German-language publications, Luthers version quickly became a popular and influential Bible translation. As such, it made a significant contribution to the evolution of the German language and literature.(Marius, 162.) Furnished with notes and prefaces by Luther, and with woodcuts by Lucas Cranach that contained anti-papal imagery, it played a major role in the spread of Luthers doctrine throughout Germany.(Lohse, 11217; Wilson, 183; Bainton, Mentor edition, 258.) The Luther Bible influenced other vernacular translations, such as Tyndales English Bible (1525 forward), a precursor of the King James Bible.(Daniel Weissbort and Astradur Eysteinsson (eds.), TranslationTheory and Practice: A Historical Reader, Oxford: Oxford University Press, 2002, ISBN 0-19-871200-6, 68.)HymnsFile:EinFesteBurg.jpg|thumb|An early printing of Luthers hymn Mighty Fortress Is Our God (Ein feste Burg ist unser Gott)Luther was a prolific hymn writer, authoring hymns such as Ein feste Burg ist unser Gott (Mighty Fortress Is Our God), based on 46.(For a short collection see online hymns) Luther connected high art and folk music, also all classes, clergy and laity, men, women and children. His device for this linking was the singing of German hymns in connection with worship, school, home, and the public arena.(Christopher Boyd Brown, Singing the Gospel: Lutheran Hymns and the Success of the Reformation. (2005))Luthers 1524 creedal hymn Wir glauben all an einen Gott (We All Believe in One True God) is a three-stanza confession of faith prefiguring Luthers 1529 three-part explanation of the Apostles Creed in the Catechism. Luthers hymn, adapted and expanded from an earlier German creedal hymn, gained widespread use in vernacular Lutheran liturgies as early as 1525. Sixteenth-century Lutheran hymnals also included Wir glauben all among the catechetical hymns, although 18th-century hymnals tended to label the hymn as Trinitarian rather than catechetical, and 20th-century Lutherans rarely use the hymn because of the perceived difficulty of its tune.(Luthers 1538 hymnic version of the Prayer, Vater unser im Himmelreich, corresponds exactly to Luthers explanation of the prayer in the Small Catechism, with one stanza for each of the seven prayer petitions, plus opening and closing stanzas. The hymn functioned both as a liturgical setting of the Lords Prayer and as a means of examining candidates on specific catechism questions. The extant manuscript shows multiple revisions, demonstrating Luthers concern to clarify and strengthen the text and to provide an appropriately prayerful tune. Other 16th- and 20th-century versifications of the Lords Prayer have adopted Luthers tune, although modern texts are considerably shorter.(Robin A. Leaver, Luthers Catechism Hymns. Lutheran Quarterly 1998 12(1): 7988, 8998.)Luther wrote tiefer Not schrei ich zu dir (From depths of woe I cry to you) in 1523 as a hymnic version of 130 and sent it as a sample to encourage evangelical colleagues to write psalm-hymns for use in German worship. In a collaboration with Paul Speratus, this and seven more hymns were published in the first Lutheran hymnal, also called Achtliederbuch. In 1524 Luther developed his original four-stanza psalm paraphrase into a five-stanza Reformation hymn that developed the theme of grace alone more fully. Because it expressed essential Reformation doctrine, this expanded version of Aus tiefer Not was designated as a regular component of several regional Lutheran liturgies and was widely used at funerals, including Luthers own. Along with Erhart Hegenwalts hymnic version of 51, Luthers expanded hymn was also adopted for use with the fifth part of Luthers catechism, concerning confession.(Robin A. Leaver, Luthers Catechism Hymns: 5. Baptism. Lutheran Quarterly 1998 12(2): 160169, 170180.)Luthers 1540 hymn Christ unser Herr zum Jordan kam (To Jordan came the Christ our Lord) reflects the structure and substance of his questions and answers concerning baptism in the Small Catechism. Luther adopted a preexisting Walter tune associated with a hymnic setting of 67s prayer for grace; Wolf Heintzs four-part setting of the hymn was used to introduce the Lutheran Reformation in Halle in 1541. Preachers and composers of the 18th century, including J. S. Bach, used this rich hymn as a subject for their own work, although its objective baptismal theology was displaced by more subjective hymns under the influence of late-19th-century Lutheran pietism.(Luther wrote Gott, vom Himmel sieh darein (Oh God, look down from heaven). He wrote komm, der Heiden Heiland (Now come, Savior of the gentiles) based on Veni redemptor gentium. It became the main hymn (Hauptlied) for Advent. He transformed A solus ortus cardine to Christum wir sollen loben schon (We should now praise Christ) and creator spiritus to Komm, Gott Schpfer, Heiliger Geist (Come, Holy Spirit, Lord God).(Christoph Markschies, Michael Trowitzsch: Luther zwischen den Zeiten  Eine Jenaer Ringvorlesung; Mohr Siebeck, 1999; p. 215219 (in German).) He wrote two hymns on the Commandments, Dies sind die heilgen Zehn Gebot and Mensch, willst du leben seliglich. His seist du, Jesu Christ (Praise be to You, Jesus Christ) became the main hymn for Christmas. He wrote for Pentecost Nun bitten wir den heiligen Geist and for Easter Christ ist erstanden (Christ is risen), based on paschali laudes.Luthers hymns inspired composers to write music. Sebastian Bach included several verses as chorales in his cantatas and based cantatas entirely on them, namely lag in Todes Banden, BWV 4, as early as possibly 1707, in his second annual cycle (1724 to 1725) Gott, vom Himmel sieh darein, BWV 2, unser Herr zum Jordan kam, BWV 7, komm, der Heiden Heiland, BWV 62, seist du, Jesu Christ, BWV 91, and tiefer Not schrei ich zu dir, BWV 38, later feste Burg ist unser Gott, BWV 80, and in 1735 Gott nicht mit uns diese Zeit, BWV 14.Marburg Colloquy and Eucharist controversyFile:Statue of Martin Luther, St. Marys Church, Mitte, Berlin.jpg|thumb|upright|Statue of Martin Luther outside Marys Church, BerlinIn October 1529, I, Landgrave of Hesse convoked an assembly of German and Swiss theologians at the Colloquy, to establish doctrinal unity in the emerging Protestant states.(Mullett, 19495.) Agreement was achieved on fourteen points out of fifteen, the exception being the nature of the Eucharist  the sacrament of the Lords Supperan issue crucial to Luther.(Brecht, 2:32534; Mullett, 197.)The theologians, including Zwingli, Melanchthon, Bucer, and Oecolampadius, differed on the significance of the words spoken by Jesus at the Supper: This is my body which is for you and This cup is the new covenant in my blood (Corinthians 11:2326).(Wilson, 259.) Luther insisted on the Presence of the body and blood of Christ in the consecrated bread and wine, which he called the union,(Ausgabe 26, 442; Luthers Works 37, 299300.) while his opponents believed God to be only spiritually or symbolically present.(Oberman, 237.) Zwingli, for example, denied Jesuss ability to be in more than one place at a time but Luther stressed his ubiquity.(Marty, 14041; Lohse, 7475.) According to transcripts, the debate sometimes became confrontational. Citing Jesuss words The flesh profiteth nothing (John 6.63), Zwingli said, This passage breaks your neck. Dont be too proud, Luther retorted, German necks dont break that easily. This is Hesse, not Switzerland.(Quoted by Oberman, 237.) On his table Luther wrote the words Hoc est corpus meum (This is my body) in chalk, to continually indicate his firm stance.(Brecht 2:329.)Despite the disagreements on the Eucharist, the Marburg Colloquy paved the way for the signing in 1530 of the Confession, and for the formation of the League the following year by leading Protestant nobles such as of Saxony, Philip of Hesse, and Margrave of Brandenburg-Ansbach. The Calvinist Swiss cities, however, did not sign these agreements.(Oberman, 238.)On the soul after deathIn contrast to the views of Calvin(Psychopannychia (the night banquet of the soul), manuscript Orlans 1534, Latin Strasbourg 1542, 2nd.ed. 1545, French, Geneva 1558, English 1581.) and Melanchthon,(Liber de Anima 1562) through his life Luther maintained the idea that the soul was unconscious in death, and from this Luther came also to dispute traditional interpretations of some Bible passages, such as the parable of the man and Lazarus.(Sermons of Martin Luther: the House Postils, Eugene F. A. Klug, ed. and trans., 3 vols., (Grand Rapids, Michigan: Baker Book House, 1996), 2:240.) This also led Luther to reject the idea of torments for the saints: It is enough for us to know that souls do not leave their bodies to be threatened by the torments and punishments of hell, but enter a prepared bedchamber in which they sleep in peace(Weimarer Ausgabe 43, 360, 2123 (to Genesis 25,710): also Exegetica opera latina Vol 56 1833 p. 120 and the English translation: Luthers Works, American Edition, 55 vols. (St. Louis: CPH), 4:313; Sufficit igitur nobis haec cognitio, non egredi animas ex corporibus in periculum cruciatum et paenarum inferni, sed esse eis paratum cubiculum, in quo dormiant in pace.) However, Luther affirmed the continuation of ones personal identity beyond death. For example, in his Smalcald Articles he described the saints as currently residing in their graves and in heaven.(Smalcald Articles, Part II, Article II, paragraph 28)Franz August Otto Pieper argues that Luthers apparent teaching of sleep (German Seelenschlaf) was a source of embarrassment(Franz August Otto Pieper Christliche Dogmatik: bd. Das christliche leben. 1920 Hieraus geht sicher so viel hervor, da die abgeschiedenen Seelen der Glubigen in einem Zustande des seligen Genie ... der ein Genieen Gottes einschliet (so Luther), ist nicht als irrige Lehre zu bezeichnen.) to some later Lutherans, such as Gerhard.(Gerhard Loci Theologici, Locus de Morte) This was also the view of Lessing (1755) in his analysis of late Orthodoxy to these passages.(Article in the Berlinischer Zeitung 1755 in Complete Works ed. Karl Friedrich Theodor Lachmann  1838 p. 59 Was die Gegner auf alle diese Stellen antworten werden, ist leicht zu errathen. Sie werden sagen, da Luther mit dem Worte Schlaf gar die Begriffe nicht verbinde, welche Herr R. damit verbindet. Wenn Luther sage, da die Seele IS nach dem Tode schlafe, so denke er nichts mehr dabey, als was alle Leute denken, wenn sie den Tod des Schlafes Bruder nennen. Tode ruhe, leugneten auch die nicht, welche ihr Wachen behaupteten :c. Ueberhaupt ist mit Luthers Ansehen bey der ganzen Streitigkeit nichts zu gewinnen)Luthers Commentary on Genesis contains a passage which concludes ...the soul does not sleep (anima non sic dormit), but wakes (sed vigilat) and experiences visions.(Exegetica opera Latina, Volumes 56 Martin Luther, ed. Christopf Stephan Elsperger (Gottlieb) p. 120 Differunt tamen somnus sive quies hujus vitae et futurae. Homon enim in hac vita defatigatus diurno labore, sub noctem intrat in cubiculum suum tanquam in pace, ut ibi dormiat, et ea nocte fruitur quiete, neque quicquam scit de ullo malo sive incendii, sive caedis. Anima autem non sic dormit, sed vigilat, et patitur visiones loquelas Angelorum et Dei. Ideo somnus in futura vita profundior est quam in hac vita et tamen anima coram Deo vivit. Hac similitudine, quam habeo a somno viventia. (Commentary on Genesis  Enarrationes in Genesin, 15351545)) Francis Blackburne in 1765 argued that Jortin misread this and other passages from Luther,(Blackburne A short historical view of the controversy concerning an intermediate state (1765) p121) while Fritschel pointed out in 1867 that it actually refers to the soul of a man in this life (homo enim in hac vita) tired from his daily labour (defatigus diurno labore) who at night enters his bedchamber (sub noctem intrat in cubiculum suum) and whose sleep is interrupted by dreams.(Fritschel. Zeitschrift fr die gesammte lutherische Theologie und Kirche p. 657 Denn dass Luther mit den Worten anima non sic dormit, sed vigilat et patitur visiones, loquelas Angelorum et Dei nicht dasjenige leugnen will, was er an allen andern Stellen seiner Schriften vortragt)Henry Eyster Jacobs English translation from 1898 reads::Nevertheless, the sleep of this life and that of the future life differ; for in this life, man, fatigued by his daily labour, at nightfall goes to his couch, as in peace, to sleep there, and enjoys rest; nor does he know anything of evil, whether of fire or of murder.(Henry Eyster Jacobs Martin Luther the Hero of the Reformation 1483 to 1546 1898. Emphasis added.)On IslamAt the time of the Marburg Colloquy, the Magnificent was besieging Vienna with a vast Ottoman army.(Mallett, 198; Marius, 220. The siege was lifted on 14 October 1529, which Luther saw as a divine miracle.) Luther had argued against resisting the Turks in his 1518 Explanation of the Ninety-five Theses, provoking accusations of defeatism. He saw the Turks as a scourge sent to punish Christians by God, as agents of the Biblical apocalypse that would destroy the antichrist, whom Luther believed to be the papacy, and the Roman Church.(Andrew Cunningham, The Four Horsemen of the Apocalypse: Religion, War, Famine and Death in Reformation Europe, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press,. 2000, ISBN 0-521-46701-2, 141; Mullett, 23940; Marty, 164.) He consistently rejected the idea of a Holy War, as though our people were an army of Christians against the Turks, who were enemies of Christ. This is absolutely contrary to Christs doctrine and name.(From War against the Turk, 1529, quoted in William P. Brown, The Ten Commandments: The Reciprocity of Faithfulness, Louisville, KY: Westminster John Knox Press, 2004, ISBN 0-664-22323-0, 258; Lohse, 61; Marty, 166.) On the other hand, in keeping with his of the two kingdoms, Luther did support non-religious war against the Turks.(Marty, 166; Marius, 219; Brecht, 2:365, 368.) In 1526, he argued in Whether Soldiers can be in a State of Grace that national defence is reason for a just war.(Mullett, 23839; Lohse, 5961.) By 1529, in War against the Turk, he was actively urging Emperor Charles V and the German people to fight a secular war against the Turks.(Brecht, 2:364.)He made clear, however, that the spiritual war against an alien faith was separate, to be waged through prayer and repentance.(Wilson, 257; Brecht, 2:36465.) Around the time of the Siege of Vienna, Luther wrote a prayer for national deliverance from the Turks, asking God to give to our emperor perpetual victory over our enemies.(Brecht, 2:365; Mullett, 239.)In 1542, Luther read a Latin translation of the Quran.(Brecht, 3:354.) He went on to produce several critical pamphlets on the Islamic faith, which he called Mohammedanism or the Turk.(Daniel Goffman, The Ottoman Empire and Early Modern Europe, Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 2002, ISBN 0-521-45908-7, 109; Mullett, 241; Marty, 163.) Though Luther saw the Muslim faith as a tool of the devil, he was indifferent to its practice: Let the Turk believe and live as he will, just as one lets the papacy and other false Christians live.(From On war against the Turk, 1529, quoted in Roland E. Miller, Muslims and the Gospel, Minneapolis: Kirk House Publishers, 2006, ISBN 1-932688-07-2, 208.) He opposed banning the publication of the Quran, wanting it exposed to scrutiny.(Brecht, 3:355.)Augsburg ConfessionFile:ACAP.jpg||thumb|First edition of the Confession and Apology, 1531Shaken by the of Vienna, Charles V convened the Imperial Diet at Augsburg in 1530, aiming to unite the empire against the Turks.(Hughes, 55.) To achieve this, he needed first to resolve the religious controversies in his lands, considering with love and kindness the views of everybody.(Gritsch, 45.) He asked for a statement of the evangelical case, and one was duly devised by Luther, Melanchthon, and their colleagues at Wittenberg. Melanchthon drafted the document, known as the Confession, and travelled with the electors party to Augsburg, where it was read to the emperor and diet on 25 June 1530.(Mullett, 198200; Elton, 14849.)  (Luther was left behind at the Coburg fortress in southern Saxony because he remained under the imperial ban and lacked a safe-conduct to attend the diet.(Wilson, 265.))  Luthers writings during his 165 days at Coburg, including the Exhortation to all Clergy Assembled at Augsburg, show that, unlike Melanchthon, he was set against making concessions.(Mullett, 201203; Marius, 223.)Despite the Confessions avoidance of strident language or abuse of the pope, the diet rejected it on 22 September and ordered the reformers to renounce heresy and submit to the control of the Roman Catholic Church by the following April or face the imperial army.(Mullett, 207; Wilson, 269.)  That decision confirmed Luthers belief that the mission had been futile. It prompted the Lutheran princes to form a military alliance, the League, which Luther cautiously supported on grounds of self-defence in his Warning to His Dear German People of 1531.(Mullett, 208; Gritsch, 4849; Marius, 244.) The Augsburg Confession had become the statement of faith on which Lutherans were prepared to stand or fall. Though a modification of Luthers own position, it nevertheless is regarded as the first Lutheran treatise.(Mullett, 203204.)Anti-AntinomianismEarly in 1537, Agricola (14941566)  serving at the time as pastor in Luthers birthplace, Eisleben  preached a sermon in which he claimed that Gods gospel, not Gods moral law (the Commandments), revealed Gods wrath to Christians. Based on this sermon and others by Agricola, Luther suspected that Agricola was behind certain anonymous antinomian theses circulating in Wittenberg. These theses asserted that the law is no longer to be taught to Christians but belonged only to city hall.(Cf. Luther, Only the Decalogue Is Eternal: Martin Luthers Complete Antinomian Theses and Disputations, ed. and tr. H. Sonntag, Minneapolis: Lutheran Press, 2008, 2327. ISBN 978-0-9748529-6-6) Luther responded to these theses with six series of theses against Agricola and the antinomians, four of which became the basis for disputations between 1538 and 1540.(Cf. ibid., 1115.) He also responded to these assertions in other writings, such as his 1539 letter to C. Gttel Against the Antinomians,(Cf. Luthers Works 47:107119. There he writes: Dear God, should it be unbearable that the holy church confesses itself a sinner, believes in the forgiveness of sins, and asks for remission of sin in the Lords Prayer? How can one know what sin is without the law and conscience? And how will we learn what Christ is, what he did for us, if we do not know what the law is that he fulfilled for us and what sin is, for which he made satisfaction? (112113).) and his book On the Councils and the Church from the same year.(Cf. Luthers Works 41, 113114, 143144, 146147. There he said about the antinomians: They may be fine Easter preachers, but they are very poor Pentecost preachers, for they do not preach de sanctificatione et vivificatione Spiritus Sancti, about the sanctification by the Holy Spirit, but solely about the redemption of Jesus Christ (114). Having rejected and being unable to understand the Ten Commandments, ... they see and yet they let the people go on in their public sins, without any renewal or reformation of their lives (147).)In his theses and disputations against the antinomians, Luther reviews and reaffirms, on the one hand, what has been called the second use of the law, that is, the law as the Holy Spirits tool to work sorrow over sin in mans heart, thus preparing him for Christs fulfillment of the law offered in the gospel.(Cf. Luther, Only the Decalogue Is Eternal, 3336.) Luther states that everything that is used to work sorrow over sin is called the law, even if it is Christs life, Christs death for sin, or Gods goodness experienced in creation.(Cf. ibid., 170172) Simply refusing to preach the Ten Commandments among Christians  thereby, as it were, removing the three letters l-a-w from the church  does not eliminate the accusing law.(Cf. ibid., 76, 105107.) Claiming that the law  in any form  should not be preached to Christians anymore would be tantamount to asserting that Christians are no longer sinners in themselves and that the church consists only of essentially holy people.(Cf. ibid., 140, 157.)On the other hand, Luther also points out that the Ten Commandments  when considered not as Gods condemning judgment but as an expression of his eternal will, that is, of the natural law  also positively teach how the Christian ought to live.(Cf. ibid., 75, 104105, 172173.) This has traditionally been called the third use of the law.(The first use of the law, accordingly, would be the law used as an external means of order and coercion in the political realm by means of bodily rewards and punishments.) For Luther, also Christs life, when understood as an example, is nothing more than an illustration of the Ten Commandments, which a Christian should follow in his or her vocations on a daily basis.(Cf. ibid., 110.)The Ten Commandments, and the beginnings of the renewed life of Christians accorded to them by the sacrament of baptism, are a present foreshadowing of the believers future angel-like life in heaven in the midst of this life.(Cf. ibid., 35: The law, therefore, cannot be eliminated, but remains, prior to Christ as not fulfilled, after Christ as to be fulfilled, although this does not happen perfectly in this life even by the justified. ... This will happen perfectly first in the coming life. See also ibid., 4344, 9193.) Luthers teaching of the Ten Commandments, therefore, has clear eschatological overtones, which, characteristically for Luther, do not encourage world-flight but direct the Christian to service to the neighbor in the common, daily vocations of this perishing world.In the 20th century, there have been attempts to show that the third use of the law was a typical Reformed doctrine and that Luther himself never taught this,(E.g., by Erlangen theologian Elert (18851954), cf. ibid., 21.) but in light of Luthers disputations against the antinomians and other texts, this position cannot be maintained.Philip of Hesse controversyFrom December 1539, Luther became implicated in the bigamy of I, Landgrave of Hesse, who wanted to marry one of his wifes ladies-in-waiting. Philip solicited the approval of Luther, Melanchthon, and Bucer, citing as a precedent the polygamy of the patriarchs. The theologians were not prepared to make a general ruling, and they reluctantly advised the landgrave that if he was determined, he should marry secretly and keep quiet about the matter.(Brecht, Martin, Martin Luther, tr. James L. Schaaf, Philadelphia: Fortress Press, 198593, 3: 206.) As a result, on 4 March 1540, Philip married a second wife, Margarethe von der Sale, with Melanchthon and Bucer among the witnesses. However, Philip was unable to keep the marriage secret, and he threatened to make Luthers advice public. Luther told him to tell a good, strong lie and deny the marriage completely, which Philip did during the subsequent public controversy.(Brecht, Martin, Martin Luther, tr. James L. Schaaf, Philadelphia: Fortress Press, 198593, 3:212.) In the view of Luthers biographer Martin Brecht, giving confessional advice for Philip of Hesse was one of the worst mistakes Luther made, and, next to the landgrave himself, who was directly responsible for it, history chiefly holds Luther accountable.(Brecht, Martin, Martin Luther, tr. James L. Schaaf, Philadelphia: Fortress Press, 198593, 3:214.) Brecht argues that Luthers mistake was not that he gave private pastoral advice, but that he miscalculated the political implications.(Brecht, Martin, Martin Luther, tr. James L. Schaaf, Philadelphia: Fortress Press, 198593, 3:20515.) The affair caused lasting damage to Luthers reputation.(Oberman, Heiko, Luther: Man Between God and the Devil, New Haven: Yale University Press, 2006, 294.)Anti-Judaism and antisemitismFile:1543 On the Jews and Their Lies by Martin Luther.jpg|upright|thumb|The original title page of the Jews and Their Lies, written by Martin Luther in 1543Luther wrote about the Jews throughout his career, though only a few of his works dealt with them directly.(Michael, Robert. Holy Hatred: Christianity, Antisemitism, and the Holocaust. New York: Palgrave Macmillan, 2006, 109; Mullett, 242.) Luther rarely encountered Jews during his life, but his attitudes reflected a theological and cultural tradition which saw Jews as a rejected people guilty of the murder of Christ, and he lived within a local community that had expelled Jews some ninety years earlier.(Edwards, Mark. Luthers Last Battles. Ithaca: Cornell University Press, 1983, 121.) He considered the Jews blasphemers and liars because they rejected the divinity of Jesus, whereas Christians believed Jesus was the Messiah.(Brecht, 3:34143; Mullett, 241; Marty, 172.) At the same time, Luther believed that all human beings who set themselves against God shared one and the same guilt.(Rupp, Gordan. Martin Luther and the Jews. London: , 1972, 9.) As early as 1516, Luther wrote, ...Many people are proud with marvelous stupidity when they call the Jews dogs, evildoers, or whatever they like, while they too, and equally, do not realize who or what they are in the sight of God.(Luther, Lectures on Romans, Luthers Werke. 25:428.) In 1523, Luther advised kindness toward the Jews in That Jesus Christ was Born a Jew, but only with the aim of converting them to Christianity.(Brecht, 3:334; Marty, 169; Marius, 235.) When his efforts at conversion failed, he grew increasingly bitter toward them.(Noble, Graham. Martin Luther and German anti-Semitism, History Review (2002) No. 42:12; Mullett, 246.)Luthers other major works on the Jews were his 60,000-word treatise Von den Juden und Ihren Lgen (the Jews and Their Lies), and Vom Schem Hamphoras und vom Geschlecht Christi (On the Holy Name and the Lineage of Christ), both published in 1543, three years before his death.(Brecht, 3:34147.) Luther argued that the Jews were no longer the chosen people but the devils people: he referred to them with violent, vile language.(Luther, On the Jews and their Lies, quoted in Michael, 112.)(Luther, Vom Schem Hamphoras, quoted in Michael, 113.) Luther advocated setting synagogues on fire, destroying Jewish prayerbooks, forbidding rabbis from preaching, seizing Jews property and money, and smashing up their homes, so that these poisonous envenomed worms would be forced into labour or expelled for all time.(Luther, On the Jews and Their Lies, Luthers Werke. 47:268271.) In Robert Michaels view, Luthers words We are at fault in not slaying them amounted to a sanction for murder.(Luther, On the Jews and Their Lies, quoted in Robert Michael, Luther, Luther Scholars, and the Jews, Encounter 46 (Autumn 1985) No. 4:343344.) Luthers recommendations for how to treat the Jews was a clear reference to the sharp mercy of Deuteronomy 13, the punishments prescribed by Moses for those who led others to false gods.()Luther spoke out against the Jews in Saxony, Brandenburg, and Silesia.(Michael, 117.) of Rosheim, the Jewish spokesman who tried to help the Jews of Saxony in 1537, later blamed their plight on that priest whose name was Martin Luthermay his body and soul be bound up in hell!who wrote and issued many heretical books in which he said that whoever would help the Jews was doomed to perdition.(Quoted by Michael, 110.) Josel asked the city of Strasbourg to forbid the sale of Luthers anti-Jewish works: they refused initially, but relented when a Lutheran pastor in Hochfelden used a sermon to urge his parishioners to murder Jews.( Luthers influence persisted after his death. Throughout the 1580s, riots led to the expulsion of Jews from several German Lutheran states.(Michael, 11718.)Luther was the most widely read author of his generation, and he acquired the status of a prophet within Germany.(Gritsch, 11314; Michael, 117.) According to the prevailing view among historians,(The assertion that Luthers expressions of anti-Jewish sentiment have been of major and persistent influence in the centuries after the Reformation, and that there exists a continuity between Protestant anti-Judaism and modern racially oriented anti-Semitism, is at present wide-spread in the literature; since the Second World War it has understandably become the prevailing opinion. Johannes Wallmann, The Reception of Luthers Writings on the Jews from the Reformation to the End of the 19th century, Lutheran Quarterly, n.s. 1 (Spring 1987) 1:7297.) his anti-Jewish rhetoric contributed significantly to the development of antisemitism in Germany,(Berger, Ronald. Fathoming the Holocaust: A Social Problems Approach (New York: Aldine De Gruyter, 2002), 28; Johnson, Paul. A History of the Jews (New York: HarperCollins Publishers, 1987), 242; Shirer, William. The Rise and Fall of the Third Reich, (New York: Simon and Schuster, 1960).) and in the 1930s and 1940s provided an ideal underpinning for the National Socialists attacks on Jews.(Grunberger, Richard. The 12-Year Reich: A Social History of Nazi German 19331945 (NP:Holt, Rinehart and Winston, 1971), 465.) Reinhold Lewin writes that whoever wrote against the Jews for whatever reason believed he had the right to justify himself by triumphantly referring to Luther. According to Michael, just about every anti-Jewish book printed in the Reich contained references to and quotations from Luther. Himmler wrote admiringly of his writings and sermons on the Jews in 1940.(Himmler wrote: what Luther said and wrote about the Jews. No judgment could be sharper.) The city of Nuremberg presented a first edition of On the Jews and their Lies to Streicher, editor of the Nazi newspaper Strmer, on his birthday in 1937; the newspaper described it as the most radically anti-Semitic tract ever published.(Ellis, Marc H. Hitler and the Holocaust, Christian Anti-Semitism, (NP: Baylor University Center for American and Jewish Studies, Spring 2004), Slide 14. http://www3.baylor.edu/American_Jewish/everythingthatusedtobehere/resources/hh.htm.) It was publicly exhibited in a glass case at the rallies and quoted in a 54-page explanation of the Aryan Law by Dr. E.H. Schulz and Dr. R. Frercks.(See Noble, Graham. Martin Luther and German anti-Semitism, History Review (2002) No. 42:12.) On 17 December 1941, seven Protestant regional church confederations issued a statement agreeing with the policy of forcing Jews to wear the badge, since after his bitter experience Luther had already suggested preventive measures against the Jews and their expulsion from German territory. According to Goldhagen, Bishop Martin Sasse, a leading Protestant churchman, published a compendium of Luthers writings shortly after Kristallnacht, for which MacCulloch, Professor of the History of the Church in the University of Oxford argued that Luthers writing was a blueprint.(Diarmaid MacCulloch, Reformation:Europes House Divided, 14901700. New York:Penguin Books Ltd, 2004, pp. 666667.) Sasse applauded the burning of the synagogues and the coincidence of the day, writing in the introduction, On 10 November 1938, on Luthers birthday, the synagogues are burning in Germany. The German people, he urged, ought to heed these words of the greatest antisemite of his time, the warner of his people against the Jews.(Bernd Nellessen, Die schweigende Kirche: Katholiken und Judenverfolgung, in Buttner (ed), Die Deutchschen und die Jugendverfolg im Dritten Reich, p.265, cited in Daniel Goldhagen, Hitlers Willing Executioners (Vintage, 1997)) According to Professor Dick Geary, the Nazis won a larger share of the vote in Protestant than in Catholic areas of Germany in elections of 1928 to November 1932.(Who voted for the Nazis?(electoral history of the National Socialist German Workers Party,History Today, October 1998, Vol.48, Issue 10, pages 814)File:Judensau-Wittenberg.jpg|thumb|upright|Judensau on the Wittenberg Church, built 13001470.At the heart of scholars debate about Luthers influence is whether it is anachronistic to view his work as a precursor of the racial antisemitism of the National Socialists. Some scholars see Luthers influence as limited, and the Nazis use of his work as opportunistic. Biographer Brecht points out that There is a world of difference between his belief in salvation and a racial ideology. Nevertheless, his misguided agitation had the evil result that Luther fatefully became one of the church fathers of anti-Semitism and thus provided material for the modern hatred of the Jews, cloaking it with the authority of the Reformer.(Brecht 3:351.) Johannes Wallmann argues that Luthers writings against the Jews were largely ignored in the 18th and 19th centuries, and that there was no continuity between Luthers thought and Nazi ideology.(Wallmann, 7297.) Siemon-Netto agreed, arguing that it was because the Nazis were already anti-Semites that they revived Luthers work.(Siemon-Netto, The Fabricated Luther, 1720.)(Siemon-Netto, Luther and the Jews, Lutheran Witness 123 (2004) No. 4:19, 21.) Hans J. Hillerbrand agreed that to focus on Luther was to adopt an essentially ahistorical perspective of Nazi antisemitism that ignored other contributory factors in German history.(Hillerbrand, Hans J. Martin Luther, Encyclopaedia Britannica, 2007. Hillerbrand writes: His strident pronouncements against the Jews, especially toward the end of his life, have raised the question of whether Luther significantly encouraged the development of German anti-Semitism. Although many scholars have taken this view, this perspective puts far too much emphasis on Luther and not enough on the larger peculiarities of German history.) Similarly, Bainton, noted church historian and Luther biographer, wrote One could wish that Luther had died before ever the Jews and Their Lies was written. His position was entirely religious and in no respect racial.(Bainton, Roland: Here I Stand, (Nashville: Abingdon Press, New American Library, 1983), p. 297)(For similar views, see:* Briese, Russell. Martin Luther and the Jews, Lutheran Forum (Summer 2000):32;* Brecht, Martin Luther, 3:351;* Edwards, Mark U. Jr. Luthers Last Battles: Politics and Polemics 153146. Ithaca, NY: Cornell University Press, 1983, 139;* Gritsch, Eric. Was Luther Anti-Semitic?, Christian History, No. 3:39, 12.;* Kittelson, James M., Luther the Reformer, 274;* Oberman, Heiko. The Roots of Anti-Semitism: In the Age of Renaissance and Reformation. Philadelphia: Fortress, 1984, 102;* Rupp, Gordon. Martin Luther, 75;* Siemon-Netto, Uwe. Lutheran Witness, 19.)Other scholars argue that, even if his views were merely anti-Judaic, their violence lent a new element to the standard Christian suspicion of Judaism. Ronald Berger writes that Luther is credited with Germanizing the Christian critique of Judaism and establishing anti-Semitism as a key element of German culture and national identity.(Berger, Ronald. Fathoming the Holocaust: A Social Problems Approach (New York: Aldine De Gruyter, 2002), 28.) Paul Rose argues that he caused a hysterical and demonizing mentality about Jews to enter German thought and discourse, a mentality that might otherwise have been absent.(Rose, Paul Lawrence. Revolutionary Antisemitism in Germany from Kant to Wagner. Princeton University Press, 1990. Cited in Berger, Ronald. Fathoming the Holocaust: A Social Problems Approach. New York: Aldine De Gruyter, 2002, 28.)Since the 1980s, Lutheran Church denominations have repudiated Martin Luthers statements against the Jews and have rejected the use of them to incite hatred against Lutherans.(Synod deplores and disassociates itself from Luthers negative statements about the Jewish people and the use of these statements to incite anti-Lutheran sentiment, from a summary of Official Missouri Synod Doctrinal Statements)(Hull, Timothy Martin Luthers Basic Theological Writings, Second Edition (2005), p. 25)Final years and deathLuther had been suffering from ill health for years, including disease, vertigo, fainting, tinnitus, and a cataract in one eye.() From 1531 to 1546, his health deteriorated further. The years of struggle with Rome, the antagonisms with and among his fellow reformers, and the scandal which ensued from the bigamy of the of Hesse incident, in which Luther had played a leading role, all may have contributed. In 1536, he began to suffer from kidney and bladder stones, and arthritis, and an ear infection ruptured an ear drum. In December 1544, he began to feel the effects of angina.(Edwards, 9.)His poor physical health made him short-tempered and even harsher in his writings and comments. His wife Katharina was overheard saying, Dear husband, you are too rude, and he responded, They are teaching me to be rude.(Spitz, 354.)His last sermon was delivered at Eisleben, his place of birth, on 15 February 1546, three days before his death.(Luther, Martin. Sermon No. 8, Predigt ber Mat. 11:25, Eisleben gehalten, 15 February 1546, Luthers Werke, Weimar 1914, 51:196197.) It was entirely devoted to the obdurate Jews, whom it was a matter of great urgency to expel from all German territory, according to Poliakov.(Poliakov, Lon. From the Time of Christ to the Court Jews, Vanguard Press, p. 220.) James Mackinnon writes that it concluded with a fiery summons to drive the Jews bag and baggage from their midst, unless they desisted from their calumny and their usury and became Christians.(Mackinnon, James. Luther and the Reformation. Vol. IV, (New York: Russell & Russell, 1962, p. 204.) Luther said, we want to practice Christian love toward them and pray that they convert, but also that they are our public enemies ... and if they could kill us all, they would gladly do so. And so often they do.(Luther, Martin. Admonition against the Jews, added to his final sermon, cited in Oberman, Heiko. Luther: Man Between God and the Devil, New York: Image Books, 1989, p. 294. A complete translation of Luthers Admonition can be found in Wikisource.Against the Jews (1546))Luthers final journey, to Mansfeld, was taken because of his concern for his siblings families continuing in their father Hans Luthers copper mining trade. Their livelihood was threatened by Count Albrecht of Mansfeld bringing the industry under his own control. The controversy that ensued involved all four Mansfeld counts: Albrecht, Philip, John George, and Gerhard. Luther journeyed to Mansfeld twice in late 1545 to participate in the negotiations for a settlement, and a third visit was needed in early 1546 for their completion.The negotiations were successfully concluded on 17 February 1546. After 8:00 pm, he experienced chest pains. When he went to his bed, he prayed, Into your hand I commit my spirit; you have redeemed me, O Lord, faithful God (Ps. 31:5), the common prayer of the dying. At 1:00 am he awoke with more chest pain and was warmed with hot towels. He thanked God for revealing his Son to him in whom he had believed. His companions, Justus Jonas and Michael Coelius, shouted loudly, Reverend father, are you ready to die trusting in your Lord Jesus Christ and to confess the doctrine which you have taught in his name? A distinct Yes was Luthers reply.An apoplectic stroke deprived him of his speech, and he died shortly afterwards at 2:45 am on 18 February 1546, aged 62, in Eisleben, the city of his birth. He was buried in the Castle Church in Wittenberg, beneath the pulpit.(Brecht, Martin. Martin Luther. tr. James L. Schaaf, Philadelphia: Fortress Press, 198593, 3:36979.) The funeral was held by his friends Bugenhagen and Melanchthon.() A year later, troops of Luthers adversary V, Holy Roman Emperor entered the town, but were ordered by Charles not to disturb the grave.(A piece of paper was later found on which Luther had written his last statement. The statement was in Latin, apart from We are beggars, which was in German.1. No one can understand Virgils Bucolics unless he has been a shepherd for five years. No one can understand Virgils Georgics, unless he has been a farmer for five years.2. No one can understand Ciceros Letters (or so I teach), unless he has busied himself in the affairs of some prominent state for twenty years.3. Know that no one can have indulged in the Holy Writers sufficiently, unless he has governed churches for a hundred years with the prophets, such as Elijah and Elisha, John the Baptist, Christ and the apostles.Do not assail this divine Aeneid; nay, rather prostrate revere the ground that it treads.We are beggars: this is true.(Kellermann, James A. (translator) The Last Written Words of Luther: Holy Ponderings of the Reverend Father Doctor Martin Luther. 16 February 1546.)(Original German and Latin of Luthers last written words is: Wir sein pettler. Hoc est verum. Heinrich Bornkamm, Luthers World of Thought, tr. Martin H. Bertram (St. Louis: Concordia Publishing House, 1958), 291.)Luther is honoured on 18 February with a commemoration in the Lutheran Calendar of Saints and a feast day in the Episcopal (United States) Calendar of Saints; in the Church of Englands Calendar of Saints he is commemorated on 31 October.Works and editions* Exegetica opera latina  Latin exegetical works.* The standard German edition of Luthers Latin and German works is the Ausgabe, indicated by the abbreviation WA. This is continued into WA Br Weimarer Ausgabe, Briefwechsel (correspondence), WA Tr Weimarer Ausgabe, Tischreden (tabletalk) and WA DB Weimarer Ausgaber, Deutsche Bibel (German Bible).See also* and antisemitism* Consubstantiation* of Erasmuss correspondents* Calvin* Wycliffe* Marian theology* during the Reformation* Germanica* of Martin Luther* Martin Luther of Halle-Wittenberg (Germany)ReferencesFurther readingFor works by and about Luther, see Luther (resources) or Luthers works at Wikisource.*** Luther, M. The Bondage of the Will. Eds. I. Packer and R. Johnson. Old Tappan, N.J.: Revell, 1957. OCLC 22724565.* Luthers Works, 55 vols. Eds. T. Lehman and J. Pelikan. St Louis Missouri, and Philadelphia, Pennsylvania, 195586. Also on CD-ROM. Minneapolis and St Louis: Fortress Press and Concordia Publishing House, 2002.*Reu, Johann Michael Thirty-five Years of Luther Research Chicago: Wartburg Publishing House, 1917.External links*LutherLutherLuteroLuteroLterLutherLutherLutherLutherLutherLuterLutherLutherLutherLutherLutherLuteroLuteroLutherLutherLutherLutherLutherLutherLutherLutherLuterogan:Lu-tetLutherLutherLutherLutherLutherLutherLtherLuteroLutherLutherLutherLutherusLutersLutherLutherLutherLterMrtonLuteruLutherLutherLutherLutherja:LutherLutherLuthrLutherLutherLutherLuterLuteroLutherLutherLutherLutherLuteruLuteroLutherLuteruLutherLutherLutherLuterLutherLutherLutherLutherLutherLuteroLutherMartinzh-classical:LutherLutherzh-yue:LutherLioteriszh:
7590600
WNCC_(AM)
WNCC is a commercial AM station, licensed to the Borough of Northern Cambria, Pennsylvania.  WNCC operates on a federally-assigned frequency of 950 kHz with a maximum power output of 500 Watts.  HistoryWNCC first signed on the air back in 1950, licensed to the coal-mining community of Barnesboro (which would later merge with Spangler to form Northern Cambria) and like many small stations of its day, served the local area with a combination of local news, sports, and music.  The station first operated from the American Legion post in Barnesboro and under the ownership of North Cambria Broadcasters, Inc.  William Thomas served as the stations first general manager.The station first changed hands in January of 1960 when it was sold to WNCC Inc., a company headed by J. Howard Bair.  Studios were then moved to 803 Maple Avenue.  Ownership changed again on December 26, 1975 when the station was purchased by Bland Group, Inc., a company headed by William Bland.  Studios were then moved to 1015 Philadelphia Avenue, which later became known as Broadcast House.  During the final years of Bland Groups ownership, WNCC successfully applied for a construction permit for a new FM station.  The permit for 94.3 WRHB-FM was issued in the late 1980s, but as it turned out, would never sign on the air under Blands ownership.  Unforeseen circumstances forced Bland to turn the station over to a bankruptcy receiver, which then proceeded to sell WNCC to Johnstown-based Eagle Broadcasting in 1990.Eagle acquired WNCC, along with two other failing AM stations, WRDD in nearby Ebensburg, and WCRO, about 25 miles south in Johnstown.  Headed by J. Richard Lee and his daughter Jane, Eagle operated both WNCC and WRDD as simulcast outlets of WCRO, as that was the only station of the three that had an existing studio building.  The three stations identified themselves as Eagle Radio and broadcast a series of time-brokered religious programs throughout the day.In 1996, Eagle Broadcasting put all three stations up for sale, after a series of competing religious-formatted FM stations and translators signed on the air.  Both WRDD and WNCC were sold to Vernal Enterprises that year, with WCRO being spun off to the Greater Johnstown School District.  The company moved the operations of WNCC back to Barnesboro, where it was joined by WRDD, and set up operations in a new studio.  Both WNCC and WRDD simulcast a full-service format of oldies, news, and local sports, which Vernal Enterprises had demonstrated success with on a station that he had acquired four years earlier, AM 1380 WTYM in Kittanning.Both WNCC and WRDD were joined four years later by a co-owned FM sister station.  Vernal Enterprises was able to secure another construction permit after the window to put WRHB-FM had already come and long gone.  Taking call letters from a former oldies station licensed to suburban Altoona, the station signed on as WHPA-FM, billing themselves as broadcasting from the Heart of PennsylvaniA.  WHPA did not simulcast its two AM stations, but rather focused on a music-intensive Classic Hits blend of both oldies and rock.PersonalitiesThe late Bernie Smith (1939-2006), who would complete a 34-year career in radio and television before being elected County Commissioner in 1995, started his career at WNCC in 1962 before moving to WDAD (and later WCCS) in his native Indiana four years later.Dennis Pompa had served as WNCCs program director under Blands ownership until the station was sold to Eagle Broadcasting.  He returned to this position following the stations acquisition by Vernal Enterprises.One of the first on air personalities was John J Kopera of Hastings. After serving his country in World war II and earning a Bachelors degree from Indiana State Teachers College John started at WNCC. Until 1959 Kopera was host of the WNCC Saturday Afternoon Polka Party, playing Walter Solek, Stanky & His Coalminers, The Ampol Airs, Ray Henry and others . In addition he served as weekend staff announcer playing Top 40 hits and reporting on local news.WNCC TodayWNCC is currently silent.Sources* 1953 Broadcasting Yearbook* 1955 Broadcasting Yearbook* 1957 Broadcasting Yearbook* 1960 Broadcasting Yearbook* 1961-62 Broadcasting Yearbook* 1967 Broadcasting Yearbook* 1975 Broadcasting Yearbook* 1981 Broadcasting YearbookExternal links
7605145
History_of_the_Massachusetts_Institute_of_Technology
right|thumb|MITs Building 10 and Great Dome overlooking Killian CourtThe history of the Institute of Technology can be traced back to the 1861 incorporation of the Massachusetts Institute of Technology and Society of Natural History led primarily by Barton Rogers.Vision and missionthumb|right|upright|William Barton Rogers.As early as 1859, the Massachusetts State Legislature was given a proposal for use of newly opened lands in Back Bay in Boston for a museum and Conservatory of Art and Science.()On April 10, 1861, the governor of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts signed a charter for the incorporation of the Massachusetts Institute of Technology and Boston Society of Natural History which had been submitted by Barton Rogers, a natural scientist. Rogers sought to establish a new form of higher education to address the challenges posed by rapid advances in science and technology in the mid-19th century, that he believed classic institutions were ill-prepared to deal with.()With the charter approved, Rogers began raising funds, developing a curriculum and looking for a suitable location. The Rogers Plan, as it came to be known, was rooted in three principles: the educational value of useful knowledge, the necessity of learning by doing, and integrating a professional and liberal arts education at the undergraduate level.() MIT was a pioneer in the use of laboratory instruction.(1911 Encyclopedia Britannica, volume 4, p. 292: MIT was a pioneer in introducing as a feature of its original plans laboratory instruction in physics, mechanics, and mining.) Its founding philosophy is the teaching, not of the manipulations and minute details of the arts, which can be done only in the workshop, but the inculcation of all the scientific principles which form the basis and explanation of them;(The Founding of MIT, cites (1) Letter, William Barton Rogers to Henry Darwin Rogers, March 13, 1846, William Barton Rogers Papers (MC 1), Institute Archives and Special Collections, MIT Libraries.) Because open conflict in the Civil War broke out only two days later on April 12, 1861, Rogers faced enormous difficulties raising funds to match conditional financial commitments from the state. Thus, his recruitment of faculty and students was delayed, bur eventually MITs first classes were held in rented space at the Mercantile Building in downtown Boston in 1865.(Andrews, Elizabeth, Nora Murphy, and Tom Rosko(2004), William Barton Rogers: MITs Visionary Founder (Charter, laboratory instruction, first classes in Mercantile building).)Boston Tech (18651916):Includes the administrations of Barton Rogers (18621870, 18791881), Daniel Runkle (18701879), Amasa Walker (18711896), and Pritchett (19001907)Construction of the first MIT building was completed in Bostons Back Bay in 1866 and would be known as Boston Tech until the campus moved across the River to Cambridge in 1916. MITs financial position was severely undermined following the of 1873 and subsequent Depression.(Report of the Committee on Educational Survey, page 11)  Enrollments decreased sharply after 1875 and by 1878, the university had abolished three professorships, reduced faculty salaries, and there was talk among members of the Corporation of closing the Institute.()() In 1879, Runkle retired from a nine-year tenure as the MITs second president trying to weather these challenges, but the board of trustees (the MIT Corporation) was unable to secure a new successor and elected the seventy-five year-old founder Barton Rogers back to the post in the interim under his stipulated conditions that he be allowed to resign upon the discovery of a successor and $100,000 (${{formatnum:}} in 2009) be raised to fund the Institutes obligations.(File:Rogers-building.jpg|thumb|left|An 1889 photogravure of the 1865 Rogers Building in the foreground with the 1883 Walker Building in the background.Because no alumni of MIT were of sufficient age to fill the position, most scientific leaders lacked executive experience, and few leaders shared the founders, facultys, or Corporations vision for the young technical institute, Walkers previous experience and reputation made him uniquely qualified for the position.( Rogers wrote Amasa Walker in June 1880 to offer him the Presidency.() Walker ultimately accepted in early May and was formally elected President by the MIT Corporation on May 25, 1881, however, the assassination attempt on President Garfield in July 1881 and the ensuing illness before his death in September upset Walkers transition and delayed his formal introduction to the faculty of MIT until November 5, 1881.()() On May 30, 1882, during Walkers first Commencement exercises, Rogers died mid-speech where his last words were famously coal.() File:Francis Amasa Walker.jpg|thumb|right|upright|Francis Amasa Walker as President of MITWalker established a new general course of study (Course IX) emphasizing economics, history, law, English, and modern languages.() Walker also set out to reform and expand the Institutes organization by creating an Executive Committee, apart from the fifty-member Corporation, to handle regular administrative issues and emphasized the importance of faculty governance by regularly attending their meetings and seeking their advice on major decisions.()()MITs inability to secure a more stable financial footing during this era can largely be attributed to the existence of the Lawrence Scientific School at Harvard. Given the choice between funding technological research at the oldest university in the nation or an independent and adolescent institution, potential benefactors were indifferent or even hostile to funding MITs competing mission.() Earlier overtures from Harvard President William Eliot towards consolidation of the two schools were rejected or disrupted by Rogers in 1870 and 1878 and despite his tenure at the analogous Sheffield School, Walker also remained committed to MITs independence from the larger institution.()In light of the difficulties in raising capital for these expansions and despite its privately endowed status, Walker and other members of the Corporation lobbied the Massachusetts legislature for a $200,000 grant to aid in the industrial development of the Commonwealth. After intensive negotiations that called upon his extensive connections and civic experience, in 1887 the legislature made a grant of $300,000 over two years to the Institute, and would lead to a total of $1.6 million in grants from the Commonwealth to the Institute before the practice was abolished in 1921.()Walker sought to erect a new building on to address the increasingly cramped conditions of the original Street campus located near Square.() Because the stipulations of the original land grant prevented MIT from covering more than two-ninths of its current lot, Walker announced his intention to build the industrial expansion on a lot directly across from the Trinity Church fully intending that their opposition would lead to favorable terms for selling the proposed land and funding construction elsewhere.() With the financial health of the Institute only beginning to recover, Walker began construction on the partially funded expansion fully expecting the immediacy of the project to be a persuasive tool for raising its funds. The strategy was only partially successful as the 1883 building had laboratory facilities that were second-to-none but also lacked the outward architectural grandeur of its sister building and was generally considered an eyesore on its surroundings.() Mechanical shops were moved out of the Rogers Building in the mid 1880s to accommodate other programs and in 1892 the Institute began construction on another Copley Square building. New programs were also launched under Walkers tenure: Electrical Engineering in 1882, Chemical Engineering in 1888, Sanitary Engineering in 1889, Geology in 1890, Naval Architecture in 1893.()Walker also sought to improve the state of student life and alumni relations by supporting the creation of a gymnasium, dormitories, and the Technology Club which served to foster a stronger identity and loyalty among the largely commuter student body.() Walker also won considerable praise from the student body by reducing the required time spent in recitation and preparation, limited the faculty to examinations lasting no longer than three hours, expanded entrance examinations to other cities, started a summer curriculum, and launched masters and doctoral graduate degree programs. These reforms were largely a response to Walkers on-going defense of the Institute and its curriculum from outside accusations of overwork, poor writing, unapplicable skills, and status as a mere trade school.() Between 1881 and 1897, enrollments quadrupled from 302 to 1,198 students, annual degrees granted increased from 28 to 179, faculty appointments quadrupled from 38 to 156, and the endowment grew thirteen-fold from $137,000 to $1,798,000.(()In the following years, the science and engineering curriculum drifted away from Rogers ideal of combining general and professional studies and became focused on more vocational or practical and less theoretical concerns. To the extent that MIT had overspecialized to the detriment of other programs, the school up the river courted MITs administration with hopes of merging the schools. An initial proposal in 1900 was cancelled after protests from MITs alumni.() In 1914, a merger of MIT and Harvards Applied Science departments was formally announced(Maclaurin quoted: in future Harvard agrees to carry out all its work in engineering and mining in the buildings of Technology under the executive control of the president of Technology, and, what is of the first importance, to commit all instruction and the laying down of all courses to the faculty of Technology, after that faculty has been enlarged and strengthened by the addition to its existing members of men of eminence from Harvards Graduate School of Applied Science.) and was to begin when the Institute will occupy its splendid new buildings in Cambridge.() However, in 1917, the arrangement with Harvard was cancelled due to a decision by the State Judicial Court.(Division of Engineering and Applied Sciences.)MIT was the first university in the nation to have a curriculum in: architecture (1865), electrical engineering (1882), sanitary engineering (1889), naval architecture and marine engineering (1895), aeronautical engineering (1914), meteorology (1928), nuclear physics (1935), and artificial intelligence (1960s).()Cambridge campus and interwar years (19161940):Includes the administrations of C. Maclaurin (19091920), W. Stratton (19231930), and Taylor Compton (19301948)thumb|right|upright|MITs Great Dome and Building 10 under construction.thumb|left|200px|MIT Cambridge campus map from 1916 when it moved there from BostonThese attempted mergers occurred in parallel with MITs continued expansion beyond the classroom and laboratory space permitted by its building in Boston. President Maclaurin sought to move the campus to a new location when he took office in 1909.(Durant, Elizabeth, The New Tech : The Cambridge campus was--and is--a marvel, MIT Technology Review, Friday, September 08, 2006) An anonymous donor, later revealed to be Eastman, donated the funds to buy a mile-long tract of swamp and industrial land along the Cambridge side of the Charles River.A distinct new era in MITs history began when it moved into its new Cambridge campus in 1916.Designed by Welles Bosworth, who had made a name for himself in designing the AT&T headquarters in New York City,(For a discussion of the building and the history of its design, see: Mark Jarzombek Designing MIT: Bosworths New Tech (Northeastern University Press, 2004.) the new campus fomented some changes in the stagnating undergraduate curriculum. In the 1930s, President Taylor Compton and Vice-President Bush drastically reformed the curricula by reemphasizing the importance of pure sciences like physics and chemistry and reducing the work required in shops and drafting. Despite the difficulties of the Depression, the reforms renewed confidence in the ability of the Institute to develop leadership in science as well as in engineering.(Report of the Committee on Educational Survey, page 13) More fortuitously, they also cemented MITs academic reputation on the eve of War II by attracting scientists and researchers who would later make significant contributions in the Laboratory, Instrumentation Laboratory, and other defense-related research programs.World War Two and Cold War (19401966): Includes the administrations of R. Killian (1948-1959) and A. Stratton (1959-1966)MIT was drastically changed by its involvement in military research during World War Two. Bush, who had been MITs Vice President (effectively Provost) was appointed head of the of Scientific Research and Development which was responsible for the Project. Government-sponsored research had contributed to a fantastic growth in the size of the Institutes research staff and physical plant as well as a shifting the educational focus away from undergraduates to graduate studies.(During War II, MIT was one of 131 colleges and universities nationally that took part in the Navy College Training Program which offered students a path to a Navy commission.()Cold War and Space RaceAs the Cold War and Space Race intensified and concerns about the technology gap between the U.S. and the Soviet Union grew more pervasive throughout the 1950s and 1960s, MITs involvement in the complex was a source of pride on campus.  MITs Department of Nuclear Engineering as well as the Center for International Studies were established in 1957.Lewis ReportWalkers Course IX on General Studies was dissolved shortly after his death and a seventy year debate followed over what was the appropriate role and scope of humanistic and social studies at MIT.() A new Department of Economics, Statistics, and Political Science was established in 1903 to replace Course IX, which was later split into a Department of Economics and Statistics and a Department of History of Political Science in 1907.() Taylor Compton reorganized the Institute to incorporate a Division of Humanities under which these departments were placed in 1932, but could offer no degrees. Between 1918 and 1956, political science classes and faculty were subsumed or merged into any of History and English or Economics and Social Science until a separate Ph.D. program was approved in 1958.() A PhD program in Economics was launched in 1941.()The 1949 report of the Committee on Educational Survey recommended the establishment of a School of Humanities granting degrees which led to the establishment of the same in 1950 and separate departments in Economics and Political Science were formally established in 1965. Since 1975, all MIT undergraduate students have been required to take eight classes distributed across the School of Humanities, Arts, and Social Sciences before receiving their degrees.()()Social movements and activism (19661980):Includes the administrations of W. Johnson (19661971)(Johnson, Howard Wesley, Holding the Center: Memoirs of a Life in Higher Education, MIT Press, 2001. ISBN 0262600447) and Wiesner (19711980)Co-educationMIT has been nominally coeducational since admitting Swallow Richards in 1870. Female students, however, remained a tiny minority (numbered in dozens) prior to the completion of the first womens dormitory, McCormick Hall, in 1964. Women constituted 43% of the undergraduates and 29% of the graduate students enrolled in 2005.() Richards also became the first female member of MITs faculty, specializing in health.thumb|upright|right|Robert Robinson Taylor (Class of 1890)Anti-war protestsHowever, by the late 1960s and early 1970s, intense protests by student and faculty activists against military-related research required that the MIT administration spin these laboratories off into what would become the Stark Draper Laboratory and Laboratory. The extent of these protests is reflected by the fact that MIT had more names on President Nixons enemies list than any other single organization, among them its president Wiesner and professor Chomsky. Memos revealed during Watergate indicated that Nixon had ordered MITs federal subsidy cut in view of Wiesners anti-defense bias.()Social movementsMITs particular strain of anti-authoritarianism has manifested itself in other forms. In 1977, two female students, juniors Susan Gilbert and Roxanne Ritchie, were disciplined for publishing an article on April 28 of that year in the alternative MIT campus weekly Thursday. Entitled Consumer Guide to MIT Men, the article was a sex survey of 36 men the two claimed to have had sex with, and the men were rated according to their performance. Gilbert and Ritchie had intended to turn the tables on the rating systems and facebooks men use for women, but their article led not only to disciplinary action against them but also to a protest petition signed by 200 students, as well as condemnation by President Jerome B. Wiesner, who published a fierce criticism of the article.() Another minor campus uproar occurred when the traditional pornographic registration-day movie was replaced by Wars in 1984.()Course BiblesIn 1970, the then-Dean of Institute Relations, Benson R. Snyder, published Hidden Curriculum, in which he argued that a mass of unstated assumptions and requirements dominated MIT students lives and inhibited their ability to function creatively. Snyder contended that these unwritten regulations, like the implicit curricula of informally compiled course bibles (problem sets and solutions from previous years classes), often outweighed the effect of the formal curriculum, and that the situation was not unique to MIT.  After studying the behavior of MIT and Wellesley students, Snyder observed that bibles  were often in fact counterproductive; they fooled professors into believing that their classes were imparting broad knowledge as intended, but instead locked professors and students into a feedback cycle to the detriment of actual education.  The differential availability of bibles to some groups (e.g. certain fraternities and organized student groups) compared to the student body at large gave the former groups considerable grading advantages over the latter group.  This unfairness was compounded by some professors re-use of the same exam questions on a 4-year (or even shorter) cycle, apparently oblivious to the existence of bibles, even when disadvantaged students would occasionally point this out.However, with the spread of the Internet and especially MITs Courseware initiative, much course material from previous years is available to all students (even far beyond MIT), lessening the unfair advantage of exclusive access to course bibles.  Spurred by the inability to re-use old exams verbatim, professors must exercise more creativity, always remaking new problem sets and exam questions.   Therefore, even with the widespread availability of bibles online, students still need to think critically and understand concepts in depth  to solve each years newly created questions.  Indeed, some professors now harness the ingenuity of students by asking for new exam questions (and solutions), awarding extra grading credit for unusually creative new problems as well as solutions.New programs* MIT and Wellesley begin cross-registration program in 1968* UROP program established by MacVicar in 1969* Department of Mechanical Engineering offers 2.007 Introduction to Design, a robotics competition* MIT-Harvard Program in Health Sciences and Technology established in 1970. Becomes Whitaker College of Health Sciences, Technology, and Management in 1977.* Independent Activities Period (IAP) first offered in 1971* Council for the Arts founded in 1972.* Program in Science, Technology, and Society established in 1977.Changing roles and priorities (19802004):Includes the administrations of E. Gray (19801990) and M. Vest (19902004)Ethical disputesIn 1986, Baltimore, a Nobel Laureate, and his colleague, Imanishi-Kari, were accused of misconduct. The ensuing controversy involved a Congressional investigation and required him to resign from his new appointment as president of University although the allegations against Imanishi-Kari were dropped and Baltimore eventually became an endowed professor at and president of Caltech.Given the scale and reputation of MITs research accomplishments, allegations of misconduct or improprieties have received substantial press coverage. Professor Baltimore, a Nobel Laureate, became embroiled in a misconduct investigation starting in 1986 that led to Congressional hearings in 1991.()() Professor Postol has accused the MIT administration since 2000 of attempting to whitewash potential research misconduct at the Lincoln Lab facility involving a missile defense test, though a final investigation into the matter has not been completed.() Dean of Admissions Jones resigned in April 2007 after she misrepresented her academic degrees when she applied to an administrative assistant position in 1979 and never corrected the record despite her subsequent promotions.()()Civic relationsThe Cambridge City Council imposed a city-wide moratorium on research into DNA in 1976 in response to community concerns that Harvard and MIT researchers may inadvertently release mutant organisms into the ecosystem but the ban was lifted in 1977 after an extensive dialogue between scientists, politicians, and community leaders.()() Throughout the late 1980s and early 1990s, American politicians and business leaders accused MIT and other universities of contributing to a declining economy by transferring taxpayer-funded research and technology to international  especially Japanese  firms that were competing with struggling American businesses.()()()()The Justice Department filed an antitrust suit against MIT and the eight League colleges in 1991 for holding Overlap Meetings to prevent bidding wars over promising students from consuming funds for need-based scholarships. While the Ivy League institutions settled, MIT contested the charges on the grounds that the practice was not anticompetitive because it ensured the availability of aid for the greatest number of students.() MIT ultimately prevailed when the Justice Department dropped the case in 1994.()() In 2001, the Environmental Protection Agency sued MIT for violating Water Act and Air Act with regard to its waste storage and disposal procedures.() MIT settled the suit by paying a $155,000 fine and launching three environmental projects.()Suicide and mental healthA number of student deaths in the late 1990s and early 2000s resulted in considerable media attention to MITs culture and student life.()  After the alcohol-related death of Scott Krueger in September 1997 as a new member at the Gamma Delta fraternity, MIT began requiring all freshmen to live in the dormitory system.() The 2000 suicide of MIT undergraduate Shin drew attention to suicides at MIT and created a controversy over whether MIT had an unusually high suicide rate.()() In late 2001 a task forces recommended improvements in student health services() were implemented, including expanding staff and operating hours at the mental health center.() These and later cases were significant as well because they sought to prove the negligence and liability of university administrators loco parentis.()Faculty diversityMIT has been nominally coeducational since admitting Swallow Richards in 1870. (Richards also became the first female member of MITs faculty, specializing in sanitary chemistry.)() Female students, however, remained a very small minority (numbered in dozens) prior to the completion of the first wing of a womens dormitory, McCormick Hall, in 1963.(In 1959, 158 women were enrolled at MIT. )(When Drake arrived on campus 50 years ago, she was one of only 16 women in a class of 1,000.)  By 1993, 32% of MITs  undergraduates were female and in 2006, the number had increased to near-parity (47.5%).() A 1998 MIT study concluded that a bias against female faculty existed in its college of science,() although the studys methods were controversial.(In 1995, faculty member Nancy Hopkins accused MIT of bias against herself and several of her female colleagues.  Hopkins, rather than a third party, investigated her own charges and concluded in 1999 concluded there was subtle yet pervasive bias against women at MIT, although no instance of intentional discrimination was found. Despite the studys sealed evidence and its lack of peer review, Vest approved targeted actions like the creation of 11 committees and 20% salary increases for women faculty.)() Since the study, the number of women undergraduates increased from 34 percent to 42 percent, women graduate students has increased from 20 percent to 29 percent, and women outnumber men in 10 undergraduate majors. Additionally, women have headed departments within the school of science, engineering, and MIT has appointed no fewer than five female vice presidents.() Hockfield, a molecular neurobiologist, became MITs 16th president on December 6, 2004 and is the first woman to hold the post. While the student body has become more balanced in recent years, women are still a distinct minority among faculty.Tenure outcomes have vaulted MIT into the national spotlight on several occasions. The 1984 dismissal of F. Noble, a historian of technology, became a celebre about the extent to which academics are granted of speech after he published several books and papers critical of MITs and other research universities reliance upon financial support from corporations and the military.() Former materials science professor Gretchen Kalonji sued MIT in 1994 alleging that she was denied tenure because of sexual discrimination.() In 1997, the Commission Against Discrimination issued a probable cause finding supporting James Jennings allegations that he was not offered reciprocal tenure in the Department of Urban Studies and Planning for a post in MITs Community Fellow Program after the senior faculty search committee believed that he was not a top black scholar in the country.() In 2006-2007, MITs denial of tenure to African-American biological engineering professor Sherley prompted accusations of racism in MITs tenure process, eventually leading to a protracted public dispute with the administration, a brief strike, and the resignation of Professor L. Douglas in protest.()()Globalization and new initiatives (2000present):Includes the administration of Hockfield (2004)*In 2000, MIT extended the existing Writing Requirement to a new Communication Requirement, encompassing spoken as well as written expression, as an undergraduate degree requirement.*In 2001, MIT announced that it planned to put many of its course materials online as part of its OpenCourseWare project. This was largely accomplished by 2010, with material from over 2,000 courses available to all.*Negroponte of the Media Lab co-founded and became head of the Laptop per Child initiative.*Hockfield launched the MIT Energy Research council to explore how MIT can respond to the interdisciplinary challenges of global energy consumption.*Consolidation of old programs like Ocean Engineering into Mechanical Engineering and emergence of interdisciplinary departments like Biological Engineering and Computational Biology.*International collaborations and educational initiatives with of Cambridge in England and University of Singapore and Technological University in Singapore.References Further reading * Names on Institute Buildings Lend Inspiration to Future Scientists, The Tech, Friday, December 22, 1922External links* MIT Institute Archives* MIT Museum* MIT HOUSING 1916-1997: A chronology of events, reports and other publications* MIT 150th Anniversary Exhibition site, collecting nominations of & comments about objects that are emblematic of MIT
7616600
Polytechnical_Museum
Polytechnical Museum () is a museum in Moscow that emphasizes the progress of Russian and Soviet technology and science, as well as modern inventions and developments. It was founded in 1872 after the first Technical Exhibition on the bicentennial anniversary of the birth of the Great. (Polytechnic Museum, History) The first stage of the museum was designed by Monighetti and completed in 1877.( Almost from the beginning the collection was too big for the space. The north wing was added in 1896 and the south wing in 1907.It is the largest technical museum in Russia, offering a wide array of historical inventions and technological achievements, including humanoid automata of the 18th century and the first Soviet computers. Its collection contains more than 160,000 items in 65 halls including, Chemistry, Mining, Metallurgy, Transport, Energy, Optics, Automation, Engineering, electronics, Communications, and exploration. Highlights include the first telescope; an early solar microscope, created by German anatomists Nathanael Lieberkhn; an early seismograph created by Borisovich Galitzine; galvanoplastics by von Jacobi; and early electric lights by Yablochkov.(Polytechnical museum, The Museum Collections) The automobile exhibit includes a Russo-Balt K12/20 and a Pobeda. ReferencesExternal links*Polytechnical Museum *Photos of the museum *State Polytechnical Museum (Moscow) Museum
7622475
Springtime_(2004_film)
When Spring Comes (  ) is a 2004 Korean film starring Min-sik as a struggling musician who takes a job as a music teacher in a rural mining town outside of Seoul.Awards*Asian Film Award - Special Mention - 2004, International Film Festival External links * * * * * * Spring Comesja:Spring Comes
7635679
Ronald_M._Clowes
Dr. Ronald M. Clowes, CM is an award winning professor specializing in seismic and other geophysical studies of the Earths lithosphere. For his work he has been appointed a Member of the of Canada.He completed three degrees while attending the of Alberta; B.Sc. (1964), M.Sc. (1966), Ph.D. (1969). In 1969-1970, Clowes completed an NRC Postdoctoral Fellowship at National University. He became a Professor at the of British Columbia in 1970. In 1987, he became the director of Lithoprobe, a national geoscience research project. Clowes continues to teach at UBC as a Professor in the Department of Earth and Ocean Sciences. His research, with colleagues and students, focuses on seismic and other geophysical studies of the Earths lithosphere; and relation of the results to geology and tectonics.Awards *2005- Medal, Association of Canadas highest honour*2004-2006- Canada Council Killam Research Fellowship*2002- Elizabeth II Golden Jubilee Medal*1998- Member, Order of Canada  *1998- Tuzo Wilson Medal, Geophysical Union *1997- Distinguished Lecturer Award, The Institute of Mining, Metallurgy and Petroleum *1995- Honorary Member, Canadian Society of Exploration Geophysicists *1995- Distinguished Fellow, Geological Association of Canada *1994- Fellow, Society of Canada *1993- George P. Woollard Award, Society of America *1988- Past President`s Medal, Geological Association of Canada  *1987-88- Canada Council Killam Research Fellowship (declined); *1966, 1981- Best Paper Award, Canadian Society of Exploration Geophysicists*1968- Best Paper Award, GeophysicsExternal links* University of British Columbia Faculty Bio*  Abstract - Comparison of lithospheric structures across the Alaskan and Canadian Cordillera
7651680
Salwa_Judum
size 4,000Salwa Judum (meaning Peace March(Salwa Judum - menace or messiah? TOI, Mar 20, 2010) or Purification Hunt (Left in the lurch Indian Express, July 10, 2011)in language) refers to a militia in Chhattisgarh, India, which is aimed at countering the naxalite violence in the region. The militia consisting of local tribal youth receives support and and training from the Chhattisgarh state government.On July 5 2011, the Court of India declared the militia as illegal and unconstitutional. The court directed the Chhattisgarh government to recover all the firearms given along with the ammunition and accessories. It also ordered the government to investigate all instances of alleged criminal activities of Salwa Judum.(Salwa Judum is illegal, says SC The Hindu July 5, 2011) The use of Salwa Judum by the government for anti naxal operations was criticized for its violations of human rights, use of child soldiers and poorly trained uneducated youth for counter-insurgency roles.OriginsSalwa Judum started in 2006 as a peoples resistance movement against the Naxalites, a far-left movement in some states in rural India that is designated by India as a terrorist organization on account of their violent Maoist activities in the state.(http://www.telegraphindia.com/1060627/asp/opinion/story_6402011.asp Ramachandra Guha.) Initially an uprising of local indigenous people in Chhattisgarh, the Salwa Judum movement later received bi-partisan support from both the opposition and ruling parties.((http://www.dailypioneer.com/206533/Mao%E2%80%99s-horsemen-of-the-apocalypse.html Kanchan Gupta.) A few years later the state government adopted the Salwa Judum movement in order to restore democratic rule to the regions where the Naxalites had established themselves by force.(http://www.dailypioneer.com/208205/Mao%E2%80%99s-Malefactors.html Pioneer)Chhattisgarh state has over the years trained a number of SPOs or Special Police Officers (also popularly referred as Koya commandos), from amongst the tribals, who are part of Salwa Judum in the state, also with its formation the state witnessed a marked rise in success against Naxalite action,(CoBRA reaches Bastar to join anti-Naxal ops Express, February 5, 2009.) as a result in 2008, Chhattisgarh along with neighboring Jharkhand accounted for over 65% of the total Naxal violence in the country.(Centre gives its tacit approval to Salwa Judum of India, January 8, 2009.)With success of counter-strikes on Naxalite hideouts in south Chhattisgarh, Maoist activities in the bordering districts of Orissa saw a rise in 2008, thus in Feb 2009, the Central government announced its plans for simultaneous, co-ordinated counter-operations in all Maoist extremism-hit states - Chhattisgarh, Orissa, Andhra Pradesh, Maharashtra, Jharkhand, Bihar, UP and West Bengal, to plug all possible escape routes of Naxalites.(Co-ordinated operations to flush out Naxalites soon Economic Times, February 6, 2009.)HistoryImage:SalwaJudumsoldiers.JPG|200px|right|thumb|Salwa Judum volunteers in Southern ChhattisgarhBastar and districts of Chhattisgarh have traditionally been sparsely populated, rich in natural resources, and yet some of the poorest tribal regions. Here the Maoists (Naxalites) have continued to enlarge their control among the local tribals over the past two decades by force.(http://planningcommission.gov.in/reports/publications/rep_dce.pdf) The first movement against the Naxalites was the Jan Jagran Abhiyan, started in 1991 by Karma. This was mostly led by local traders and businessmen.(http://www.pucl.org/Topics/Human-rights/2006/salwa_judum.pdf) This later collapsed, and the leaders had to seek police protection to survive. However, the second time around the state had signed the MoUs with the Tata and Essar groups, and was eager to flush the region of the Naxalites in order let the mining companies smoothly operate there. This was the beginning of the police support and military to the movement. A a local tribal leader, Mahendra Karma, a Congress MLA and the leader of opposition in the State Legislative Assembly, jumped into the fray as a political opportunity becoming the public front he took the Bijapur-based movement to Dantewada, Katreli and other villages in the region.(Inside Indias hidden war Guardian, May 9, 2006.)(Salwa Judum cant work in the long run Chhattisgarh Director General of Police Vishwa Ranjan. Standard, January 13, 2008.)Salwa Judum herded villagers and tibals in makeshift camps, where human rights abuses were rife. Salwa Judum became increasingly violent and out of control.() Salwa Judum is also accused of burning and evacuating out 644 or more villages, making 300,000 people flee their homes.(http://www.otherindia.org/dev/index.php?optioncom_content&viewarticle&id25&Itemid57)As the situation further escalated in the coming years, Rights Watch reported atrocities at both ends, and reported large scale displacement of the civilian population caught in the conflict between the Naxalites and Salwa Judum activists with at least 100,000 people moving to various camps in southern Chhattisgarh or fleeing to neighbouring Andhra Pradesh as of early 2008.(Salwa Judum, forces too violating rights Times of India, July 16, 2008.The 182-page report  Being Neutral Is Our Biggest Crime: Government, Vigilante and Naxalite Abuses in Indias Chhattisgarh State  documents human rights abuses against civilians, particularly tribals, caught in a tug-of-war between government forces, Salwa Judum and Naxalites. )(Indian state backing vigilantes News, July 15, 2008.) By mid-2008 the figure grew to 150,000 tribals being displaced.(How the Salwa Judum experiment went wrong The Mint, July 10, 2008.) There was also widespread report of rape and other abuses on women by the Judum.(Existence of Salwa Judum necessary)Since the inception of the movement in 2005, over 800 people, including some 300 security personnel, have been killed by the Naxalites, SPO deaths alone total 98  one in 2005; 29 in 2006; 66 in 2007; and 20 in 2008,(( when the Maoists rebels continued their attacks, though now considerably more dramatic from the previous years, they were now splitting into smaller groups and specifically targeting Salwa Judum leaders and security personnel who were ambushed in weekly markets in remote areas, and their weapons stolen, also posters threatening Salwa Judum leaders continued to appear in villages across Dantewada and Bijapur.(at least 18 people associated with Salwa Judum were killed during this period .. Express, July 23, 2008.) However by mid-2008, movements frontliner, Karma announced that it will soon cease to exist,( and end 2008, saw Salwa Judum which had controlled the lives of tribal people in camps and its influenced villages for nearly three years losing its hold in the region; the number of people living in the camps dropped from earlier 50,000 to 13,000 and public support was dwindled away.(Salwa Judum may stay in Bastar after polls NDTV, November 13 , 2008.) An NHRC report published in October 2008, said that Salwa Judum having lost its earlier momentum was only restricted to its 23 camps in the Dantewada and Bijapur districts of Chhattisgarh (Development of Special Police Officers (SPOs)Image:Map Chhatisgarh state and districts.png|thumb|200px|right|Location of Dantewada and districts, the most affected regions in ChhattisgarhThe Chhattisgarh state Police employs tribal youths as SPOs (Special Police Officers), which are essentially 4,000 youth, both ex-Naxalites and those drawn from Salwa Judum camps in the Bastar region, who are paid an honorarium of Rs 1,500 (Rs 3000 in 2011)per month by the state government, were trained by with mostly .303 rifles. In Feb 2009, the Supreme Court in India declared such arming of civilians illegal.In 2008, there were 23 Salwa Judum camps in Bijapur and Dantewara districts of Bastar region where almost 50,000 tribals from over 600 villages had settled.(( The government has now discredited the Salwa Judum movement. Union Minister of Home Affairs, Chidambaram has praised the role of special police officers (SPOs) in fighting Naxalism and called for their appointment wherever required.,(Chidambaram all praise for SPOs Economic Times, January 8, 2009.) while the Chhattisgarh Chief Minister, Singh has stated that Salwa Judum is the answer to get rid of the Naxal menace in the state...(Salwa Judum is answer to naxal menace: Raman Singh of India, January 10, 2009.) On July 5, 2011, the Supreme Court of India ordered the Indian state of Chhattisgarh to disband a militia force founded to combat Maoist guerrillas who control large areas of the country. As reported in Hindu, the Supreme Court directed the Chhattisgarh police to immediately cease and desist from using SPOs in any manner or form in any activities, directly or indirectly, aimed at controlling, countering, mitigating or otherwise eliminating Maoist/Naxalite activities and directed the police to recall all firearms issued to these men.On july 6,2011 supreme court declared sulwa judum as illegal.ControversyChild SoldiersThere have been numerous reports that the Salwa Judum had recruited minors for its armed forces. A primary survey evaluated by the for Fact-finding Documentation and Advocacy (FFDA) determined that over 12,000 minors were being used by the Salwa Judum in the southern district of Dantewada and that the Chhattisgarh Government had officially recruited 4200 Special Police Officers (SPOs); many of them being easily identifiable as minors.() The Centre for Human Rights (ACHR) also found that the Salwa Judum had engaged in the recruitment of soldiers.() Similar recruitment findings were also reported in the to Stop the Use of Child Soldierss Child Soldiers Global Report 2008  India.()Human rights violationSome human rights organizations such as the Union for Civil Liberties has raised allegations that Salwa Judum is a government-backed organisation,()()() supported by the Chhattisgarh government, but a fact finding commission of Human Rights Commission of India (NHRC), appointed by Court of India found out that Salwa Judum was a spontaneous reaction by the tribals to defend themselves against the reign of terror unleashed by the Naxalites. The report also said that, 15 years after Jan Jagran Abhiyan, an earlier attempt to deal with Naxalites, local tribals once again mustered courage to stand up to the Naxalites, which only goes to show their sense of desperation.(Existence of Salwa Judum necessary Economic Times, October 6, 2008.)(DNAIndia) It also found out that allegations against Salwa Judum were distortions of truth by some biased human right organisations.(dnaIndia)State sponsoring of militiaIn April 2008, a Supreme Court bench directed the state Government to refrain from allegedly supporting and encouraging the Salwa Judum: It is a question of law and order. You cannot give arms to somebody (a civilian) and allow him to kill. You will be an abettor of the offence under Section 302 of the Indian Penal Code.; the state government had earlier denied, Salwa Judum being a state-sponsored movement,(Hearing plea against Salwa Judum, SC says State cannot arm civilians to kill Express, April 1, 2008.)(SC raps Chattisgarh on Salwa Judum Rediff.com, March 31, 2008.) later it directed the state government to take up the remedial measures suggested in the NHRC earlier report (Implement NHRC recommendations on Salwa Judum, Supreme Court asks Chhattisgarh government Hindu, September 20, 2008.) The Human Rights Commission alleged that Security forces collaborated with Salwa Judum in their fight against the Maoists.(India backing violent militia DAWN - July 11, 2008)In December 2008, replying to a petition filed in the Supreme Court, the state government acknowledged that Salwa Judum and security forces had burnt houses and looted property but the allegations against Salwa Judum of killings were not found to be true by National Human Rights Commission.()(Salwa Judum victims assured of relief Hindu, December 16, 2008.)In an order, the the Supreme Court mentioned that people take arms for survival and against inhuman implementation of law depriving the weak, and not senselessly. The court pointed out the importance of formalized state police actions, in ways that do not ignore Constitutional values(The horror! The horror!, July 11, 2011, rediff.com, an excerpt from the order of the Supreme Court of India):EffectsEncouraged by the highly positive results of the movement in the region, the government is planning to launch a peoples movement in insurgency hit state of Manipur on similar lines. In 2006, Karnataka raised a similar force employing tribals youths to fight Naxalism in the state, as did Pradesh prior to it (Tribal youths will now fight Naxals Times of India, May 11, 2006.) Jharkhand is another state that has been successfully using SPOs to counter Leftwing terrorists.(However, the Salwa Judum appears to have been abandoned in Chhattisgarh state , with Chief Minister Raman Singh describing the movement as over, because it was counterproductive and innocent people were being killed (CM: Salwa Judum is over Times, Feb 7, 2011.) Singh, however, said that a peaceful campaign to wean locals away from supporting Maoists would continue.In media* 4s Unreported World  telecast a program titled Indias Hidden War in October 2006, on the Maoist war against the state and people of India(Indias Hidden War 4, Friday 27 October 2006.)Further reading* The Adivasis of Chhattisgarh: Victims of the Naxalite Movement and Salwa Judum Campaign, by Asian Centre for Human Rights. Published by Asian Centre for Human Rights, 2006.See also* Naxalite* Revolutionary Zone* insurgency* Communist Party of Nepal (Maoist)ReferencesExternal links* The Adivasis of Chhattisgarh: Victims of Naxalite Movement and Salwa Judum Campaign* Unreported World: Indias Hidden War* Naxal Issues* http://timesofindia.indiatimes.com/India/Anti-Naxal_Salwa_Judum_faces_axe_over_rights_abuse/articleshow/3504703.cms* Economic and Political Weekly Article on NHRC report* Report of the IAPL Fact Finding Mission* Video Documentary (20 mn.) on Salwa Judum CampsJudumJudumJudum
7660534
Index_of_Ghana-related_articles
Articles (arranged alphabetically) related to Ghana include:__NOTOC__ 0-9 Image:Flag of Ghana.svg|thumb|right|200px|The of Ghana, created in 1957Image:AccraConferenceCentre.jpg|thumb|right|200px|International Conference CenterFile:Akosombo Dam.jpg|thumb|right|200px|The Dam, created from the largest man-made lake, VoltaImage:Cacao-pod-k4636-14.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Ghana, is only second in the world to dIvoire in the production of cocoaImage:LiberationMonument.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Day MonumentImage:Ensign of the Ghana Air Force.svg|thumb|right|200px|Ensign of the Air ForceImage:Christiansborg Castle2.jpg|thumb|right|200px|A contemporary drawing of CastleImage:Asantewaa.jpg|thumb|right|200px| Asantewaa is much loved in Ghanaian history and among the of Africa* African Cup of Nations A * Abron* Accra the capital* Academy* International Conference Center* Hearts of Oak Sporting Club* Secondary School* Adinkra* Afutu* Agbogbloshie* language* people* Dam* Alcan* Aluworks* Aluminum* in Africa* International School, Accra, Ghana* Anansi* Conservation Area* Ewe* Air* University* Goldfields Corporation* Range* Ocean B * of Ghana* Bauxite* Benin* Sports Stadium* River* Bissa* Tano* Togoland* of National Investigations* Busyinternet C * Ghana* Coast* Coast Castle* Coast Sports Stadium* Ghanaian cedi* Chocolate* Cocoa* in Ghana* Coronation Park* in Ghana* - CiTylinK* of Ghana D * Boat* Dagaare* Dagomba* Park* of Ghana* of Ghana* University College E * of Ghana* in Ghana* in Ghana* of Ghana* Resources* language* people F * Fante* language* Prinzenstein* and Castles, Volta, Greater Accra, Central and Western Regions* relations of Ghana* Frafra G * people* of Ghana* Ghana* Airways* Broadcasting Corporation* Commercial Bank* Federation of Labour* International Airlines* national football team* Road Network* Stock Exchange* Telecom University College* Coast (British colony)* Jubilee House* Gonja* language* All-Share Index* GTV* Wisdom Foundation* National Agricultural Export (www.ghana-agricexport.com) I * Ikando Volunteers* Arch (Accra)* in Ghana* Centre For Economic and Social Research (ICESR) J * Air K * National Park* Kintampo* District* Anokye Teaching Hospital* Annan International Peacekeeping Training Centre* International Airport* Airport* Sports Stadium* language* Nkrumah University of Science and Technology L * of Ghana* rights in Ghana (Gay rights)* language* Day Monument* Community School, Accra Ghana* of airports in Ghana* of cities in Ghana* of Colonial Heads of Ghana* of Ga rulers* of Ghanaian companies* of Ghanaian regions by area* of Ghanaian regional capitals* of Ghanaian regional ministers* of Ghanaian regions by population* of hospitals in Ghana* of mammals of Ghana* of reptiles of Ghana* of schools in Ghana* of universities in Ghana* language M * School* of Ghana* Mining* Airlines* language* of Ghana N * people* language* Museum of Ghana* language O * Ware School* Castle* Senior High School P * of Ghana* oil* acid* of Ghana* College* Boys Secondary* holidays in Ghana Q  R * Maritime Academy - WMU Branch* of Ghana* of Ghana S * Schools in Ghana* in Ghana* Stadium* Smelting* SSNIT* Augustines College , Cape Coast* Francis Girls Secondary School Jirapa* conduct in Ghana T * People* Tallensi* Airport* Airport* Stadium* numbers in Ghana* Tema* unions in Ghana* Union Congress of Ghana* in Ghana U * of Cape Coast* of Education, Winneba* of Ghana* of Mines and Technology* for Development Studies V * of Ghana* Aluminum Company* Region* Volunteers for Ghana: Ikando W * Africa* College, Kumasi* Girls High School X  Y * Asantewaa Z See also*of country-related topics - similar lists for other countriesde:Portal:Ghana/Indexlistede tpicos relacionados com Gana
7671415
Index_of_Republic_of_the_Congo-related_articles
The of the Congo (; ; ), also known as  Congo-Brazzaville or the Congo, is a country in Africa. It is bordered by Gabon, Cameroon, the African Republic, the Republic of the Congo, the Angolan exclave province of Cabinda, and the of Guinea.The republic is a former French colony.  Upon independence in 1960, the former French region of Middle Congo became the Republic of the Congo. After a quarter century of Marxism, Congo completed its transition into a multi-party democracy in 1992. However, a brief civil war in 1997 ended in the restoration of former Marxist President Sassou Nguesso to power.Articles (arranged alphabetically) related to the Republic of the Congo include:__NOTOC__ A * AfricaPhonebook/Afrique* in Africa* Aluminum* mining B * Brazzaville C * in the Republic of the Congo* Republic of the Congo Kinshasa* of the Congo Brazzaville* River* of the Republic of the Congo D  E * of the Republic of the Congo* in the Republic of the Congo F  G * Gabon* of the Republic of the Congo H  I  J  K * Kinshasa L * rights in the Republic of the Congo (Gay rights)* of cities in the Republic of the Congo* of Congolese people from the Republic of the Congo* of national parks of the Republic of the Congo* of African writers (by country)#Congo M * of the Republic of the Congo* Mining* of the Republic of the Congo N  O * National Park P * Pointe-Noire* of the Republic of the Congo* Republic of the Congo Q  R * of the Republic of the Congo* of the Congo S *in the Republic of the Congo T * in the Republic of the Congo U  V * requirements for Republic of the Congo citizens W  X  Y  Z * ZaireSee also*of country-related topics - similar lists for other countries
7684120
Leonard_Harrison_State_Park
 accessdate June 4, 2008)| elevation_imperial  1821| elevation_round  1| elevation_note (| area_unit  acre| area_imperial  585| area_round  0| area1_imperial | area1_type | length_imperial | length_orientation | width_imperial | width_orientation | highest | highest location | highest_lat_d | highest_lat_m | highest_lat_s | highest_lat_NS | highest_long_d | highest_long_m | highest_long_s | highest_long_EW | highest_elevation_imperial | lowest | lowest_location | lowest_lat_d | lowest_lat_m | lowest_lat_s | lowest_lat_NS | lowest_long_d | lowest_long_m | lowest_long_s | lowest_long_EW | lowest_elevation_imperial | biome | biome_share | biome1 | biome1_share | geology | geology1 | plant | plant1 | animal | animal1 | established_type | established  1922| established1_type | established1 | management_body  Pennsylvania Department of Conservation and Natural Resources| management_location | management_lat_d | management_lat_m | management_lat_s | management_lat_NS | management_long_d | management_long_m | management_long_s | management_long_EW | management_elevation | visitation 142,716| visitation_year 2003|visitation_note ()| free_type                   | free                        | free1_type | free1 | map  Pennsylvania Locator Map.PNG| map_caption  Location of Leonard Harrison State Park in Pennsylvania| map_locator  Pennsylvania| map_altA map of the state of Pennsylvania with a red dot in the north-central part| map_size  300| map_first | map1  Colton Point and Leonard Harrison State Parks Map.png| map1_alt A map showing the two parks with Tioga State Forest to the north, west, and south and private land to the east. Labels include Delmar, Elk, and Shippen Townships, Pine Creek and its tributaries Bear Run, Fourmile Run, Little Fourmile Run, and Stowell Run, Pine Creek Rail Trail, West Rim Trail, Turkey Path, Pennsylvania Route 660, Park Office, and Camping and Group Tenting areas. Symbols for picnic shelters and vistas are shown in each park.| map1_size  300| map1_caption  Colton Point (left) and Leonard Harrison (right) State Parks in Tioga County, Pennsylvania| website  Leonard Harrison State Park}}Leonard Harrison State Park is a  Pennsylvania state park in Tioga County, Pennsylvania, in the United States. It is on the east rim of the Creek Gorge, also known as the Grand Canyon of Pennsylvania, which is  deep and nearly  across here. It also serves as headquarters for the adjoining Point State Park, its sister park on the west rim of the gorge. Leonard Harrison State Park is known for its views of the Pine Creek Gorge, and offers hiking, fishing and hunting, whitewater boating, and camping. The park is in Shippen and Delmar Townships,  west of Wellsboro at the western terminus of Route 660.Pine Creek flows through the park and has carved the gorge through five major rock formations from the Devonian and Carboniferous periods. Native Americans once used the Creek Path along the creek. The path was later used by lumbermen, and then became the course of a railroad from 1883 to 1988. Since 1996, the  Creek Rail Trail has followed the creek through the park. The Pine Creek Gorge was named a Natural Landmark in 1968 and is also protected as a Pennsylvania State Natural Area and Bird Area, while Pine Creek is a Pennsylvania Scenic and Wild River. The gorge is home to many species of plants and animals, some of which have been reintroduced to the area.Although the Pine Creek Gorge was clearcut in the 19th and early 20th centuries, it is now covered by second growth forest, thanks in part to the conservation efforts of the Conservation Corps (CCC) in the 1930s. The park is named for Harrison, a Wellsboro lumberman who cut the timber there, then established the park, which he donated to the state in 1922. The CCC improved the park and built many of its original facilities. Since a successful publicity campaign in 1936, the park has been a popular tourist destination and attracts hundreds of thousands of visitors each year. Leonard Harrison State Park was chosen by the Department of Conservation and Natural Resources (DCNR) Bureau of Parks for its Twenty Must-See Pennsylvania State Parks list, which praised its spectacular vistas and a fabulous view of Pine Creek Gorge, also known as Pennsylvanias Grand Canyon.( Note: Despite the title, there are twenty-one parks in the list, with Colton Point and Leonard Harrison State Parks treated as one.) History  Native Americans Humans have lived in what is now Pennsylvania since at least 10,000 BC. The first settlers were Paleo-Indian nomadic hunters known from their tools.()(Note: For a general overview of Native American History in the West Branch Susquehanna watershed, see  Note: ISBN refers to the Heritage Books July 1996 reprint. URL is to a scan of the 1892 version with some OCR typos.) The hunter-gatherers of the Archaic period, which lasted locally from 7000 to 1000 BC, used a greater variety of more sophisticated stone artifacts. The period marked the gradual transition to semi-permanent villages and horticulture, between 1000 BC and 1500 AD. Archeological evidence found in the state from this time includes a range of pottery types and styles, burial mounds, pipes, bows and arrows, and ornaments.(Leonard Harrison State Park is in the Branch Susquehanna River basin, the earliest recorded inhabitants of which were the Iroquoian-speaking Susquehannocks.(The earliest written record of contact with the Susquehannocks comes from Captain Smith of Jamestown, who met members of the tribe near the mouth of the Susquehanna River on Chesapeake Bay in 1608. The tribe controlled the Susquehanna drainage basin and are believed to have lived there for at least a few centuries prior to this contact.) They were a matriarchal society that lived in stockaded villages of large long houses,( and occasionally inhabited the mountains surrounding the Pine Creek Gorge.() Their numbers were greatly reduced by disease and warfare with the Five Nations of the Iroquois, and by 1675 they had died out, moved away, or been assimilated into other tribes.((After this, the lands of the West Branch Susquehanna River valley were under the nominal control of the Iroquois. The Iroquois lived in long houses, primarily in what is now York, and had a strong confederacy which gave them power beyond their numbers.( They and other tribes used the Creek Path through the gorge, traveling between a path on the River in modern New York in the north, and the Shamokin Path along the West Branch Susquehanna River in the south. The Seneca tribe of the Iroquois believed that Pine Creek Gorge was sacred land and never established a permanent settlement there.() They used the path through the gorge and had seasonal hunting camps along it, including one just north of the park near what is now the village of Ansonia.(( Note: ISBN refers to 1998 impression) To fill the void left by the demise of the Susquehannocks, the Iroquois encouraged displaced tribes from the east to settle in the West Branch watershed, including the Shawnee and Lenape (or Delaware).((Note: ISBN refers to a 1999 reprint edition, URL is for the Susquehanna River Basin Commissions web page of Native American Place names, quoting and citing the book.)The and Indian War (17541763) led to the migration of many Native Americans westward to the Ohio River basin.( On November 5, 1768, the British acquired the New Purchase from the Iroquois in the of Fort Stanwix, including what is now Leonard Harrison State Park. The line established by this treaty was disputed, as it was unclear whether the border along Tiadaghton Creek referred to present-day Pine Creek or to Creek, further to the east. As a result, the land between them was disputed territory until 1784 and the Second Treaty of Fort Stanwix.( After the Revolutionary War, Native Americans almost entirely left Pennsylvania,( although some isolated bands of Natives remained in Pine Creek Gorge until the of 1812.() Lumber era Prior to the arrival of Penn and his Quaker colonists in 1682, up to 90 percent of what is now Pennsylvania was covered with woods: more than  of White Pine, Eastern Hemlock, and a mix of hardwoods.() The forests near the three original counties, Philadelphia, Bucks, and Chester, were the first to be harvested, as the early settlers used the readily available timber to build homes, barns, and ships, and cleared the land for agriculture. The demand for wood products slowly increased and by the time of the Revolution the lumber industry had reached the interior and mountainous regions of Pennsylvania.(() Lumber thus became one of the leading industries in Pennsylvania.( Trees were used to furnish fuel to heat homes, tannin for the many tanneries that were spread throughout the state, and wood for construction, furniture, and barrel making. Large areas of forest were harvested by colliers to fire iron furnaces. Rifle stocks and shingles were made from Pennsylvania timber, as were a wide variety of household utensils, and the first wagons.(By the early 19th century the demand for lumber reached the Pine Creek Gorge, where the surrounding mountainsides were covered with Eastern White Pine  in diameter and  or more tall, Eastern Hemlock  in circumference, and huge hardwoods.( Each  of these virgin forests produced  of white pine and  of hemlock and hardwoods. For comparison, the same area of forest today produces a total of only  on average. According to Steven E. Owlett, environmental lawyer and author, shipbuilders considered pine from Pine Creek the best timber in the world for making fine ship masts,() so it was the first lumber to be harvested on a large scale. Pine Creek was declared a public highway by the General Assembly on March 16, 1798,( and rafts of spars were floated down the creek to the Susquehanna River, then to the Bay and the shipbuilders at Baltimore.( The lumbermen would then walk home, following the old Pine Creek Path at the end of their journey.( A spar sold for one dollar and three spars up to  long were lashed together to make a ships mast. The largest spar produced on Pine Creek was  in diameter  above the base,  long, and  in diameter at the top. By 1840, Tioga County alone produced over 452 such spar rafts with more than  of lumber.(As the 19th century progressed, fewer pines were left and more hemlocks and hardwoods were cut and processed locally.( By 1810 there were 11 sawmills in the Pine Creek watershed, and by 1840 there were 145, despite a flood in 1832 which wiped out nearly all the mills along the creek.(( Selective harvesting of pines was replaced by clearcutting of all lumber in a tract. The first lumbering activity to take place close to what is now Leonard Harrison State Park occurred in 1838 when William Dodge and some partners built a settlement at Big Meadows and formed the Pennsylvania Joint Land and Lumber Company. Dodges company purchased thousands of acres of land in the area, including what is now Colton Point State Park.( In 1865 the last pine spar raft floated down the creek, and on March 28, 1871 the General Assembly passed a law allowing dam construction and clearing of creeks to allow loose logs to float better. The earliest spring log drives floated up to  of logs in Pine Creek at one time.( These logs floated to the West Branch Susquehanna River and to sawmills near the Boom at Williamsport.( Hemlock wood was not widely used until the advent of wire nails, but the bark was used to tan leather. After 1870 the largest tanneries in the world were in the Pine Creek watershed, and required  of bark to produce  of quality sole leather.(In 1883 the Shore, Pine Creek and Buffalo Railway opened, following the creek through the gorge. The new railroad used the relatively level route along Pine Creek to link the York Central Railroad with the Coalfield. In the surrounding forests, log drives gave way to logging railroads, which transported lumber to local sawmills. There were 13 companies operating logging railroads along Pine Creek and its tributaries between 1886 and 1921, while the last log drive in the Pine Creek watershed started on Little Pine Creek in 1905. The west rim, which became Colton Point State Park, had a logging railroad by 1903, which was able to harvest lumber on Fourmile Run that had been previously inaccessible.( The forests were clearcut by the early 20th century and the gorge was stripped bare. Nothing was left except the dried-out tree tops, which became a fire hazard, so much of the land burned and was left barren.( On May 6, 1903 the Wellsboro newspaper had the headline Wild Lands Aflame and reported landslides through the gorge. The soil was depleted of nutrients, fires baked the ground hard, and jungles of blueberries, blackberries, and mountain laurel covered the clearcut land, which became known as the Pennsylvania Desert. Disastrous floods swept the area periodically and much of the wildlife was wiped out.( Nessmuk and Leonard Harrison George Washington Sears, an early conservationist who wrote under the pen name Nessmuk, was one of the first to criticize Pennsylvania lumbering and its destruction of forests and creeks.( (No ISBN)) In his 1884 book Woodcraft he wrote of the Pine Creek watershed where A huge tannery ... poisons and blackens the stream with chemicals, bark and ooze. ... The once fine covers and thickets are converted into fields thickly dotted with blackened stumps. And, to crown the desolation, heavy laden trains of The Pine Creek and Jersey Shore R.R. go thundering by almost hourly ... Of course, this is progress; but, whether backward or forward, had better be decided sixty years hence.() Nessmuks words went mostly unheeded in his lifetime and did not prevent the clearcutting of almost all of the virgin forests in Pennsylvania.(Sears lived in Wellsboro from 1844 until his death in 1890, and was the first to describe the Pine Creek Gorge.() He also described a trip to what became Leonard Harrison State Park: after a  buggy ride, he then had to hike  through tangles of fallen trees and branches, down ravines, and over banks for five hours. At least he reached The Point, which he wrote was the jutting terminus of a high ridge which not only commands a capital view of the opposite mountain, but also of the Pine Creek Valley, up and down for miles.(Quoted in )  A Historical and Museum Commission (PHMC) state historical marker commemorating Nessmuk was dedicated in the park in 1972.(The creation of the park was the work of Harrison, a former lumberman and businessman from Wellsboro who owned a substantial amount of land in the Pine Creek Gorge. In the 1890s Harrison operated a sawmill at Tiadaghton in the middle of the gorge, which was supplied with logs, not by train as was most common in that era, but by a log slide built into the side of the gorge.(( The log slide was used on a year round basis: during the winter the logs slid down on ice; following the snowmelt the slide was greased to ease the descent of the logs. After the village and the mill were destroyed by a fire, Harrison turned his attention to tourism. He purchased  of land at the site of the current park in 1906, then developed this land, known as The Lookout, and invited the public to enjoy the beauty of Pine Creek Gorge. Harrison donated the picnic grounds to the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania in 1922.()(Although the park was donated to the state, the Wellsboro Chamber of Commerce made initial improvements there and operated it for the first two decades.( Elsewhere in the gorge the state bought land abandoned by lumber companies, sometimes for less than .( Except for the adjoining Colton Point State Park, this land became the Tioga State Forest, which was officially established in 1925 and lies just north and south of the park. As of 2008 the state forest encompasses , mostly in Tioga County.()( Modern era Despite its status as Leonard Harrison State Forest Park, it took time for the park to become more well known. Access to the park over small roads was still difficult. An elderly woman who had lived nearby all her life visited the park for the first time in 1932 and asked, on seeing the gorge, How long has this been here?(The Conservation Corps (CCC) improved access and constructed many of the amenities at Leonard Harrison park from 1933 to 1936, during the Depression. Leonard Harrison State Park is one of many examples of the work of the CCC throughout north-central Pennsylvania. The CCC built picnic and comfort facilities, made roads and trails (often following old logging roads), and planted stands of white pine, spruce and larch.()  Some of the CCC-constructed facilities remain and are still used,() and the park has hosted a reunion of former CCC workers each summer since 1990.(()In 1936 Larry Woodin of Wellsboro and other Tioga County business owners began a tourism campaign to promote the Pine Creek Gorge as The Grand Canyon of Pennsylvania. Bus Lines featured a view of the canyon from a Leonard Harrison lookout on the back cover of its Atlantic Coast timetable. The bus lines Chicago to New York City tour had an overnight stay in Wellsboro and a morning visit to the canyon for $3. More than 300,000 tourists visited the canyon by the autumn of 1936, and 15,000 visited Leonard Harrison over Day weekend in 1937.( That year more visitors came to the Pine Creek Gorge than to National Park. In response to the heavy use of the local roads, the CCC widened the highways in the area, and guides from the CCC gave tours of the canyon.(( A PHMC state historical marker honoring the CCCs work in the park and county was dedicated on June 3, 1995.( Near the lookout over the gorge there is a bronze statue of a Tioga County CCC Worker, unveiled on August 14, 1999, as a monument to the achievements of the CCC.()()()After the Second World War the state took over operation of the park,( and expanded its size beyond the original land donated by Harrison: six purchases between 1946 and 1949 increased the parks area from  to  at a cost of $26,328.( The Pennsylvania Geographic Board dropped the word Forest and officially named it Leonard Harrison State Park on November 11, 1954.() The park was improved in the following decade with the completion of new latrines (1963) and a new concession stand and visitor center (1968).( Pine Creek was named a state scenic river on December 4, 1992, which ensured further protection of Pine Creek Gorge in its natural state.( In 2000 the park became part of the Creek State Park complex, an administrative grouping of eight state parks in Potter and Tioga counties.( Note: the eight parks in the Hills Creek State Park Complex are Cherry Springs, Colton Point, Denton Hill, Hills Creek, Leonard Harrison, Lyman Run, Patterson, and Prouty Place.) In 2005 the state began a $1.2 million upgrade of park facilities, including a new maintenance building, the replacement of three pit latrines at the overlook and campground, the addition of showers at the campground, and the conversion of all restrooms to flush toilets.(The second half of the 20th century saw great changes in the rail line through the park. Regular passenger service on the canyon line ended after the Second World War, and in 1960 the second set of train tracks was removed.() Conrail abandoned the section of the railroad passing through the gorge on September 21, 1988. The right-of-way eventually became the Creek Rail Trail, which follows the path of the former Pine Creek Path.(( The first section of the rail trail opened in 1996 and included the  section in the park: as of 2008 the Pine Creek Rail Trail is  long.(Leonard Harrison State Park continued to attract national attention in the post-war era. New York Times featured the park and its breath-taking views of the gorge as well as its trails and picnic groves in a 1950 article,() and in 1966 praised the whitewater boating on Pine Creek and the parks outstanding look-out points.() The Pine Creek Gorge, including Leonard Harrison and Colton Point State Parks and a  section of Tioga State Forest, was named a National Natural Landmark (NNL) in April 1968. The plaque for the entire NNL is on the lookout terrace of Leonard Harrison State Park.( Another New York Times article on whitewater canoeing in 1973 noted the damage along the creek done by Agnes the year before, and Leonard Harrisons waterfalls.()In the new millennium, the two state parks on either side of the Pine Creek Gorge are frequently treated as one. A 2002 New York Times article called Leonard Harrison and Colton Point state parks Two State Parks, Divided by a Canyon and noted their overlooks offer the most spectacular views.() Leonard Harrison and Colton Point were each part of the twenty-one state parks chosen by the DCNR Pennsylvania Bureau of Parks for its Twenty Must-See Pennsylvania State Parks list. They are the only two parks treated as one unit for the list. The DCNR describes the parks together, noting how they offer spectacular vistas and a fabulous view of Pine Creek Gorge, also known as Pennsylvanias Grand Canyon.( It goes on to praise their inclusion in a National Natural Landmark and State Park Natural Area, hiking and trails, and the Pine Creek Rail Trail and bicycling.( Pine Creek Gorge Leonard Harrison State Park lies on the east side of the Creek Gorge, also known as the Grand Canyon of Pennsylvania.() A sister park, Colton Point State Park, is on the west side, and the two parks combined form essentially one large park that includes parts of the gorge and creek and parts of the plateau dissected by the gorge. Pine Creek has carved the gorge nearly  through the dissected Plateau in northcentral Pennsylvania. The canyon begins in southwestern Tioga County, just south of the village of Ansonia, and continues south to near the village of Waterville in Lycoming County. The depth of the gorge in Colton Point State Park is about  and it measures nearly  across.()()The Pine Creek Gorge Natural Landmark includes Colton Point and Leonard Harrison State Parks and parts of the State Forest along  of Pine Creek between Ansonia and Blackwell. This federal program does not provide any extra protection beyond that offered by the land owner. The Park Services designation of the gorge as a National Natural Landmark notes that it contains superlative scenery, geological and ecological value, and is one of the finest examples of a deep gorge in the eastern United States.()The gorge is also protected by the state of Pennsylvania as the  Pine Creek Gorge Natural Area, which is the second largest State Natural Area in Pennsylvania.()() Within this area,  of Colton Point and Leonard Harrison State Parks are designated a State Park Natural Area.() The state Natural Area runs along Pine Creek from Darling Run in the north (just below Ansonia) to Jerry Run in the south (just above Blackwell). It is approximately  long and  wide, with state forest roads providing all of the western border and part of the eastern border.( Retrieved on September 30, 2008.)Within the park, Pine Creek and the walls of the gorge visible from the opposite shoreline( are also protected by the state as a Pennsylvania Scenic River.() In 1968 Pine Creek was one of only 27 rivers originally designated as eligible to be included in the Wild and Scenic River system, and one of only eight specifically mentioned in the law establishing the program. Before Pine Creek could be included in the federal program, the state enacted its State Scenic Rivers Act, then asked that Pine Creek be withdrawn from the national designation. However, there was much local opposition to its inclusion on the states list, based at least partly on mistaken fears that protection would involve seizure of private property and restricted access. Eventually this opposition was overcome, but Pennsylvania did not officially include it as one of its own state Scenic and Wild Rivers until November 25, 1992. The state treated Pine Creek as if it were a state scenic river between 1968 and 1992. It protected the creek from dam-building and water withdrawals for power plants, and added public access points to reduce abuse of private property.( (No ISBN))() Geology and climate Although the rock formations exposed in Leonard Harrison State Park and the Pine Creek Gorge are at least 300 million years old, the gorge itself formed only about 20,000 years ago, in the last ice age. Pine Creek had flowed northeasterly until then, but was dammed by rocks, soil, ice, and other debris deposited by the receding Laurentide Continental Glacier. The dammed creek formed a lake near the present village of Ansonia, and the lakes glacial meltwater overflowed the debris dam, which caused a reversal of the flow of Pine Creek. The creek flooded to the south and quickly carved a deep channel on its way to the West Branch Susquehanna River.((The park is at an elevation of  on the Plateau,( which formed in the orogeny some 300 million years ago, when Gondwana (specifically what became Africa) and what became North America collided, forming Pangaea.(() While the gorge and its surroundings appear mountainous, these are not true mountains: instead years of erosion have made this a plateau, causing the mountainous terrain seen today. The hardest of the ancient rocks are on top of the ridges, while the softer rocks eroded away forming the valleys.()The land on which Leonard Harrison State Park sits has undergone tremendous change over the last 400 million years. It was once part of the coastline of a shallow sea that covered a great portion of what is now North America. The high mountains to the east of the sea gradually eroded, causing a buildup of sediment made up primarily of clay, sand and gravel. Tremendous pressure on the sediment caused the formation of the rocks that are found today in the Pine Creek drainage basin: sandstone, shale, conglomerates, limestone, and  coal.(()Five major rock formations are present in Leonard Harrison State Park, from the Devonian and Carboniferous periods. The youngest of these, which forms the highest points in the park and along the gorge, is the early Pennsylvanian Formation, a gray conglomerate that may contain sandstone, siltstone, and shale, as well as anthracite coal. Low-sulfur coal was once mined at three locations within the Pine Creek watershed. Below this is the late Mississippian Chunk Formation, which is formed with grayish-red shale, siltstone, sandstone, and conglomerate. Millstones were once carved from the exposed sections of this conglomerate. Together the Pottsville and Mauch Chunk formations are some  thick.(((Next below these is the late Devonian and early Mississippian Mountain Formation, which is made of grayish-red shale and olive-gray sandstone. This is relatively hard rock and forms many of the ridges. Below this is the red shale and siltstone of the Formation, about  thick and some 375 million years old. This layer is relatively soft and easily eroded, which helped to form the Pine Creek Gorge. Cliffs formed by the Huntley Mountain and Catskill formations are visible north of the park at Barbour Rock. The lowest and oldest layer is the Haven Formation, which is gray to green-brown siltstone and shale over 400 million years old. It forms the base of the gorge, contains marine fossils, and is up to  thick.(()()()The dominant soil in Leonard Harrison State Park is somewhat excessively drained Oquaga channery loam, which is often associated with well drained Lordstown channery loam. Much of the campground near the eastern boundary is supported by Morris gravelly silt loam, which is somewhat poorly drained due to a subsoil fragipan. The Oquaga tends to be very strongly acidic (pH 4.8), Morris is strongly acidic (pH 5.3) and Lordstown is moderately acidic (pH 5.5). All of these soils belong to the Inceptisol soil order.(http://websoilsurvey.nrcs.usda.gov/app/WebSoilSurvey.aspx) The Allegheny Plateau has a climate, with occasional severe low temperatures in winter and average daily ranges of 20 F (11 C) in winter and 26 F (14 C) in summer.() The mean annual precipitation for the Pine Creek watershed is .( The highest recorded temperature at the park was  in 1936, and the record low was  in 1934. On average, July is the hottest month at Leonard Harrison, January is the coldest, and June the wettest.(dateAugust 2010 Ecology Descriptions from early explorers and settlers give some idea of what the Pine Creek Gorge was like before it was clearcut. The forest was up to 85 percent hemlock and white pine, with the rest hardwoods.( (No ISBN)) Many animal species that are now vanished inhabited the area. A herd of 12,000 Bison migrated along the West Branch Susquehanna River in 1773. Pine Creek was home to large predators such as Wolves, Lynx, Wolverines, Panthers, Fishers, foxes and Bobcats, all save the last three now locally extinct. The area had herds of Elk and deer, and large numbers of Black Bears, River Otters, and Beavers. In 1794, two of the earliest white explorers to travel up Pine Creek found so many rattlesnakes on its banks that they had to sleep in their canoe. Further upstream, insects forced them to do the same.(The virgin forests cooled the land and streams. Centuries of accumulated organic matter in the forest soil caused slow percolation of rainfall into the creeks and runs, so  they flowed more evenly year-round.(( (No ISBN)) Pine Creek was home to large numbers of fish, including trout, but dams downstream on the River have eliminated the shad, salmon,(Early accounts of salmon in Pine Creek may have been referring to shad.) and eels once found in the creek.( The clearcutting of forests destroyed habitat for animals, but there was also a great deal of hunting, with bounties paid for large predators.( State Natural Area and wildlife While Leonard Harrison and Colton Point State Parks and parts of the surrounding Tioga State Forest are now the Pine Creek Gorge National Natural Landmark, it is their status as part of a Pennsylvania State Natural Area that provides the strongest protection for them.( Within this Natural Area, all logging, mining, and oil and gas drilling are prohibited, and only foot trail access is allowed.() In 1988 the Pennsylvania Department of Environmental Resources, precursor to the DCNR, described it as ... about 95% State owned, unroaded, and designated the Pine Creek Gorge Natural Area. It is a place of unique geologic history and contains some rare plant communities, an old growth hemlock stand, ... active bald eagle nests ... and is a major site of river otter reintroduction. Departmental policy is protection of the natural values of the Canyon from development and overuse, and restoration of the area to as near a natural condition as possible.(The gorge has over 225 species of wildflowers, plants and trees,( (No ISBN))  with scattered stands of old growth forest on some of its steepest walls. The rest of the gorge is covered with thriving second growth forest that can be over one hundred years old.( However, since clearcutting, nearly 90 percent of the forest land has burnt at least once. Typical south-facing slopes here have Mountain Laurel below oak and hickory trees, while north-facing slopes tend to have ferns below hemlocks and hardwoods. Large chestnuts and Black Cherry can also be found.(The Grand Canyon of Pennsylvania is known for its fall foliage, and Leonard Harrison State Park is a popular place to observe the colors, with the first three weeks of October as the best time to see the leaves in their full color. Red leaves are found on Red Maple, red oak, and Black Cherry, while orange and yellow leaves are on Black Walnut, Sugar Maple, aspen, birch, Tulip Poplar and Chestnut Oak, and brown leaves are from beech, oak, and Black Oak trees.( Plants of special concern in Pennsylvania that are found in the gorge include Jacobs ladder, wild pea, and parsley.(There are over 40 species of mammals in the Pine Creek Gorge.( Leonard Harrison State Parks extensive forest cover makes it a habitat for big woods wildlife, including Deer, Black Bear, Turkey, Red and Gray Squirrels. Less common creatures include Bobcats, Coyote, Fishers, River Otters, and Timber Rattlesnakes.( There are over 26 species of fish in Pine Creek, including trout, suckers, Fallfish, and Bass. Other aquatic species include crayfish and frogs.(Several species have been reintroduced to the gorge. White-tailed Deer were imported from Michigan and released throughout Pennsylvania to reestablish what had once been a thriving population. The current population of deer in Pennsylvania are descended from the original stock introduced beginning in 1906, after the lumberman had moved out of the area.() The deer population has grown so much that today they exceed their capacity in many areas. River Otters were successfully reintroduced in 1983 and now breed in the gorge. Despite the fears of anglers, their diet is only 5 percent trout.(Fishers, medium-sized weasels, were reintroduced to Pine Creek Gorge as part of an effort to establish a healthy population of Fishers in Pennsylvania.( Prior to the lumber era, Fishers were numerous throughout the forests of Pennsylvania.() They are generalized predators and will hunt any smaller creatures in their territory, including porcupines.(() Elk have been reintroduced west of the gorge in Clinton County and occasionally wander near the west rim of the canyon. Coyotes have come back on their own.( Invasive insect species in the gorge include moths, which eat all the leaves off trees, especially oaks,( and Woolly Adelgids, which weaken and kill hemlocks. Invasive plant species include Loosestrife and Knotweed.( Important Bird Area File:LHSP Turkey Vulture.jpg|thumb|left|alt A large black bird soars overhead with a blue sky behind|Vulture at Leonard Harrison State ParkLeonard Harrison State Park is part of Bird Area #28, which encompasses  of both publicly and private held land. State managed acreage accounts for 68 percent of the total area and includes Leonard Harrison and Colton Point State Parks and the surrounding Tioga State Forest lands. The Pennsylvania Society has designated all  of Leonard Harrison State Park as part of the IBA, which is an area designated as a globally important habitat for the conservation of bird populations.()Ornithologists and bird watchers have recorded a total of 128 species of birds in the IBA. Several factors contribute to the high total of bird species observed: there is a large area of forest in the IBA, as well as great habitat diversity, with  of open water that is used by many of the birds, especially Eagles. The location of the IBA along the Pine Creek Gorge also contributes to the diverse bird populations.(In addition to Bald Eagles, which live in the IBA year round and have successfully established a breeding population there,(( the IBA is home to Kingfishers, Tanagers, Blue Warblers, Mergansers, Blue and Heron, Thrushes, and Ducks. Large numbers of Ospreys use the gorge during spring and fall migration periods. The woodlands are inhabited by the Grouse, Pennsylvanias state bird, and Wild Turkeys. Thrush breeds in the IBA and the Harrier breeds and overwinters in Pine Creek Gorge.(A variety of warblers is found in Leonard Harrison State Park. The Pennsylvania Audubon Society states that Pine Creek Gorge is especially rich in warbler species, including Pine, Black-throated Blue, Black-throated Green, Blackburnian, and Black-and-white.( Note: This guide is available both as a book (page number given) and website (URL given).) Many of these smaller birds are more often heard than seen as they keep away from the trails and overlooks.( Recreation  Trails Leonard Harrison State Park is a destination for avid hikers, with some challenging hikes in and around the Grand Canyon of Pennsylvania. The park has  of trails that feature very rugged terrain, pass close to steep cliffs, and can be slick in some areas.( In 2003, the DCNR reported that 37,775 people used the trails in the park, and another 24,407 bicycled in it.(* Overlook Trail is a  path to Otter View, a vista looking to the south.( This moderately difficult loop passes reminders of the CCCs work in the park, including a plantation of Pines and an old incinerator.(* Turkey Path is a difficult trail,  long (down and back), that follows Little Fourmile Run down the side of the canyon, descending over  to Pine Creek and the rail trail at the bottom of the gorge.( It was originally a mule drag used to haul timber to the creek.() There are several waterfalls on the trail, which passes through an environmentally sensitive area and is on a steep slope. Hikers are encouraged to remain on the path to reduce erosion and protect fragile plant life along the trail.( In 2006 a hiker who had left the path slipped near a waterfall and fell to his death.()A vista at the halfway point on Turkey Path was constructed in 1978 by the Conservation Corps. Hand rails, steps and observation decks were added to the path in 1993 by the Pennsylvania Conservation Corps. The park website classifies it as a down and back trail since there is no bridge across Pine Creek.( However, there is also a Turkey Path from Colton Point State Park on the west rim of the gorge down to a point on Pine Creek just upstream of the end of this trail. According to Owlett and the DCNR Pine Creek Rail Trail map, the creek can be forded with care when the water is low, and the Turkey Path connects the two parks.(()* Creek Rail Trail is a  trail from Wellsboro Junction, just north of Wellsboro, south through the Pine Creek Gorge to Jersey Shore:  of this trail is in Leonard Harrison and Point State Parks.(( A 2001 article in Today said the scenic beauty of the Grand Canyon of Pennsylvania made the trail one of 10 great places to take a bike tour in the world.()() Camping and picnics Camping is a popular pastime at Leonard Harrison State Park, with 3,511 persons using the rustic camping facilities in 2003.( The DCNR classifies camping facilities as rustic if they do not have flush toilets or showers. The state has renovated the park camping area since 2003, building modern bathrooms with flush toilets and hot showers, and no longer considers it rustic.() The park has updated electric sites for RV campers as well. The campground has picnic tables and fire rings. The park has almost 100 picnic tables for use; seven of these tables are in shelters.( The park hosted some 29,150 picnickers in 2003.( Hunting, fishing, and whitewater Hunting is permitted on about  of Leonard Harrison State Park: hunters are expected to follow the rules and regulations of the Pennsylvania State Game Commission. The common game species are Ruffed Grouse, Eastern Gray Squirrel, Wild Turkey, White-tailed Deer, and Black Bear; however, hunting Groundhog is prohibited. Additional acres of forested woodlands are available for hunting on the grounds of the adjacent Tioga State Forest.(Fishing is permitted at the state park, though anglers must descend the Turkey Path to reach Pine Creek. This has been designated as approved trout waters by the Fish and Boat Commission, which means the waters will be stocked with trout and may be fished during trout season.() Other species of fish found in Pine Creek include Bass and some panfish. Several small trout streams are accessible from within the park, which had 2,597 anglers in 2003.(( Historically, fishermen of note on the stretch of Pine Creek in the park include President Roosevelt and Pennsylvania Governor A. Stone.(Edward Gertler writes in Keystone Canoeing that Pine Creek is possibly Pennsylvanias most famous canoe stream and attributes this partly to the thousands who decide to boat on it after they peer into Pine Creeks spectacular abyss from the overlooks of Leonard Harrison and Colton Point state parks.() The park contains  of Pine Creek, which is Class 1 to Class 2 whitewater here.( Boaters do not normally start or end their run in the park, which has no launches:( it is part of the  trip from Ansonia (Marsh Creek) south to Blackwell (Babb Creek).( Nearby state parks Leonard Harrison State Park is mostly in Shippen Township, with a small portion in Delmar Township north of Stowell Run. It is  west of Wellsboro at the western terminus of Route 660.() The following state parks are within  of the park:()( Note: shows Leonard Harrison State Park) References  External links * Leonard Harrison State Park* * * Pine Creek Rail Traildtat Leonard Harrison
7696399
Greater_Pittston
Greater Pittston is a  region in Luzerne County, Pennsylvania, in reference to the area in and around Pittston.  The total population of the Greater Pittston area is around 50,000 people. This region includes Avoca, Dupont, Duryea, Exeter Boro, Exeter Township, Hughestown, Jenkins Township, Laflin, Pittston Township, West Pittston, West Wyoming, Wyoming and Yatesville. History * 3 July 1778A force of British and Tories, led by John Butler, with the assistance of about 700 Indians, attacked and killed nearly 300 Valley settlers. Today in PA, a monument marks the gravesite of the victims from the of Wyoming.* 28 June 1896The Newton Coal Companys Twin Shaft Mine in Pittston City caved-in and killed 58 miners.(Twin Shaft Disaster Marker)(Pittston, PA Twin Shaft Mine Cave In, June 1896)* 1934  The right arm of Pennsylvania resident, Harry Tompkins, was crushed by an Erie Railroad train.  This resulted in the Supreme Court case, Railroad Co. v. Tompkins, which laid the foundation for a large part of modern American civil procedure.* 22 January 1959  The Mine Disaster in Port Griffith, Jenkins Township, claimed the lives of 12 people and essentially shut down the mining industry in Pennsylvania.* June 1972  Agnes was responsible for massive flooding in and around the Greater Pittston area.* 1974  1989  Alleged ghost hauntings took place in the home of Jack and Janet Smurl in West Pittston. This resulted in the 1991 film The Haunted.* 25 September 1982  Banks kills 13 people in a shooting rampage in Wilkes-Barre and Jenkins Township.* 1992  The opening scenes from the movie Ties was filmed in West Pittston; it shows David Green, the hero of the movie (played by Fraser), hanging out with friends in the streets of the tiny town.* September 2011: The Greater Pittston area, along with the rest of Luzerne County, witnessed historical flooding from  Tropical Storm Lee. The Susquehanna River reached a record high of 42.6 feet (13 meters) in Wilkes-Barre. The river topped the 40.9-foot (12.5 meters) level in flooding caused by Hurricane Agnes in 1972.(Mandatory Evacuation of Wyoming Valley by 4 p.m., Times-Leader, September 8, 2011)(http://www.reuters.com/article/2011/09/09/usa-flooding-idUSN1E7880XA20110909)(Luzerne officials issue mandatory evacuation in footprint of Agnes flood, Times Tribune, September 8, 2011) Geography Greater Pittston is a  region in Luzerne County, Pennsylvania, encompassing the River. Pittston Township has the largest landmass, in all of Greater Pittston, with a total area of . Yatesville covers the least amount of land, in all of Greater Pittston, with a total area of only . Population According to the 2000 census, around 50,000 people live in and around Pittston City. Pittston has the highest population, in all of Greater Pittston, with nearly 8,000 citizens. Yatesville has the smallest population with only 649 citizens. Government The current mayor of Greater Pittstons representative city (Pennsylvania) is Jason C. Klush. Every other borough and township, in the Greater Pittston area, has their own form of governance which includes mayors and supervisors. Transportation 81 passes through Pittston Township and the surrounding Greater Pittston area. There is also transportation to and from Greater Pittston. Railways into Greater Pittston provides for other services.References
7705856
History_of_Indigenous_Australians
19th century engraving showing natives of the Gweagal tribe opposing the arrival of Captain James Cook in 1770.The history of Australians is thought to have spanned 40000 to 45000 years, although some estimates have put the figure at up to 70000 years before European settlement. For most of this time, the Indigenous Australians lived as nomads and as hunter-gatherers with a strong dependence on the land and their agriculture for survival.The path of Australian Aboriginal history changed radically after the 18th- and 19th-century settlement of the British: Indigenous people were displaced from their ways of life, were forced to submit to European rule, and were later encouraged to assimilate into Western culture. Since the 1960s, reconciliation has been the pursuit of European Australian  Indigenous Australian relations.OriginsThere is no clear or accepted origin of the indigenous people of Australia. Although they migrated to Australia through Southeast Asia  they are not demonstrably related to any known Asian or Polynesian population. There is evidence of genetic and linguistic interchange between Australians in the far north and the Austronesian peoples of modern-day New Guinea and the islands, but this may be the result of recent trade and intermarriage.(Diamond, J. (1997). Guns, germs, and steel. Random House. London. pp 314316)It is believed that first migration to Australia was achieved when this landmass formed part of the Sahul continent, connected to the island of Guinea via a bridge. It is also possible that people came by boat across the Sea. The exact timing of the arrival of the ancestors of the Indigenous Australians has been a matter of dispute among archaeologists. The most generally accepted date for first arrival is between 4000050000 years BP. In 1971 finds of Aboriginal stone tools in a quarry in Penrith in New South Wales were dated to 47000 years BP.(Aborigines) A 48000 BCE date is based on a few sites in northern Australia dated using thermoluminescence. A large number of sites have been radiocarbon dated to around 38000 BCE, leading some researchers to doubt the accuracy of the thermoluminescence technique. Radiocarbon dating is limited to a maximum age of around 40 000 years.  Some estimates have been given as widely as from 30000 to 68000 BCE.(Bowler, JM et al., (20 February 2003), Letters: New ages for human occupation and climatic change at Lake Mungo, Australia, Nature 421, pp. 837840)  Earlier dates are requiring new techniques such as stimulated luminescence (OSL) and mass spectrometry (AMS), and the evidence for an earlier date for arrival is growing.  Charles Dortch has dated recent finds on Rottnest Island, Western Australia at 70000 years BP.(Dortch, C.E. and Hesp, P.A. 1994. Rottnest Island artifacts and palaeosols in the context of Greater Swan Region prehistory (Journal of the Royal Society of Western Australia 77:2332))  The rock shelters at Malakunanja II (a shallow rock-shelter about 50 kilometres inland from the present coast) and of Nauwalabila I (70 kilometers further south) show evidence of used pieces of ochre  evidence for paint used by artists 60000 years ago. Using OSL Rhys Jones has obtained a date for stone tools in these horizons dating from 5300060000 years ago.(How old is Australian Rock Art? - Aboriginal Art Online)dating of the Jinmium site in the Territory suggested a date of 200000 BCE. Although this result received wide press coverage, it is not accepted by most archaeologists. Only Africa has older physical evidence of habitation by humans.  There is also evidence of a change in fire regimes in Australia, drawn from reef deposits in Queensland, between 70 and 100000 years ago,(Flannery, Tim The Future Eaters) and the integration of human genomic evidence from various parts of the world also supports a date of before 60000 years for the arrival of Australian Aboriginal people in the continent.(Oppenheimer, Stephen, (2004),Out of Eden: The Peopling of the World(Constable and Robinson; New Ed))(http://www.bradshawfoundation.com/journey/)(Oppenheimer, Stephen The Real Eve: Modern Mans Journey Out of Africa(Carroll & Graf Publishers)(ISBN 0786713348)Humans reached Tasmania approximately 40000 years ago by migrating across a land bridge from the mainland that existed during the last age. After the seas rose about 12000 years ago and covered the land bridge, the inhabitants there were isolated from the mainland until the arrival of European settlers.(Mulvaney, J. and Kamminga, J., (1999), Prehistory of Australia. Smithsonian Institution Press, Washington.)Short statured aboriginal tribes inhabited the rainforests of North Queensland, of which the best known group is probably the Tjapukai of the Cairns area.(Tindales Catalogue of Australian Aboriginal Tribes: Tjapukai (QLD)) These rainforest people, collectively referred to as Barrineans, were once considered to be a relict of an earlier wave of Negrito migration to the Australian continent,(The Extinction of the Australian Pygmies (June 2002), Keith Windschuttle and Tim Gillin) but this theory no longer finds much favour.(Colin Groves: Australia for the Australians)Man, whose remains were discovered in 1974 near Mungo in South Wales, is the oldest human yet found in Australia. Although the exact age of Mungo Man is in dispute, the best consensus is that he is at least 40000 years old. Stone tools also found at Lake Mungo have been estimated, based on stratigraphic association, to be about 50000 years old. Since Lake Mungo is in south-eastern Australia, many archaeologists have concluded that humans must have arrived in north-west Australia at least several thousand years earlier.The Long History in AustraliaThere has been a long history of contact between Papuan peoples of the Western Province, Strait Islanders and the Aboriginal people in Cape York.(Flood, Josephine (1994), Archaeology of the Dreamtime (Angus & Robertson; 2Rev Ed)(ISBN 0207184488))  The introduction of the dingo, possibly as early as 3500 BCE, showed that contact with South East Asian peoples continued, as the closest genetic connection to the dingo seems to be the wild dogs of Thailand.  This contact was not just one way, as the presence of kangaroo ticks on these dogs demonstrates.  Dingoes began and evolved in Asia. The earliest known dingo-like fossils are from Ban Chiang in north-east Thailand (dated at 5500 years BP) and from north Vietnam (5000 years BP). According to skull morphology, these fossils occupy a place between Asian wolves (prime candidates were the pale footed (or Indian) wolf Canis lupus pallipes and the Arabian wolf Canis lupus araba) and modern dingoes in Australia and Thailand.(Corbett, Laurie (1995), The Dingo: in Australia and Asia)Similarly Aboriginal people also seem to have lived a long time in the same environment as the now extinct megafauna, stories of which are preserved in the oral culture of many Aboriginal groups (see Waugal, Serpent and Bunyip).  The recent European scientific belief that it was the arrival of the Australian Aboriginal people on the continent, and their introduction of farming, that was responsible for these extinctions(Flannery, Tim The Future Eaters: An Ecological History of the Australian Lands and People (Grove Press)(ISBN 0802139434)) is contested by Aboriginal people themselves, and others who argue that mass extinctions of Australian megafauna occurred only 20000 years ago, with the Age Maxima, during which times much if not most of the continent was reduced to desert and sand-dune conditions.(  There is evidence that there may have been a significant reduction in Australian Aboriginal populations during this time, and there would seem to have been specific refugia, in which Aboriginal populations during this time were confined.  Corridors between these areas seem to be routes by which people kept in contact, and they seem to have been the basis of what have been called Songlines to the present day.Following the Ice Age, Aboriginal people around the coast, from Land, the Kimberley and the south west of Western Australia, all tell stories of former territories that were drowned beneath the sea with the rising coastlines after the Ice Age. It was this event that isolated the Tasmanian Aboriginal people on their island, and probably led to the extinction of Aboriginal cultures on the Bass Strait Islands and Kangaroo Island in South Australia.(  In the interior, the end of the Ice Age may have led to the recolonisation of the desert and semi-desert areas by Aboriginal people of the Northern Territory.  This may have been in part responsible for the spread of languages of the PamaNyungan language phylum, and secondarily responsible for the spread of male initiation rites involving circumcision.Aborigines were limited to the range of foods occurring naturally in their area, but they knew exactly when, where and how to find everything edible. Anthropologists and nutrition experts who studied the tribal diet in Arnhem Land found it to be well-balanced, with most of the nutrients modern dietitians recommend. But food was not obtained without effort. In some areas both men and women had to spend from half to two-thirds of each day hunting or foraging for food. Each day the women of the horde went into successive parts of one countryside, with wooden digging sticks and plaited dilly bags or wooden coolamons. They dug yams and edible roots and collected fruits, berries, seeds, vegetables and insects. They killed lizards, bandicoots and other small creatures with digging sticks. The men went hunting. Small game such as birds, possums, lizards and snakes were often taken by hand. Larger animals and birds such as kangaroos and emus were speared or disabled with a thrown club, boomerang, or stone. Many indigenous devices were used to get within striking distance of prey. The men were excellent trackers and stalkers and approached their prey running where there was cover, or freezing and crawling in the open. They were careful to stay downwind, and sometimes covered themselves with mud to disguise their smell.Frequently disguises were used. Mud also served as camouflage, or the hunter held a bush in front of him while stalking in the open. He glided through water with a bunch of rushes or a lily-leaf over his head until he was close enough to pull down a water-bird. He prepared hides and, with bait or bird calls, lured birds to within grabbing distance. He attracted emus, which are inquisitive birds, by imitating their movements with a stick and a bunch of feathers or some other simple device. Likewise, it was common to use the pelts of animals as a disguise, and imitate them in order to get within striking range of their herd.Fish were sometimes taken by hand by stirring up the muddy bottom of a pool until they rose to the surface, or by placing the crushed leaves of poisonous plants in the water to stupefy them. Fish spears, nets, wicker or stone traps were also used in different areas. Lines with hooks made from bone, shell, wood or spines were used along the north and east coasts. Dugong, turtle and large fish were harpooned, the harpooner launching himself bodily from the canoe to give added weight to the thrust.Hunting was frequently organised on co-operative lines. Groups of men combined to drive animals into a line of spearsmen, a brush-fence, or large nets. Sometimes a U-shaped area was fenced and the trapped animals killed. Animals were also trapped in snares, pits, and partly enclosed water-holes. there was a fairly clear division of labour between the sexes in food-collecting, but this was not rigidly maintained. The main concern was to get food. The womens work may appear monotonous drudgery, but it was usually easier than the mens. Hunting was arduous, and the men often had to walk, run, or crawl long distances. In poor country the men often returned empty-handed but the women invariably collected something - perhaps only a few roots and tiny lizards - but sufficient to tide the family over. Inland, the quest for water was a life and death matter. Aborigines survived where others would perish. they knew all the water holes and soaks in their area. They drained dew, and obtained water from certain trees and roots. They even dug up and squeezed out frogs which store water in their bodies.Before British arrivalImage:Aboriginal craft.jpg|thumb|250px|These implements were used only by men. At left, a spear-thrower (called woomera in the Eora language), and two examples of boomerangs. Boomerangs could be used for hunting (most were non-returning), or purely for music and ceremony.At the time of first European contact, it is estimated that between 315000 and 750000 people lived in Australia, with upper estimates being as high as 1.25 million.() Population levels are likely to have been largely stable for many thousands of years. The regions of heaviest indigenous population were the same temperate coastal regions that are currently the most heavily populated. The greatest density was to be found in the southern and eastern regions of the continent, the River valley in particular. However, indigenous Australians maintained successful communities throughout Australia, from the cold and wet highlands of Tasmania to the more arid parts of the continental interior. In all instances, technologies, diets and hunting practices varied according to the local environment.Post-colonisation, the coastal indigenous populations were soon absorbed, depleted or forced from their lands; the traditional aspects of Aboriginal life which remained persisted most strongly in areas such as the Sandy Desert where European settlement has been sparse.Image:Aboriginal craft made from weaving grass.jpg|thumb|left|250px|Aboriginal womens implements, including a coolamon lined with paperbark and a digging stick. This woven basket style is from Northern Australia. Baskets were used for collecting fruits, corms, seeds and even water  some baskets were woven so tightly as to be watertight.The mode of life and material cultures varied greatly from region to region. While Torres Strait Island populations were agriculturalists who supplemented their diet through the acquisition of wild foods, most Indigenous Australians were hunter-gatherers. Indigenous Australians along the coast and rivers were also expert fishermen. Some Aborigines and Torres Strait Islanders relied on the dingo as a companion animal, using it to assist with hunting and for warmth on cold nights.Some writers have described some mainland indigenous food and landscape management practices as incipient agriculture . In present-day Victoria, for example, there were two separate communities with an economy based on eel-farming in complex and extensive irrigated pond systems; one on the River in the states north, the other in the south-west near Hamilton in the territory of the Wurrung, which traded with other groups from as far away as the Melbourne area (see Gunditjmara).On mainland Australia no animal other than the dingo was domesticated, however domestic pigs were utilised by Torres Strait Islanders. The typical indigenous diet included a wide variety of foods, such as pig, kangaroo, emu, wombats, goanna, snakes, birds, many insects such as honey ants, moths and grubs. Many varieties of plant foods such as taro, coconuts, nuts, fruits and berries were also eaten.A primary tool used in hunting is the spear, launched by a woomera or spear-thrower in some locales. Boomerangs were also used by some mainland indigenous peoples.  The non-returnable boomerang (known more correctly as a Stick), more powerful than the returning kind, could be used to injure or even kill a kangaroo.Image:Aboriginal grinding stones.jpg|thumb|250px|Aboriginal grinding stones - a pestle and mortar - vital in making flours for bread. Aboriginal women were expert at making bread from a variety of seasonal grains and nuts.Permanent villages were the norm for most Torres Strait Island communities. In some areas mainland Indigenous Australians also lived in semi-permanent villages, most usually in less arid areas where fishing could provide for a more settled existence. Most indigenous communities were semi-nomadic, moving in a regular cycle over a defined territory, following seasonal food sources and returning to the same places at the same time each year. From the examination of middens, archaeologists have shown that some localities were visited annually by indigenous communities for thousands of years. In the more arid areas Indigenous Australians were nomadic, ranging over wide areas in search of scarce food resources.The Indigenous Australians lived through great climatic changes and adapted successfully to their changing physical environment. There is much ongoing debate about the degree to which they modified the environment. One controversy revolves around the role of indigenous people in the extinction of the marsupial megafauna (also see megafauna). Some argue that natural climate change killed the megafauna. Others claim that, because the megafauna were large and slow, they were easy prey for human hunters. A third possibility is that human modification of the environment, particularly through the use of fire, indirectly led to their extinction.Indigenous Australians used fire for a variety of purposes: to encourage the growth of edible plants and fodder for prey; to reduce the risk of catastrophic bushfires; to make travel easier; to eliminate pests; for ceremonial purposes; for warfare and just to clean up country. There is disagreement, however, about the extent to which this burning led to large-scale changes in vegetation patterns.thumb|left|250px|Lomandra, a plant used by Aborigines for weavingThere is evidence of substantial change in indigenous culture over time. painting at several locations in northern Australia has been shown to consist of a sequence of different styles linked to different historical periods.Some have suggested, for instance, that the Glacial Maximum, of 20000 years ago, associated with a period of continental wide aridity and the spread of sand-dunes, was also associated with a reduction in Aboriginal activity, and greater specialisation in the use of natural foodstuffs and products. The transgression associated with sea-level rise, particularly in the north, with the loss of the Sahul Shelf, and with the flooding of Strait and the subsequent isolation of Tasmania, may also have been periods of difficulty for affected groups.Lourandos has been the leading proponent of the theory that a period of hunter-gatherer intensification occurred between 3000 and 1000 BCE. Intensification involved an increase in human manipulation of the environment (for example, the construction of eel traps in Victoria), population growth, an increase in trade between groups, a more elaborate social structure, and other cultural changes. A shift in tool technology, involving the development of smaller and more intricate points and scrapers, occurred around this time. This was probably also associated with the introduction to the mainland of the Australian dingo.Many indigenous communities also have a very complex kinship structure and in some places strict rules about marriage. In traditional societies, men are required to marry women of a specific moiety. The system is still alive in many Central Australian communities. To enable men and women to find suitable partners, many groups would come together for annual gatherings (commonly known as corroborees) at which goods were traded, news exchanged, and marriages arranged amid appropriate ceremonies. This practice both reinforced clan relationships and prevented inbreeding in a society based on small semi-nomadic groups.The historical record tends to favour distinct and widespread evidence of cannibalism in indigenous communities. That the practice was observed by anthropologists from the time of European settlement and well into the 20th century has been noted by a number of writers, including W.E. Roth in his monumental study The Queensland Aborigines. In Arnhem Land in northern Australia, a study of warfare among the Indigenous Australian Murngin people in the late 19th century found that over a 20-year period no less than 200 out of 800 men, or 25% of all adult males, had been killed in intertribal warfare.(Anthropological Quarterly)The impact of British settlement17881900thumb|250px|right|A 19th century engraving of an Indigenous Australian encampment, showing the indigenous lifestyle in the cooler parts of Australia at the time of European settlement.In 1770, Lieutenant Cook claimed the east coast of Australia in the name of Great Britain and named it South Wales. British colonisation of Australia began in Sydney in 1788. The most immediate consequence of British settlement  within weeks of the first colonists arrival  was a wave of European epidemic diseases such as chickenpox, smallpox, influenza and measles, which spread in advance of the frontier of settlement. The worst-hit communities were the ones with the greatest population densities, where disease could spread more readily. In the arid centre of the continent, where small communities were spread over a vast area, the population decline was less marked.The second consequence of British settlement was appropriation of land and water resources. The settlers took the view that Indigenous Australians were nomads with no concept of land ownership, who could be driven off land wanted for farming or grazing and who would be just as happy somewhere else. In fact the loss of traditional lands, food sources and water resources was usually fatal, particularly to communities already weakened by disease. Additionally, Indigenous Australians groups had a deep spiritual and cultural connection to the land, so that in being forced to move away from traditional areas, cultural and spiritual practices necessary to the cohesion and well-being of the group could not be maintained. Proximity to settlers also brought disease, to which Indigenous Australians had no tolerance and which greatly reduced indigenous fertility and birthrates. Settlers also brought alcohol, opium and tobacco, and abuse has remained a chronic problem for indigenous communities ever since. The combination of disease, loss of land and direct violence reduced the Aboriginal population by an estimated 90% between 1788 and 1900. Entire communities in the moderately fertile southern part of the continent simply vanished without trace, often before European settlers arrived or recorded their existence.The Palawah, or indigenous people of Tasmania, were particularly hard-hit. Nearly all of them, apparently numbering somewhere between 2000 and 15000 when white settlement began, were dead by the 1870s. It is widely claimed that this was the result of a genocidal policy, in the form of the War. However, such claims are disputed by historian Windschuttle, who claims that only 118 Tasmanian Aborigines were killed in 180347 and that many of these were killed in self-defence. Another scholar, H. A. Willis, has subsequently disputed Windschuttles figures and has documented 188 Palawah killed by settlers in 180334 alone, with possibly another 145 killed during the same period.(Cited in Josephine Flood, 2006, The Original Australians: Story of the Aboriginal People, Allen & Unwin, (ISBN 1-741-14872-3) p.86.) Such counts do not consider undocumented violence and must be regarded as minimum estimates.(Flood, Ibid) It is also claimed, but untrue, that the last indigenous Tasmanian was Truganini, who died in 1876. This belief stems from a distinction between full bloods and half castes that is now generally regarded as racist. Palawah people survived, in missions set up on the islands of Strait.On the mainland, prolonged conflict followed the frontier of European settlement.(The War for the land: A Short History of Aboriginal-European relations in Cairns.) In 1834, Dunmore Lang wrote: There is black blood at this moment on the hands of individuals of good repute in the colony of New South Wales of which all the waters of New Holland would be insufficient to wash out the indelible stains.(Lang, 1834. History of NSW p.38) In 1838, twenty eight indigenous people were killed at the Creek massacre; the hanging of the white convict settlers responsible was the first time whites had been executed for the murder of indigenous people. Many indigenous communities resisted the settlers, such as the Noongar of south-western Australia, led by Yagan, who was killed in 1833. The Kalkadoon of Queensland also resisted the settlers, and there was a massacre of over 200 people on their land at Battle Mountain in 1884. There was a massacre at Coniston in the Northern Territory in 1928. Poisoning of food and water has been recorded on several different occasions. The number of violent deaths at the hands of white people is still the subject of debate, with a figure of around 10000 - 20000 deaths being advanced by historians such as Henry Reynolds. Nevertheless, deadly infectious diseases like smallpox, influenza and tuberculosis were always major causes of indigenous deaths.(Invisible Invaders) Smallpox alone killed more than 50% of the Aboriginal population.() Reynolds, and other historians, estimate that up to 3000 people were killed by Indigenous Australians in the frontier violence.(The Statistics of Frontier Conflict) By the 1870s all the fertile areas of Australia had been appropriated, and indigenous communities reduced to impoverished remnants living either on the fringes of European communities or on lands considered unsuitable for settlement.Some initial contact between indigenous people and Europeans was peaceful, starting with the Yimithirr people who met Cook near Cooktown in 1770. Bennelong served as interlocutor between the Eora people of Sydney and the British colony, and was the first Indigenous Australian to travel to England, staying there between 1792 and 1795. Indigenous people were known to help European explorers, such as John King, who lived with a tribe for two and a half months after the ill fated and Wills expedition of 1861. Also living with indigenous people was William Buckley, an escaped convict, who was with the Wautharong people near Melbourne for thirty-two years, before being found in 1835. Many indigenous people adapted to European culture, working as stock hands or labourers. The first Australian cricket team, which toured England in 1868, was principally made up of indigenous players.Image:Aboriginal cricket team at MCG in 1867.jpg|thumb|220px|The first Australian cricket team to tour England was made of indigenous players (1867)As the European pastoral industries developed, several economic changes came about. The appropriation of prime land and the spread of European livestock over vast areas made a traditional indigenous lifestyle less viable, but also provided a ready alternative supply of fresh meat for those prepared to incur the settlers anger by hunting livestock. The impact of disease and the settlers industries had a profound impact on the Indigenous Australians way of life. With the exception of a few in the remote interior, all surviving indigenous communities gradually became dependent on the settler population for their livelihood. In south-eastern Australia, during the 1850s, large numbers of white pastoral workers deserted employment on stations for the goldrushes. Indigenous women, men and children became a significant source of labour. Most indigenous labour was unpaid, instead indigenous workers received rations in the form of food, clothing and other basic necessities. In the later 19th century, settlers made their way north and into the interior, appropriating small but vital parts of the land for their own exclusive use (waterholes and soaks in particular), and introducing sheep, rabbits and cattle, all three of which ate out previously fertile areas and degraded the ability of the land to carry the native animals that were vital to indigenous economies. Indigenous hunters would often spear sheep and cattle, incurring the wrath of graziers, after they replaced the native animals as a food source. As large sheep and cattle stations came to dominate northern Australia, indigenous workers were quickly recruited. Several other outback industries, notably pearling, also employed Aboriginal workers.In many areas Christian missions provided food and clothing for indigenous communities and also opened schools and orphanages for indigenous children. In some places colonial governments provided some resources.After 1900In spite of the impact of disease, violence and the spread of foreign settlement and custom, some indigenous communities in remote desert and tropical rainforest areas survived according to traditional means until well into the 20th century.  In 1914 around 1200 Aboriginal people answered the call to arms, despite restrictions on Aborigines serving in the military. As the war continued, these restrictions were relaxed as more recruits were needed. Many enlisted by claiming they were Mori or Indian.()By the 1920s, the indigenous population had declined to between 50000 and 90000, and the belief that the Indigenous Australians would soon die out was widely held, even among Australians sympathetic to their situation. But by about 1930, those Indigenous Australians who had survived had acquired better resistance to imported diseases, and birthrates began to rise again as communities were able to adapt to changed circumstances.In the Territory, significant frontier conflict continued. Both isolated Europeans and visiting Asian fishermen were killed by hunter gatherers until the start of World War II in 1939. It is known that some European settlers in the centre and north of the country shot indigenous people during this period. One particular series of killings became known as the Bay crisis, and became a watershed in the relationship between indigenous and non-indigenous Australians.Well into the 20th Century, indigenous Australians were  both in Australia itself and in many other countries  the subject of widespread crude racist stereotyping. For example, the American control campaigner Sanger could write casually: The aboriginal Australian, the lowest known species of the human family, just a step higher than the chimpanzee in brain development, has so little sexual control that police authority alone prevents him from obtaining sexual satisfaction on the streets (What Every Girl Should Know, 1920).By the end of World War II, many indigenous men had served in the military. They were among the few indigenous Australians to have been granted citizenship; even those that had were obliged to carry papers, known in the vernacular as a dog licence, with them to prove it. However, Aboriginal pastoral workers in northern Australia remained labourers, paid only small amounts of cash, in addition to rations, and severely restricted in their movements by regulations and/or police action. On 1 May 1946, Aboriginal station workers in the Pilbara region of Western Australia initiated the Pilbara strike and never returned to work. Mass layoffs across northern Australia followed the Federal Industry Award of 1968, which required the payment of a wage to Aboriginal station workers, as they were not paid by the Pastoralist discretion, many however were not and those who were had their money held by the government. Many of the workers and their families became refugees or dwellers, living in camps on the outskirts of towns and cities.In 1984, a group of Pintupi people who were living a traditional hunter-gatherer desert-dwelling life were tracked down in the Desert in Western Australia and brought in to a settlement. They are believed to be the last uncontacted tribe in Australia.(Colliding worlds: first contact in the western desert, 19321984)The path to reconciliation: 1967 onwardsIn 1949, the right to vote in federal elections was extended to Indigenous Australians who had served in the armed forces, or were enrolled to vote in state elections. At that time, those Indigenous Australians who lived in Queensland, Western Australia and the Northern Territory were still ineligible to vote in state elections, consequently they did not have the right to vote in federal elections.All Indigenous Australians were given the right to vote in Commonwealth elections in Australia by the Menzies government in 1962.(Australian Electoral Commission - Electoral Milestone / Timetable for Indigenous Australians) The first federal election in which all Aboriginal Australians could vote was held in November 1963. The right to vote in state elections was granted in Western Australia in 1962 and Queensland was the last state to do so in 1965.The 1967 referendum, passed with a 90% majority, allowed the Commonwealth to make laws with respect to Aboriginal people, and for Aboriginal people to be included in counts to determine electoral representation. This has been the largest affirmative vote in the history of Australias referendums.In 1971, Yolngu people at Yirrkala sought an injunction against Nabalco to cease mining on their traditional land. In the resulting historic and controversial land rights case, Justice Blackburn ruled that Australia had been nullius before European settlement, and that no concept of Native title existed in Australian law. Although the Yolngu people were defeated in this action, the effect was to highlight the absurdity of the law, which led first to the Commission, and then to the Land Rights Act.In 1972, the Tent Embassy was established on the steps of Parliament House in Canberra, in response to the sentiment among indigenous Australians that they were strangers in their own country. A Tent Embassy still exists on the same site.In 1975, the Whitlam government drafted the Aboriginal Land Rights Act, which aimed to restore traditional lands to indigenous people. After the dismissal of the Whitlam government by the Governor-General, a reduced-scope version of the Act (known as the Land Rights Act 1976) was introduced by the coalition government led by Fraser. While its application was limited to the Northern Territory, it did grant inalienable freehold title to some traditional lands.In 1992, the Australian High Court handed down its decision in the Mabo Case, declaring the previous legal concept of nullius to be invalid. This decision legally recognised certain land claims of Indigenous Australians in Australia prior to British Settlement. Legislation was subsequently enacted and later amended to recognise Title claims over land in Australia.In 1998, as the result of an inquiry into the forced removal of indigenous children (see generation) from their families, a Sorry Day was instituted, to acknowledge the wrong that had been done to indigenous families. Many politicians, from both sides of the house, participated, with the notable exception of the Prime Minister, Howard.In 1999 a referendum was held to change the Australian Constitution to include a preamble that, amongst other topics, recognised the occupation of Australia by Indigenous Australians prior to British Settlement. This referendum was defeated, though the recognition of Indigenous Australians in the preamble was not a major issue in the referendum discussion, and the preamble question attracted minor attention compared to the question of becoming a republic.In 2004, the Australian Government abolished The and Torres Strait Islander Commission (ATSIC), which had been Australias top indigenous organisation. The Commonwealth cited corruption and, in particular, made allegations concerning the misuse of public funds by ATSICs chairman, Clark, as the principal reason. Indigenous specific programmes have been mainstreamed, that is, reintegrated and transferred to departments and agencies serving the general population. The of Indigenous Policy Coordination was established within the then Department of Immigration and Multicultural and Indigenous Affairs, and now with the Department of Families, Community Services and Indigenous Affairs to coordinate a whole of government effort.In June 2005, Frankland, founder of the Voice political party, in an open letter to Prime Minister John Howard, advocated that the eighteenth-century conflicts between indigenous and colonial Australians be recognised as wars and be given the same attention as the other wars receive within the War Memorial. In its editorial on 20 June 2005, Melbourne newspaper, Age, said that Frankland has raised an important question, and asked whether moving work commemorating Aborigines who lost their lives defending their land ... to the War Memorial would change the way we regard Aboriginal history.In 2008, Prime Minister Rudd made a formal apology to the Aboriginal people.See also*wars*archaeology*HistoryNotes and referencesExternal links* Jamison, T. The Australian Aboriginal People: Dating the Colonization of Australia
7721715
K._A._Taipale
K. A. (Kim) Taipale is a lawyer, scholar, and social theorist specializing in information, technology, and national security policy.  He is a partner in Stilwell Holding, a private investment firm and in Parkview Ventures, a technology merchant bank.  He is the founder and executive director of the Stilwell Center for Advanced Studies in Science and Technology Policy, a private, nonpartisan research organization, a director of the Stilwell Charitable Fund, and a senior fellow at the Policy Institute.    He was previously an investment banker at Lazard Freres & Co.  and a lawyer at Polk & Wardwell.Taipale serves on the Foundation Task Force on National Security in the Information Age, and previously served on the Science and Engineering for National Security Advisory Board of the Foundation, the LexisNexis Information Policy Forum; and the Steering Committee of the Law Institutes digital information privacy project. In addition, he has served on several corporate and non-profit boards.Taipale is a frequent speaker and has written extensively on the intersection of information and technology policy with national and global security interests.  He has testified before Congressional and other national committees, including on issues relating to foreign intelligence surveillance,(Statement on Foreign Intelligence Surveillance Modernization, Senate Select Committee on Intelligence (SCCI) Hearing on The Foreign Intelligence Modernization Act of 2007, U.S. Senate (May 1, 2007).)(Testimony on Foreign Intelligence Surveillance Reform, House Permanent Select Committee on Intelligence (HPSCI), U.S. House of Representatives (Jul. 19, 2006).) data mining,(Testimony of Kim A. Taipale, Senate Committee on the Judiciary, Hearing on Privacy Implications of Government Data Mining Programs, U.S. Senate (Jan. 10, 2007).)(Committee on Technical and Privacy Dimensions of Information for Terrorism Prevention and Other National Goals, The National Academies, Washington, DC (Apr. 27, 2006).) biometrics,(Committee on the Technology, Policy, and Cultural Dimensions of Biometric Systems, The National Academies, Washington, DC (Mar. 2005).) and information warfare.(Committee on the Policy Consequences and Legal/Ethical Implications of Offensive Information Warfare, The National Academies, Washington, DC (Oct. 30, 2006).)   Taipale is a nationally recognized expert on technology and security policy, and related issues, including privacy and civil liberties. He is regularly quoted in the media,(For example, see The Rise of Black Market Data, Newsweek (Dec. 6, 2008), Freedom and its Digital Discontents, The Economist (Feb. 8, 2008),  Listening to the Enemy, Wall Street Journal (Jan. 28, 2008), In Cyberwar There Are No Rules, Sueddeutsche Zeitung (Sept. 20, 2007), NSA Spying Part of Broader Effort, Washington Post (Aug. 1, 2007), Daylight Sought For Data Mining, Washington Post (Jan. 11, 2007), Experts Differ About Surveillance and Privacy, N. Y. Times (July 20, 2006), Balancing Privacy and Security, The Wall Street Journal (May 16, 2006), Surveillance Society: The Experts Speak, Business Week (Aug. 8, 2005), and Brave New Era for Privacy Fight, Wired News (Jan. 17, 2005).) and appears frequently on PBS and NPR.(For example, see  Digital Age: Russian Cyber Attacks on Georgia (WNYE-PBS Sept. 28, 2008),  On Point: Privacy in the Electronic Workplace (NPR Jul. 3, 2008), Fred Friendly: Nanotechnology: Privacy and Security (PBS April 2008),  Justice Talking: The Tension Between Security and Liberty in the War on Terror (NPR Mar. 3, 2008),  Digital Age: Encryption and Information Security (WNYE-PBS Jan. 16, 2008), and Digital Age: Will the CIA Ever Learn to Blog? (WNYE-PBS, Jul. 1, 2007).)Taipale received a BA and JD from York University and an MA, EdM, and LLM from University.Selected publicationsBook chapters*Cyber-Deterrence, in Law, Policy and Technology: Cyberterorrism, Information Warfare, and Internet Immobilization (IGI Global 2011) (ISBN 1615208313).*Power to the Edge: New Threats, New Responses, in Americas Security Role in a Changing World: A Global Strategic Assessment 2009 (National Defense University 2009) (ISBN 0160832128).*Why Cant We All Get Along? How Technology, Security and Privacy Can Co-exist in a Digital World, in Cybercrime and Digital Law Enforcement, Ex Machina: Law, Technology & Society Book Series, (Jack Balkin, et al., eds., NYU Press, 2007) (ISBN 0814799833).*Designing Technical Systems to Support Policy: Enterprise Architecture, Policy Appliances, and Civil Liberties, in Emergent Information Technologies and Enabling Policies for Counter Terrorism (Robert Popp and John Yen, eds., Wiley-IEEE, 2006) (ISBN 0471776157).*Seeking Symmetry in Fourth Generation Warfare: Information Operations in the War of Ideas, in Proceedings from Challenges in the Struggle Against Violent Extremism: Winning the War of Ideas (INSCT-Bantle 2006).*Introduction to Domestic Security and Civil Liberties, in The McGraw-Hill Homeland Security Handbook (David Kamien, ed., McGraw-Hill, 2005) (ISBN 0071446656).Journal articles and papers*Identity and Resilience, Paul Trevithick, William Coleman, John Clippinger, and Kim Taipale (White House Cyberspace Policy Review Document 2009).*Seeking Symmetry on the Information Front: Confronting Global Jihad on the Internet, 16 Natl Strategy F. Rev. 14 (Summer 2007).*The Ear of Dionysus: Rethinking Foreign Intelligence Surveillance, 9 Yale J. L. & Tech. 128 (Spring 2007).*Rethinking Foreign Intelligence Surveillance, World Policy Journal, Vol. XIII (Winter 2006-2007).*Whispering Wires and Warrantless Wiretaps: Data Mining and Foreign Intelligence Surveillance, N.Y.U. Rev. L. & Security, No. VII Supl. Bull. on L. & Sec.: The NSA and the War on Terror (Spring 2006).*The Trusted Systems Problem: Security Envelopes, Statistical Threat Analysis, and the Presumption of Innocence, IEEE Intelligent Systems, Vol. 20 No. 5, (Sept./Oct. 2005).*Technology, Security and Privacy: The Fear of Frankenstein, the Mythology of Privacy, and the Lessons of King Ludd, 7 Yale J. L. & Tech. 123; 9 Intl. J. Comm. L. & Poly 8 (Dec. 2004).*Data Mining and Domestic Security: Connecting the Dots to Make Sense of Data, 5 Colum. Sci. & Tech. L. Rev. 2 (Dec. 2003).Reports* The Future of Work: What It Means for Individuals, Businesses, Markets and Governments, David Bollier, rapp. (Aspen Institute 2011) (ISBN 0898435439).* The Promise and Peril of Big Data, David Bollier, rapp. (Aspen Institute 2010) (ISBN 0898435161).*  No More Secrets: National Security Strategies for a Transparent World, S. E. Spaulding, conv., A. Kochems, rapp. (ABA-SCLNS, Off. of the Natl Counterintelligence Exec., & Natl Strategy F. 2010).* Biometric Recognition: Challenges and Opportunities,  J. N. Pato and L. I. Millett, eds. (National Academies Press 2010) (ISBN 0309142083).* Identity in the Age of Cloud Computing, J.D. Lasica, rapp. (Aspen Institute 2009) (ISBN 0898435056).* Technology, Policy, Law, and Ethics Regarding U.S. Acquisition and Use of Cyberattack Capabilities, W. A. Owens, K. W. Dam, and H. S. Lin, eds. (National Academies Press 2009) (ISBN 0309138507).* Protecting Individual Privacy in the Struggle Against Terrorist, Committee on Technical and Privacy Dimensions of Information for Terrorism Prevention and Other National Goals (National Academies Press 2008) (ISBN 0309124883).* Mobilizing Information to Prevent Terrorism, Third Report of the Markle Foundation Task Force on National Security in the Information Age, Zoe Baird & James Barksdale, chmn. (Jul. 2006).* Implementing a Trusted Information Sharing Environment, Markle Foundation Task Force on National Security in the Information Age, Zoe Baird & James Barksdale, chmn. ( Feb. 2006).Opinion*Commentary, Security vs. Privacy: Security, The Huffington Post (Nov. 9, 2007).*Commentary (with James Jay Carafano), Free the Hostages: Continuing FISA Concerns, National Review Online (Oct. 24, 2007).*New Authority to Oversight Foreign Intelligence Needed, Program on Law Enforcement and National Security in the Information Age, World Policy Institute (May 7, 2007).*FISA Should be Amended, Says Center for Advanced Studies, Program on Law Enforcement and National Security in the Information Age, World Policy Institute (Apr. 19, 2007).*Is Net Neutrality Bad for National Preparedness?, Program on Telecommunications and Cybersecurity Policy, World Policy Institute (Jun. 14, 2006).*Commentary (with James Jay Carafano), Fixing Foreign Intelligence Surveillance, The Washington Times (Jan. 24, 2006).*Not Issuing Drivers Licenses to Illegal Aliens is Bad for National Security, Program on Law Enforcement and National Security in the Information Age, World Policy Institute (Dec. 17, 2004).*Government Should Not Rush to Massive ID Surveillance System, Global Information Society Project, World Policy Institute (Oct. 29, 2004).ReferencesExternal links*taipale.info - personal web page*Center for Advanced Studies in Science and Technology Policy*Global Information Society Project*Markle Task Force on National Security in the Information Age
7731194
Aluminium_in_Africa
Aluminium in Africa originates primarily in Guinea, Mozambique and Ghana. Guinea is by far the biggest producer in Africa, and is a world leader in aluminium and bauxite production; see World bauxite mine production, reserves, and reserve base at the bauxite article.There are many companies involved in the aluminium trade in Africa. Principal mine and smelter operators include:  Cameroon * Ngaoundr - railhead  Egypt www.egyptalum.com.eg  Ghana * Bauxite, affiliated with Alcan* Aluminum Company (Valco)  Guinea * Mbendi overview* Tinto Alcan* des Bauxites de Guine (CBG) - in the Region - Guineas largest producer, affiliated with Mining, which is affiliated with Alcan, Alcoa, Metals, Pechiney, Comalco, etc.* Company of Guinea, ACG - operating the bauxite-alumina complex at Fria (http://railwaysafrica.com/index.php?optioncom_content&taskview&id3381&Itemid35 )* des Bauxites de Kindia SBK - state-owned, operates the Kindia mining operations; operated by Rusal (Russia Aluminium) and exports bauxite to Ukraine* Alumina Products Corporation, proposed smelting operation in Conakry * Kinia - refinery (* Sangaredi* There are over 100 Guinean aluminium companies listed at MBendis Bauxite:Africa:Guinea information page  Mozambique * Mozal - Mozambique aluminium(http://allafrica.com/stories/200806101031.html)  Africa * Africa does not mine bauxite nor refine alumina; Billiton operates two smelters at Richards Bay in Kwazulu Natal. See also * Mining* in Africa* ore in Africa* in Africa* in Africa* in Africa* of Alumina Refineries External links * MBendi:Mining:Bauxite:Africa* MBendi:Mining:Bauxite:Africa:Guinea* Alcant in South Africa References  
7739956
Edlington_railway_station
 events1      Station closedEdlington railway station was a small station at the eastern terminus of the Valley Railway. The stations full title as shown on the station nameboard is Edlington for Balby Doncaster (with the words for and Doncaster in lettering half size compared to the others). It was built to serve the mining village of Edlington and the Doncaster suburb of Balby in Yorkshire, England.The station, like others on the Dearne Valley, consisted of a bed of sleepers set at track level with an old L&Y coach body lit by a couple of lamps for a waiting shelter. The large station sign was removed in the late 1920s and replaced by a simple Edlington.The station was opened for passengers on 3 June 1912 and ceased on 10 September 1951.() The passenger service was originally operated by a Hughes-designed railmotor which was fitted with vacuum-operated retractable steps, thus saving on platform building. At first, trains were operated on behalf of the DVR by the and Yorkshire Railway; when that company amalgamated with the and North Western Railway on 1 January 1922, the combined organisation (also known as the London and North Western Railway) absorbed the DVR on the same day.() See also * station layout* of closed railway stations in Britain References Further reading* Railways in South Yorkshire by C. T. Goode.  Dalesman Publications External links * The station on navigable 1935 OS mapcol 
7757234
Islamic_economics_in_the_world
:This is a sub-article of economic jurisprudence and world.Islamic economics in practice, or economic policies supported by self-identified Islamic groups, has varied throughout its long history. Traditional Islamic concepts having to do with economics included*zakat - the taxing of certain goods, such as harvest, with an eye to allocating these taxes to expenditures that are also explicitly defined, such as aid to the needy.*Gharar - the interdiction of chance ... that is, of the presence of any element of uncertainty, in a contract (which excludes not only insurance but also the lending of money without participation in the risks)These concepts, like others in Islamic law and jurisprudence, came from the prescriptions, anecdotes, examples, and words of the Prophet, all gathered together and systematized by commentators according to an inductive, casuistic method. (Roy, The Failure of Political Islam Harvard University Press, 1994, p.132) Sometimes other sources such as al-urf, (the custom),  al-aql (reason) or al-ijma (consensus of the jurists) were employed.(Schirazi, Asghar, Constitution of Iran, (1997), p.170) In addition, Islamic law has developed areas of law that correspond to secular laws of contracts and torts.Early Islamic economicsEarly reforms under IslamSome argue  early Islamic theory and practice formed a coherent economic system with a blueprint for a new order in society, in which all participants would be treated more fairly. Michael Bonner, for example, has written that an economy of poverty prevailed in Islam until the 13th and 14th centuries. Under this system Gods guidance made sure the flow of money and goods was purified by being channeled from those who had much of it to those who had little by encouraging zakat (charity) and discouraging riba (usury/interest) on loans. Bonner maintains the prophet also helped poor traders by allowing only tents, not permanent buildings in the market of Medina, and not charging fees and rents there.(Michael Bonner, Poverty and Economics in the Quran, Journal of Interdisciplinary History, xxxv:3 (Winter, 2005), 391406)Social responsibility in commerceresponsibility in commerce was stressed in sociology. The development of banks and economics was a side effect of this sociology: usury was rather severely restrained, no rate was allowed, and investors were not permitted to escape the consequences of any failed ventureall financing was equity financing (Musharaka). In not letting borrowers bear all the risk/cost of a failure, an extreme disparity of outcomes between partners is thus avoided. Ultimately this serves a social harmony purpose. Muslims also could not and cannot (in shariah) finance any dealings in forbidden goods or activities, such as wine, pork, gambling, etc. Thus investing is the only acceptable investing, and purchasing is encouraged.Legal institutionsHawala agencyThe Hawala, an early value transfer system, has its origins in classical Islamic law, and is mentioned in texts of Islamic jurisprudence as early as the 8th century. Hawala itself later influenced the development of the agency in law and in civil laws such as the aval in French law and the avallo in Italian law. The words aval and avallo were themselves derived from Hawala. The transfer of debt, which was not permissible under law but became widely practiced in medieval Europe, especially in transactions, was due to the large extent of the trade conducted by the Italian cities with the world in the Middle Ages. The agency was also an institution unknown to Roman law as no individual could conclude a binding contract on behalf of another as his agent. In Roman law, the contractor himself was considered the party to the contract and it took a second contract between the person who acted on behalf of a principal and the latter in order to transfer the rights and the obligations deriving from the contract to him. On the other hand, Islamic law and the later common law had no difficulty in accepting agency as one of its institutions in the field of contracts and of obligations in general.()Waqf trustThe waqf in Islamic law, which developed in the medieval Islamic world from the 7th to 9th centuries, bears a notable resemblance to the English law.() Every waqf was required to have a waqif (founder), mutawillis (trustee), qadi (judge) and beneficiaries.() Under both a waqf and a trust, property is reserved, and its usufruct appropriated, for the benefit of specific individuals, or for a general charitable purpose; the corpus becomes inalienable; estates for life in favor of successive beneficiaries can be created and without regard to the law of inheritance or the rights of the heirs; and continuity is secured by the successive appointment of trustees or mutawillis.()The only significant distinction between the Islamic waqf and English trust was the express or implied reversion of the waqf to charitable purposes when its specific object has ceased to exist,() though this difference only applied to the waqf ahli (Islamic family trust) rather than the waqf khairi (devoted to a charitable purpose from its inception). Another difference was the English vesting of legal estate over the trust property in the trustee, though the trustee was still bound to administer that property for the benefit of the beneficiaries. In this sense, the role of the English trustee therefore does not differ significantly from that of the mutawalli.()The trust law developed in England at the time of the Crusades, during the 12th and 13th centuries, was introduced by Crusaders who may have been influenced by the waqf institutions they came across in the Middle East.()()After the Islamic waqf law and madrassah foundations were firmly established by the 10th century, the number of Bimaristan hospitals multiplied throughout throughout Islamic lands. In the 11th century, every Islamic city had at least several hospitals. The waqf trust institutions funded the hospitals for various expenses, including the wages of doctors, ophthalmologists, surgeons, chemists, pharmacists, domestics and all other staff, the purchase of foods and drugs; hospital equipment such as beds, mattresses, bowls and perfumes; and repairs to buildings. The waqf trusts also funded medical schools, and their revenues covered various expenses such as their maintenance and the payment of teachers and students.(, in )Classical Muslim commerceDuring the Golden Age, guilds were formed though officially unrecognized by the medieval Islamic city. However, trades were recognized and supervised by officials of the city. Each trade developed its own identity, whose members would attend the same mosque, and serve together in the militia.Technology and industry in Islamic civilization were highly developed. Distillation techniques supported a flourishing perfume industry, while chemical glazes were developed to compete with ceramics imported from China.The systems of contract relied upon by merchants was very effective. Merchants would buy and sell on commission, with money loaned to them by wealthy investors, or a joint investment of several merchants, who were often Muslim, Christian and Jewish. Recently, a collection of documents was found in an Egyptian synagogue shedding a very detailed and human light on the life of medieval Middle Eastern merchants. Business partnerships would be made for many commercial ventures, and bonds of kinship enabled trade networks to form over huge distances. During the ninth century banks enabled the drawing of a check in by a bank in Baghdad that could be cashed in Morocco.(Peters, Edward. Europe and the Middle Ages, 1983. p. 125)The concepts of welfare and pension were introduced in early Islamic law as forms of Zakat (charity), one of the Pillars of Islam, since the time of the Abbasid caliph Al-Mansur in the 8th century. The taxes (including Zakat and Jizya) collected in the treasury of an Islamic government was used to provide income for the needy, including the poor, elderly, orphans, widows, and the disabled. According to the Islamic jurist Al-Ghazali (Algazel, 10581111), the government was also expected to store up food supplies in every region in case a disaster or famine occurs. The Caliphate was thus one of the earliest states, particularly the Caliphate.(Age of discoveryDuring the Islamic Golden Age, isolated regions began integrating into a geographically far-reaching trade network. Muslim Traders and explorers travelled over most of the World,( covering significant areas of Asia and Africa and much of Europe, with their trade networks extending from the Atlantic Ocean and Mediterranean in the west to the Ocean and China Sea in the east.(Subhi Y. Labib (1969), Capitalism in Medieval Islam, The Journal of Economic History 29 (1), p. 79-96.) This helped establish the Islamic Empire (including the Rashidun, Umayyad, Abbasid and Fatimid Caliphates) as the worlds leading extensive economic power in the 7th-13th centuries.(John M. Hobson (2004), The Eastern Origins of Western Civilisation, p. 29-30, University Press, ISBN 0521547245.)Arabic silver dirham coins were being circulated throughout the Afro-Eurasian landmass, as far as Africa in the south and Europe in the north, often in exchange for goods and slaves.(Roman K. Kovalev, Alexis C. Kaelin (2007), Circulation of Arab Silver in Medieval Afro-Eurasia: Preliminary Observations, History Compass 5 (2), pp. 56080.) In England, for example, the Anglo-Saxon king of Mercia (r. 757-796) had coins minted with the Shahadah in Arabic. These factors helped establish the Islamic Empire as the worlds leading extensive economic power throughout the 7th13th centuries.(John M. Hobson (2004), The Eastern Origins of Western Civilisation, pp. 2930, University Press, ISBN 0521547245.)Agricultural RevolutionDuring the Agricultural Revolution, a fundamental transformation in agricultural practice tied in with significant economic change. This transformation involved diffusion of many crops and plants along Muslim trade routes, the spread of more advanced farming techniques, and an agricultural-economic system which promoted increased yields and efficiency. In addition to significant changes in economy, population distribution, vegetation cover,(Andrew M. Watson (1983), Agricultural Innovation in the Early Islamic World, University Press, ISBN 052124711X.) agricultural production, population levels, urban growth, the distribution of the labour force, and numerous other aspects of life in the Islamic world were affected.(Andrew M. Watson (1974), The Arab Agricultural Revolution and Its Diffusion, 700-1100, The Journal of Economic History 34 (1), p. 8-35.)The economic system in place in Muslim areas during this time incorporated reformed ownership rules and labourers rights, combining the recognition of private ownership and the rewarding of cultivators with a harvest share commensurate with their efforts also improved agricultural practices. The cities of the Near East, North Africa and Moorish Spain were supported by highly structured agricultural systems which required significant labor inputs. Such regional systems were often significantly more productive than the agricultural practices in most of Europe at the time which relied heavily on grazing animals and systems of fallowing.The demographics of medieval Islamic society varied in some significant aspects from other agricultural societies, including a decline in rates as well as a change in expectancy. Other traditional agrarian societies are estimated to have had an average life expectancy of 20 to 25 years,() while ancient Rome and medieval Europe are estimated at 20 to 30 years.() Conrad I. Lawrence estimates the average lifespan in the early Islamic Caliphate to be above 35 years for the general population,() and several studies on the lifespans of Islamic scholars concluded that members of this occupational group enjoyed a life expectancy between 69 and 75 years,()()() though this longevity was not representative of the general population.()The early Islamic Empire also had the highest literacy rates among pre-modern societies, alongside the city of Athens in the 4th century BC,() and later, China after the introduction of printing from the 10th century.() One factor for the relatively high literacy rates in the early Islamic Empire was its parent-driven educational marketplace, as the state did not systematically subsidize educational services until the introduction of state funding under al-Mulk in the 11th century.() Another factor was the diffusion of paper from China,() which led to an efflorescence of books and written culture in Islamic society, thus papermaking technology transformed Islamic society (and later, the rest of Afro-Eurasia) from an oral to scribal culture, comparable to the later shifts from scribal to typographic culture, and from typographic culture to the Internet.() Other factors include the widespread use of paper books in Islamic society (more so than any other previously existing society), the study and memorization of the Quran, flourishing commercial activity, and the emergence of the Maktab and Madrasah educational institutions.()Islamic capitalismA number of concepts and techniques were applied in early Islamic commerce, including of exchange, forms of partnership (mufawada) such as partnerships (mudaraba), and early forms of capital (al-mal), accumulation (nama al-mal),( cheques, notes,(Robert Sabatino Lopez, Irving Woodworth Raymond, Olivia Remie Constable (2001), Medieval Trade in the Mediterranean World: Illustrative Documents, University Press, ISBN 0231123574.) trusts (see Waqf), accounts, loaning, ledgers and assignments.(Subhi Y. Labib (1969), Capitalism in Medieval Islam, The Journal of Economic History 29 (1), pp. 7996 923.) Organizational enterprises independent from the state also existed in the medieval Islamic world, while the agency institution was also introduced.(Said Amir Arjomand (1999), The Law, Agency, and Policy in Medieval Islamic Society: Development of the Institutions of Learning from the Tenth to the Fifteenth Century, Comparative Studies in Society and History 41, pp. 26393. University Press.)(Samir Amin (1978), The Arab Nation: Some Conclusions and Problems, MERIP Reports 68, pp. 314 13.) Many of these early concepts were adopted and further advanced in Europe from the 13th century onwards.(Jairus Banaji (2007), Islam, the Mediterranean and the rise of capitalism, Historical Materialism 15 (1), pp. 4774, Publishers.)A economy was established in the Islamic world on the basis of an economic system resembling capitalism. formation was promoted by labour in medieval Islamic society, and capital was developed by a considerable number of owners of monetary funds and metals. Riba (usury) was prohibited by the Quran, but this did not hamper the development of capital in any way. The capitalists (sahib al-mal) were at the height of their power between the 9th12th centuries, but their influence declined after the arrival of the ikta (landowners) and after production was monopolized by the state, both of which hampered the development of industrial capitalism in the Islamic world.() Some enterprises still had a mode of production, such as diving in Iraq and the industry in Egypt.(Judith Tucker (1975), Islam and Capitalism by Maxime Rodinson, MERIP Reports 34, pp. 312 31.)During the 11th13th centuries, the Karimis, an early enterprise and group controlled by entrepreneurs, came to dominate much of the Islamic worlds economy.(Subhi Y. Labib (1969), Capitalism in Medieval Islam, The Journal of Economic History 29 (1), pp. 7996 812.) The group was controlled by about fifty Muslim merchants labelled as Karimis who were of Yemeni, Egyptian and sometimes Indian origins.(The Cambridge economic history of Europe, pp. 43840. University Press, ISBN 0521087090.) Each Karimi merchant had considerable wealth, ranging from at least 100,000 dinars to as much as 10 million dinars. The group had considerable influence in most important eastern markets and sometimes in politics through its financing activities and through a variety of customers, including Emirs, Sultans, Viziers, foreign merchants, and common consumers. The Karimis dominated many of the routes across the Mediterranean, Sea, and Ocean, and as far as Francia in the north, China in the east, and Africa in the south, where they obtained gold from mines. Practices employed by the Karimis included the use of agents, the financing of projects as a method of acquiring capital, and a institution for loans and deposits.Islamic socialismThough medieval Islamic economics appears to have somewhat resembled a form of capitalism, some arguing that it laid the foundations for the development of modern capitalism,()() some Orientalists also believe that there exist a number of parallels between Islamic economics and communism, including the Islamic ideas of zakat and riba. Others see Islamic economics as neither completely capitalistic nor completely socialistic, but rather a balance between the two, emphasizing both individual economic freedom and the need to serve the common good.(Ab Dharr al-Ghifr, a Companion of Prophet Muammad, is credited by many as the founder of Islamic socialism.()()()()() He protested against the accumulation of wealth by the ruling class during Uthmns caliphate and urged the equitable redistribution of wealth.The concepts of welfare and pension were introduced in early Islamic law as forms of Zakat (charity), one of the Pillars of Islam, during the time of the Rashidun caliph Umar in the 7th century. This practiced continued well into the era of the Caliphate, as seen under Al-Mamuns rule in the 8th century, for example. The taxes (including Zakat and Jizya) collected in the treasury of an Islamic government were used to provide income for the needy, including the poor, elderly, orphans, widows, and the disabled. According to the Islamic jurist Al-Ghazali (Algazel, 10581111), the government was also expected to stockpile food supplies in every region in case a disaster or famine occurred. The Caliphate is thus considered the worlds first major state.()( (see online))Industrial developmentMuslim engineers in the Islamic world were responsible for numerous innovative industrial uses of hydropower, early industrial uses of mills, power,and fuels such as petroleum. A variety of industrial mills were used in the Islamic world, including fulling mills, gristmills, hullers, sawmills, shipmills, stamp mills, steel mills, sugar mills, tide mills, and windmills. By the 11th century, every province throughout the Islamic world had these industrial mills in operation, from al-Andalus and North Africa to the Middle East and Central Asia.(Adam Robert Lucas (2005), Industrial Milling in the Ancient and Medieval Worlds: A Survey of the Evidence for an Industrial Revolution in Medieval Europe, Technology and Culture 46 (1), pp. 130 10.) Muslim engineers also employed turbines, and gears in mills and water-raising machines, and pioneered the use of dams as a source of water power, used to provide additional power to watermills and water-raising machines.(Ahmad Y Hassan, Transfer Of Islamic Technology To The West, Part II: Transmission Of Islamic Engineering) Such advances made it possible for many industrial tasks that were previously driven by labour in ancient times to be mechanized and driven by machinery instead in the medieval Islamic world. The transfer of these technologies to Europe later laid the foundations for the Revolution in 18th century Europe.(Many industries were generated due to the Muslim Agricultural Revolution, including astronomical instruments, ceramics, chemicals, distillation technologies, clocks, glass, mechanical hydropowered and wind powered machinery, matting, mosaics, pulp and paper, perfumery, petroleum, pharmaceuticals, rope-making, shipping, shipbuilding, silk, sugar, textiles, weapons, and the mining of minerals such as sulfur, ammonia, lead and iron. The first large factory complexes (tiraz) were built for many of these industries. Knowledge of these industries were later transmitted to medieval Europe, especially during the translations of the 12th century, as well as before and after. The agricultural and handicraft industries also experienced high levels of growth during this period.(In Islamic governments such as the Caliphate, the tax collection, rather than being wasted on temples or courts, was invested industrial development, such as the Fatimid governments investment in the textile industry. In addition to government-owned tiraz textile factories, there were also owned enterprises run largely by landlords who collected taxes and invested them in the textile industry.()Labour forceThe force in the Caliphate were employed from diverse ethnic and religious backgrounds, while both men and women were involved in diverse occupations and economic activities.() Women were employed in a wide range of commercial activities and diverse occupations( in the primary sector (as farmers for example), secondary sector (as workers, dyers, spinners, etc.) and tertiary sector (as investors, doctors, nurses, presidents of guilds, brokers, peddlers, lenders, scholars, etc.).() Muslim women also held a monopoly over certain branches of the industry,( the largest and most specialized and market-oriented industry at the time, in occupations such as spinning, dyeing, and embroidery. In comparison, female rights and labour were relatively uncommon in Europe until the Revolution in the 18th and 19th centuries.(Maya Shatzmiller (1997), Women and Wage Labour in the Medieval Islamic West: Legal Issues in an Economic Context, Journal of the Economic and Social History of the Orient 40 (2), pp. 174206 1757.)The of labour was diverse and had been evolving over the centuries. During the 8th11th centuries, there were on average 63 unique occupations in the sector of economic activity (extractive), 697 unique occupations in the sector (manufacturing), and 736 unique occupations in the sector (service). By the 12th century, the number of unique occupations in the primary sector and secondary sector decreased to 35 and 679 respectively, while the number of unique occupations in the tertiary sector increased to 1,175. These changes in the division of labour reflect the increased mechanization and use of machinery to replace labour and the increased of living and of life of most citizens in the Caliphate.()An economic transition occurred during this period, due to the diversity of the service sector being far greater than any other previous or contemporary society, and the high degree of integration between the labour force and the economy. Islamic society also experienced a change in attitude towards labour. In previous civilizations such as Greece and in contemporary civilizations such as medieval Europe, intellectuals saw manual labour in a negative light and looked down on them with contempt. This resulted in technological stagnation as they did not see the need for machinery to replace manual labour. In the Islamic world, however, manual labour was seen in a far more positive light, as intellectuals such as the of Purity likened them to a participant in the act of creation, while Khaldun alluded to the benefits of manual labour to the progress of society.()By the early 10th century, the idea of the degree was introduced and being granted at Maktab schools, Madrasah colleges and Bimaristan hospitals. In the medical field in particular, the Ijazah certificate was granted to those qualified to be practicing physicians, in order to differentiate them from unqualified quacks.()UrbanizationThere was a significant increase in urbanization during this period, due to numerous scientific advances in fields such as agriculture, hygiene, sanitation, astronomy, medicine and engineering. This also resulted in a rising class population.(Avner Greif (1989), Reputation and Coalitions in Medieval Trade: Evidence on the Maghribi Traders, The Journal of Economic History 49 (4), pp. 85782 874.)As urbanization increased, Muslim cities growth was largely unregulated, resulting in narrow winding city streets and neighborhoods separated by different ethnic backgrounds and religious affiliations. Suburbs lay just outside the walled city, from wealthy residential communities, to working class semi-slums. City garbage dumps were located far from the city, as were clearly defined cemeteries which were often homes for criminals. A place of prayer was found near one of the main gates, for religious festivals and public executions. Similarly, Military Training grounds were found near a main gate.While varying in appearance due to climate and prior local traditions, Islamic cities were almost always dominated by a merchant middle class. Some peoples loyalty towards their neighborhood was very strong, reflecting ethnicity and religion, while a sense of citizenship was at times uncommon (but not in every case). The extended family provided the foundation for social programs, business deals, and negotiations with authorities. Part of this economic and social unit were often the tenants of a wealthy landlord.State power normally focused on Dar al Imara, the governors office in the citadel. These fortresses towered high above the city built on thousands of years of human settlement. The primary function of the city governor was to provide for defence and to maintain legal order. This system would be responsible for a mixture of autocracy and autonomy within the city. Each neighborhood, and many of the large tenement blocks, elected a representative to deal with urban authorities. These neighborhoods were also expected to organize their young men into a militia providing for protection of their own neighborhoods, and as aid to the professional armies defending the city as a whole.The head of the family was given the position of authority in his household, although a qadi, or judge was able to negotiate and resolve differences in issues of disagreements within families and between them. The two senior representatives of municipal authority were the qadi and the muhtasib, who held the responsibilities of many issues, including quality of water, maintenance of city streets, containing outbreaks of disease, supervising the markets, and a prompt burial of the dead.Another aspect of Islamic urban life was waqf, a religious charity directly dealing with the qadi and religious leaders. Through donations, the waqf owned many of the baths and factories, using the revenue to fund education, and to provide irrigation for orchards outside the city. Following expansion, this system was introduced into Eastern Europe by Ottoman Turks.While religious foundations of all faiths were tax exempt in the Muslim world, civilians paid their taxes to the urban authorities, soldiers to the superior officer, and landowners to the state treasury. Taxes were also levied on an unmarried man until he was wed. Instead of zakat, the mandatory charity required of Muslims, non-Muslims were required to pay the jizya, a discriminatory religious tax, imposed on Christians and Jews. During the Muslim Conquests of the 7th and 8th centuries conquered populations were given the three choices of either converting to Islam, paying the jizya, or dying by the sword.Animals brought to the city for slaughter were restricted to areas outside the city, as were any other industries seen as unclean. The more valuable a good was, the closer its market was to the center of town. Because of this, booksellers and goldsmiths clustered around the main mosque at the heart of the city.By the 10th century, the library of Cairo had more than 100,000 books, while the library of Tripoli is said to have had as many as three million books. The number of important and original Arabic works on science that have survived is much larger than the combined total of Greek and Latin works on science.(N. M. Swerdlow (1993). Montuclas Legacy: The History of the Exact Sciences, Journal of the History of Ideas 54 (2), pp. 299328 320.)Classical Islamic economic thoughtTo some degree, the early Muslims based their economic analyses on the Quran (such as opposition to riba, meaning usury or interest), and from sunnah, the sayings and doings of Muhammad.Early Islamic economic thinkersAl-Ghazali (10581111) classified economics as one of the sciences connected with religion, along with metaphysics, ethics, and psychology.  Authors have noted, however, that this connection has not caused early Muslim economic thought to remain static.(Spengler (1964) p274) Persian philosopher Nasir al-Din al-Tusi (12011274) presents an early definition of economics (what he calls hekmat-e-madani, the science of city life) in discourse three of his Ethics:Many scholars trace the history of economic thought through the Muslim world, which was in a Golden Age from the 8th to 13th century and whose philosophy continued the work of the Greek and Hellenistic thinkers and came to influence Aquinas when Europe rediscovered Greek philosophy through Arabic translation.(October 1581   Matthew E. Falagas, Effie A. Zarkadoulia, George Samonis (2006). Arab science in the golden age (7501258 C.E.) and today, The FASEB Journal 20, p. 1581-1586.) A common theme among these scholars was the praise of economic activity and even self-interested accumulation of wealth.(Hosseini (2003) p36)Persian philosopher Miskawayh (b. 1030) notes:This view is in conflict with an idea Schumpeter called the great gap. The great gap thesis comes out of Schumpeters 1954 History of Economic Analysis which discusses a break in economic thought during the five hundred year period between the decline of the Greco-Roman civilizations and the work of Thomas Aquinas (12251274).(Schumpeter (1954))  However in 1964, Joseph Spenglers Economic Thought of Islam: Ibn Khaldun appeared in the journal Comparative Studies in Society and History and took a large step in bringing early Muslim scholars to the attention of the contemporary West.(The prevalence and error of Schumpeters thesis and the importance of Spenglers paper are discussed in Hosseini (2003).)The influence of earlier Greek and Hellenistic thought on the Muslim world began largely with Abbasid caliph al-Mamun, who sponsored the translation of Greek texts into Arabic in the 9th century by Syrian Christians in Baghdad. But already by that time numerous Muslim scholars had written on economic issues, and early Muslim leaders had shown sophisticated attempts to enforce fiscal and monetary financing, use deficit financing, use taxes to encourage production, the use of credit instruments for banking, including rudimentary savings and checking accounts, and contract law.(Hosseini (2003) p 33)Among the earliest Muslim economic thinkers was Yusuf (731-798), a student of the founder of the Hanafi Sunni School of Islamic thought, Hanifah.  Abu Yusuf was chief jurist for Abbasid Caliph al-Rashid, for whom he wrote the  Book of Taxation (Kitab al-Kharaj).  This book outlined Abu Yusufs ideas on taxation, public finance, and agricultural production.  He discussed proportional tax on produce instead of fixed taxes on property as being superior as an incentive to bring more land into cultivation.  He also advocated forgiving tax policies which favor the producer and a centralized tax administration to reduce corruption.  Abu Yusuf favored the use of tax revenues for socioeconomic infrastructure, and included discussion of various types of taxes, including sales tax, death taxes, and import tariffs.(Hosseini (2003) p 34)Early discussion of the benefits of division of labor are included in the writings of Qabus, al-Ghazali, al-Farabi (873950), Ibn Sina (Avicenna) (9801037), Miskawayh, Nasir al-Din al-Tusi (120174), Khaldun (13321406), and Asaad Davani (b. 1444). Among them, the discussions included division of labor within households, societies, factories, and among nations.  Farabi notes that each society lacks at least some necessary resources, and thus an optimal society can only be achieved where domestic, regional, and international trade occur, and that such trade can be beneficial to all parties involved.(Farabi, Abu Nassr 1982: Madineh Fazeleh (Good City), Persian translation by Sajadi. Teheran, Iran: Zuhuri. p25)  Ghazali was also noted for his subtle understanding of monetary theory and formulation of another version of Law.The power of and demand was understood to some extent by various early Muslim scholars as well. Taymiyyah illustrates:Ibn Taymiyyah also elaborated a circumstantial analysis of the market mechanism, with a theoretical insight unusual in his time. His discourses on the welfare advantages and disadvantages of market regulation and deregulation, have an almost contemporary ring to them.()Ghazali suggests an early version of price inelasticity of demand for certain goods, and he and Ibn Miskawayh discuss equilibrium prices.(Hosseini (2003), p. 38) Other important Muslim scholars who wrote about economics include al-Mawardi (10751158), Taimiyah (12631328), and al-Maqrizi.RibaThe common view of riba (usury) among classical jurists of Islamic law and economics during the Golden Age was that it is only riba and therefore unlawful to apply interest to money exnatura suaexclusively gold and silver currenciesbut that it is not riba and is therefore acceptable to apply interest to fiat moneycurrencies made up of other materials such as paper or metalsto an extent.()The definition of riba in classical Islamic jurisprudence was value without counterpart. When currencies of base metal were first introduced in the Islamic world, no jurist ever thought that paying a debt in a higher number of units of this fiat money was riba as they were concerned with the value of money rather than the numerical value. For example, it was acceptable for a loan of 1000 gold dinars to be paid back as 1050 dinars of total equal mass. The rationale behind riba according to classical Islamic jurists was to ensure equivalency in real value and that the numerical value was immaterial. Thus an interest rate that did not exceed the rate of inflation was not riba according to classical Islamic jurists.()Ibn KhaldunImage:Ibn Khaldoun.jpg|thumb|150px|Statue of Ibn Khaldoun in TunisPerhaps the best known Islamic scholar who wrote about economics was Ibn Khaldun of Tunisia (1332&ndash;1406),(Schumpeter (1954) p 136 mentions his sociology, others, including Hosseini (2003) emphasize him as well) who is considered a forerunner of modern economics.((Jean David C. Boulakia (1971), Ibn Khaldun: A Fourteenth-Century Economist, The Journal of Political Economy 79 (5): 1105-1118.)  Ibn Khaldun wrote on economic and political theory in the introduction, or Muqaddimah (Prolegomena), of his History of the World (Kitab al-Ibar).  In the book, he discussed what he called asabiyya (social cohesion), which he sourced as the cause of some civilizations becoming great and others not.  Ibn Khaldun felt that many social forces are cyclic, although there can be sudden sharp turns that break the pattern.(Weiss (1995) p29-30)  His idea about the benefits of the division of labor also relate to asabiyya, the greater the social cohesion, the more complex the successful division may be, the greater the economic growth.  He noted that growth and development positively stimulates both supply and demand, and that the forces of supply and demand are what determines the prices of goods.(Weiss (1995) p31 quotes Muqaddimah 2:276-278)  He also noted macroeconomic forces of population growth, capital development, and technological developments effects on development.(Weiss (1995) p31 quotes Muqaddimah 2:272-273)  In fact, Ibn Khaldun thought that population growth was directly a function of wealth.(Weiss (1995) p33)Although he understood that money served as a standard of value, a medium of exchange, and a preserver of value, he did not realize that the value of gold and silver changed based on the forces of supply and demand.(Weiss (1995) p 32)  He also introduced the concept known as the Curve (the relationship between tax rates and tax revenue increases as tax rates increase for a while, but then the increases in tax rates begin to cause a decrease in tax revenues as the taxes impose too great a cost to producers in the economy).Ibn Khaldun used a dialectic approach to describe the sociological implications of tax choices, which is now of course part of economics:In the early stages of the state, taxes are light in their incidence, but fetch in a large revenue...As time passes and kings succeed each other, they lose their tribal habits in favor of more civilized ones. Their needs and exigencies grow...owing to the luxury in which they have been brought up. Hence they impose fresh taxes on their subjects...and sharply raise the rate of old taxes to increase their yield...But the effects on business of this rise in taxation make themselves felt. For business men are soon discouraged by the comparison of their profits with the burden of their taxes...Consequently production falls off, and with it the yield of taxation.This analysis anticipates the modern economic concept known as the Curve.Ibn Khaldun also introduced the theory of value. He described labor as the source of value, necessary for all earnings and capital accumulation, obvious in the case of craft. He argued that even if earning results from something other than a craft, the value of the resulting profit and acquired (capital) must (also) include the value of the labor by which it was obtained. Without labor, it would not have been acquired.(I. M. Oweiss (1988), Ibn Khaldun, the Father of Economics, Arab Civilization: Challenges and Responses, York University Press, ISBN 0887066984.)His theory of asabiyyah has often been compared to modern economics, with Ibn Khalduns theory clearly containing the concept of the multiplier. A crucial difference, however, is that whereas for Maynard Keynes it is the classs greater propensity to save that is to blame for economic depression, for Ibn Khaldun it is the governmental propensity to save at times when investment opportunities do not take up the slack which leads to demand.()Another modern economic theory anticipated by Ibn Khaldun is economics.() He argued that high taxes were often a factor in causing empires to collapse, with the result that lower revenue was collected from high rates. He wrote:()Post-colonial eraDuring the modern post-colonial era, as Western ideas, including Western economics, began to influence the Muslim world, some Muslim writers sought to produce an Islamic discipline of economics. Because Islam is not merely a spiritual formula but a complete system of life in all its walks,(The Economic Life of Islam) it logically followed that Islam also had its own economic system unique from and superior to non-Islamic systems.(  To date, however, there have been no agreement as to the methodological definition and scope of Islamic Economics.In the 1960s and 70s Shia Islamic thinkers worked to develop a unique Islamic economic philosophy with its own answers to contemporary economic problems.  Several works were particularly influential,*Eslam va Malekiyyat (Islam and Property) by Mahmud Taleqani (1951),*Iqtisaduna (Our Economics) by Baqir al-Sadr (1961) and*Eqtesad-e Towhidi (The Economics of Divine Harmony) by Banisadr (1978)*Some Interpretations of Property Rights, Capital and Labor from Islamic Perspective by Habibullah Peyman (1979).(Bakhash, Shaul, The Reign of the Ayatollahs, Basic Books, c1984, p.167-8)(Revolutionary Surge and Quiet Demise of Islamic Economics in Iran)Al-Sadr in particular has been described as having almost single-handedly developed the notion of Islamic economics (The Renewal of Islamic Law)In their writings Sadr and the other Shia authors sought to depict Islam as a religion committed to social justice, the equitable distribution of wealth, and the cause of the deprived classes, with doctrines acceptable to Islamic jurists, while refuting existing non-Islamic theories of capitalism and Marxism. This version of Islamic economics, which influenced the Revolution, called for public ownership of land and of large industrial enterprises, while private economic activity continued within reasonable limits.  (Bakhash, Shaul, The Reign of the Ayatollahs, Basic Books, c1984, p.172-3)  These ideas helped shape the large public sector and public subsidy policies of the Iranian Islamic revolution.In the 1980s and 1990s, as the Iranian revolution failed to reach the per capita income level achieved by the regime it overthrew, and Communist states and socialist parties in the non-Muslim world turned away from socialism, Muslim interest shifted away from government ownership and regulation.  In Iran, it is reported that eqtesad-e Eslami (meaning both Islamic economics and economy) ... once a revolutionary shibboleth, is indubitably absent in all official documents and the media. It disapperared from Iranian political discourse about 15 years ago 1990. (But in other parts of the Muslim world the term lived on, shifting form to the less ambitious goal of interest-free banking.  Some Muslim bankers and religious leaders suggested ways to integrate Islamic law on usage of money with modern concepts of ethical investing.  In banking this was done through the use of sales transactions (focusing on the fixed rate return modes) to achieve similar results to interest. This has been criticised by some western writers as a means of covering conventional banking with an Islamic facade.Traditional approachWhile most Muslims believe Islamic law is perfect by virtue of its being revealed by God, Islamic law on economic issues was/is not economics in the sense of a systematic study of production, distribution, and consumption of goods and services.Contemporary economicsIn modern times, economic policies of the 1979 Revolution in predominately Shia Iran were heavily statist with a very large public sector, and official rhetoric celebrating revolution and the rights of the dispossessed, although this tendency has faded over time.(Roy, Olivier, Failure of Political Islam, Harvard University Press, (1994), p.138)  In Sudan, the policies of the Islamic Front party dominated regime in the 1990s have been the reverse, employing liberalism and accepting market forces in the formulation of state policies. In Algeria, Jordan, Egypt, and Pakistan, Islamist parties have supported populist policies, showing a marked reluctance to adopt austerity policies and decreased subsidies. (Fuller, Graham E., The Future of Political Islam, Palgrave MacMillan, (2003), p.142)In recent years, Turkey had a rapidly growing economy and became a developed country according to the CIA.(Developed Countries, World Factbook, CIA.) Indonesia, Arabia and Turkey are members of the major economies.In 2008, at least $500 billion in assets around the world were managed in accordance with Sharia, or Islamic law, and the sector was growing at more than 10% per year. Islamic finance seeks to promote social justice by banning exploitative practices. In reality, this boils down to a set of prohibitionson paying interest, on gambling with derivatives and options, and on investing in firms that make pornography or pork.(Islamic Finance, Forbes (April 21, 2008))Another form of modern finance that originated from the Muslim world is microcredit and microfinance. It began in the 1970s in Bangladesh with Bank, founded by Yunus, recipient of the 2006 Peace Prize.Land reformOne issue generally absent from contemporary Islamist economic thought (with the exception of Qutb) and action whether moderate or radical is the question of reform. Opposition to agrarian reform even played a role in Islamist uprisings (Iran 1963, Afghanistan, 1978).( At least one observer (Olivier Roy) believes this is primarily because it would imply a reexamination of the concept of ownership, and in particular throw into question the Waqf, endowments whose revenue ensures the functioning of religious institutions.( In the Islamic Republic of Iran, for example, waqf holdings are very large (in Province, 50% of the cultivated lands belong to the religious foundation Astan-i Quds, which oversees the Reza shrine in Mashhad).( Thus questioning waqf property would mean questioning the foundation of the financial autonomy of the mullahs and mosques, particularly among Shia Muslims.(Roy, Olivier, The Failure of Political Islam translated by Carol Volk Harvard University Press, 1994, p.136)See also*Jones Islamic Fund*Jones Islamic Index;Banks*Development Bank*Islam Malaysia*Muamalat Malaysia*Islamic Bank*Bank of Britain*Bank LimitedReferencesFurther reading******** Waleed Addas (2008).  Methodology of Economics: Secular versus Islamicekonomi Islam di dunia 
7770444
Agriculture_in_Mongolia
thumb|right|340px||Mongolian landscapeAgriculture in Mongolia constitutes 20.6% of Mongolias annual domestic product and employs 42% of the labor force. However, the high altitude, extreme fluctuation in temperature, long winters, and low precipitation provides limited potential for agricultural development. Because of Mongolias harsh climate, it is unsuited to most cultivation. Only 1% of the arable land in Mongolia is cultivated with crops, amounting to 1,322,000 hectares (3,266,000 acres) in 1998.()  The agriculture sector therefore remains heavily focused on nomadic animal husbandry with 75% of the land allocated to pasture, and cropping only employing 3% of the population. Crops produced in Mongolia include corn, wheat, barley, and potatoes.  Animals raised commercially in Mongolia include sheep, goats, cattle, horses, camels, and pigs. They are raised primarily for their meat, although goats are valued for their hair which can be used to produce cashmere.History and growth of productionIn the late 1980s, agriculture was a small but critical sector of the Mongolian economy. In 1985 agriculture accounted for only 18.3 percent of national income and 33.8 percent of the labor force.() Nevertheless, agriculture remained economically important because much of Mongolias industry processed agricultural products, foodstuffs, timber, and animal products, such as skins and hides for domestic consumption and for export. In 1986 agriculture supplied nearly 60 percent of Mongolias exports.(Mongolian agriculture developed slowly. An abortive attempt to collectivize all arads occurred in the early 1930s; efforts to encourage voluntary cooperatives and arad producers associations followed. In the 1930s, the government also began developing state farms, and by 1940 there were ten state farms and ninety-one agricultural cooperatives. In 1937 the Union provided ten hay-making machine stations to prepare fodder for livestock. In 1940 agriculture represented 61 percent of national income, and it employed approximately 90 percent of the labor force.(In the 1950s, agriculture began to adopt its present structure and modern techniques, based in part on material and technical assistance from the Soviet Union and East European countries. In the 1950s, the hay-making machine stations were reorganized as livestock machine stations. In 1955 negdels replaced the arad producers associations. By 1959 the state had accomplished the collectivization of agriculture.(  In ten years, agricultural cooperatives had more than doubled, from 139 in 1950 to 354 by 1960. Ownership of livestock and sown areas changed dramatically as a result of collectivization. In 1950, according to Mongolian government statistics, state farms and other state organizations owned approximately 0.9 percent of livestock and 37.8 percent of sown areas; negdels had about 0.5 percent of livestock and no sown lands; and private owners some held 98.3 percent of livestock and 62.2 percent of sown areas.( In 1960 state farms and other state organizations owned 2.7 percent of livestock; negdels, 73.8 percent; and individual negdel members, 23.5 percent.(  The state sector owned 77.5 percent of sown lands, and the cooperative sector the remainder.Image:Mongolischer Yak.JPG|thumb|left|280px|The Mongolian yak which still plays a role in farming in the least developed and poorer parts of MongoliaBy 1960 agricultures share of national income had fallen to 22.9 percent, but agriculture still employed 60.8 percent of the work force.(  After 1960 the number of state farms increased, state fodder supply farms were established, the number of negdels decreased through consolidation, and interagricultural cooperative associations were organized to facilitate negdel specialization and cooperation.(  Mongolia also began receiving large-scale agricultural assistance from the Soviet Union and other East European countries after Mongolias 1962 entry into Comecon. The Soviet Union, for example, assisted in establishing and equipping several new state farms, and Hungary helped with irrigation. In 1967 the Third Congress of Agricultural Association Members founded the of Agricultural Associations to supervise negdels and to represent their interests to the government and to other cooperative and social organizations. The union elected a central council, the chairman of which was, ex officio, the minister of agriculture; it also adopted a Model Charter to govern members rights and obligations.( In 1969 the state handed over the livestock machine stations to the negdels.Negdels, which concentrated on livestock production, were organized into brigad (brigades) and then into suuri (bases), composed of several households. Each suuri had its own equipment and production tasks. Negdels adopted the Soviet system of herding, in which arad households lived in permanent settlements rather than traveling with their herds, as in the pastoral tradition. In 1985 the average negdel had 61,500 head of livestock, 438,500 hectares of land, of which 1,200 hectares was plowable land, 43 tractors, 2 grain harvesters, and 18 motor vehicles; it harvested 500 tons of grain.(  Individual negdel members were permitted to own livestock. In mountain steppe pasture areas, ten head of livestock per person, up to fifty head per household, were allowed. In desert regions, fifteen head per person, up to seventy-five head per household, were permitted. Private plots also were allowed for negdel farmers.State farms, compared with negdels, had more capital invested, were more highly mechanized, and generally were located in the most productive regions, or close to major mining and industrial complexes. State farms engaged primarily in crop production. In 1985 there were 52 state farms, 17 fodder supply farms, and 255 negdels. In 1985 the average state farm employed 500 workers; owned 26,200 head of livestock, 178,600 hectares of land, of which 15,400 hectares was plowable land, 265 tractors, 36 grain harvesters, and 40 motor vehicles; it harvested 12,100 tons of grain.(In the late 1980s, several changes in governmental organization occurred to facilitate agricultural development. In October 1986, the Ministry of Agriculture absorbed the Ministry of Water Economy, which had controlled irrigation. In December 1987, the Ministry of Agriculture, the Ministry of Forestry and Woodworking, and the Ministry of Food and Light Industries were abolished and two new ministries, the Ministry of Agriculture and Food Industry, and the Ministry of Environmental Protection were established.(  Among the functions of the Ministry of Agriculture and Food Industry were the further coordination of agriculture and of industrial food processing to boost the food supply, and the development on state farms of agro-industrial complexes, which had processing plants for foodstuffs. The Sharin Gol state farm, for example, grew fruits and vegetables, which then were processed in the state farms factories to produce fruit, fruit juices, fruit and vegetable preserves, and pickled vegetables. The Ministry of Environmental Protection incorporated the Forestry and Hunting Economy Section of the former Ministry of Forestry and Woodworking and the State Land and Water Utilization and Protection Service of the former Ministry of Agriculture.(Crop productionSince its inception, the Mongolian Peoples Republic has devoted considerable resources to developing crop production in what was a predominantly nomadic, pastoral economy. Mongols traditionally disdained the raising of crops, which was conducted for the most part by Chinese farmers.( Early efforts to force arads to become farmers failed, and the government turned to the creation of state farms to promote crop production. By 1941 when the state had established ten state farms, Mongolia had 26,600 hectares of sown land. State farms, however, accounted for only 29.6 percent of the planted areas.(After War II, Mongolia intensified efforts to expand crop production by establishing more state farms, by reclaiming virgin lands for crop raising, by mechanizing farm operations, and by developing irrigation systems for farmlands. When Mongolia began to report statistics on arable land in 1960, there were 532,000 hectares of arable land, and sown crops covered 265,000 hectares of the 477,000 hectares of plow land. Mongolias 25 state farms accounted for 77.5 percent of sown areas, and cooperatives, for 22.5 percent.( In 1985 when 52 state farms and 17 fodder supply farms existed, there were about 1.2 million hectares of arable land, and sown crops covered 789,600 hectares of the approximately 1 million hectares of plow land.( The state sector accounted for 80.6 percent of sown areas, and cooperatives, for 19.4 percent. Development of virgin lands by state farms was responsible for most of the expansion of arable land and sown areas. Land reclamation started in the late 1950s and the early 1960s, when 530,000 hectares were developed, and it continued throughout each five-year plan. During the Seventh Plan, 250,000 hectares were assimilated, and the Eighth Plan called for an additional 120,000 to 130,000 hectares to be reclaimed.(Mechanization of farm operations commenced on a large scale in the 1950s with Soviet assistance. The Soviet Union provided most agricultural machines, as well as advice and expertise in mechanization. State farms were more highly mechanized than cooperatives. For example, in 1985, 100 percent of potato planting and 84 percent of potato harvesting were mechanized on state farms, compared with 85 percent and 35 percent, respectively, in negdels. Beginning in the 1960s, state farms also pioneered the development of irrigation systems for crops. By 1985 Mongolia had 85,200 hectares of available irrigated land, of which 81,600 hectares actually were irrigated.(Crop production initially concentrated on raising cereals; in 1941 cereals covered 95.1 percent of sown areas, while 3.4 percent was devoted to potatoes and 1.5 percent to vegetables. Cultivation of fodder crops began in the 1950s. In 1985 cereals covered 80.6 percent of sown areas, fodder crops 17.7 percent, potatoes 1.3 percent, and vegetables 0.4 percent. Mongolias staple crops were wheat, barley, oats, potatoes, vegetables, hay, and silage crops.( Since 1960 agricultural performance as measured by gross output, per capita output, and crop yields was uneven. Although sown acreage expanded dramatically between 1960 and 1980, output and crop yields remained stagnant and, in some cases, fell because of natural disasters and poor management. In addition to the staple crops mentioned, Mongolia also produced small quantities of oil-yielding crops, such as sunflower and grape, and fruits and vegetables, such as sea buckthorn, apples, European currants, watermelons, muskmelons, onions, and garlic.( Small amounts of alfalfa, soybean, millet, and peas also were grown to provide protein fodder.The Eighth Plan called for increasing the average annual gross harvest of cereals to between 780,000 and 800,000 tons; potatoes to between 150,000 and 160,000 tons; vegetables to between 50,000 and 80,000 tons; silage crops to between 280,000 and 300,000 tons; and annual and perennial fodder crops to between 330,000 and 360,000 tons.( Emphasis was placed on raising crop production and quality by increasing mechanization, improving and expanding acreage, raising crop yields, expanding irrigation, selecting cereal varieties better adapted to natural climatic conditions and better locations for cereal cultivation.(  It also meant applying greater volumes of organic and mineral fertilizers; building more storage facilities; reducing losses because of pests, weeds, and plant diseases; and preventing erosion.( Emphasis also was put on improving management of crop production on state farms and negdels as well as of procurement, transport, processing, and storage of agricultural products.thumb|center|880px|Sheep farming in the Terelj National ParkAnimal husbandrythumb|right|340px|Animals grazing on the Mongolian steppe landsFrom prerevolutionary times until well into the 1970s, husbandry was the mainstay of the Mongolian economy. In the traditional economy, livestock provided foodstuffs and clothing; after the 1921 revolution, livestock supplied foodstuffs and raw materials for industries and for export. Mongolia had 9.6 million head of livestock in 1918 and 13.8 million head in 1924; arad ownership was estimated to be 50 to 80 percent of all livestock, and monastic and aristocratic ownership to be 50 to 20 percent.( Policies designed to force collectivization in the early 1930s met with arad resistance, including the slaughter of their own animals. Reversal of these policies led to a growth in livestock numbers, which peaked in 1941 at 27.5 million head. War II brought new commitments to provide food and raw materials for the Soviet war effort. With the levy of taxes in kind, livestock numbers fell to about 20 million in 1945, and they have hovered between 20 million and 24 million head since then.( Collectivization and advances in veterinary science have failed to boost livestock production significantly since the late 1940s. In 1940 animal husbandry produced 99.6 percent of gross agricultural output. The share of animal husbandry in gross agricultural output declined after World War II, to 71.8 percent in 1960, 81.6 percent in 1970, 79.5 percent in 1980, and 70 percent in 1985.( The rise in crop production since 1940 has accounted for animal husbandrys decline in gross agricultural output.Nevertheless, in the late 1980s, animal husbandry continued to be an important component of the national economy, supplying foodstuffs and raw materials for domestic consumption, for processing by industry, and for export. In 1985 there were 22,485,500 head of livestock, of which 58.9 percent were sheep; 19.1 percent, goats; 10.7 percent, cattle; 8.8 percent, horses; and 2.5 percent, camels. In addition, pigs, poultry, and bees were raised. In 1985 there were 56,100 pigs and 271,300 head of poultry; no figures were available on apiculture. Livestock products included meat and fat from camels, cattle, chickens, horses, goats, pigs and sheep; eggs; honey; milk; wool from camels, cattle, goats, and sheep; and hides and skins from camels, cattle, goats, horses, and sheep. In 1986 exports of livestock products included 15,500 tons of wool, 121,000 large hides, 1,256,000 small hides, and 44,100 tons of meat and meat products.(thumb|left|180px|Camels in the Gobi. Camels are productive animals, producing meat and fat and also hide and skin for saleIn the late 1980s, differences existed in ownership and productivity of livestock among state farms, agricultural cooperatives, and individual cooperative members. For example, in 1985 agricultural cooperatives owned 70.1 percent of the five animals, camels, cattle, goats, horses, and sheep; state farms, 6 percent, other state organizations, 1.7 percent; and individual cooperative members, 22.2 percent. State farms raised 81.4 percent of all poultry; other state organizations, 3.3 percent; cooperatives, 12.9 percent; and individual cooperative members, 2.4 percent. State farms accounted for 19.1 percent of pig raising; other state organizations, for 34.2 percent; agricultural cooperatives, for 12.5 percent; and individual cooperative members, for 34.2 percent.( Survival rates of young livestock were higher in the cooperatives than on state farms; however, state farms produced higher yields of milk and wool. Fodder for livestock in the agricultural cooperatives was supplemented by production on state fodder supply farms and on state farms, which had higher output and yields.thumb|right|300px|Mongolian women laying out milk curdsDespite its economic importance, in the late 1980s animal husbandry faced many problems: labor shortages, stagnant production and yields, inclement weather, poor management, diseases, and the necessity to use breeding stock to meet high export quotas.( The Eighth Plan attempted to address some of these problems. To alleviate labor shortages, the plan called for higher income, increased mechanization, and improved working and cultural conditions in rural areas to retain animal husbandry workers, particularly those with technical training. Measures to raise productivity included increased mechanization; improved breeding techniques to boost meat, milk, and wool yields and to cut losses from barrenness and miscarriages; and strengthened veterinary services to reduce illness.( Additional livestock facilities were to be built to provide shelter from harsh winter weather and to fatten livestock. More efficient use of fodder was sought through expanding production; improving varieties; and decreasing losses in procurement, shipping, processing, and storage. Pastureland was to be improved by expanding irrigation and by combating pests.Overcoming poor management was more difficult. Local party, state, and cooperative organizations were admonished to manage animal husbandry more efficiently, and cooperative members were requested to care for collectively owned livestock as if it were their own. In addition, more concrete measures to improve the management and the productivity of animal husbandry were adopted in the late 1980s. The individual livestock holdings of workers, employees, and citizens were increased to eight head per household in major towns, sixteen head in smaller towns, and twenty-five head in rural areas; households were allowed to dispose of surplus produce through the cooperative trade network and through the state procurement system.( Auxiliary farms run by factories, offices, and schools were established to raise additional pigs, poultry, and rabbits, as well as to grow some vegetables. Family contracts concluded on a voluntary basis with cooperatives or with state farms were reported by the government to increase high-quality output, to lower production expenses, and to enhance production efficiency.As of 2006, livestock still constituted 80% of Mongolian agricultural output.(Montsame News Agency.  Mongolia.  2006, Foreign Service Office of News Agency, ISBN 9992906278, p. 97)  97% of Mongolian livestock remained privately owned.(Montsame News Agency.  Mongolia.  2006, Foreign Service Office of News Agency, ISBN 9992906278, p. 98)Forestrythumb|right|340px|Mongolian forest interspersed with lakes and riversMongolias vast forests (15 million hectares) are utilized for timber, hunting, and fur-bearing animals. In 1984 a Mongolian source stated that the forestry sector accounted for about one-sixth of national product (GNP).( Until December 1987, exploitation of these resources was supervised by the Forestry and Hunting Economy Section of the Ministry of Forestry and Woodworking. In that month this section was integrated into the new Ministry of Environmental Protection. The woodworking component of the former ministry presumably became part of the new Ministry of Light Industry. The Ministry of Environmental Protections assumption of control of forest resources reflected the governments concern over degradation resulting from indiscriminate deforestation. Forestry enterprises reafforested only 5,000 hectares of the 20,000 hectares felled annually. In addition, fires engulfed 1 million hectares of forest between 1980 and 1986. Mongolias shrinking forests lowered water levels in many tributaries of the Selenge and Orhon rivers, hurting conservation and creating water shortages in Ulaanbaatar.Timber enterprises and their downstream industries made a sizable contribution to the economy, accounting for 10 percent of gross industrial output in 1985. Approximately 2.5 million cubic meters of timber were cut annually. wood accounted for about 55 percent of the timber cut, and the remainder was processed by the woodworking industry.( In 1986 Mongolia produced 627,000 cubic meters of sawn timber, of which 121,000 cubic meters was exported. Lumber also was exported; lumber exports declined dramatically from 104,000 cubic meters in 1984 to 85,700 cubic meters in 1985 and to 39,000 cubic meters in 1986.(Mongolias forests and steppes abounded with animals that were hunted for their fur, meat, and other products in the late 1980s. Fur-bearing animals included marmots, muskrats, squirrels, foxes, korsak (steppe foxes), and wolves, which were hunted, and such animals as deer, sable, and ermine, which were raised on state animal farms.( Animal pelts were exported in large numbers. In 1985 Mongolia exported more than 1 million small hides, which included some of the 763,400 marmot pelts, 23,800 squirrel skins, 3,700 wolf skins, and other furs.( Marmot also was hunted for its fat, which was processed industrially. gazelles were hunted for their meat, and red deer, for their antler velvet. Organized hunting of wild sheep was a foreign tourist attraction.Fishingthumb|right|340px|Mongolias rivers provide a source of freshwater fishMongolias lakes and rivers teem with fish. Mongolia has developed a small-scale fishing industry, to export canned fish. Little information was available on the types and the quantities of fish processed for export, but in 1986, the total fish catch was 400 metric tons in live weight.See also*in Central AsiaReferencesExternal links* Ministry of Food, Agriculture and Light Industry* Water Agency of Mongolia  
7781674
Nundle,_New_South_Wales
 coordinates  thumb|The Primitive Methodist Church built in 1882thumb|A shop, Jenkins St, Nundle, NSWNundle is a village in the New England region of South Wales, Australia.  It was formerly the centre of Nundle Shire Local Government Area, but most of this area, including the village of Nundle, was absorbed into Regional Council in 2004. The village is 400 km north of Sydney and about 56 km south east of Tamworth past Chaffey Dam via a good sealed road. At the 2006 census Nundle had a population of 289.( Nundle is located at the southern end of Way. HistoryNundle was established at the foot of the Dividing Range when gold was discovered at The Hanging Rock and nearby Swamp Creek in 1852. By June 1852 there were 300 diggers on the fields at Oakenville Creek.(Gold and Grit, A History of Nundle Shire Council, 1906-1981, Ian Lobsey,) Prospectors from California, Europe and China were also digging along the Peel River and up the mountain slopes. By 1865 the population was around 500 with about 50 businesses in operation. A public school was completed during December, 1871 and lessons commenced there in 1872.(Nundle Public School, 125 Year of Education, Judith Baldock, 1997)  Nundle was declared a town in 1885. In 1924 the Peel River Bridge was constructed and in 1941 electricity was connected to the town. During 1966 the swimming pool was opened by the Rt Hon. Sinclair. The population of Nundle Shire was 1350 in 1969. In 1979 Premier Wran opened the newly completed Chaffey Dam. Sheep, cattle and timber are the economic mainstays of this village nowadays.This is a scenic village, with historic buildings, the Nundle Woollen Mill, old Court House, Peel Inn and Primitive Methodist Church which are a few examples of existing 19th century architecture there. Nundle Courthouse (former) and Police Station have been placed on the of the National Estate. Nundle is noted as one of the best areas in the State for crystals. Some gold and other precious stones to be found include zircons, green jasper, sapphires and serpentine minerals. Nundle is a popular tourist destination for both casual travellers and motorcycle enthusiasts. Nearby is the interesting Hanging Rock mining village with good views of the Nundle valley.In 1948, an ANA DC3 Lutana crashed into Square Peak, north east of Nundle during a service between Brisbane and Sydney in which all passengers and crew were killed.   The plane, found two days after the accident was 100 miles off course.   One of the propellers from the plane was recovered and is now a memorial to the accident in the town.(  Pete-n-Pam.com)A new bridge across the Peel River at Nundle was completed in early 2008, with the funding of $683,000 provided by the NSW State Government.(Northern Daily Leader, 5 April 2008, p.32) In July 2008 the rare arguta was rediscovered in a State Forest near Nundle. This plant was last recorded in 1904 and is believed to have been regenerated after fire control activities the previous summer.(Northern Daily Leader, Foresters Rediscover Rare plant, 9 Jul 2008, p.7 c.1)Facilities*	Caravan and cabin park*	Bus service to Tamworth secondary schools*	General Store*       Nundle Pre-School*	Nundle Public School*	Rural Health Service*	Post office*	Pony Club*	Golf and Bowling Club*	Tennis Club with synthetic surface tennis courts*       Nundle Branch Library ( Part of Central Northern Regional Library )EventsThe annual Go for Gold Festival is held each Easter long-weekend, attracting around 4,000 visitors. Independent State Member for Tamworth told Parliament that visitors had come to Nundle from all points of the compass during the Easter weekend to enjoy the relaxed atmosphere and the beautiful setting. (   The Great Nundle Dog Race, only open to working dogs, is run on the first Sunday in May and attracts many visitors. This event helped to raise money for sporting equipment, computers, books and excursions for students at the Nundle Public School.The first Sunday in November sees the running of both the Le Tour do Rocque (cycle race) & King of the Rock fun run, raising money for the Westpac Helicopter ServiceReferences( Tamworth Information, Tamworth City CouncilExplore Australia, 20th edition, 2002, VikingNew South Wales
7788962
Roman_military_engineering
The military engineering of Romes armed forces were of a scale and frequency far beyond that of any of its contemporaries. Indeed, military engineering was in many ways institutionally endemic in Roman military culture, as demonstrated by the fact that each legionary had as part of his equipment a shovel, alongside his gladius (sword) and pila (spears).Fabri were workers, craftsmen or atisans in Roman society and descriptions of early Roman army structure (Legion assumed) attributed to king Servius Tullius describe there being two centuriae of fabri under an officer, the praefectus fabrum.Roman military engineering took both routine and extraordinary forms, the former a proactive part of standard military procedure, and the latter of an extraordinary or reactionary nature.Proactive and routine military engineeringThe Roman legionary fortified campEach legion had a military legionary fort as its permanent base. However, when on the march, particularly in enemy territory, the legion would, after a days marching, construct a fortified camp or castra, requiring as raw materials only earth, turf and timber. Camp construction were the responsibility of special engineering units to which specialists of many types belonged, officered by architecti (engineers), from a class of troops known as immunes since they were excused from or, literally, immune from, regular duties. These engineers would requisition manual labor from the soldiers at large as required. A legion could throw up a camp under enemy attack in as little as a few hours. Judging from the names, they probably used a repertory of camp plans from a set textbook, selecting the one appropriate to the length of time a legion would spend in it: tertia castra, quarta castra: a camp of three days, four days, etc.Bridge buildingImage:072 Conrad Cichorius, Die Reliefs der Traianssule, Tafel LXXII (Ausschnitt 01).jpg|thumb|Bridge across the Danube, the longest bridge for over a millenniumThe engineers also built bridges from both timber and stone depending on required permanence, time available etc. Some Roman stone bridges survive to this day. Stone bridges were made possible by the innovative use of the keystone to allow an arch construction.  One of the most notable examples of military bridge-building in the Roman Empire was Julius Caesars Bridge over the Rhine River.  This bridge was completed in only ten days and is conservatively estimated to be more than 100 m (300 feet) long.(Nebel, B. Julius Csars Brcke ber den Rhein)(Voggenreiter, A., Historischer Rckblick) The construction was deliberately over-engineered for Caesars stated purpose of impressing the Germanic tribes,(Caesar writes in his War in Gaul that he rejected the idea of simply crossing in boats because it would not be fitting for my own prestige and that of Rome - at the time, he did not know that the Germanic tribes had already in fact withdrawn from the area upon his arrival) who had little experience of engineering, and to emphasise that Rome could travel wherever she wished. Caesar was able to cross over the completed bridge and explore the area uncontested, before crossing back over and dismantling the bridge. Caesar relates in his War in Gaul that he sent messengers to the Sugambri to demand the surrender of those who had made war on me and on Gaul, they replied that the Rhine was the limit of Roman power. The bridge was intended to show otherwise.Engineering siege machinesAlthough most siege engines were adaptations from earlier Greek designs, the Romans were adept at engineering them swiftly and efficiently, as well as innovating variations such as the repeating ballista. The 1st century BC army engineer Vitruvius describes in detail many of the Roman siege machines in his manuscript Architectura.Road makingWhen invading enemy territories, the Roman army would often construct roads as they went, to allow swift reinforcement and resupply, as well as a path for easy retreat if necessary. Roman road-making skills are such that some Roman roads survive to this day. Michael Grant credits the Roman building of the Appia with winning them the Samnite War.(Michael Grant, The History of Rome, p. 52)Civilian engineering by military troopsthumb|Greco-Roman Pentaspastos (Five-pulley-crane), a medium-sized variant (ca. 450 kg load)The Roman army also took part in building projects for civilian use. There were sound reasons for the use of the army in building projects: primarily, that if they werent directly engaged in military campaigns, the legions were largely unproductive, costing the Roman state large sums of money. But the involvement of the soldiers in building works, kept them not only well accustomed to hard physical labour, but also kept them busy, since it was the widely held belief that busy armies werent plotting to mutiny, whereas idle armies were.Of both military and civilian use was the construction of roads within the boundaries of the Empire, in which the army was heavily involved. But so too were soldiers put to use in the construction of town walls, the digging of shipping canals, the drainage of land, aqueducts, harbours, even in the cultivation of vineyards. In some rare cases soldiers were even used in mining work.Mining operationsThey were also skilled in conducting mining operations such as building the many aqueducts needed for prospecting for metal veins, in methods like mining, and the building of reservoirs to hold the water at the minehead. It is likely that they were also capable of building and operating mine equipment such as mills, mills and dewatering machines. It is likely that they were closely involved in exploiting gold resources such as those at Dolaucothi in south west Wales. It was developed soon after conquest of the region under Frontinus, and the local auxiliary troop came from north-west Spain, a country where gold mining developed on a very large scale in the early part of the first century AD.Reactive and extraordinary engineeringThe knowledge and experience learned through such routine engineering lent itself readily to any extraordinary engineering projects required by the army, and it is here that the scale of Roman military engineering exceeded that of any of its contemporaries in both imagination and scope.One of the most famous of such extraordinary constructions was the circumvallation of the entire city of Alesia and its Celtic leader Vercingetorix, within a massive length  of double-wall - one inward-facing to prevent escape or offensive sallies from the city, and one outward-facing to prevent attack by Celtic reinforcements. This wall is estimated to be over  longA second example would be the massive ramp built using thousands of tons of stones and beaten earth up to the invested city of Masada in the Revolt. The siege works and the ramp remain in a remarkable state of preservation today.See also* history of the Roman military*List of Roman Pontoon bridges*architecture*aqueducts*engineering*columnNotesReferencesExternal links* Traianus - Technical investigation of Roman public worksmilitaire (Rome antique)militare (storia romana)inenjerija
